© 2018 Elsevier B.V.As the doped semiconductors can induce and tune the novel physical characteristics. Therefore, we present the investigation of Fe doped SnS nano-crystallites, with xFe = 0.00–0.10, synthesized by using cost-effective and simple co-precipitation method. X-ray diffraction (XRD) has confirmed the orthorhombic single phase formation with nano-crystalline nature that is consistent with the surface structure revealed using SEM. NEXAFS spectroscopy has demonstrated that Fe retains +2 oxidation states. The dielectric response measured within 1 kHz-20 MHz depicts that the specimens respond well to the low energies indicating potential applications in the optical devices. Complex impedance study has elucidated dominant contribution from the grain resistance, while the complex modulus analysis confirmed the role of grains capacitance, suggesting that the polarization effect of such electrodes could have practical utilities. The ferromagnetism exhibited at 300 K also has revealed data storage device applications of the studied compounds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Designing the new multifunctional ferromagnetic materials for multilayer chip inductor has attracted widespread interest in recent years. Co2Y strontium hexaferrites with composition of Sr2−xNdxCo2Fe12−yMnyO22 (for X = 0.00–0.1, Y = 0.00–1.0) were fabricated by the simple economical sol-gel autocombustion method. The surface morphology of the synthesized materials was investigated by using scanning electron microscopy and the particles were in plate-like shape. The magnetic properties calculated through hysteresis loops which were measured by vibrating sample magnetometer showed that the fabricated materials have typical properties related to ferromagnetic materials. The observed values of saturation magnetization were found in the range of 64.43–35.11 (emu/g). The observed decline in the values of magnetic parameters with the substituents (Nd-Mn) resulted due to suppression of magnetic superexchange interactions. The dielectric parameters including impedance and modulus investigation reveal that there are grains where the grain boundaries might play an important role in the conduction mechanism and the same may also be concluded from semicircle shape of Cole-Cole plots.© 2018In this work, we investigated the gradual switching and self-rectifying characteristics of Cu/α-IGZO/p+-Si resistive-switching random-access memory (RRAM) device. We fabricated the RRAM cells with Cu as the top electrode (TE) and heavily doped p-type silicon as the bottom electrode (BE), and amorphous indium gallium zinc oxide (α-IGZO) film as the switching layer. In particular, we developed a bilayer IGZO film consisting of an oxygen-deficient layer and an oxygen-rich one by controlling the oxygen concentrations in the respective switching layers in the expectation of gradual switching owing to an oxygen vacancy reservoir. Fabricated RRAM cells successfully showed the typical hysteretic I–V curves including SET and RESET operations in the DC sweep mode. Furthermore, gradual switching and self-rectifying performances were observed. These characteristics are suitable to applications for synaptic devices toward the advanced neuromorphic systems.© 2018 Elsevier LtdTowards fully printed organic electronics, bottom-gate, bottom contacts fullerene based organic FETs (OFETs) are fabricated using inkjet printing drop-on-demand technology for the deposition of gate contact, organic gate insulator and source and drain contacts. The last layer of this structure that is the semiconducting fullerene C60 film is deposited by thermal evaporation at ambient temperature. Using physical and electrical analysis, the electrical performances are optimized by studying the effect of the thickness of the C60 film and of the post-thermal annealing of the OFET. A quantitative relationship between the crystalline structure of the C60 semiconducting layer (grain size and surface roughness) and the electrical performance of the OFETs is demonstrated. The best performance as determined from the values of the electrical parameters of the OFETs is obtained for 90 nm thick C60 film and after an annealing of the OFET at 200 °C. The answer of present nearly fully printed OFETs to a voltage pulse applied to the gate leads to a switching time of 13 ms, and then to application frequency of some 10 Hz. This result opens the way to potential main application in electronic circuits for the treatment of analog signals coming from the human body activities.© 2018 Elsevier LtdTo realize highly-functional flexible nonvolatile memories, the organic/inorganic hybrid structures were introduced as suitable approaches to exploit both advantages of flexibility of organic materials and the electrical performance of inorganic materials. Electrically conductive poly(3,4-ethylenedioxythiophene) polystyrene sulfonate (PEDOT:PSS) thin film was transferred on plastic poly(ethylene naphthalate) (PEN) substrates and then patterned by conventional photo-lithography process through the optimization of the surface properties in terms of the enhanced interaction between the PEDOT:PSS and the PEN substrate. The gate-stack structure of the charge-trap memory thin-film transistors was designed to be Al2O3 blocking/ZnO charge-trap/Al2O3 tunneling/In-Ga-Zn-O active/PEDOT:PSS source-drain layers. The fabricated device showed the nonvolatile memory operations including charge-trap-assisted memory window. However, the long-tapered rough patterns of PEDOT:PSS and damaged back-channel on organic barrier were demonstrated to be feasible origins for some drawbacks including the high contact resistance of the fabricated prototype device. Appropriate ideas for further improvements memory device characteristics was also suggested.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA new direct extraction method to determine the parasitic capacitances for HBTs is presented in this paper. The main advantage is that base parasitic capacitance Cpb can be extracted by using three different size HBTs with the same pad profile. This method is based on an improved small-signal model, which takes into account the distribution effects of the base and collector feedlines. Good agreement is obtained between the measured and modeled results for the 1 × 3 × 12 μm2, 2 × 2 × 20 μm2 and 1 × 3 × 40 μm2 (number of emitter fingers × emitter width × emitter length) GaAs HBTs up to 40 GHz.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, surface acoustic wave (SAW) devices with various designs were fabricated on two types of piezoelectric substrates of LiNbO3 bulk material and thin piezoelectric ZnO film on silicon. Different sizes, orientation and types of SAW devices were laid out on the same mask to compare their RF performance with a same fabrication. Devices were fabricated using lift-off technology with a double photoresist technique to achieve a steeper and narrower SAW pattern with a depth-to-width ratio of 1.27 and a steep resist angle of 85°. The devices were then characterized using RF probe station together with vector network analyzer. RF performance was also verified by 2D computer simulation implementing both electrical and piezoelectric physics models using the same device dimensions in the mask layout. RF response of 128°Y LiNbO3 from experiments agrees with simulation fairly well while the devices on ZnO/Si have larger frequency distribution due to process variation of the ZnO thin film on silicon wafer. Quality factor of 34,000 was obtained from the SAW device fabricated in LiNO3 substrate and this Q value has a strong dependency on the numbers electrodes of IDT fingers and reflectors. Temperature dependency was also measured for future wireless sensor application. The temperature coefficient of frequency of 16 μm wavelength devices of LiNbO3 substrate was −87.5 ppm/°C and was −72.41 ppm/°C for 12 μm wavelength devices.© 2018The inevitable current overshoot which follows forming in filamentary RRAM devices is often perceived as a source of variability that should be minimized. This sentiment has led to efforts to curtail the overshoot by decreasing the parasitic capacitance using highly integrated 1T-1R or 1R-1R device structures. While this is readily achievable in single device test structures, it poses an intricate design constraint for memory array designs. Several papers (Degraeve et al., 2010, 2014; Fantini et al., 2013; Raghavan et al., 2013; Padovani et al., 2015) suggest that there is insufficient current to form stable filaments for small parasitic capacitances and/or low current compliance levels. Thus, the relationship between minimizing overshoot current and improved filament stability is tenuous. In this study, we utilize the forming energy-based understanding of filamentary forming to reveal that the parasitic capacitance should be optimized, rather than minimized for better filament control.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we analyze the effect of CF4/O2 plasma treatment on the contact interface between the amorphous Indium-Gallium-Zinc-Oxide (a-IGZO) semiconductor and Titanium-Gold electrodes. First, the influence of CF4/O2 plasma treatment is evaluated using transmission line structures and compared to pure O2 and CF4 plasma, resulting in a reduction of the contact resistance RC by a factor of 24.2 compared to untreated interfaces. Subsequently, the CF4/O2 plasma treatment is integrated in the a-IGZO thin-film transistor (TFT) fabrication process flow. We achieve a reduction of the gate bias dependent RC by a factor up to 13.4, which results in an increased current drive capability. Combined with an associated channel length reduction, the effective linear field-effect mobility μlin,FE,eff is increased by up to 74.6% for the CF4/O2 plasma treated TFTs compared to untreated reference devices.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe present a compact model for Tunnel Field Effect Transistors (TFET), that captures several non-idealities such as the Trap Assisted Tunneling (TAT) originating from interface traps (Dit), along with Verilog-A implementation. We show that the TAT, together with band edge non-abruptness known as the Urbach tail, sets the lower limit of the sub-threshold swing and the leakage current at a given temperature. Presence of charged trap states also contributes to reduced gate efficiency. We show that we can decouple the contribution of each of these processes and extract the intrinsic sub-threshold swing from a given experimental data. We derive closed form expressions of channel potential, electric field and effective tunnel energy window to accurately capture the essential device physics of TFETs. We test the model against recently published experimental data, and simulate simple TFET circuits using the Verilog-A model. The compact model provides a framework for TFET technology projections with improved device metrics such as better electrostatic design, reduced TAT, material with better transport properties etc.© 2018 Elsevier LtdTwo-dimensional (2D) molybdenum disulfide (MoS2) has attracted growing interests due to its intriguing electrical, optical, and scalable properties. Exploring 2D MoS2-based electronic devices which are compatible with the biological systems are of great significance. Herein, a proof-of-concept water-gated multilayer MoS2 transistor is successfully demonstrated by using a side-gated device architecture. Electric-double-layer (EDL) effect is observed in such water-gated multilayer MoS2 transistor. The device exhibits a good performance with a high current on/off ratio of 4 × 103, a small subthreshold swing of 0.27 V/dec, and a low operation voltage of ∼1.5 V, respectively. Furthermore, an ion-contributed quasi-EDL model can be further confirmed by the frequency-dependent capacitance and phase angle measurements. Such merits of water-containing systems coupled with MoS2 opens new opportunities to harness the excellent physical and electrical properties of 2D MoS2 for the potential bioelectronic devices integrated in biological systems for monitoring, diagnostic, and medical applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Carbonyl iron powder (CIP) and reduced iron powder (RIP) were homogeneously coated with an SiO2 insulating layer by a controlled in-suit chemical deposition procedure and used as raw materials to fabricate CIP/SiO2-RIP/SiO2 (C-R) soft magnetic composites (SMCs) by powder metallurgy techniques. Compared with RIP/SiO2 powders, CIP/SiO2 powders possess a higher SiO2 content and more stable Si-O covalent network. The addition of CIP/SiO2 to the C-R SMCs leads to a significantly increase in the resistivity due to the full electrical isolation of the RIP/SiO2 particles. Transmission electron microscopy analysis confirms that a SiO2 amorphous layer approximately 100–400 nm in thickness grows with a high packing density and adheres tightly to the iron grains, resulting in the effective constraint of electron transfer between the Si and O atoms. Annealed C-R SMCs containing 15–20 wt% CIP/SiO2 have optimum properties with a high resistivity of 4980–6383 μΩ·m and a low core loss of 19.08–23.66 W/kg (50 mT, 100 kHz). The results of this present study provide a significant method to improve resistivity and reduce core loss.© 2018In this work, UTBOX SOI nMOSFETs have been studied at liquid helium temperature (i.e. 4.2 K). Transfer characteristics at very low temperature and polarization evidenced step-like effects that can be associated to energy subband scattering. Low frequency noise measurements were performed at the same temperature in polarization conditions corresponding to drift-diffusion and quantum transport related to energy subband scattering, respectively. A theoretical approach valid in moderate inversion is constructed for the mobility fluctuations and carrier number fluctuations with correlated mobility fluctuations models at this temperature operation. It was observed that flicker noise originates from carrier number fluctuations when the drift-diffusion transport is dominant. In quantum transport related to energy band scattering condition, the results suggest that the mobility fluctuations mechanism is suitable to explain the flicker noise behavior.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The author regrets that one of the authors is missed to be included in the final version. The author is Boris Kovalev. The updated list of authors and their affiliation is below. Radel Gimaev a, Dmitry Kopeliovich b, Yury Spichkin b, Boris Kovalev c, Alexander Tishin b,c (a) National Research Center “Kurchatov Institute” 123182 Moscow, Russia (b) Advanced Magnetic Technologies and Consulting LLC (AMT&C Group), 142191 Troitsk, Moscow, Russia (c) Faculty of Physics, M.V. Lomonosov Moscow State University, 119991 Moscow, Russia The author would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused. DOI of original article: 10.1016/j.jmmm.2017.11.018© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis work proposes a new method for dissociating both channel conductions of two levels vertically stacked inversion mode nanowires (NWs) composed by a Gate-All-Around (GAA) level on top of an Ω-gate level. The proposed methodology is based on experimental measurements of the total drain current (IDS) varying the back gate bias (VB), aiming the extraction of carriers’ mobility of each level separately. The methodology consists of three main steps and accounts for VB influence on mobility. The behavior of non-stacked Ω-gate NWs are also discussed varying VB through experimental measurements and tridimensional numerical simulations in order to sustain proposed expressions of mobility dependence on VB for the bottom level of the stacked structure. Lower mobility was obtained for GAA in comparison to Ω-gate. The procedure was validated for a wide range of VB and up to 150 °C. Similar temperature dependence of mobility was observed for both Ω-gate and GAA levels.© 2018 Elsevier LtdNew analytical expressions for the subthreshold swing in FDSOI structures operated in both front gate and bottom gate modes are developed. These new equations (9)-(10) provide an accurate description of the subthreshold swing SW as a function of the main FDSOI stack parameters (film thickness, front gate thickness, back gate oxide thickness) and front/back interface trap density. They can be very useful for architecture design as well as electrical characterization of FDSOI devices operated either in front gate or free top surface bottom gate configurations.© 2018The effects of in-situ NH3 plasma passivation on the interface between atomic layer deposited HfO2 and Ga-face n-GaN substrate in metal-oxidesemiconductor (MOS) devices were investigated by varying plasma power and exposure time and compared with GaN MOS device without plasma passivation. ALD HfO2-GaN device with in-situ NH3 plasma treatment shows improved electrical characteristics including negligible frequency dispersion at the near flat-band voltage region, lower hysteresis (∼10 mV), suppressed oxide capacitance dispersion in the accumulation (2.2%), lower leakage current density (5.21 × 10−2 A/cm2 at 1 V), and low interface state density (Dit) of ∼6.77 × 1011 eV−1 cm−2 at Ec-Et = 0.3 eV using an optimized plasma passivation exposure time of 10 min and power of 50 W. These results are attributed that NH3 plasma treatment could eliminate carbon species and detrimental sub-GaOx as well as passivate the surface and bulk defects on GaN caused by Ga-N dissociation.© 2018In this paper, the capacitance frequency dispersion in strong accumulation of capacitance voltage curves has been studied for different high-k dielectric layers in MOS stacks. By studying experimental data at low (77 K) and room temperature (300 K), in oxides with different density of defects, it was possible reflect the spatial distribution of the defects in the capacitance frequency dispersion. The experimental data show that while at room temperature, the capacitance dispersion is dominated by the exchange of carriers from the semiconductor into oxide traps far away from the interface, at low temperature the oxide traps near the Al2O3/InGaAs interface are responsible for the frequency dispersion. The results indicate that the capacitance dispersion in strong accumulation reflect the spatial distribution of traps within the oxide, and that dielectric/semiconductor conduction band offset is a critical parameter for determining the capacitance dispersion for Al2O3/InGaAs based gate stacks.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe theoretical and experimental studies on BaSi2/Si heterojunction solar cells have demonstrated the great potential in utilization of BaSi2 material as light absorption layer for developing high efficiency solar cells with low cost. In addition to BaSi2/Si heterojunction solar cells, BaSi2 based Schottky junction solar cells could also be achieved by coupling n-type or p-type BaSi2 with suitable metal electrode. In this work, BaSi2 based Schottky junction solar cells were simulated with the program AMPS (analysis of microelectronic and photonic structures)-1D in order to thoroughly understand the mechanism for further improvement in conversion efficiency. Simulation results demonstrated that a simpler structure of metal/n-BaSi2 Schottky junction solar cell with thickness of 2000 nm can reach high conversion efficiency up to 24.12% and 25.28% for ND = 1 × 1015 cm−3 and ND = 1 × 1018 cm−3 respectively, being comparable to BaSi2/Si heterojunction solar cell. Contact barrier height, illumination condition, as well as defect level of metal/n-BaSi2 Schottky junction solar cell were also identified to significantly influence the device performance.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIt is well known that the current leakage at a switching thin film transistor (TFT) of a pixel circuit is one of key factors for the luminance fluctuation of liquid crystal displays (LCDs) perceived as a flicker artifact. This paper proposes a flicker estimation scheme based on the current leakage model of an amorphous silicon (a-Si) TFT. The proposed scheme consists of four blocks such as gray-to-voltage conversion, pixel voltage update, voltage-to-transmittance conversion, and flicker estimation. Gray-to-voltage and voltage-to-transmittance conversion blocks are built from measured data at a source driver and a panel for gray levels. Flicker estimation is established by applying fast Fourier transform (FFT) to simulated transmittance waveforms. The pixel voltage update block is made up by the voltage leakage model which parameters are estimated by matching simulation results to measurement results at a band gray pattern regarding several gray levels. Any given information of TFTs is not required for parameter extraction. The proposed method is applied to a WSXGA+ in-plane switching (IPS) LCD of a 1-dot inversion and flicker levels are estimated within an error range of ±0.6 dB at full gray patterns of gray levels from 32 to 224, compared to measurement results.© 2018The relation between the empirical mobility model parameters used for amorphous thin film transistors and physical device parameters is analyzed, when both localized and free carriers have to be considered to represent the device behavior. A simple procedure is presented to obtain the characteristic temperature and trap concentration of the DOS at the conduction band, using only the linear transfer characteristic at room temperature. An empirical analytical expression that represents analytically the dependence of the surface potential on the gate voltage is presented and validated. Using this expression, the procedure described to calculate the above mentioned parameters is completely analytical. The procedure presented is applied to experimental data of a-IGZO TFTs fabricated with two different technological process.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on THz absorption spectroscopy combined with high magnetic fields of polycrystalline RCrO3 (R = Pr, Sm, Er) aiming understanding spin wave resonances at their low temperature magnetic phases. Our measurements show that the temperature and the implicit anisotropies at which the Cr3+ spin reorientation at TSR takes place, are determinant on the ferromagnetic-like (FM) and the antiferromagnetic-like (AFM) spin modes being optically active. It is found that they are dependent on Rare Earth 4f moment and ion size. We also studied temperature and field dependence of crystal field levels in the same spectroscopic region. Pr3+ non-Kramers emerges at 100 K and Zeeman splits. An observed absence of spin wave resonances in PrCrO3 is attributed to Pr3+ remaining paramagnetic. In SmCrO3 near cancelation of the spin and orbital moments is proposed as the possible reason for not detecting Sm3+ ground state transitions. Here, the FM and AFM resonant modes harden when the temperature decreases and split linearly under applied fields at 5 K and below. In ErCrO3 the Er3+ Kramers doublet becomes active at about the TSR onset. Each line further experiences Zeeman splitting under magnetic fields while an spin reversal induced by a ∼2.5 T field, back to the Γ4 (Fz) from the Γ1 phase at 2 K, produces a secondary splitting. The 5 K AFM and FM excitations in ErCrO3 have a concerted frequency-intensity temperature dependence and a shoulder pointing to the Er3+ smaller ion size also disrupting the two magnetic sublattice approximation. Both resonances reduce to one when the temperature is lowered to 2 K in the Γ1 representation. Our findings have important implications on the complex interplay in the magneto-electrodynamics associated with the Rare-Earth 4f – 3d transition metal spin coupling and the structural A site instabilities in perovskite multiferroics.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, new computationally implemented semi-empirical table-based and predictive model for the drain–current in DG-MOS transistors is presented. This model includes two stages; the first one is a generic table-based method to obtain the basic approximate solutions only valid for long channel conditions, the second one calculates the correction to these solutions in order to take into account the short channel effects and it is actually a method that should be calibrated a la carte for each technological parameters set used by manufacturing Integrated Circuits. The new model is valid and continuous in linear, saturation and sub threshold regimes. Short-channel effects and channel-length modulation are accurately predicted by this model that shows very good agreement not only with drain–current curves but also with and their VDS and VGS derivatives issued from Silvaco-ATLAS simulations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present numerical and analytical results describing the dynamics of a helical orientational structure of a ferrocholesteric liquid crystal, i.e., dilute suspension of ferromagnetic nanoparticles in a cholesteric liquid crystal, under the action of a rotating magnetic field. We employ the continuum theory to show how rotating magnetic field can untwist the helical ferrocholesteric structure and induce a ferrocholesteric–ferronematic transition. We analyze the non-stationary and stationary rotation regimes of the helical structure of a ferrocholesteric in a magnetic field. For weak fields, small and large rotational velocities the analytical expressions are obtained for the pitch of the ferrocholesteric helix. In the stationary rotational regime the orientational phase diagram of the ferrocholesteric–ferronematic transition is constructed for different values of magnetic field and angular velocities. It is shown that with increasing these parameters the transition field decreases. The dependence of a ferrocholesteric pitch on the magnetic field and its angular velocity at various material parameters is numerically obtained. We derive the analytical expression describing the divergence law for the pitch of a helix in the pre-transition region.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Topological insulators are novel state of quantum matter that have a bulk band gap like an ordinary insulator, but have protected conducting states by time reversal symmetry on their edge or surface. The spin-orbit coupling can play an important role in these materials, resulting in a band inversion at time reversal invariant momenta (TRIM) points. The topological phase and the effect of the hydrostatic pressure on the electronic structure and topological phase of the KNa2Sb compound are investigated by using both first-principles calculations and ab-initio based tight-binding computations. Under hydrostatic lattice strain until 5.6%, the KNa2Sb compound is semimetal with zero energy band gap and has an inverted band order. In this pressure, the Z2 invariants of this compound are calculated using the parity analysis at TRIM points and evolution of wannier charge centers at the six TRIM plane. The calculated surface states at (0 0 1) surface show a single Dirac cone exists on the X¯Γ¯W¯ line at the surface Brillouin zone. To investigate the stability of KNa2Sb compound the phonon dispersions and elastic tensors of this compound in the cubic structure are calculated.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Interlayer exchange coupling (Jex) between a hard magnetic Nd-Fe-B layer and a soft magnetic Ni80Fe20 layer is studied by means of time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect (TRMOKE) microscope. Whereas a single 16 nm thick Nd-Fe-B layer without Ni80Fe20 showed high coercivity of μ0Hc = 2 T and resonance frequency of fr = 161 GHz at external bias magnetic field of μ0Hb = 2 T due to the high anisotropy field, those of the bi-layer Nd-Fe-B (16 nm)/Ni80Fe20 (5 nm) are dramatically reduced to μ0Hc = 1.34 T and fr = 74.4 GHz. When the Nd-Fe-B and Ni80Fe20 are separated by a 1 nm thick non-magnetic Mo layer, by contrast, the coercivity recovered partially to μ0Hc = 1.9 T but the frequency further reduced to fr = 63.4 GHz. We derived Jex based on a simple macrospin model, whose value reduced from 3.9 ± 0.1 mJ/m2 for the bi-layer without the Mo layer to 0.1 ± 0.1 mJ/m2 with the Mo layer. The reduction in Jex suggested that the interlayer exchange decoupling between the Nd-Fe-B and the Ni80Fe20 layers was responsible to the recovery of μ0Hc and the reduction of fr by the insertion of the non-magnetic layer. We successfully estimated the interlayer exchange coupling constant in the hard/soft magnetic bilayer system by TRMOKE and macrospin-modeling, which had been previously difficult because of its high anisotropy and high coercivity. This method is applicable also to the quantitative estimation of the intergranular exchange coupling.© 2018 Elsevier LtdAn alternative methodology to the modified Norde's model is presented to determine both series and shunt parasitic resistance, ideality factor and the resistance-mediated “turn-on” voltage of diodes by measuring derivatives of I-V characteristics. Experimental results follow to support the theoretical investigation and demonstrate a self-consistency check.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe impact of uni-axial compressive and tensile strain and diameter on the electronic band structure of indium arsenide (InAs) nanowires (NWs) is investigated using first principles calculations. Effective masses and band gaps are extracted from the electronic structure for relaxed and strained nanowires. Material properties are extracted and applied to determine charge transport through the NWs described within the effective mass approximation and by applying the non-equilibrium Green's function method. The transport calculations self-consistently solve the Schrödinger equation with open boundary conditions and Poisson's equation for the electrostatics. The device structure corresponds to a metal oxide semiconductor field effect transistor (MOSFET) with an InAs NW channel in a gate-all-around geometry. The channel cross sections are for highly scaled devices within a range of 3 × 3–1 × 1 nm2. Strain effects on the band structures and electrical performance are evaluated for different NW orientations and diameters by quantifying subthreshold swing and ON/OFF current ratio. Our results reveal for InAs NW transistors with critical dimensions of a few nanometer, the crystallographic orientation and quantum confinement effects dominate device behavior, nonetheless strain effects must be included to provide accurate predictions of transistor performance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Tunable, one-dimensional (1D) nanofiller assembly using oscillating magnetic fields in the low frequency range (<5 Hz) is studied as a scalable and energy-efficient method to structure nanofillers within viscous matrices to deliver anisotropic, multi-functional polymer nanocomposites (PNCs). In this work 1D assembly tailoring was first experimentally studied and demonstrated using the model system of superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs, 15 nm, 0.02–0.08 vol%) in DI water using varying magnetic fields (0–5 Hz frequency, 10–100 G magnetic flux density, and square and sinusoidal waveforms). In addition to lateral assembly of nanofillers, when the field oscillation is turned on, transverse assembly can be introduced as the magnetic moments of the particles respond to the changing fields by Brownian rotation. The degree of transverse assembly, in balance with lateral assembly and the resulting nanofiller patterns, was observed to be determined by the magnetic field parameters, magnetic responsiveness of the nanofillers, and the matrix viscosity. Based on this assembly study, PNCs consisting of ferrimagnetic iron oxide nanofillers in a thermoset polymer, with two different linear nanoparticle patterning, were successfully fabricated using small magnetic fields (<100 G) even in a viscous matrix (70 cP) with a short assembly time of 30 min. This work can contribute to scalable manufacturing and thus bulk application of multi-functional PNCs enabled by more precise nanofiller and interface structuring.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Transitions of the magnetization out of a metastable state to a more stable one in the presence of a polarized current is considered. We derive an effective Lagrangian to represent the equation of motion of the magnetization, and with the method of path integral we derive the imaginary-time action and the rate of transitions out of the metastable state. As the current can be varied, its presence allows one to study transitions of the magnetization with or without dissipation. The rates of quantum and thermal transitions are given for various regimes of temperature. Results for cubic and tetragonal ferromagnets are given as examples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Effect of gadolinium doping on growth mechanism, microstructure, magnetic properties and conductivity relaxation behavior of sol-gel prepared yttrium iron garnet (YIG) nanoparticles is studied in detail. Rietveld microstructural analysis of XRD data confirms the growth of single phase nanocrystalline YIG. Gd doping created oxygen vacancies inside the system which played an important role in controlling transport properties. Switching field distribution (S.F.D.) and Law of Approach to saturation (L.A.S.) techniques were adapted to analyze magnetic properties which delineate an improvement of coercivity and anisotropy constant. Impedance spectroscopy revealed the grain contributions only to the conduction process and frequency dependent conductivity follows universal power law. Harviliak-Negami (H.N.) formalism was adapted to analyze the modulus data in the frequency domain. Scaling of conductivity and electrical modulus data established that the conduction and relaxation process are temperature and composition independent. Non-Debye type correlative motion of charge carriers was established via analysis of decay function of electric field ϕ(t) inside the material which was described by Kohlrausch-Williams-Watts (K.W.W.) function. Improvements of magnetic and electrical properties in the prepared system can be beneficial for different applications.© 2018The anomalous electronic and magnetic properties of monolayer BeO with intrinsic vacancy and transition metal (TM) substitutional doping are investigated by means of extensive density functional theory calculations. Our calculations reveal that the Be vacancy (VBe) can give rise to a stable ferromagnetism, while the O vacancy (VO) does not show spin dependent electronic properties. More significantly, the monolayer BeO with VBe becomes the magnetic semiconductor with a direct band gap (0.97 eV), whereas the band gap of the monolayer BeO with VO drops to 3.56 eV, in comparison with the band gap of the pristine BeO (5.64 eV). It is found that the TM substituting Be atom (TM-BeO) is favorable and the ionic bonds are formed between TM and its neighboring O atoms. The electronic properties of the monolayer BeO are also considerably changed due to the induced impurity states. Only the Zn-BeO system preserves the nonmagnetic semiconductor characteristic, similar to the monolayer BeO. The Sc-, V-, Mn-, and Ni-BeO systems show dilute magnetic semiconductor (DMS) characters. More interestingly, the Ti-, Cr-, Fe-, Co- and Cu-BeO systems display half-metal characters. According to the study of magnetic coupling between two same TM impurity atoms, there exists antiferromagnetic coupling (AFM) in all TM-BeO systems. Therefore, it is concluded that TM substitutional doped BeO could cause useful magnetic properties, which may stimulate an experimental exploration of BeO for application in electronic and spintronic devices.© 2018The Fe52Co34Hf7B6Cu1 amorphous alloy ribbons were prepared by single-roller-quenching method and then treated by medium-frequency magnetic pulse. The microstructural changes of specimens before and after magnetic pulse treatment were observed by TEM and Mössbauer spectroscopy techniques. The magnetostriction coefficient of specimens before and after the medium-frequency magnetic pulse was measured by homemade magnetostriction coefficient measurement system. The results showed that the specimens were nano-crystallized after treated by medium-frequency magnetic pulse. The crystalline phase was α-FeCo which dispersed in the residual amorphous matrix phase to form the two-phase nanocrystalline alloys. The magnetostriction coefficient of specimens after treated by medium-frequency magnetic pulse was composed of the positive magnetostriction coefficient of amorphous matrix phase and the negative magnetostriction coefficient of nanocrystalline phase. With the increase of the crystallization volume fraction, the magnetostriction coefficient λ decreased. And accompanied with the increase of the applied DC magnetic field intensity H, the magnetostriction coefficient λ firstly increased and then decreased.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Structural, optical and diluted magnetic semiconducting properties of pristine ZnO, Fe-doped (Zn0.98Fe0.02O), Ga-doped (Zn0.98Ga0.02O) and Ni-doped (Zn0.98Ni0.02O) ZnO thin films deposited by pulsed laser deposition technique have been studied. X-ray diffraction (XRD) studies reveal the nanocrystalline nature in single wurtzite phase of all the films. Optical bandgap of the films found to depend upon the transition/post-transition metal doping and has a maximum value (∼3.65 eV) for Zn0.98Ga0.02O film and lowest value (∼3.23 eV) for Zn0.98Ni0.02O film. SQUID-vibrating sample magnetometer studies confirm the ferromagnetic nature of all the films with well defined field dependent magnetization (M−H) curves and temperature dependent zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) curves. The origin of ferromagnetism in the present films has been analyzed under bound magnetic polarons (BMPs) and grain boundary specific area models. The present films are found to follow the grain boundary specific area model for the origin of ferromagnetism.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Atomically-flat thin films of ferrimagnetic insulator Tb3Fe5O12 (TbIG) were grown on (1 1 1)-oriented Gd3Ga5O12 (GGG) substrates by pulsed laser deposition. Magnetic measurements indicated the easy magnetic axis of TbIG film was out-of-plane, as a result of the substrate-induced compressive in-plane strain within the film. The temperature dependence of anomalous Hall effect (AHE) in Pt/TbIG bilayer was systematically studied with the applied magnetic field normal to the film plane, with square hysteresis AHE loops being observed. Reversal of AHE sign occurred twice between 10 K and room temperature, one at 50 K and another around 220 K, the latter of which was accompanied by complex magnetization switching behavior. The peculiar behavior of AHE loop around 220 K is closely related to the compensation point of TbIG. On the other hand, the sign change at 50 K was attributed to the modification of Pt electronic structure by TbIG. Our results highlight the relation between the AHE of Pt and magnetic properties of TbIG, which can be used for probing the magnetism in TbIG.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.L10-MnGa alloys have attracted intensive attention due to their great potential in the field of magnetic recording, permanent magnets and spintronic devices. Here we present the magnetic and electrical transport properties of Fe-doped L10-Mn1.25Ga alloy films deposited on different substrates by magnetron sputtering. It is found that Fe-doped L10-Mn1.25Ga films deposited on both SrTiO3 and MgO substrates have high (0 0 1) orientation while the film deposited on MgO substrate has better magnetic property with larger magnetic anisotropy constant, coercivity, and a magnetic energy product of 3.0 MGOe, which is mainly due to strain arisen from the larger lattice mismatch. Moreover, the deposition temperature plays an important role in electrical transport properties of the films. The film deposited on SrTiO3 substrate at 250 °C shows an ordinary Hall effect while anomalous Hall effect when the deposition temperature is 300, 400 and 500 °C.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of transition to disordered phase on AC conductivity in the two-dimensional frustrated ferrimagnetic model in the square lattice at T=0 is investigated. The spin conductivity, σreg(ω) is determined for different values of frustration parameters J2S and J2s that separates the different phases such as the ferrimagnetic phase and the collinear phase. We obtain a small influence of this phase transition on spin conductivity. Furthermore, we present the behavior of the half-width of S(q→,ω) that gives the information about the scattering of magnons at long wavelength range.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study the magnetic properties in a diluted ferrimagnetic materials structure, composed with three areas, by Monte Carlo simulations. The system consists of two non-equivalent types of atoms A and B, two arrangements ABA and BAB are considered. The dilution effect concerns only the B atoms. The ground state phase diagrams are reported. The effect of exchange coupling interactions on the compensation temperature is investigated. The obtained results show that the system presents a compensation temperature and different behaviors when varying the coupling parameters and the dilution probability.© 2018The analogy between magnetic systems and fluids is explored and the corresponding thermodynamic potentials of the microcanonical, canonical, and conjugate intensive variable (field) ensembles are analyzed. It is shown that the discrepancy criteria of the magnetic free energy obtained when working within the canonical ensemble, as can be seen in a variety of text books on statistical mechanics, are in fact because one is actually working in the field ensemble instead. The disagreement, however, is more a question about the name given to the thermodynamic potential than on the underlying principles of the theory. Examples of the spin-1/2 paramagnet and the one-dimensional Ising model are discussed in detail.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetism of layered NaxMnO2 with space group P63/mmc is investigated by first-principles calculation and magnetic measurement. Results indicate that NaMnO2 without any Na-vacancies posses the antiferromagnetic metal state. And along with Na-vacancies formed, the magnetism and electronic properties of NaxMnO2 show rich change, which undergo the change of AFM → FM → AFM and metal → semiconductor, respectively. Magnetic measurement of Na0.806MnO2−δ with space group P63/mmc also shows that have thin hysteresis and remanent under 5 K. Hence, Na0.806MnO2−δ presents the ferromagnetic metal state under low temperature rooting in the Mn3+-O2−-Mn4+ double exchange, which is agreement with theoretical results.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis study investigated the effect of resistive switching on Pt/Al2O3/Cu/Al2O3/ITO multilayer structures grown by RF/DC magnetron sputtering. A reproducible unipolar switching free forming was found only for the negative voltage. The SET and RESET processes occurred at very low voltage values, which may be advantageous for practical applications. The ON/OFF ratio was approximately five orders of magnitude for more than 103 s, which is desirable for nonvolatile memories such as resistive random-access memories (RRAMs). We explain the unipolar behavior of the characteristic (I–V) curves in terms of the formation and rupture of conductive filaments, connected via a Cu metal layer.© 2018The complex magnetic nature of 5d layered iridate Sr2IrO4, owing to IrO6 octahedral rotation has triggered great interest in recent years. In this article, we investigated the magnetic excitations in layered canted antiferromagnet Sr2IrO4 via dc magnetization measurements and report the Griffiths phase (GP) signatures above the magnetic ordering temperature TN. The non-analytic nature of GP leads to unique critical exponent, β = 0.75(1) extracted from modified Arrott plot, in corroboration with magneto-caloric study. However, the analysis by Bray model in GP regime yields a reliable critical exponent value of β = 0.18(1), belonging to two-dimensional XYh4 universality class. The study also suggests a new picture of largely debated insulating nature of Sr2IrO4 in context of GP above TN.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.180° transverse domain walls (TDWs) in planar magnetic nanowires find important applications in advanced logic and memory devices. Controlling DW structure is important because it determines DW behaviors and is used to store digital information. This paper presents, using micromagnetic simulations, simple designs of nanowire unit that enables reliable generation of TDWs and effective control of their structures under rotating magnetic field. It is shown that a series of TDWs can be created, two per loading cycle, and external magnetic field can be programmed to control the TDW structures in terms of their polarity and chirality. These nanowire units and the corresponding magnetic field control schemes can be integrated into magnetic circuits to generate TDWs of controlled structures, facilitating the development of logic and memory devices based on DW functionalities.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Epitaxial Fe3O4 films on (1 1 0)-oriented SrTiO3 and MgAl2O4 were prepared to investigate the in-plane-direction dependence of the interfacial lattice disorder and its effect on the magnetic property. Transmission electron microscopy images of (1 1 0) Fe3O4/SrTiO3 showed that lattice spots at the interface along the in-plane [−1 1 0] direction were quite regular, but those along the in-plane [0 0 1] direction exhibited a distinctive lattice disorder. In contrast, the (1 1 0) Fe3O4/MgAl2O4 exhibited quite regular and smooth interfaces along both in-plane directions. The (1 1 0) Fe3O4/SrTiO3, which keeps structural symmetry across the interface along the in-plane [−1 1 0] direction but not across the interface along the in-plane [0 0 1] direction, exhibited improved properties: The in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy was about five times larger than those in the previous reports, and the maximum magnetoresistance was about twice that of the Fe3O4/MgAl2O4. This suggests that the microscopically anisotropic lattice disorder at the interface can be used to control the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and the magnetoresistance of a magnetic film for spintronic applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroics, in which off-center magnetic ions induced ferroelectricity, are believed to exhibit enhanced magnetoelectric (ME) or magnetodielectric (MD) effects because their ferroelectricity and ferromagnetism are driven by the same originations. In this paper, multiferroics with off-center Mn ions were obtained in hexagonal manganite-barium titanate solid solutions. As an external magnetic field (H) was applied, intermediate and high frequency MD effects were observed. The MD (MD(%) = (ε(H = 3.5 kOe) − ε(H = 0 Oe)) × 100/ε(H = 0 Oe)) values at 10 MHz frequency were 3.37%, 3.21% and 2.65% for the three samples, respectively. The further discussion indicated that the MD effects did not originate from some extrinsic source such as grain boundary magnetoresistance (MR) and contributions from the electrode, but mainly attributed to the intrinsic ME coupling such as magnetic-field-induced variations of asymmetric hopping. The first-principles calculations also confirmed that the asymmetry of coplanar octahedrons aggravated when Mn ions occupied the off-center site in the hexagonal phases, especially in 0.1La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 − 0.9BaTiO3 solid solutions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Co nanowire arrays with diameters of 25 nm, 50 nm and 75 nm were prepared in pores of anodic aluminum oxide (AAO) templates via an AC electrodeposition technique. Filling rate of Co nanowires in the pores of AAO template was studied at various voltages. Studies showed that Co nanowire can be full of the pores of AAO template at high voltage, which suggested a two dimensional (2D) titled plane growth mode for Co nanowire growing up by AC electrodeposition technique. The growth process of Co nanowires was illustrated in detail. Theoretical analysis indicated that thermodynamic factor was responsible for the filling rate of Co nanowires in the pores of AAO template. The magnetic behaviors of Co nanowire arrays with varying diameters were investigated at room temperature. The results have confirmed that coercivity (Hc), remanent magnetization (Mr) and squareness (SQ), measured along wire axis, decrease with increasing of Co nanowires diameter. Moreover, the SQ of Co nanowire arrays with diameter of 25 nm was much higher than those of others in this direction. It can be attributed to both the magnetostatic coupling among the wires and the arrangement of Co grains in the AAO pores. This work will be beneficial for a magnetic media with perpendicular anisotropy to allow a smaller bit size and increase the recording density.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, thin Pr2Co17 flakes fractured along c crystal plane are successfully prepared by a surfactant-assisted high energy ball-milling technology and then oxidized by hydrogen peroxide (H2O2). The complex permittivity and permeability of the unoxidized and oxidized Pr2Co17 flakes/epoxy composites are measured. The measured results show that the oxidation of H2O2 can effectively decrease the permittivity and simultaneously suppress the eddy. For the oxidized sample with 40 vol% Pr2Co17, the real permeability at 8.2 GHz and 12.4 GHz can reach 1.65 and 1.42, respectively, and the natural resonance frequency can reach 11.0 GHz. If used as a microwave absorber, the oxidized sample with 20 vol% Pr2Co17 flakes exhibits a very excellent microwave absorption performance in x-band when the absorber thickness t is very thin (1.3 mm < t < 1.5 mm).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The main goal of this study was to characterize the structural, mechanical and magnetic properties of Fe-48Ni alloy during annealing processes in different temperatures and holding times. The alloys were studied after 80% cold-rolling and annealing processes under different profile conditions to reach the best magnetic properties such as remanence, coercivity and saturation magnetization. The results were characterized using X-ray diffraction, field emission scanning electron microscopy, vibrating scanning magnetometer and hardness and tensile test to analyze magnetic and mechanical properties. The results about the metallography images indicate that the grain sizes of annealed samples grow with elevation of the heating temperature. The VSM and mechanical tests determine that 80% cold rolled samples require lower annealing temperature to attain optimum values of mechanical and magnetic properties. The experimental results show that both magnetic and mechanical properties improved after annealing at 900 °C for 20 min. In fact, the formation of FeNi intermetallic compounds during annealing in high temperature up to 900 °C has destructive effects on magnetic and mechanical properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Bio-inspired magnetic helical microswimmers have attracted much attention for performing complex tasks at low Reynolds numbers. To fabricate such helical microswimmers with enhanced propulsion velocity in bulk, Spirulina were electroless plated with nickel coating. The morphology, coating composition and magnetic property of the as-prepared microswimmers were investigated in detail. The results showed that homogeneous and compact nickel coating was successfully deposited on the helical biotemplates with good surface quality. Furthermore, the locomotion behavior of the microswimmers under the rotating magnetic field generated by the triaxial Helmholtz coils was also studied, and the propulsion mechanism was analyzed. Different parameters affecting the propulsion velocities were optimized. The microswimmers can not only be propelled and steered flexibly in deionized water, but also reach a high forward velocity of more than 12 body lengths per second even under a relatively low field strength, indicating excellent swimming performance of these helical microswimmers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnesium-zinc ferrite (Mg1− xZnxFe2O4) nanofibers (with x = 0, 0.05, 0.10, and 0.15) were successfully prepared by the electrospinning technique followed by calcinations at temperature 550 °C. The structural, morphological, optical properties and magnetic characterization of the prepared nanofibers were studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), Fourier Transform Infrared (FTIR), DRS and VSM. The XRD pattern has been analyzed employing Rietveld technique and revealed the diffraction peaks are mainly assigned to the cubic structure of the MgFe2O4 phase. The SEM images exhibit fabrication of the smooth and free of beads nanofibers with average diameter ranged from 180 ± 20 to 100 ± 20 nm. The absorption spectra and optical band gap were estimated by diffuse reflectance spectroscopy (DRS). DRS study showed an increase in the band gap energy of MgFe2O4 nanofibers upon increase in doping concentration. Magnetic properties of the pure MgFe2O4 and 10% Zn-doped MgFe2O4 nanofibers were characterized by using VSM magnetometer. Magnetic results showed saturation magnetism and eminence decrease with Zn doping.© 2018The effects of La and Ce substitutions for Nd on the magnetic properties and intergranular exchange coupling of nanocrystalline (Nd1-xMx)yFe94-yB6, (M = La and Ce; y = 10 and 12; x = 0–0.4) alloys have been investigated and presented in order to improve room temperature magnetic properties and reduce the rare earth content for NdFeB based alloys. Optimum magnetic properties such as remanent magnetization Mr, maximum energy product (BH)max and coercivity Hc up to 104 emu/g, 151 kJ/m3 and 9.0 kOe have been obtained for as-quenched single phase (Nd0.95La0.05)12Fe82B alloy. The decrease in Mr for La/Ce substituted alloys is attributed to saturation magnetization reduction. An unusual increase in Hc for 5% La substituted single phase alloy is speculated to the change in microstructure and magnetic phase separation. The analysis of remanence ratio, susceptibility curve, recoil loops and Henkel plots reveal that La substituted alloys exhibit strong ferromagnetic exchange coupling between hard magnetic phases or hard and soft phases than Ce substituted alloys due to the increase of exchange length and refine microstructure by La substitution. The present results indicate that partial substitution of Nd by La or Ce leads to various change behaviors for magnetic properties and inter-grain exchange coupling.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The thermoelectric properties (TE) of rare-earth based RENi2 (RE = Dy, Ho and Er) Laves phase compounds, have been investigated using first-principle density functional theory. The generalized gradient approximation (GGA) and local spin density approximation (LSDA) with Hubbard parameter (U) have been used for exchange and correlation effect. Calculated ground state properties such as lattice constants are in good agreement with pervious reported results. The electronic band structures display the metallic nature of these compounds. The high values of N(EF) are responsible for more metallic nature in spin down channel as compared to spin up channel. The electrical conductivity (σ/τ) decreases with increasing temperature. The negative value of Seebeck coefficient indicates that electrons play major role in spin up profiles but in spin down profiles both type of charge carriers are contribute for Seebeck effect.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Mn-based room-temperature ferromagnets attract considerable attention due to their high ordered Mn moment. We have found that a Pd0.75Mn0.25 alloy with added B (Pd0.75Mn0.25Bx) shows room-temperature soft ferromagnetism, whereas the parent Pd0.75Mn0.25 alloy is a spin-glass system. The saturated Mn moment at room temperature systematically increases to 2.68μB/Mn as x increases to 0.125. The maximum Curie temperature of 390 K is also realized at an x of 0.125. The experimental results suggest a tunable soft ferromagnetism, which is governed only by the boron concentration. Our results will pave the way in chemical control of room-temperature bulk ferromagnetism in Mn compounds based on the addition of an atom with a small atomic radius.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.CoxCrCuFeMnNi (x = 0.5, 1.0, 1.5, 2.0 mol) high-entropy alloy (HEA) powders were synthesized by mechanical alloying (MA). The effects of milling time, Co content, and vacuum annealing on the structural evolution, thermostability, and magnetic properties were investigated. After 50 h of milling, the Co0.5CrCuFeMnNi HEA powder consisted of a major face-centered cubic (FCC) phase and minor body-centered cubic (BCC) phase, whereas the other three HEA powders were composed of single FCC phase. The Co0.5CrCuFeMnNi HEA powder was composed of FCC1, FCC2, and minor ρ phases when annealed at 700 and 800 °C and then completely transformed into FCC1 and FCC2 phases at 900 °C. For the other three HEA powders, the single FCC phase transformed into the FCC1 and FCC2 phases during annealing at 700–900 °C. Both increasing Co content or prolonging balling time can improve the soft magnetic properties of HEA powders. Therefore, the Co2.0CrCuFeMnNi HEA powder with a maximum saturated magnetization of 52 emu/g and a minimum coercivity of 14 Oe exhibited the best soft-magnetic properties among the four HEA powders.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A constant rise in magnetic permeability with a simultaneous decrease in saturation magnetization, and Curie temperature has been recorded throughout the cobalt concentration studied in Ni-Zn ferrite system of composition, Ni0.57−yCoyZn0.35Mg0.08Fe2O4 (x = 0.00, 0.04, 0.08, 0.12, 0.16, 0.20). The observed increase in magnetic permeability with cobalt addition has been an unusual phenomenon in nickel zinc ferrites. The anomalous increase along with allied magnetic properties has been discussed in terms of the super exchange interactions between the cations occupying tetrahedral and octahedral sites and their distribution by studying lattice parameter, grain size and differential magnetic susceptibility.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Manipulation of magnetic domain walls in nanostructures can be used to improve the capabilities of the next generation of memory and sensing devices. Materials of interest for such devices include heterostructures of ultrathin ferromagnets sandwiched between a heavy metal and an oxide, where spin–orbit coupling and broken inversion symmetry give rise to the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI), stabilizing chiral domain walls. The efficiency of the motion of these chiral domain walls may be controlled using in-plane magnetic fields. This property has been used both for measurement of DMI strength, and for improved performance in applications. While micromagnetic simulations are able to accurately predict domain wall motion under in-plane fields in these materials, collective coordinate models such as the q-ϕ and q-ϕ-χ models fail to reproduce the micromagnetic results. In this theoretical work, we present a set of extended collective coordinate models including canting in the domains, which better reproduce micromagnetic results, and improve our understanding of the effect of in-plane fields on magnetic domain walls. These models are used in conjunction with micromagnetic simulations to develop simpler descriptions of DW motion under specific conditions. Our new models and results help in the development of future domain wall based devices based on perpendicularly magnetized materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The CoFeBSiNb soft magnetic metallic glasses with strong glass forming ability were selected as microwave absorption materials for the first time. The metallic glass powders (MGPs) were prepared through milling and hydrochloric acid treatments. The effects of mass fraction of MGPs in wax composites and corrosion treatment on the microwave absorbing properties were investigated in details. The results demonstrated that the complex permittivity and permeability of the composites increased gradually as the MGPs mass fraction increased. Through chemical corrosion, the complex permittivity of the metallic glasses apparently increased, which due to the strengthened interfacial polarization caused by the porous surface structures. As a result, the minimum value of reflection loss (RL) for the composites containing 60 wt% of MGPs corroded for one hour under pH = 2 reached −45.2 dB at 14.64 GHz with a thickness of only 2.3 mm and the bandwidth reached 14 GHz for RL < −10 dB or 6.2 GHz for RL < −20 dB.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The thickness dependent magneto-optical Faraday rotation in Co ferromagnetic thin films and perforated periodic Co nano-hole arrays were investigated. It was observed that the optical response and Faraday rotation of Co nano-hole arrays were strongly dependent on the thickness of the film, and the Faraday rotation reached the maximum amplitude at an optimal thickness value of 30–50 nm, which contrasted with the Co thin films where the Faraday rotation increased with the film thickness. In addition, the Faraday rotation spectra of Co nano-hole arrays showed a weak resonantly enhanced peak at the anti-resonance modes (or Wood's anomalies) on the transmission spectra, which correspond to the enhanced local electric field at the film and surrounding medium interfaces. All experimental results were confirmed by the finite-difference time domain calculations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Relationships between the alignment magnetic field Halign of NdFeB powders and the thermal stability of their sintered magnets were investigated on the base of observing the domain structure and microstructure. The thermal stability increased before 0.6 T and then decreased with the enhancement of Halign. The action of Halign is manifested in rotating magnetic particles and higher Halign increases the alignment degree of matrix phase and optimizes the magnet microstructure, thus increasing the magnetic ordering and minimizing the magnetostatic energy of aligned particles. Better magnetic ordering and lower magnetostatic energy are sensitive to the temperature, accounting for the reduction of thermal properties after 0.6 T.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper studied the sensitivity of the magnetic levitation (MagLev) device and the improvement of its sensitivity by enlarging the distance between the two magnets. The sensitivity is defined as the ability of the device to distinguish the difference of density Δρs caused by the change of levitation Δzh. The improved device has a larger sensitivity in most areas between two magnets. The device also has an area where the sensitivity is much larger (204 mm cm3 g−1–305 mm cm3 g−1 in 2.0 M of MnCl2 aqueous solution, which is 1.67–2.50 times larger than the previous device). Based on its high sensitivity, the device's applications of separation and non-destructive testing are assessed. The improved device was able to separate samples with similar densities, while the previous device could not completely distinguish them. Non-destructive testing was advantageous for assessing tiny interior defects. The high sensitivity was beneficial.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the behaviour of a ferronematic mixture in external magnetic field, considering a new model for the anchoring energy of the nematic molecules on the cell plates in twisted nematic configuration. Using Euler Lagrange equations, we calculated the critical field for the magnetic Freedericksz transition and the saturation field. We observed that both, the critical and the saturation fields increase when the anchoring is stronger.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the magnetization behavior in Co40Fe40B20 nanodisks with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, which is induced by a Pt layer. The known giant perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in thin films elaborated from this kind of materials improves the topological structures nucleation. Our work consists in investigating the skyrmions apparition and stability in amorphous CoFeB nanodisks. The detected skyrmions are not spontaneously nucleated. Their nucleation is induced by an applied external field. We also study reversal magnetization of CoFeB and we elucidate skyrmions nucleation and annihilation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Ti substituting partially Fe in Fe – 22 at.% Al alloy on the structure and magnetic properties is investigated experimentally by electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction, Mössbauer spectrometry, and by magnetic measurements at room and low temperatures. The samples in a form of discs prepared by cutting the arc-melted button-type ingots have yielded a coarse-grained structure in the Fe – 22 at.% Al sample and fine Fe-Al-Ti cuboids embedded in Fe-Al(Ti) matrix in the Fe – 22 at.% Al – 7 at.% Ti alloy. The mean cuboids’ size was 45 nm and the mean composition was determined to be close to Fe2TiAl. The as-prepared Fe-Al-Ti samples exhibited substantially reduced saturation magnetization and markedly higher remanent magnetization and coercivity as compared to the as-prepared Fe-Al sample. The thermal treatment of the Fe-Al sample at 1073 K/168 h has changed its magnetic behaviour only slightly, whereas the treatment of the Fe-Al-Ti sample at 1273 K/168 h resulted in remarkable softening of its magnetic properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Hubbard model in a bipartite face-centered cubic (fcc) lattice is studied in the tight-binding limit and using the mean-field approximation. This bipartite lattice can be obtained from the traditional fcc lattice by considering a larger four-atom cubic unit cell and allowing electron hopping to occur only between atoms on the vertexes and atoms on the faces of each unit cell. We find that two of the tight-binding energy bands of this type of lattice are flat, as expected, and the other two bands are energetically symmetrical about the zero-energy level. This result contrasts with the single, energetically asymmetrical energy band that is found on the traditional fcc lattice. The transition from the traditional (asymmetrical) case to the new (symmetrical) one is studied in two ways: via comparison of the density of states, and through mean-field calculations. In what concerns the density of states, we begin by considering all hoppings between nearest neighbors, which is the traditional assumption for the fcc lattice. The density of states in this case is known to be asymmetrical. We then gradually decrease the hopping parameter for jumps between atoms on different faces of the cubic unit cell, and find that, as this parameter approaches zero (and the fcc lattice becomes bipartite), localized states appear and the density of states becomes symmetrical. Our mean-field analysis consists of calculating the magnetization of the Hubbard model on both the traditional and the bipartite fcc lattices. One consequence of the asymmetry of the bands in the traditional fcc lattice is the absence of the particle-hole symmetry that occurs in the bipartite fcc lattice. The mean-field results are in agreement with both Lieb's theorem and the uniform density theorem, and suggest an extension of the former in the limit of high Hubbard U.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Spin-dependent electronic transport has been investigated on granular 99.95% La0.7Sr0.3MnO3-0.05% Paraffin wax nanocomposite. Although, the composite exhibits usual signature of spin-polarized tunnelling magnetoresistance (MR) of polycrystalline La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (LSMO) within the temperature range of 50–300 K; it differs significantly at low temperature region (T < 50 K) where decrease in low field MR (LFMR) with decrease in temperature has been observed. Interestingly, we have even found a change in the sign of LFMR from negative to positive at T = 10 K with the effect gets enhanced with decreasing temperature. Finally, at T = 5 K, MR is found to be positive at the entire applied field regime. Calculated surface or boundary spin susceptibility has been found to follow similar nature of temperature dependence of MR indicating interface magnetization governing MR. Our conjecture is the blocking of superparamagnetic nanoscopic LSMO impurities, possibly present at intergranular Paraffin wax layers, at lower temperature (T < 50 K) resulting in spin-flip scattering of tunnelling electrons. These spin-flipped tunnelling electrons, in turn experience strong spin-dependent scattering at the minority spin band of LSMO. This leads to enhancement of resistance with applied field and hence yields positive MR. Significantly, with the incorporation of cheap, easily available, organic Paraffin wax tunnel barrier, an overall MR response of ∼200% has been achieved at T = 5 K, at 5 T applied magnetic field and with ac excitation of 111 Hz frequency.© 2018Longitudinal spin Seebeck effect (LSSE) refers to generate spin accumulation in ferromagnetic material by thermal gradient, and the spin accumulation can transfer to the attached heavy metal and convert to charge current through inverse spin Hall effect (ISHE). However, the origin of LSSE has been under debate for a long time. In this paper, we prepared the YIG/Pt heterostructure by pulsed laser deposition and magnetron sputter, and studied the relationship between temperature and the voltage of inverse spin Hall effect (VISHE). It is found that the VISHE vs T curve measured under zero-field (ZFC) and nonzero-field (FC) condition are not coincident with each other, meaning there might exist some spin glass states in the system which may come from the YIG/Pt interface. Moreover, we also compare the experimental data and magnon spin current theory prediction which considers both the bulk magnon spin current effect and the interfacial spin pumping process in the interface. It is found that there is a big deviation between them, meaning that the interface effect may play a crucial role in the temperature-dependent LSSE, especially in low temperature. This work will provide deep insight into the spin transport behavior of the YIG/Pt heterostructure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we propose an extension to the Handrich model considering the fluctuations in exchange energies between ions located in different magnetic sublattices. Thus, each magnetic sublattice has an amorphization parameter that changes with temperature. A systematic study of the magnetization as a function of temperature is performed, which allows to observe significant differences when such fluctuations are not considered.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the effect of substitution of Co with Fe on structural and magnetic characteristics of nanocrystalline Fe-Co-Cr alloys has been investigated. In this regard, different combinations of Fe, Co and Cr elements with nominal composition of Fe72−xCoxCr28 (10 < X < 22) were mechanically milled and subsequently annealed in the range of 560–640 °C. The samples were characterized using X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer. Based on results, during milling process Cr and Co elements have been dissolved in Fe matrix and Fe-Cr-Co solid solution (with combination of α1 and α2 spinodal phases) has been formed. The coercivity and saturation of magnetization of formed alloys were in the range of 110–187 Oe and 150–175 emu/g, respectively. The coercivity of Fe72−xCoxCr28 (10 < X < 22) alloys showed an anomalous behavior at 18 at.% of Co as a result of optimal interaction between α1 and α2 phases in this composition. The formed Fe-Co-Cr α-phase solid solutions were not stable and transformed to σ and γ phases during annealing process at temperatures higher than 600 °C. The formation of non-magnetic σ and γ phases had destructive effect on magnetic properties of prepared samples with different composition.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Exchange bias and coercivity of two dimensional (2-D) Co-Cr2O3 nanodots of different lateral sizes (120 nm and 240 nm) have been measured to investigate the effects of nanostructuring in exchange coupled systems. Triangular nanodots were prepared using polystyrene nanosphere lithography in conjunction with magnetron sputtering. The thickness of Co in the nanodots has been varied from 5 to 12 nm, while the thickness of Cr2O3 has been kept constant (23 nm) for all samples. Continuous films with the same thicknesses have also been investigated and compared with purely ferromagnetic (Co) and exchange biased (Co/Cr2O3) nanodots in order to study the effect of discretization on the magnetic properties. The coercivity of Co nanodots was found to be larger than that of both Co and Co/Cr2O3 continuous thin films. The Co/Cr2O3 nanodots showed a very large increase in exchange bias and coercivity over that of the continuous exchange biased films. The results have been used to estimate the effective interfacial coupling constant of the Co/Cr2O3 system, which is found to increase due to nanostructuring. These effects have been explained in terms of interfacial and configurational anisotropy of the nanostructures.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this letter, a novel Superjunction Metal-Oxide -Semiconductor Field Effect Transistor with wave-type field limiting ring (WFLR-SJ-MOSFET) is proposed to improve the di/dt robustness of body diode reverse recovery. When SJ-MOSFET body diode goes through reverse recovery, the WFLR can suppress and rebuild the peak electric field which is resulted from the large current flowing through the sensitive terminal boundary region. As a consequence, the ruggedness of dynamic avalanche during reverse recovery is optimized. Finally, the di/dt robustness of WFLR-SJ-MOSFET body diode reverse recovery is improved by 3.2 times from 72 A/μs to 320 A/μs comparing with the conventional SJ-MOSFET.© 2018Photoelectrical mechanism of single Indium Oxide nanowires have been investigated using current-voltage characteristics measurements varying with temperature. The fabricated In2O3 nanowires show high photosensitivity up to 140 at room temperature. It is shown that the photosensitivity of In2O3 nanowires decreases by increasing the temperature due to shorter carrier life time, higher dark conductance and lower electron mobility at higher temperatures. The significantly enhanced photoconduction of single-In2O3 nanowires observed under UV illumination is attributed mainly to the transition from defect levels, which are introduced by the oxygen vacancies that are mostly present on the surface of the nanowires.© 2018Memory devices having the structure of n-Si(1 0 0)/SiO2/metal nanocrystals (NCs)/Y2O3/Au were fabricated and their structural and electrical characteristics have been studied extensively. Gold nanoparticles were formed via laser annealing (LA) of a thin Au layer. The aim was to investigate the use of laser annealing as an effective method to produce NC-based memory devices. In particular, laser annealing was used in order to obtain uniformly spaced NCs with an average diameter of 20 nm. Best results for Au NCs were obtained using fluence below 500 mJ/cm2 and a small number of laser pulses (1–5). After structural characterization using SEM, electrical characterization involving capacitance-voltage and current-voltage measurements revealed good (dis-)charging behavior and memory windows around 3 V. The analysis of the experimental data showed that LA is a promising annealing technique to realize devices with electrical characteristics suitable for future memory devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ca2CrOsO6 was synthesized recently and measured to be an insulating ferrimagnet with a high magnetic ordering temperature of 490 K. To design a half metal, we substituted Cr with Mo and performed an investigation on Ca2AOsO6 (A = Cr, Mo) by using the density functional theory. However, Ca2MoOsO6 is an insulator with a small band gap in one spin direction. By applying external pressure, the small gap can be closed, making Ca2MoOsO6 a compensated half metal. The estimated Tc for Ca2MoOsO6 under pressure is higher than the room temperature. Therefore, we expect that Ca2MoOsO6 would be promising compound for spintronic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Table-like magnetocaloric effect is an important requirement for obtaining high efficiency performance in magnetic refrigeration that uses Ericsson cycle. Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Ho36Co48Al16 alloy, carefully selected from multiphase region of the ternary Ho-Co-Al system, have been studied. The multiphasic alloy exhibits three magnetic phase transitions spread over a wide temperature range. Suitable distribution of phase proportions and respective magnetic entropy changes result in the broadening of the overall peak magnetic entropy change of the alloy. Table-like magnetocaloric effect is obtained with magnetic entropy change of 8.5 J/kg K and large refrigerant capacity of 525 J/kg under applied magnetic field change of 0–5 T. At field change of 0–2 T, the magnitude of the magnetic entropy change plateau is 2.9 J/kg K with refrigerant capacity of 180 J/kg. The table-like feature and the competitive refrigerant capacity and applied magnetic field change values make the multiphase alloy a practical magnetic refrigerant for efficient low temperature cooling applications that employ the Ericsson cycle, even under permanent magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The great majority of experimental studies on magnetic interactions employ a technique based on the Wohlfarth's relation and require an initially demagnetized state. In the present work a relation analogous to that of Wohlfarth though between in-field magnetization curves instead of remanence curves is derived. This allowed to introduce interaction plots obtained via measurements of the major hysteresis loop and a recoil curve only. The method is effectively tested on three real magnetic systems which evidence different interaction effects. Although the plots introduced here seem to provide information about interactions alike the classical remanence plots, they present important advantages. These plots are acquired in an easier and faster manner and do not demand demagnetization, which significantly simplifies the measurement procedure and allows assessment of interaction effects in virtually impossible to demagnetize systems with rectangular major loops. Furthermore, this method can easily be adapted for estimation of effects leading to deviations from theoretical behavior of other hysteretic quantities.© 2018In this research paper, we determine and analyze the magnetic properties and the magneto-caloric effect in the compound MnBi. To do so, we firstly establish the magnetic properties of the studied compound by using Monte Carlo simulations method, and then we determine the transition temperature through studying the magnetization, the susceptibility, the specific heat, and the Binder's fourth-order cumulate of order parameter. This latter result is only one among a number of results attained in this paper. To cite but an example, the plotting of the magnetic entropy change, adiabatic temperature change and the relative cooling power for the different external magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Stochastic magnetization dynamics at non-zero temperatures gives rise to write errors in spin-transfer-torque random access memory (STTRAM). In this paper, the write error rate (WER) of an in-plane STTRAM bit is estimated by extending a previously developed rare-event-enhancement (REE) technique for spin-transfer-torque switching to an in-plane magnet. Reliable calculation of write error rates up to 10-9 is demonstrated with only ∼103 micromagnetic simulations, thereby making an otherwise prohibitively large computational burden tractable. For the in-plane bit studied here, WERs obtained from the REE-enabled micromagnetic simulations are found to be higher than those obtained within a spatially-coherent (macrospin) switching assumption. Spatially-incoherent switching modes of different types are observed to reduce the switching speed. A detailed study of these spatially-incoherent modes reveals that, at lower applied currents, the end mode controls the WER slope, whereas, at higher applied currents, switching via vortices or anti-vortices governs the WER slope. A sharp change in the WER slope is observed when the latter type of excitation begins to dominate the unswitched population. By further improvements to the REE technique to selectively take into account the vortices and the anti-vortices, reliable prediction of WERs for all ranges of current is demonstrated. The results could help explain prior experimental observations. REE techniques also could be useful for magnetic devices other than STTRAM where rare events remain important and impact device performance.© 2018Avalanche breakdown of novel 650 V SiC Schottky-barrier rectifiers is investigated. The rectifier diode has low leakage current for the temperatures up to 300 °C. Thermal coefficient of avalanche breakdown increases with the temperature to around 0.009%/K at 200 °C. Near-uniform avalanche breakdown is verified using emission imaging, and maximum specific avalanche energy of 20.7 J/cm2 is achieved. The critical temperature for stability in unclamped inductive switching (UIS) is above 520 °C as estimated through thermal simulation. Long-term walkout of breakdown voltage at 176 °C is less than 0.02%.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Carbon-coated nickel (Ni) nanoparticles, Ni@C nanocomposites, have been synthesized using solid-state pyrolysis of nickel phthalocyanine and metal-free phthalocyanine (NiPc)x· (H2Pc)1−x solid solutions, 0⩽x⩽1. The Ni concentrations in carbon matrix (cNi) of the prepared samples continuously varied in the range of 0–3at.% (0–12wt.%). The average nanoparticle size varied within 4–40 nm range. All samples containing single domain Ni nanoparticles exhibit both ferromagnetic and superparamagnetic properties because of the wide range of size distribution. An abrupt drop of saturation magnetization has been observed with decrease in size of Ni nanoparticles from 40 nm to 12 nm. Nearly linear dependence of saturation magnetization on the nanoparticle surface/volume ratio can be interpreted as a result of contact interaction between Ni nanoparticles and the carbon matrix which provides an electron transfer from carbon matrix to nickel. However, further reductions in nanoparticle size increase magnetization growth of which can apparently contribute to the emergence of the giant paramagnetism due to large orbital moments of conductive electrons. The size effects and surface magnetic anisotropy in Ni@C nanocomposites are revealed in the measurements of coercive field, zero-field cooling (ZFC) susceptibility, blocking temperatures and ferromagnetic resonance spectra. Concentration dependencies of ferromagnetic and electron paramagnetic resonance parameters in Ni@C nanocomposites have also been investigated and their peculiarities highlighted. A correlation between concentration dependencies of FMR and SQUID magnetometry parameters, namely between the g-factor curves – geff, the resonance linewidth – ΔHFMR and coercive field – Hc, have been observed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on the investigation of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy in magnetron sputtered Pt/[Co60Fe40/Pt]5 multilayers, and the behaviour of the anisotropy field as function of the growth rate of the Pt buffer layer (4 nm thick). Highly crystallized, atomically flat (1 1 1) fcc-textured [CoFe/Pt] multilayers were obtained, as confirmed by high resolution transmission electron microscopy along with fast Fourier transform patterns and X-ray diffraction. Equivalent lattice relaxation between the Pt buffer and the CoFe/Pt multilayer was observed in all samples, indicating that the magnetic anisotropy is not dominated by magnetoelastic effects. Our results indicate that the formation of an ordered phase of CoFePt with fcc (1 1 1) texture, which is affected by the Pt buffer layer growth rate, regulates the anisotropy field in these multilayer systems, suggesting a magnetocrystalline origin of the observed perpendicular anisotropy. An optimum growth rate of the Pt buffer layer was obtained (∼0.7 Å/s), which allows enhancing the fcc (1 1 1) texture of the alloy-like CoFe/Pt multilayer, for which an uniaxial anisotropy energy constant of 3.5 × 106 erg/cc and an anisotropy field of 13 kG were obtained.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The anisotropic parylene-coated bonded NdFeB magnets with parylene C coating on the surface of NdFeB powders are prepared by warm compaction process. The parylene C coating is characterized by focused ion beam-scanning electron microscopy (FIB-SEM) and energy dispersive X-ray Spectroscopy (EDS), revealing a parylene C film of 300–500 nm thickness on the surface of NdFeB powders. The parylene-coated NdFeB magnets show excellent magnetic properties of maximum energy product ((BH)max, 104 kJ/m3), degree of alignment (DOA, 0.476) and density (6.17 g/cm3) than non-coated NdFeB magnets (60 kJ/m3, 0.337, 5.72 g/cm3). And with the increasing thickness of parylene C coating, (BH)max and density increase first, and then decrease while DOA keeps a growing trend all the time. The parylene-coated NdFeB magnets also exhibit better corrosion resistance according electrochemical test. The mechanisms for the improvement of magnetic properties and corrosion resistance are the good lubricating property and super chemical stability of parylene C coating on the surface of NdFeB powders.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we report the behavior of maximum energy product (BH)max of cobalt ferrite nanopowder towards the variation of calcinations temperature. The studied CoFe2O4 nanopowder was synthesized using sol–gel autocombustion method. X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, Mössbauer spectroscopy and superconducting quantum interference device magnetometer techniques were used to characterize crystal structure, phase composition, morphology and magnetic properties. By changing the calcination temperature (T = 600 °C, 800 °C, 1000 °C and 1100 °C), the structural and magnetic properties of the compounds could be tuned. The magnetic properties results show that the highest value of (BH)max is close to 0.35 MGOe observed for the sample calcined at T = 800 °C. These results suggest that (BH)max of cobalt ferrite nanopowder can be enhanced by optimizing synthesis steps.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.La1− xPbxFeO3 (x = 0.1–0.5) solid solutions have been prepared by aliovalent substitution of Pb2+ at La3+ site using solid state reaction route. The structural, magnetic and magneto dielectric properties of these solid solutions have been reported. The XRD data shows that all samples possess orthorhombic crystal structure and do not exhibit any phase segregation indicating that the Pb2+ is well within its solid solubility limit. All samples exhibit magnetic ordering with Mr increasing up to x = 0.2 (1.65 emu/g) and decreasing thereafter. The XPS data shows that the ratio of Fe3+/Fe2+ ions increases up to x = 0.2 and decreases thereafter. The magneto dielectric response has been observed in all the samples at low frequencies only indicating the role of space charge polarization.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electromagnetic (EM) and microwave absorption properties of microwave absorbing materials (MAMs) with ball-milled flaky carbonyl iron-BaFe12O19 (FCI-BaFe12O19) as compound absorbents and silicon resin as matrix were investigated in the frequency range of 2.6–18.0 GHz. Results indicate that efficiently enhanced impedance matching and microwave absorption of the FCI-BaFe12O19/silicon resin composites were obtained due to the microstructure and synergism of FCI-BaFe12O19 particles as well as the inherent electromagnetic properties. And the values and frequency dependencies of EM and microwave absorption properties of the MAMs can be simply adjusted by filling FCI-BaFe12O19 absorbents with different mass ratios. When the mass ratio was 6:1, the reflective loss (RL) values below −5dB were obtained in the frequency range of 5.4–18 GHz, 4.9–18 GHz and 4.5–18 GHz with the thicknesses of 1.0 mm, 1.1 mm and 1.2 mm, respectively. Moreover, RL values are all below −8dB in military X band, meaning that 85% EM wave can be absorbed. The advantages demonstrate that this FCI-BaFe12O19 compound absorbent can be acted as a potential candidate for fabricating microwave absorbing material with thin-thickness and broadband absorption, especially for practical application.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We systematically studied the structure, magnetism, resistance, magnetoresistance (MR) and nonlinear current-voltage (I-V) curves of La0.33Pr0.34Ca0.33MnO3 (LPCMO) nanofibers via electrospinning and followed calcination. Magnetic study shows that this nanosystem can form long-range order and generate spin-glass states at low temperatures. The resistance and MR studies indicate the presence of metal insulator transitions and colossal MR effects in the system, respectively. One-dimensional variable range hopping (1D VRH) model is used to explain the high-temperature segment behavior of resistance and MR. The behavior of the nonlinear I-V curves indicates the exist of threshold voltage and zero bias conductance at low temperatures in the LPCMO nanowires, which represents the existence of Coulomb gap.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe read instability of conventional 6T-SRAM cell has made the 8T-SRAM cell a substitute for high data reliability. But the single ended nature of read operation demands a complete Vdd swing of high capacitive read bit lines leading to large energy consumption. A novel assist technique using charge recycling concept is proposed here which reduces the read and write energy by reducing the voltage swing. Mathematical analysis of the proposed technique, theoretically predicts the read and write energy to reduce by 75% and 25% respectively compare to that of the conventional 8T-SRAM array. Experimental simulation using predictive technology model demonstrates these two energy consumptions to be reduced by 58% and 27% respectively. The proposed technique also reduces the leakage current flow in the standby cells and hence the energy consumption. The dummy read current flow in the half-selected cells is also controlled significantly in the proposed technique. The stability of the SRAM cell remains unchanged by the insertion of the proposed assist technique.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We critically discuss various experimental methods to determine Curie temperature TC of (Ga,Mn)As thin layers or other conducting magnetic materials by means of electric charge transport measurements. They all base on the influence of sample magnetization on the magnetoresistivity tensor ρ̂ and are an alternative to the method based upon an analysis of the temperature derivative of the sample resistance (Novák et al., 2008). These methods can be applied even when standard SQUID magnetometers are difficult or impossible to use – for example for extremely small samples or in the case of experiments performed at very specific physical conditions, e.g. at high hydrostatic pressure inside the clamp cell. We show that the use of the so called Arrott plot prepared with the use of high magnetic field isotherms ρxx(H0),ρxy(H0) (H0 – external magnetic field) may lead to substantial (of the order of 10 K) divergence of the obtained TC values depending on the assumptions which are necessary to make in this case and depending on the direction of a magnetic anisotropy easy axis. We also propose a number of ways how to obtain, basing on low magnetic field isotherms ρxx(H0),ρxy(H0), clear and characteristic features which are closely related to the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic phase transition.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MCA) of MnPt(0 0 1) film and MnPt/MgO(0 0 1) using ab initio electronic structure calculations. We found that the magnetic ground state of the MnPt film strongly depends on thickness (n). In bulk and in film with n ≥ 7 monolayers; AFM-II is the magnetic ground state. However, as the film thickness reduces, the magnetic ground state shifts from AFM-II to AFM-III. We employ layer-by-layer Heisenberg model to explain thickness dependent ground state transition. AFM-III state in the Mn-terminated film shows large perpendicular MCA(PMCA), which further enhances on a MgO(0 0 1) substrate. We conclude that the interface plays a key role for the enhancement of PMCA on the substrate.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.To increase the maximum energy product, (BH)max, of Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets, a process for preparing a Sm-Fe-N powder with a low oxygen content was developed. The Sm-Fe-N powder containing 0.23 wt% oxygen was prepared by ball milling and nitriding, and the powder remanence and coercivity were 140 A·m2kg−1 and 0.72 MA·m−1, respectively. Arc plasma deposition (APD) was used for Zn addition. Fine Zn particles several tens of nanometers in size were deposited on the Sm-Fe-N powder under vacuum conditions, and APD prevented the oxygen content increasing in the Zn-deposited Sm-Fe-N powder. The low-oxygen Sm-Fe-N powder was pressed and sintered by spark plasma sintering (SPS), and 3.3 wt% Zn-bonded and Zn-free Sm-Fe-N magnets were prepared. For both Zn-bonded and Zn-free Sm-Fe-N magnets, the density increased with increasing sintering pressure, and the relative density of the Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnet was 89% and that of the Zn-free Sm-Fe-N magnet was 85% after SPS. The coercivities of the Zn-bonded and Zn-free Sm-Fe-N magnets were both high at 1.1 and 0.8 MA·m−1, respectively. (BH)max of these magnets increased with increasing relative density, and the highest (BH)max value of the Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets was 153 kJ·m−3 and that of the Zn-free Sm-Fe-N magnet was 179 kJ·m−3.© 2018Thin film transistors have become crucial components of several electronic display devices. However, high leakage current is a frustrating impediment to increasing the efficiency of these transistors. We have performed an experimental and quantitative study on the effects of off-state bias stress on the characteristics of a p-type polycrystalline silicon (poly-Si) thin film transistor (TFT). The gate-induced drain leakage (GIDL) current under off-state bias stress conditions was investigated by changing gate-source voltage (Vgs) and drain-source voltage (Vds). Off-state bias stress was found to dramatically increase the threshold Vgs from 1 to 11 V, thereby increasing the voltage needed to turn off the TFT, without causing significant changes in on-state current or subthreshold swing. We developed local defect creation and charge trapping models for a technology computer-aided design simulation platform to understand the mechanisms underlying these observed effects. Using the model, we showed that off-state stress induces charge trapping within the local defects of a high electric field region in the TFT channel near the drain. This reduces the electric field and thermionic field-emission current, which in turn lowers the GIDL current by increasing threshold voltage Vgs.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA simple and cost-effective paper-based triboelectric nanogenerator (TENG) using polypropylene carbonate (PPC) and photoacid generator (PAG) is proposed in this work. Paper is used as the supporting platform for triboelectric friction between commercial Teflon tape and PAG-PPC. The PAG-PPC layer is proved to be a novel and promising material for TENG, and brings fast termination of functionality of TENG after thermal triggering. The proposed TENG has potential application in transient sensor networks.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe determined characteristics of internal gettering of copper in the vertical direction of p-type silicon wafer. Bulk micro-defects (BMDs) caused by oxygen precipitation and the gettering efficiency of Cu along the vertical direction from the surface into the bulk were investigated for Si wafers with and without rapid thermal annealing (RTA) process. Based on scanning infrared microscopy, secondary ion mass spectrometry, and local etching results, the density of BMDs in Si wafers with RTA process was higher than that in Si wafer without RTA process. Depth profile of Cu concentration was strongly related to the BMD density profile in the vertical direction. According to the transmission electron microscopy analysis, Cu impurities were trapped at BMDs through precipitation of copper silicides. It is proposed that the RTA process can improve the internal getterig efficiency of copper in the vertical direction of p-type silicon wafer.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis paper will focus on design, fabrication and characterization of a new MEMS capacitive microphone with the perforated diaphragm supported by Z-shape arms using SOI wafer. The aim is to fabricate a new microphone with the smallest size, simple and low cost. The novelty is making Z-shape arms around of diaphragm on SOI wafer using only a mask to decrease diaphragm stiffness and air damping and thus improve microphone performances. The fabricated structure has a diaphragm thickness of 5 µm, a diaphragm size of 0.3 mm × 0.3 mm, and an air gap of 1 µm. The results show that the pull-in voltage is 10.3 V, open circuit sensitivity of 2.46 mV/Pa, and resonance frequency of 60 kHz. The fabrication process uses minimal number of layers and masks due to using SOI wafer to reduce fabrication time and cost. The specific geometry of the proposed diaphragm causes the new fabricated microphone has low bias voltage, good sensitivity and smallest size compared with previous works.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ni45Mn44Sn11 melt spun ribbons have been prepared by melt spinning technique. A single austenite L21 phase with lattice constant 5.945 Å is confirmed at room temperature. The first order martensite transition is observed from calorimetric, electronic transport and magnetic measurements in our Ni45Mn44Sn11 melt spun ribbon sample. The change in lattice entropy due to martensite transformation is found to be nearly 15 J kg−1 K−1 from calorimetric data, both for heating and cooling cycle. A noticeable shift (−7.5 K) of reverse martensite transition for the application of 8 T magnetic field has been clearly observed from temperature dependent resistivity measurement. Field induced transformation of martensite phase to austenite phase has also been noticed directly from the field dependent isothermal resistivity data inside martensite transition regime. As a result large negative magnetoresistance of 38% has been observed at 265 K. Sharp increase of magnetization, on heating, near reverse martensite transition is also observed due to transformation of weak magnetic martensite phase to ferromagnetic austenite phase. Isothermal magnetization data show magnetic hysteresis near the martensite transition regime due to difference in austenite and martensite phase fraction between increasing and decreasing field. A maximum positive magnetic entropy change of 7.2 J kg−1 K−1 is observed for the field change of 5 T. Magnetic hysteresis and refrigerant capacity are the important parameters for magnetic refrigerant material. The maximum value of magnetic hysteresis loss is 16.6 J kg−1. However, the net refrigerant capacity is found to be 30.4 J kg−1 for Ni45Mn44Sn11 melt spun ribbon sample. The adiabatic temperature change is found to be of −2.68 K for application of 5 T magnetic field at 276 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The aim of the present report is to show the synergistic effect of conducting polyaniline and manganite nanoparticles on the low field magnetoresistance response. We specially focused on the role of the conducting polyaniline interphase in a broad range of temperatures and low applied magnetic fields. Our results showed an increment on the electrical conductivity and enhancement on the magnetoresistance for lower amounts of conducting polyaniline additions with respect to the manganite unloaded samples. We also found that close to room temperature, the changes in magnetoresistance are mostly due to an increment of the spin polarization and spin disorder due to the presence of polyaniline interphase. However, at intermediate temperatures the polyaniline interphase intrinsic magnetoresistance showed an additional contribution to the total negative magnetoresistance response. These results, suggest that conducting polymer interphase shows both passive and active roles in the enhancement of the low field magnetoresistance of inorganic-organic nanocomposites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Hybrid nanocomposites are nowadays the focus of intensive scientific and industrial research motivated by expectations from fields as diverse as microelectronics and medicine. One of the challenges faced by these materials, before getting into applications, is the development of methodologies capable of processing them in the form of thin planar nanostructures. To achieve this, bottom-up manipulation, such as the layer-by-layer approach capable of growing nano-objects while controlling position and inter-particle distances, has made possible the construction of assemblies with properties tailored on the nanoscale level. This review will summarize the new initiatives taken in the area of colloidal iron oxide nanoparticles and their arrays in polymeric matrix employing the layer-by-layer technique related research. Aiming to understand fundamental issues such as the effect of nanocomposite morphology on the collective magnetic properties, experiments and simulations performed to assess both the nanocomposite's morphology and the corresponding magnetic signatures, will be discussed. Applications leading to future developments related with these nanostructures, as for instance chemical sensors and storage devices, will also be highlighted.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Previous experiments have found that LaMnO3 thin films grown on SrTiO3 substrate exhibit insulating ferromagnetism different from that of the bulk LaMnO3. Utilizing first-principles calculations based on density functional theory, magnetic transitions, energy gaps and spin exchange interactions of LaMnO3 thin films with different epitaxial strains are investigated, and the effect of the Jahn-Teller distortion, rotation and tilt of oxygen octahedrons on magnetic and electrical properties are analyzed in detail. A relative narrow insulating ferromagnetic area without structural phase transition is obtained during the transition from metallic ferromagnetic phase to insulating A-type antiferromagnetic phase. If the magnetic transition of LaMnO3 film is attributed to Jahn-Teller distortion, then the metal–insulator transition should be ascribed to the tilt of the oxygen octahedron and large change of the O1-Mn-O2 angle in ab plane, which is helpful to understand the insulating ferromagnetic characters during the preparations of the LaMnO3 superlattices or heterostructures, also indicates that the insulating ferromagnetic properties of LaMnO3 films can be tuned by epitaxial strain-controlled oxygen octahedrons distortions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt substituted nickel spinel ferrites were synthesized in the form of Ni1-xCoxFe2O4(x=0-1,Δx=0.15) via Pechini's sol–gel citrate method with final sintering at 1000 °C for 6 h. Structural purity of the prepared ferrites is examined by using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Raman spectroscopy, scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and energy dispersive spectroscopy (EDS). Thermo-gravimetric and differential thermal analysis (TG-DTA) show that the formation of spinel phase is completed upto 700 °C. Lattice constant, cationic distribution and cationic site parameters are estimated from XRD data. For the first time, lattice parameter (a) is determined using four different methods and quite similar values are obtained in those. Characteristic peaks of nickel ferrites are observed in the Raman spectrum of each ferrite composition. Grain size (80–95 nm) is observed to be higher than crystallite size (26.2–31.8 nm) due to agglomeration of grains. Mössbauer spectra recorded at 300 K temperature show the presence of iron in only +3 valency. Variations of isomer shift, hyperfine field, quadrupole splitting and line width are analyzed with the amount of doped cobalt. This paper also presents the electromagnetic and shielding properties of these Ni–Co ferrites in X-band (8.2–12.4 GHz) frequency range using vector network analyzer (VNA). The analysis of shielding effectiveness shows that increasing the amount of cobalt in nickel ferrites results in increase in shielding efficiency of the ferrites which proves the utility of this specific doping.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Indium doped barium hexaferrites were synthesized by usual ceramic technology. They were investigated by the high resolution neutron powder diffraction and vibration sample magnetometry in temperatures up to 730 K. Analysis of NPD data was performed by FullProf in classical approximation. Structure parameters as well as bond lengths and bond angles were determined versus the substitution level and the temperature. Main attention was paid to the distribution of indium cations between different crystallographic positions and temperature change of bond lengths and bond angles. Effect of these two structure parameters on Fe3+(i) – O− – Fe3+(j) (i, j = 1, 2, 3, 4, 5) indirect superexchange interactions with the substitution level and temperature was established. A dominant effect of a positive intrasublattice Fe3+(i) – O2− – Fe3+(i) (i = 1, 2, 3, 4, 5) indirect superexchange interactions on a magnetic ordering was detected.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Single-domain ferromagnetic nanoparticle systems can be used to transfer energy from a time-dependent magnetic field into their environment. This local heat generation, i.e., magnetic hyperthermia, receives applications in cancer therapy which requires the enhancement of the energy loss. A possible way to improve the efficiency is to chose a proper type of applied field, e.g., a rotating instead of an oscillating one. The latter case is very well studied and there is an increasing interest in the literature to investigate the former although it is still unclear under which circumstances the rotating applied field can be more favourable than the oscillating one. The goal of this work is to incorporate the presence of a static field and to perform a systematic study of the non-linear dynamics of the magnetisation in the framework of the deterministic Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation in order to calculate energy losses. Two cases are considered: the static field is either assumed to be perpendicular to the plane of rotation or situated in the plane of rotation. In the latter case a significant increase in the energy loss/cycle is observed if the magnitudes of the static and the rotating fields have a certain ratio (e.g. it should be one for isotropic nanoparticles). It can be used to “super-localise” the heat transfer: in case of an inhomogeneous applied static field, tissues are heated up only where the magnitudes of the static and rotating fields reach the required ratio.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic properties of ZnFe2O4 nanograins, prepared by high-energy ball milling and annealed, were systematically studied by X-ray diffraction, 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy and AC magnetic susceptibility measurements. Disordered spinel-like structure, with a grain size of 12 nm, is established after 200 h of milling. While the 300 K Mössbauer spectrum of the as-milled sample (200 h) displays broad magnetic absorption lines, characteristic of a disordered system, the magnetization data do not show a magnetic phase transition between 4 and 300 K. At low temperatures, the Mössbauer spectra suggest the presence of two distinct ferrite magnetic phases: one attributed to the grain core (crystalline-like phase), with magnetic ordering temperature of about 90 K, and one showing a magnetic hyperfine field distribution; the latter is associated with a chemically disordered phase (grain boundary contributions). Annealing the 200 h sample at 973 K leads to an improvement of atomic ordering of the spinel structure (reduction of cationic inversion) and average grain size of about 17 nm. AC magnetic susceptibility shows a cusp at about T≈30K, whilst Mössbauer experiments in the same sample reveal magnetic blocking in the same temperature range. The frequency dependence of susceptibility suggests the formation of a cluster-glass-like state. High temperature susceptibility can be described with a Fulcher law of interacting magnetic clusters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The doping of parent compound with selective dopants usually enhances the properties of the parent compound. In this paper, titanium doped cobalt ferrite nanoparticles (Co1−xTixFe2O4 with x = 0–0.075) via the sol-gel route is reported. The effect of titanium ions on the properties of cobalt ferrite is detailed. Structural evolution is confirmed using XRD technique and the titanium ion induced changes are given in terms of lattice constant, grain size, X-ray density, tetrahedral and octahedral hopping length and tetrahedral and octahedral bond length. The X-ray diffraction pattern displayed the formation of cubic inverse spinal structure belonging to the Fd3m space group. FTIR analysis confirmed the presence of characteristic peaks of ferrites around 400 cm−1 and 600 cm−1. Raman spectroscopy revealed reduction in peak intensities of Raman active modes. SEM characterization had shown the formation of well resolved spherical particles. Elemental composition was evaluated by EDAX spectrum. TEM images also confirmed the spherical morphology of the nanocrystallites and crystallite size calculated is in agreement with that calculated from the XRD analysis. The SAED pattern shows uniform fringes of width 0.428 nm belonging (2 2 2) plane. The diffraction pattern of HRTEM confirmed cubic spinel structure of the samples. Magnetic properties are evaluated from room temperature hysteresis loops. Increase in the saturation magnetization and coercivity was observed with increasing titanium content. Gradual increase in impedance with the increase in titanium concentration was estimated by impedance spectroscopy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The search for new methods of determining the degree of stress of steel structures and the methods of detecting early phases of defect development are still proceeding. These allows to enhance the safety of use of machines and construction structures. The paper presents the description of a measuring apparatus, the method of measurements and the results of the research carried out at test beds with a focus of acquiring new sources of information regarding the technical condition of construction materials. In the long run, such information could prove useful for the diagnosis of objects made of various types of materials that have magnetic properties. Authors points out the basic problems encountered while searching for diagnostic information in magnetic signal, which comes from the complexity of stress effective magnetization. The proper model of magnetization was introduced which leads to original method which based on the special measurement and on dedicated processing of obtained signals. Relevant experiment was performed which concerned a two-dimensional measurement and analysis of own magnetic field of a construction steel sample for three various degrees of effort. The key point was to identify and separate reversible and irreversible magnetomechanical effects according to proposed method. The results proofs of existence of detail diagnostic information which is possible to discover. The results of the research lead to improvement of the existing measuring approach for passive magnetic methods and reduce the risk of omissions of diagnostically valuable diagnostic information. This paper ends with a summary of the obtained results while focusing in particular on the utility value of the approach for the purpose of diagnosis and its further development.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe features of electromigration-induced resistance change profile are important aspects of reliability, especially for ULSI interconnect. By experimenting on 0.28 µm wide Cu dual-damascene interconnects, clear evidence of catastrophic failure is observed even when the failure criterion of only 2% resistance change is imposed. Applying theoretical constitutive law of degradation and using basic principles of generic model, constitutive equation for resistance degradation in electromigration is derived and simulated for catastrophic failure. Then real-time resistance change profile is obtained by a simple analytical model which incorporates the Nernst-Einstein relation of mass transport. The convergence of the analytical model to the generic one is also shown. The various aspects of catastrophic failure are discussed. A good correlation between the results obtained from the model and experiment are shown.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have applied the first-principles calculations to investigate magnetoelectronic properties of Vanadium impurities co-doped (Cd, Cr)Te compound for spintronic devices. The ferromagnetic (FM) nature in (Cd, Cr)Te compound co-doped with V atoms has been found, and the mechanism responsible for this behavior has been considered to be the double exchange. Moreover, the Curie-temperature calculation reveals that the stability's field of the FM-phase rises with rising both the concentration of Cr and V atoms above ambient temperature. This system presents the half-metallic character where its polarization of spin is total at the Fermi level, and its total magnetic moment is principally induced by Cr and V elements. The spin-orbit coupling (SOC) typically play an important role in the electronic structure calculations due to both the concentration of Cr and V impurities. In addition to that, our results have been confirmed by the calculation of magnetization and susceptibility using the Monte Carlo simulation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have investigated a multi-scale study of Pr5Co19 carbides. The nanocrystalline Pr5Co19Cx (x = 0, 0.5, 1, 1.5) samples were prepared using two-step method: mechanical milling process and subsequent annealing at 775 °C, followed by a solid-solid reaction carbonation at 420 °C. The structural properties of Pr5Co19Cx carbides were characterized by X-ray diffraction and refinement Rietveld method. This analysis has revealed that, all samples crystallize in the rhombohedral (3R) of Ce5Co19-type structure (space group R3¯m). The lattice parameters have increased with carbon content. Due to the magnetovolume effect, the Curie temperature was enhanced by about [Formula presented]=10%. The coercivity Hc of these carbides have decreased versus x. In addition, the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) have been studied by isothermal magnetization measurements. The low field entropy change (|▵SM max|) present a maximum of 5.2 J/kg.K for x = 0 and decreases when C content is increasing. The Arott plots and temperature dependence of the magnetization around second order magnetic transition are reported.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically study the magnetic properties of iron germanium, known as one of canonical helimagnets. For this purpose we use the real-space spin Hamiltonian and micromagnetic model, derived in terms of Andersen's “local force theorem” to describe the low-lying magnetic excitations via spin-polarized Green's function, obtained from the first-principles calculations. The model was designed to numerically evaluate the spin stiffness constant in reciprocal space, in order for assessment of the contributing itinerant mechanisms. The calculated pairwise exchange interactions reveal the essentiality of Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yosida coupling in FeGe. Thus provided mean-field estimation of magnetic transition temperature agrees good with the experimental measurement, underlining the necessity of the comprehensive real/reciprocal space-based approach for a proper description of magnetic excitations in FeGe.© 2018In this work, we demonstrate a novel method of extrusion-based 3D printing additive manufacturing of bonded magnets comprising 65 vol% anisotropic composite powders of Dy-free magfine Nd-Fe-B and Sm-Fe-N in nylon. The 3D printing was performed using a big area additive manufacturing (BAAM) process. The effects of various post-printing alignment with different magnetic field intensities and temperatures on the properties of the anisotropic bonded Nd-Fe-B + Sm-Fe-N composite magnets were investigated. Remanence increases with alignment magnetic field leading to an increase in energy product, (BH)max. For anisotropic Nd-Fe-B + Sm-Fe-N composite bonded magnets with a 65 vol% loading fraction, (BH)max of up to 11.3 MGOe are obtained. In addition, the magnetic properties of the bonded magnets can be tuned through the post-printing alignment of anisotropic particles in different directions without impairing the original shape-changing effect. This technique shows great promise for producing anisotropic bonded magnets with enhanced magnetic properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.(1 − x)La0.7Sr0.3MnO3/xNaF (x = 0.05, 0.15, 0.2) composites were synthesized by the conventional solid-state synthesis route, while the sodium fluoride NaF was added to the stoichiometric amount of La2O3, SrCO3 and Mn2O3, that allowed to reduce the synthesis temperature of composites in respect to the pure lanthanum strontium manganite. The phase purity and microstructures of composites were analyzed by X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, and energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy. Magnetocaloric effect was investigated by means of field dependence magnetization measurements. The significant affect of the additive NaF to the final size and morphology of (1 − x)La0.7Sr0.3MnO3/xNaF composite samples was observed. Though the high-concentration samples (x = 0.15, 0.2) exhibit the lower magnetic entropy changes ΔSM in respect to the pure La0.7Sr0.3MnO3, the expanded temperature dependence of ΔSM curves leads to the slightly higher values of the relative cooling power.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have used many theoretical models to simulate the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in the charge ordered Pr0.5Sr0.5MnO3 (PSMO) manganite. This sample undergoes a first order antiferromagnetic charge-ordered (AFM/CO) to a ferromagnetic (FM) transition at TCO∼165 K followed by a second order FM to paramagnetic (PM) transition at Curie temperature, TC∼255 K. The Mean-field theory and the Bean-Rodbell model are called to study deeply the MCE in FM-PM transition. Based on the mean-field theory, we proposed a numerical approach to study the evolution of magnetization versus temperature for the first order AFM/CO – FM transition. By using a phenomenological model, we have compared theoretical and experimental MCE for the above two transitions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic, thermodynamic and dielectric properties of the γ-Fe2WO6 system is reported. Crystallizing in the centrosymmetric Pbcn space group, this particular polymorph exhibits a number of different magnetic transitions, all of which are seen to exhibit a finite magneto-dielectric coupling. At the lowest measured temperatures, the magnetic ground state appears to be glass-like, as evidenced by the waiting time dependence of the magnetic relaxation. Also reflected in the frequency dependent dielectric measurements, these signatures possibly arise as a consequence of the oxygen non-stoichiometry, which promotes a disordered magnetic and electronic ground state.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The volume change on magnetic saturation of a large single crystal of Fe83Ga17 is measured by Joule's liquid displacement method. The crystal was tested in the as-grown state, and after annealing at 760 °C followed by slow cooling at 10 °C/min or quenching in water. In each case an upper limit to any volume change is < 5 ppm, establishing that the linear magnetostriction is volume-conserving. The conclusion agrees with that drawn from a study of a dozen small crystals of Fe–Ga by the strain gauge method, but the demonstration of volume conservation using Joule's original method is more direct.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Montmorillonite magnetic-clay nanoparticles (MtMag) and its exchanged product with hexadecyltrimethylammonium (O100MtMag) were synthetized by alkaline oxidation of ferrous sulfate, characterized by diverse techniques (XRD, Mössbauer spectroscopy, VSM, SEM, Zeta Potential, total specific surface area, TOC) and used as Co2+ sorbents. The magnetic characteristic of these materials allows them to be used in cases of decontamination of water polluted with dangerous materials, such as radioactive ones, reducing the risk to health due to indirect manipulation by means of external magnetic fields. For comparison, samples without magnetic material (O100Mt) and in absence of clay (Mag) were also synthetized. The synthesis of magnetic materials disclosed the presence of magnetite and goethite nanoparticles, while the saturation magnetization displayed by O100MtMag was higher than that obtained for MtMag, indicating the existence of a higher amount of magnetite particles in the first one. This suggests that O100MtMag could be manipulated easier than MtMag through external magnetic fields. Moreover, the surface electric charge of MtMag sample can be described as a mixture of Magnetite and montmorillonite, with ratios related to the surface of both components. Co2+ sorption percentages, using an initial Co2+ concentration of 85 mg/L, resulted similar for the different materials while the Co2+ sorption was ascribed to interactions with the montmorillonite interlayer and external surface. The current results indicate that O100MtMag is a more appropriate material than MtMag for Co2+ removal by external magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetic-field-induced transition in a Co51.7Cr26.8Ga10.6Si10.9 alloy. Because of the unique reentrant martensitic transformation behavior, the reentrant parent phase was found to be induced by pulsed high magnetic fields up to 550 kOe, which is a new type of magnetic-field-induced transition of martensite. The critical magnetic field-temperature H–T phase diagram was completed, from which the entropy change for the reentrant martensitic transformation was estimated using the Clausius-Clapeyron relationship. A good consistency was found for the entropy change in comparison with those from earlier reports.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This study reports on the synthesis and characterization of oleic acid (OA)-coated Fe3O4 nanoparticles (Fe3O4@OA) and AO plus essential oil (EO)-coated Fe3O4 nanoparticles (Fe3O4@OA/EO). The EO was extracted from Croton cajucara Benth (CCB) leaves; a plant from the Brazilian Amazon region. Structural and morphological characterizations were carried out using X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images, respectively. Additionally, thermogravimetric analysis and magnetization measurements (hysteresis cycle, zero field-cooled-ZFC, field-cooled-FC, and AC susceptibility) were used to assess thermal and magnetic properties of the as-fabricated samples. Rietveld refinement of XRD pattern confirmed the formation of magnetite phase with no extra phases, whereas TEM images revealed spherically-shaped nanoparticles in the Fe3O4@OA and (Fe3O4@OA/EO) samples with a mean physical size of 8.5 nm and 10.1 nm, respectively. ZFC and FC curves revealed the occurrence of blocked/frozen state below the maximum peak (Tmax) at ∼81 K and ∼40 K for the Fe3O4@OA and (Fe3O4@OA/EO) samples, respectively. Moreover, low-temperature AC susceptibility vs. T curves recorded in the range of 0.2–1000 Hz showed that the OA coating of the Fe3O4 nanoparticles leads to a spin-glass-like behavior credited to the strong particle-particle interactions; meanwhile, the double layer (AO + EO) coating of the Fe3O4 nanoparticles remarkably quenches the particle-particle interaction leading to a superparamagnetic-like behavior.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Rotating chains of magnetic microparticles have many applications in lab-on-a-chip technologies. The simplest such chain is the fluid-borne doublet, where two beads are in close contact, but remain unattached, allowing each bead to freely rotate. These beads typically have two components contributing to their net magnetic moment: (i) a superparamagnetic moment and (ii) a field-independent permanent moment. In a rotating magnetic field, there are magnetic torques that separately rotate the doublet and its constituent beads as well as a hydrodynamic torque from the bead-doublet coupling. This study investigates, through experiments and simulations, the dynamics of field-driven doublets. New dynamics were found for the case where the dominant torque stems from the hydrodynamic coupling.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Tb–Fe–Co thin films were grown at different substrate temperatures on Si 〈1 0 0〉 substrates to engineer their structure, microstructure, magnetic anisotropy and magnetostriction. Structural studies showed an amorphous structure for the as-deposited film. However, films deposited at higher substrate temperatures exhibited formation of Tb2(Fe,Co)17 and Fe–Co phases. Magnetization studies displayed presence of in-plane magnetic anisotropy for all the films. In addition to this, strong out-of-plane magnetic anisotropy co-existing with in-plane component has been observed for the film grown at 400 °C. These observations were further confirmed by the magnetic microscopy studies which showed strong magnetic phase contrast for the film processed at 400 °C. Consequently, the magnetostriction calculated from tip deflection measurements was found to be very small for this film. A maximum magnetostriction of about 300 ppm has been realized for the film grown at 550 °C owing to the presence of in-plane magnetic anisotropy, enhancement in crystallization and relaxation of stresses.© 2018Electron Spin resonance spectroscopy (ESR) was used to determine the magnetic properties of nanocrystalline samples of La0.8Sr0.2MnO3 having an average crystallite size ranging from 9 to 57 nm. The control of the size is performed by adopting the autocombustion method with two-step synthesis process. The main objective of this study is to determine the effect of crystallite size on the magnetic behavior of materials. As well as the domains of the sizes correspond to the superparamagnetic state and to single-domain and multi-domain ferromagnetic states. However, we have noticed that Electron Magnetic Resonance (EMR) and Low Field Microwave Absorption (LFMA) spectra are highly crystallites size dependent. Significant changes in the line shape, LFMA signal, resonance field, and linewidth (ΔHpp) can be used as indices of magnetic state transitions. Moreover, the discontinuity observed in ΔHpp and g-factor is attributed to the changes of magnetic states. Magnetic measurements showed a good agreement with ESR results. Therefore, samples having crystallite size less than 24.5 nm are in a superparamagnetic state and those between 24.5 and 32 nm are single-domain ferromagnetic. The multi-domains ferromagnetic are manifested for sizes greater than 32 nm. Above 24.5 nm in accordance with the core-shell structure, the increase in g-factor with crystallites size is attributed to the increase in core size magnetic. In the superparamagnetic zone, the practically constant value of the g-factor assumes that the volume of the core magnetic is not affected by increasing crystallites size. This contradictory observation with the core-shell model was explained by the phenomenon of phase separation often reported for manganites perovskite. Thus, the low size crystallites consist of several small ferromagnetic volumes distributed in a paramagnetic matrix, that we called crystallite multi-core superparamagnetic.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Electrical resistivity of the FeXMn1−XS (0 ≤ X ≤ 0.29) single crystals based on the Mott insulator α-MnS is experimentally studied in the temperature range of 2–300 K at ambient pressure (P = 0) and at high (up to 30 GPa) hydrostatic pressures for x = 0.12. The electron subsystem of FeXMn1−XS undergoes insulator-to-metal transitions indicated by a resistivity drop by a factor of 106 with an increase in the chemical pressure (X) due to the cation substitution under ambient conditions and at the hydrostatic pressure (PC = 27 ± 5 GPa) for x = 0.12. The results obtained show that the hydrostatic pressure - and cation-substitution induced insulator-to-metal transitions in the α-MnS-based Mott compounds have similar mechanisms. The dependence of the critical hydrostatic pressure PC on the Fe content in FeXMn1−XS is established.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report a detailed dc magnetization, ac susceptibility and magnetocaloric properties of a binary intermetallic compound Tb5Pd2. Our dc magnetization and heat capacity results reveal the absence of long range ordering in this compound. Two distinct frequency dependent peaks (Tf1∼60 K and Tf2∼21 K) had been observed in the ac-susceptibility. Analysis of these frequency dependent peaks by Mydosh parameter, power and Vogel-Fulcher law reveals that around Tf1 the compound is at the boundary of spin glass (SG) like-cluster glass (CG) like state and it undergoes a cluster glass-like freezing below Tf2. Zero field cooled memory effect and non-linear dc susceptibility also confirmed the presence of two glassy transitions in this compound. The transformation from SG/CG boundary to CG phase was also confirmed by the magnetic relaxation measurement and Arrott plots study. Remarkably, a significant magnetic entropy change was also observed in the temperature range of 60–120 K. Additionally a large relative cooling power also observed in this compound. The observed value is comparable to those of promising refrigerant material in this temperature range and is quite notable as in this compound magnetic hysteresis was absent in this temperature range. It was noted that in this compound short-range interactions persist up to a higher temperature above Tf1 and this is responsible for the observation of significant MCE over a wide temperature range. Our studies suggest that this compound is an example of a glassy magnetic compound which shows large magnetocaloric effect.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The influence of thermal annealing on the structural and magnetic properties of nanocrystalline La1-xSrxFeO3-γ perovskites with x=0, 0.3, 0.4 and 0.5 was investigated by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), Mössbauer spectroscopy and magnetization measurements. Samples prepared by a sol gel method were calcined for 4 h at 1073 K and annealed for 8 h at 1273 K. XRD data indicate the formation of single phases in all samples, orthorhombic with the space group Pbnm for x = 0.0 and 0.3 and rhombohedral with the space group R3‾c for x = 0.4 and 0.5. The Mössbauer spectroscopy reveal that the sintering process increase the amount of Fe4+ and decrease the paramagnetic sites. Despite of the XRD data indicating the samples to be single phase, the higher coercivity observed in the samples with x = 0.4 may be associated with the emergence of Sr1-xLaxFe12O19 clusters in the samples. Irreversibility in the measurements of magnetization as a function of temperature was interpreted in terms of a high temperature glass cluster behavior.© 2018[Mn12(CH3COO)16(H2O)4O12]·2CH3COOH·4H2O (Mn12-acetate) crystal is a perfect ensemble of identical nanoclusters, with uniform space distribution within the crystal. These tiny magnetic clusters experience dipolar field from one another that potentially result in collective relaxations. We have studied low-temperature, low-field dc magnetic relaxation features of a single crystal of this archetypal single molecular magnet in order to recognize such interactions. The crystal exhibits wait-time dependent memory characteristics of Mn12O12 superspins at 2.85 K, slightly below its blocking temperature. Through time-dependent magnetic measurements, we show that these molecular magnetic clusters undergo collective magnetic relaxation, attributed to the inter-cluster dipolar interactions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Evolution of the structure and magnetic properties of an amorphous CoFeB layer in a heterostructure consisting of HM/CoFeB/HM (HM = Hf, W), with thermal annealing has been studied using magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) and synchrotron based Grazing incidence x-ray diffraction (GIXRD) measurements. It is found that the interface with HM can significantly affect the thermal stability as well as magnetic properties of CoFeB layer. Crystallization temperature of CoFeB layer interfaced with Hf is about 50 °C lower than that of CoFeB interfaced with W. Further, while in Hf/CoFeB/Hf, the as-deposited film possesses a well-defined uniaxial magnetic anisotropy, in W/CoFeB/W the magnetization is almost isotropic in the film plane. Long range stresses in as-deposited film and possible bond orientational order are expected to cause the observed anisotropy. With onset of crystallization, random stresses and compositional inhomogenities are generated in CoFeB film, resulting in a large increase in magnetic coercivity, and disappearance of magnetic anisotropy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Arc melted Gd2Co3Al9 compound crystallizes in orthorhombic Y2Co3Ga9 structure type (space group Cmcm, No. 63) as single phase. The magnetization M(T), specific heat C(T) and the resistivity ρ(T) measurements reveal an antiferromagnetic transition at 9.6 K. The temperature dependence of magnetic entropy change, -ΔSM(T), calculated from the M(B) data, gives a maximum value of entropy change -ΔSM Max=6.3J/kg.K for a field change of 0–7 T in a broad temperature range of ΔT=32K above the magnetic ordering temperature. B2 dependence of magnetic field dependent magnetocaloric effect (MCE) data in the paramagnetic regime indicates the role of applied magnetic field in suppressing the spin fluctuations. The interesting observation in this compound is that the presence of spin fluctuation smears out the MCE peak at the transition temperature and drags it to higher temperatures as a broad peak.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The interplay among electron-electron and intrinsic spin-orbit interactions (ISOI) at the zigzag edge of triangular quantum dots (ZTQDs) was analyzed by means of the mean-field Kane-Mele-Hubbard model. It was shown that the magnetic anisotropy (in-plane and out-of-plane magnetic configurations) significantly modifies electronic and magnetic properties of ZTQDs. The in-plane configuration is more energetically stable than the other one. However, its magnetization becomes easier depolarized as a continuous function as strengths of electric field E and ISOI increase. This is in contrast to the out-of-plane magnetization, which is more robust and becomes depolarized in a step-like way. Moreover, the energy gap only vanishes in the out-of-plane case by adjusting E and ISOI strengths, and thus we cannot expect a topological insulator phase in the in-plane magnetic configuration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The field tunable thermal, rheological and optical properties of ferrofluids have been studied extensively and have been exploited in numerous technological applications. However, there are very few studies on the field assisted wetting behavior of ferrofluids, though it is important from fundamental and practical point of view. In this study, we probe the effect of magnetic field induced aggregation on ‘magnetowetting’ in three different well characterized oil based ferrofluids of similar crystallite sizes (∼10 nm) but with different particle size distributions and polydispersity index, through contact angle measurements of sessile droplets. When exposed to a uniform external magnetic field, ferrofluid droplets of all three samples showed elongation along the magnetic field direction, adopting a prolate ellipsoidal meniscus in an effort to balance magnetic force and surface tension. However, the extent of deformation depends on the aggregation kinetics of ferrofluid system as the field induced aggregates are responsible for the meniscus deformation. Further, our studies indicate that at low field strengths, droplet deformation is not significant for systems that displayed rapid aggregation with micron sized thick and long columnar aggregates. The decrease in base fluid-aggregate interaction, brought about by rapid aggregation initiated by significant quantities of larger sized particles, is believed to be the cause for the decreased deformation of meniscus. For magnetic fluids with polydispersity index (PDI) values of 0.79, 0.23 and 0.22, the zero field contact angles were 59 ± 1.5, 63 ± 1.3 and 64 ± 1.2° respectively. On increasing field strength from 0 to 160 G, the sample with the highest PDI showed a marginal decrease in contact angle from 59 to 54° where the system with minimum PDI showed a significant contact angle change from 64 to 44°. These results will be useful in better control on tunable ‘magnetowetting’ for practical applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Reducing the spatial dimension of ferromagnetic (α1) phase is the most promising route for coercivity enhancement of alnico alloys. It is an experimental fact that the spatial dimension of α1 phase cannot be reduced below a certain limit (∼25 nm) using conventional processing methods. To obtain finer α1 phase we have fabricated alnico ribbons with nominal composition of 32.2Fe-36Co-13.5Ni-7.6Al-6.2Ti-3.8Cu-0.5Zr-0.2B by melt spinning and subsequent heat treatments. Very fine Fe-Co rich (α1) rods of the order of 5 nm diameter and 100 nm length embedded in Al-Ni rich matrix are obtained. After simplified heat treatment the properties of the isotropic ribbons are Hcj = 770 Oe, Br = 6.5 kGs and (BH)max = 1.86 MGOe. It is shown that alnico ribbons have unprecedented thermal stability described in terms of temperature coefficient of remanence (α) and temperature coefficient of coercivity (β) by measuring magnetic properties at high temperatures (∼800 K). The microstructures of the alloys have been analyzed by Optical Microscope, Scanning Electron Microscope and Transmission Electron Microscope. The phase transition temperatures have been observed by DTA and magnetic properties are measured by PPMS.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We calculate the anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) in two dimensional electron gas (2DEG) with Rashba spin-orbit coupling, when the Fermi energy lies at the crossing point of the two energy bands, in the presence of dilute magnetic charged impurities. We use the semiclassical Boltzmann equation and solve it exactly by an ansatz with an anisotropic parameter that is interpreted as a transport time vector. AMR is zero if the electric contribution to scattering overcomes the magnetic one, otherwise it is finite.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electric and thermal transport properties (electric resistivity ρ magneto-resistance MR, Hall coefficient RH and anomalous Hall effect, thermal conductivity Κ and Seebeck coefficient S) of the off-stoichiometric Ni1.92Mn1.56Sn0.52 Heusler alloy were measured in a wide temperature and magnetic field range. The simultaneous measurement of several transport and magnetic properties offers a possibility to combine information arising from the received experimental results. The phonon and the charge carriers parts of complex temperature dependence of thermal conductivity K(T) were consistently separated using the Lorentz factor and temperature dependence of resistivity ρ(T). The positive values of the Hall coefficient RH has been determined in martensite phase of the alloy at low temperatures. RH reaches zero value at temperature range where the so-called “paramagnetic gap” was observed and the negative value of RH was detected in austenite phase. Temperature dependence of the Hall coefficient RH(T) was used to derive both, the density and the mobility of charge carriers. The standard relations were used to describe the measured temperature dependence of the Seebeck coefficient. All the received result point to an important role of changes in electronic structure of the alloy in all the studied transport effects. A scenario of the complex behavior of the transport properties of the Heusler alloy based on a possible existence of an energy gap in electronic structure is discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.It has been more than two hundred years since the first iron filings experiment, showing us the 2D macroscopic magnetic imprint of the field of a permanent magnet. However, latest developments in modern nanomagnetic passive direct observation devices reveal in real-time and color a more intriguing 3D dynamic and detailed image of the field of a magnet, with surprising new findings, that can change our perspective for dipole magnetism forever and lead to new research. This research is a continuation of our previous work, “Markoulakis, E., Rigakis, I., Chatzakis, J., Konstantaras, A., Antonidakis, E. Real time visualization of dynamic magnetic fields with a nanomagnetic ferrolens(2018) Journal of Magnetism and Magnetic Materials, 451, pp. 741–748. DOI: https://doi.org//10.1016/j.jmmm.2017.12.023” that is using a ferrolens apparatus for showing the dynamic magnetic field on a transmitting radio antenna, while this time the magnetostatic fields were under our scope and examined with the aid of the ferrolens. We are presenting experimental and photographical evidence, demonstrating the true complex 3D Euclidian geometry of the quantum field of permanent magnets that have never been seen before and the classic iron filings experiment, apart of its 2D limitations, fails to depict. An analysis of why and what these iron filings inherent limitations are, giving us an incomplete and also in some degree misguiding image of the magnetic field of a magnet is carried out, whereas, as we prove the ferrolens is free of these limitations and its far more advanced visualization capabilities is allowing it to show the quantum image with depth of field information, of the dipole field of a permanent magnet. For the first time the domain wall (i.e. Bloch or Neel wall) region of the field of a magnet is clearly made visible by the ferrolens along with what phenomenon is actually taking place there, leading to the inescapable conclusion, novel observation and experimental evidence that the field of any dipole magnet actually consists of two distinct and separate toroidal shaped 3D magnetic bubbles, each located at either side of the dipole around the exact spatial regions where the two poles of the magnet reside.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Enhancements in the spin Hall magnetoresistance (SMR) close to one order of magnitude in bilayers of yttrium iron garnet (YIG) and platinum with embedded metallic nanoparticles of Ag and Cu are reported. The enhancement in the electrical detection of the back reflected spin current in YIG/Pt-MP(tMP)-Pt relative to YIG/Pt is attributed to the increase in the effective spin Hall angle (θSHA eff) due to the presence of the metallic nanoparticles. The maximum value observed for the spin Hall magnetoresistance is related to critical thickness of the tMP close to the percolation threshold. The results are also supported by data obtained by means of the spin pumping effect where dc-voltage measurements confirm the enhancement of the spin to charge conversion process.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The glass forming ability, microstructure as well as the cryogenic magnetic and magnetocaloric properties in melt-spun Cu20Al20Er60 ribbons were reported. The as-spun ribbons were confirmed to possess fully amorphous structure with a large supercooled liquid region of 54.3 K. A broad second-order paramagnetic to ferromagnetic (PM-FM) magnetic transition together with a large reversible cryogenic magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in Cu20Al20Er60 amorphous ribbon was found around TC of 13.3 K. The MCE parameters of the maximum magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM max), relative cooling power (RCP) and refrigerant capacity (RC) for Cu20Al20Er60 amorphous ribbons were evaluated to be 15.3 J/kg K, 543 J/kg and 420 J/kg for a magnetic field change (ΔH) of 0–7 T, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline powders of Gadolinium (Gd3+) substituted nickel ferrite spinel (NiGdxFe2−xO4: x = 0.00, 0.025, 0.050, 0.075 and 0.1) samples were synthesized via sol-gel method. Nickel nitrate hexahydrate and Ferric nitrate hexahydrate were used as the precursors and rare earth Gadolinium nitrate hexahydrate [Gd(NO3)3·6H2O] was used as the dopant. The structural, morphological, magnetic and dielectric properties of the synthesized nanoparticles were examined by XRD, FTIR, HRSEM, EDX, TEM, VSM and dielectric studies. The Scherrer method and Williamson-Hall (W-H) method were used to evaluate the crystallite sizes and lattice strain. The crystallite size of NiGdxFe2−xO4 samples were found to decrease from 25 nm to 11 nm with increase in Gd3+ content. Lattice parameters decrease and lattice strain increases with the increase in Gd3+ content in the sample. HRSEM images showed the spherical morphology and uniform size distribution. The elemental composition analysis confirms the stoichiometric presence of expected elements in the samples. The crystallite size and the particle size calculated from the XRD analysis and HRTEM monographs indicate the correlation of the data obtained from both the measurements. Magnetic studies of the samples were performed using vibrating Sample Magnetometer, in which magnetizations (Ms) decrease with increase in Gd3+ concentration from 36.51 emu/gm to 19.69 emu/gm. As the gadolinium content was gradually increased, coercivity and remnant magnetization were also decreased. Magnetic anisotropy of nickel ferrite was also found to decrease with increasing gadolinium content. The saturation magnetization values were achieved by using the “Law of Approach (LA) to Saturation magnetization” technique. Specific correlation between magnetic interaction and lattice strain was observed in Gd3+ substituted nickel ferrite. Dielectric parameters such as dielectric constant and dielectric loss of the prepared samples decrease with increase of applied frequency and increasing of Gd3+ doping concentration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Significant perturbation on the local magnetic structure and related behavior in BiFeO3 is achieved through a substitution of Fe by Mn. The BiFe1− xMnxO3 ceramics were synthesized by sol–gel method and self-sustaining combustion. The crystal structure of BiFe1− xMnxO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3) changes from rhombohedral R3c to orthorhombic Pbnm forming a biphasic region at 0.05 ≤ x ≤ 0.15. It is found that the phase fraction change can effectively regulate the macroscopic magnetization and magnetoelectric coupling. The amount of the R3c phase reduces significantly with the Mn content increasing. The ceramic consisting of two phases with almost equal fractions shows a remnant magnetization and magnetoelectric coupling coefficient of 0.40 emu/g and 7.65 mV/(cm·Oe), respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Since few decades, several studies on hole-doping in rare-earth manganites (RMnO3) have been reported exploring various novel phenomena. Comparatively electron-doping studies in RMnO3 are scarcely found and the intrinsic properties are still unidentified. We report on the occurrence of exchange bias phenomenon and glassy magnetic interaction in multiferroic compound Sc0.8Zr0.2MnO3 induced by electron doping. The compound possesses long-range antiferromagnetic ordering, (TN = 90 K) and electron doping was found to induce additional ferromagnetic interaction (TC = 60 K) in it. The study provides compelling experimental evidences that the system behaves more like a cluster glass compound than a canonical spin glass system with a freezing temperature (Tf) of 13 K. Field-cooled magnetic hysteresis loops are found to shift in the field axis (HE) and show asymmetry in remanent magnetization (ME). The direction of loop shift depends on the sign of the cooling field used. We present details of field cooling and temperature dependence of HE and ME and training effect in Sc0.8Zr0.2MnO3. A comparison with the commonly observed exchange bias phenomena in typical phase separated systems is also presented. The present study assumes significance as it helps the understanding of new phenomena consequent to electron doping.© 2018Magnetoelectric (ME) effects in a heterostructure consisting of mechanically coupled layers of amorphous ferromagnet FeBSiC and electrostrictive lead magnesium niobate-lead titanate (PMN-PT) ceramics are observed and investigated. Magnetoelectric characteristics of the structure strongly differ from those of the ferromagnetic-piezoelectric one. The FeBSiC-PMN-PT structure did not show the direct ME effect under excitation with an alternating magnetic field. For the converse ME effect, when the structure was excited with alternating electric fields, the frequency doubling and mixing of electric fields frequencies were observed. Nonlinear ME effects arise due to the nonlinear electrostrictive strain vs electric field dependence. Efficiency of nonlinear ME conversion is proportional to the piezomagnetic coefficient of the ferromagnetic layer, nonlinear electrostriction coefficient of the electrostrictive layer, and amplitudes of the excitation fields. A theory for nonlinear ME effects in the ferromagnet-electrostrictor heterostructures was developed.© 2018We have successfully synthesised Ni75Fe25 nanostructured powders by means of low temperature (150 °C) hydrothermal method using sodium hydroxide (NaOH) as co-reduction agent. The powders are in fact large agglomerations of small nanoparticles with average diameters below 30 nm. The concentration of NaOH seems to play an important role in the final microstructure and morphology of the samples as deduced from scanning electron microscopy images. Although x-ray diffraction patterns reveal that the samples are single-phase with a face centered cubic crystal structure, the analysis of Mössbauer spectra suggests the existence of different local environments for the iron atoms. The room temperature saturation magnetization shows similar values for all the samples (≈90 Am2/kg), in contrast with the coercive field that is clearly influenced by the morphology of the samples, ranging from 60 Oe (spherical-shaped samples) to 150 Oe (denditric-shaped powders).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied experimentally ferromagnetic properties of GaAs-AlGaAs quantum wells where the center of GaAs well was doped by Mn (x<0.1%) while the neighboring barrier was doped by shallow acceptor Be with an aim to occupy (at least, partially) the states of the upper Hubbard band of Mn acceptors in the well (AMn +). It was found that while the measurements of the anomalous Hall effect unambiguously demonstrated a presence of ferromagnetic ordering up to rather high temperatures (of 250 K), the conductivity demonstrated activated behavior with high activation temperatures (of the order of 100 meV). In contrast to our previous studies of the structures with undoped barriers, the Curie temperatures were significantly higher (150 K instead of 100 K), but conductivities of barrier-doped structures were order of magnitudes lower. We suggest a theoretical model explaining this behavior. It takes into account, first, the electrostatic potential of charged acceptors in the barrier (Be-) forming a potential bend in the near-barrier region which accepts some of the holes supplied by the barrier acceptors. Second, we take into account the fact that at least part of the supplied holes occupies the upper Hubbard band mentioned above. The latter fact can explain observed increase in the Curie temperature with respect to the structures with undoped barriers. The suppression of conductivity is explained by a presence of long-range potential produced by the randomly distributed charged centers within the barrier. Thus we deals with droplets of delocalized holes within the potential bend and partially occupied upper Hubbard band which, with a help of the indirect exchange, form the islands of ferromagnetically ordered Mn ions. The detailed discussion of further experimental studies necessary to confirm our model is also presented.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The surface antiferromagnetic ordering of MnO(001) ultrathin films has been probed using Low-energy Electron Diffraction (LEED) and Angle-Resolved Photoemission spectroscopy (ARPES) techniques. We observe coherent exchange scattered half-order spot in LEED which is only visible at low electron beam energy (<40 eV) and arises below a certain temperature with a periodicity of the magnetic unit cell of MnO(001) surface, confirms its magnetic origin. A thickness dependent evolution of surface antiferromagnetic (AFM) Néel temperature has been observed for the MnO films. Interestingly, we found the Néel temperature of the MnO films exceed its bulk Néel temperature even in the ultrathin limit (∼2 ML). Detailed LEED analysis reveals that the increase of the Néel temperature is due to the presence of strain and the image charge screening effect in the film while, the competition between the finite size effects, surface strain, and substrate polarizability ultimately determine the observed Néel temperature. The surface magnetic critical exponent (β1) varies from 0.16 ±.03 to 0.81 ±.03, upon changing film thickness from 3 to 10 ML, indicates the transition from nearly 2D Ising system to 3D Ising/Heisenberg system. Furthermore, upon paramagnetic (PM)-AFM transition, ARPES energy distribution curves (EDCs) show, opening an energy gap of 150 meV with an increased occupation in the eg levels is good agreement with the theoretical prediction of the presence of AFM-II type ordering in the film.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A nonlinear magneto-mechanical-thermo-electric coupling finite element model is established for the Terfenol-D/PZT and Ni/PZT laminates structure respectively, based on Maxwell electromagnetic equations and nonlinear constitutive equations of giant magnetostrictive materials. The magnetoelectric (ME) coefficients of the two laminates with considering the coupling stress or without considering the coupling stress are calculated respectively. The results indicate that the predicted values of ME coefficient of our model are very well in agreement with the experimental datas both in the low, intermediate and high magnetic field for the two kinds of materials structures at different temperatures (most of previous theoretical models just give the well comparison in low and intermediate field). The coupling stress has a significant effect on the ME coefficient for the Terfenol-D/PZT laminate, but little effect for the Ni/PZT laminate. The ME coefficient with considering coupling stress is smaller than that without considering coupling stress. Besides, the magnetic flux density, displacement and voltage distribution characteristics of ME laminates at different temperatures and pre-stresses are also detailed investigated. It has been shown a noteworthy phenomenon that the sensitivity of ME effect on temperature and/or pre-stress can be tuned by the pre-stress and/or temperature, respectively. Adjusting pre-stress can reduce the sensitivity of ME effect on temperature, which may promote the stability of ME devices operating in complex environments.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ab initio calculations based on density functional theory with local spin density approximation are used to study defects-driven magnetism in bulk α-Li3N. Our calculations show that bulk Li3N is a non-magnetic semiconductor. Two types of Li vacancies (Li-I and Li-II) are considered, and Li-vacancies (either Li-I or Li-II type) can induce magnetism in Li3N with a total magnetic moment of 1.0 μB which arises mainly due to partially occupied N-p-orbitals around the Li vacancies. The defect formation energies dictate that Li-II vacancy, which is in the Li2N plane, is thermodynamically more stable as compared with Li-I vacancy. The electronic structures of Li-vacancies show half-metallic behavior. On the other hand N-vacancy does not induce magnetism and has a larger formation energy than Li-vacancies. N vacancy derived bands at the Fermi energy are mainly contributed by the Li atoms. Carbon is also doped at Li-I and Li-II sites, and it is expected that doping C at Li-I site is thermodynamically more stable as compared with Li-II site. Carbon can induce metallicity with zero magnetic moment when doped at Li-I site, whereas magnetism is observed when Li-II site is occupied by the C impurity atom and C-driven magnetism is spread over the N atoms as well. Carbon can also induce half-metallic magnetism when doped at N site in Li3N, and has a smaller defect formation energy as compared with Li-II site doping. The ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) coupling between the C atoms is also investigated, and we conclude that FM state is more stable than the AFM state.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe doping effects and electrical characteristics of rubidium carbonate (Rb2CO3) in organic bipolar charge transport material 2-methyl-9,10-di(2-naphthyl) anthracene (MADN) has been investigated. Utilizing temperature-dependent admittance spectroscopy, the electron injection barrier (so-called activation energy) is verified to be reduced from 1.33 to 0.2878 eV by the incorporation of Rb2CO3 from 0 to 33 vol%. The precision of admittance spectroscopy is further proved by photovoltaic measurement. Higher mobility has achieved using space-charge-limited current (SCLC) determination. Consequently, these enhancements in electron injection and transport yield superior device performance for organic light-emitting diodes (OLEDs).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effect of Gd/Ba co-doping on magnetocaloric properties for Sr2FeMoO6 is presented. Double-perovskite (Sr2-3xGdxBa2x)FeMoO6 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.20) were prepared by the solid reaction method. X-ray diffraction results showed that all samples were single phase and belonged to I4/m space group. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis of (Sr2−3xGdxBa2x)FeMoO6 samples showed that proportional variations in Fe3+/Fe2+ and Mo5+/Mo6+ were found under Gd/Ba co-doping. Field-cooled magnetization curves indicated that Gd/Ba co-doping led to the Curie temperature (Tc) drop from 394 K to 357 K. Arrot plots analysis of samples revealed a second-order magnetic transition. The magnetic entropy change of all samples increased initially and then decreased with temperature, and all samples exhibited the maximum magnetic entropy change near Tc. The maximum magnetic entropy change of samples in the magnetic field of 2T decreased from 0.72 J K−1 kg−1 to 0.54 J K−1 kg−1 because of Gd/Ba co-doping. Relative cooling power decreased correspondingly.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Single phase, nanocrystalline nickel-zinc ferrite samples, with nominal erbium (Er3+) doping were prepared by the citric acid assisted sol gel auto-combustion method. Samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction, thermo gravimetric analysis, field emission scanning electron microscopic, transmission electron microscopic, Raman spectroscopic and Mössbauer spectroscopic techniques. Transmission electron microscopic images confirmed the inclusion of suitable amount of Er3+ drastically reduced the particle size of the samples from 22 nm to 8 nm. In room temperature (300 k) Mössbauer spectra of the samples with typical dopant concentrations (x = 0.025 and x = 0.035), discrete sextet patterns appeared along with the predominant doublets. Subsequently with higher percentage of Er3+ (x = 0.05) doping, it gets modified into a superparamagnetic doublet. This phenomenon is related to the indirect f-d, direct d-d exchange interactions, as well as to the well known superparamagnetic relaxation of single domain particles. Both room temperature (300 K) and low temperature (5K) field dependent magnetic loops (M-H loops) of the samples were recorded using superconducting quantum interference device magnetometer. Almost 63% enhancement of the value of coercivity, (for x = 0.025) is observed. The modifications in magnetic properties of the samples due to addition of rare earth ion has been explained in terms of enhanced anisotropy owing to strong spin-orbit coupling of Er3+ ion and the ferromagnetic core-surface spin canted shell morphology.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, using magnetron sputtering technique we prepare and characterize a series of exchange-biased (Fe70Co30/Ir25Mn75)3 multilayers with antiferromagnetic layer (Ir25Mn75) doped by nonmagnetic MgO to study the misaligned effect of anisotropies on the static exchange bias field (Heb) and the dynamic magnetization relaxation behavior. We demonstrate a strong correlation between the misalignment angle and Heb, as well as the dynamic damping along the easy axis of the Heb, and attributed this to the noncollinear spin structure in ferromagnetic layer. While a different relaxation behavior was observed for the hard axis due to the unidirectional relaxation mechanism in the exchange biased system. Our result may shed new insight in the field of exchange bias, promoting its application in low consumption spintronics devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The features of wave processes in a heterostructure based on two ferromagnetic films separated by a layer of non-magnetic dielectric layer have been investigated at different levels of the input signal power. It has been experimentally demonstrated using Brillouin light scattering set-up that at low input power it is transferred from one film to another along the length of the structure, which is typical for any spatially distributed coupled systems. At a certain level of input power the inhibition of periodic power transfer from one film to another is observed, therefore, the coupling between the films disappears. In order to explain this effect, we have developed the theory based on the model of two nonlinear equations for the amplitudes enveloping the signals in each film. Numerical calculation results are in a good agreement with experimental data.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Displaced Aperture Method (DAM) of Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) is used to visualize internal structure of magnetic domains in the Co49-Ni21-Ga30 Ferromagnetic Shape Memory Alloy (FSMA). The preparation of the FSMA specimens and the details of DAM enabling visualization of these domains and their internal details are described. The magnetic domains of ca. 100-nm width with the domain walls of ca. 20 nm width are observed. The theoretical estimation supporting the possibility of appearance of such domains in the thin foil prepared for TEM observations is presented. The superfine crystallographic microstructure possessing the features, which are inherent to the quasiperiodic twinning of crystal lattice with period of ca. 6 nm, is observed inside the magnetic domains. The obtained TEM data may be useful for examination of the influence of external magnetic field on the magnetic and crystallographic microstructure of FSMAs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, an Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si13.5B9 amorphous alloy film was used as a sensing chip for the development of a novel piezomagnetic force sensor model with a closed inductance loop. The sensor exhibits an excellent anti-interference ability against the electromagnetic effects from the environment. Reliable data is obtained at temperatures smaller than 60 °C. Furthermore, the piezomagnetic properties of the Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si13.5B9 films annealed at different conditions were investigated. After annealing at 350–555 °C, the elastic hysteresis of the sensing chip was weakened, which is beneficial in dynamic stress measurements. The optimal stress range for static and dynamic measurements is 0–2 kPa, where the sensitivity is 3.5 μH/kPa. When the annealing temperature is 150 °C, the piezomagnetic effect of the film is significant and elastic hysteresis is obvious, which is suitable only for static stress measurements. In the range 0–10 kPa, the force-sensitivity performance curve is linear with a sensitivity of 3 μH/kPa, which demonstrates its excellent force-sensitivity properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Bulk metallic glasses (BMGs) have an extremely low coercivity, suggesting that the BMGs must have unique magnetic microstructures. These magnetic microstructures, however, are largely unknown. We prepared Fe65.5Cr4Mo4Ga4P12B5.5C5 BMGs by a flux-melting and water-quenching technique. We then studied the topographical and magnetic microstructures of as-quenched and annealed BMGs by atomic force microscopy (AFM) and magnetic force microscopy (MFM), respectively. The microstructural results were compared with those achieved in rapidly quenched glassy ribbons. Magnetic domains are pinned inside the BMGs due to residual stress, most of which can be removed by annealing. This is also applicable to the glassy ribbons. However, when compared to the glassy ribbons, our BMGs are with a significantly smaller surface roughness, a much smaller free volume, and free from non-magnetic inclusions. It is these unique microstructural factors and the stress release by annealing that greatly improve the soft ferromagnetic properties of our iron-based BMGs.© 2018This study looks at the response rate and magnitude of magneto-rheological elastomers (MREs) upon applying magnetic field depending on the type and content of iron powder. Specimens were prepared under different magnitudes of an applied magnetic field during vulcanization. S1640 (carbonyl) iron powder has a round shape and small size (3–5 µm), and Fe#400 (electrolytic) has irregular shape and large size (6–11 µm). Both of these were used at up to 80 phr. In general, the specimen with S1640 has a better response force and more rapid response to an external magnetic field than the specimen with Fe#400. However, the compressive characteristics of the Fe#400 specimen with low iron powder content (40 phr) and isotropic conditions are better than those of the S1640 specimen. The experimental results show better mechanical properties and rapid response with an applied magnetic field of 1.5 T compared to 2.0 T during the specimen vulcanization. This means that the smaller iron powder can move faster when applying the magnetic field than the bigger iron powder, and the iron powder distribution influences the compressive modulus and response behaviors. Therefore, the response and force to an applied magnetic field and the durability of the MRE are better with the S1640 iron powder, and the pattern is similar to the compressive modulus.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principles calculations based on density functional theory, we have studied the X-ray absorption spectra (XAS) and X-ray Magnetic Circular Dichroism (XMCD) spectra of Co2PtGa and Mn2PtGa alloys. Using relativistic calculations, we have estimated and analyzed the contribution of the orbital and spin moments to the total magnetic moment for the transition metal atoms, Pt, Co and Mn. It has been observed that while the ratio of orbital and spin magnetic moments of Pt atom in Co2PtGa in cubic phase is substantial, this is an order of magnitude lower in Mn2PtGa. On the other hand, this difference reduces drastically in case of the martensite phase. This signifies the crucial role of the neighborhood in determining the magnetic properties of these materials. Further, the XAS and XMCD spectra at the L2,3 edges of different constituent atoms in various materials have been analyzed. The results (peaks and shoulders present in these XAS and XMCD spectra) have been corroborated with the atom-projected unoccupied density of states of the respective materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Two models of Hamiltonians are proposed to describe the propagation of magnetic disturbances within materials whose form is of long and narrow film strips. Both models are defined in terms of special Heisenberg Hamiltonians where it is assumed that the interaction of the spins of the electrons with the structure of the material can be replaced in first approximation by a Hamiltonian of that type. The first one is a one-dimensional periodic Heisenberg Hamiltonian applicable to describe the transport of spin waves in magnonic crystals and it is shown that the associated Schrodinger equation supports analytical solutions and closed expressions are obtained for the dispersion relation and the density of states. This Hamiltonian of course leads to a structure of bands in the spectrum of energies. However, several essential differences are found with respect to the band structure of the well-known Kronig-Penney model. The second model is a Hamiltonian, in principle periodic, but to which a gradient has been added that alters the interaction between the spins. This Hamiltonian only supports numerical solution. This model is applicable to the transport of spin waves in magnetic crystals in the presence of some external agent. For example a temperature gradient, exposure to some non-uniform luminous signal, a non-uniform chemical attack, etc., which modifies the constant interactions from spin to spin. It is shown that in this case the original band structure is completely destroyed and under certain circumstances it appears a series of resonances which are similar to the Wannier-Stark ladder resonances.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic domains of {1 0 0} grains in electrical steels with 1.85 ≤ Al ≤ 6.54 wt% were observed by magneto-optic Kerr microscopy. The characteristics and motion of magnetic domains were correlated with hysteresis loss, anomalous loss and permeability. As Al contents increased, domain wall energy decreased, so the magnetic domain size of {1 0 0} grains decreased. In steel with Al 6.54 wt%, 90° domain walls appeared, so the complexity of domain structures increased. Addition of Al caused increase in hysteresis loss. Anomalous loss decreased until Al 4.68 wt%, then saturated, despite high resistivity and small domain size. External magnetizing force H→ required to induce maximum permeability µmax increased drastically at Al 6.54 wt%. These changes of magnetic properties may be caused by pinning of 90° walls during magnetization. As domain size decreased to form closure domains, the complexity of reorganization of magnetic domains increased, and they were interrupted by pinning 90° walls.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.CoCr2O4 of 50 nm particles having core-shell structure demonstrate two different phenomena such as memory effect and exchange bias depending on temperature. The memory effect is responsible for spin glass behavior in the shell and exchange bias is due to core-shell interactions. From magnetization measurement, we observe a long range ferrimagnetic (FiM) order in core and the spin glass behavior at the shell. The spin glass nature is confirmed from memory effect experiment performed using zero field cool (ZFC) protocol below blocking temperature (TB) i.e. 80 K. While the strength of memory effect decreases with decrease in temperature and vanishes at 30 K, the exchange bias increases with decrease in temperature down to 50 K and shows two orders of magnitude more than the bulk at lowest temperature. The high exchange bias field obtained in CoCr2O4 nanoparticles is not only due to the contribution of interface between collinear and non-collinear spin alignment, but also due to spiral ordering below 30 K. While the exchange interaction and strong interface anisotropy results in an exchange bias field (HEB), the training effect have the contribution from the interface as well as from the core shell interaction depending on the particle size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.First-principles method within the generalized gradient approximation (GGA-PBEsol) and the modified Becke-Johnson approach (mBJ-GGA-PBEsol) for the exchange-correlation energy and potential were used to investigate the structural, elastic, mechanical and thermal properties of MgN compound in different phases. Various phases of MgN compound were considered, which are NaCl, CsCl, ZB, WZ, NiAs, PtH4I, and Pnma phases. We found that the NaCl phase is the lowest energy phase as a function of the volume. The ferromagnetic phase is energetically favored with respect to the non-magnetic phases, except for the CsCl and PtH4I phases. The calculated elastic properties for the NaCl, ZB and WB phases showed that they are elastically stable. Considering the phonon dynamics of MgN in the NaCl, ZB and WB phases, we observed that the MgN compound in the NaCl and ZB phases is dynamically stable. From electronic band structure and density of states, MgN compound shows half-metallic behavior in NaCl and ZB phases. The NaCl phase was found to have a robust half-metallic character with respect to the lattice compression and expansion. The half-metallic and magnetic character found in MgN compound is attributed to the presence of spin polarized 2p orbitals of the nitrogen atom. We found that the MgN compound in the NaCl and ZB phases is a half-metallic ferromagnet with magnetic moment of 1 μB per formula unit and half-metallic gaps of 0.01 eV (1.34 eV) and 0.57 eV (1.85 eV) within the GGA-PBEsol (mBJ-GGA-PBEsol) for the NaCl and ZB phases respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanoferrites with the chemical equation MnxZn1− xFe2O4 (x = 0.5, 0.6, 0.7) were prepared by sol-gel auto combustion method in order to study their structural, elastic and electron magnetic resonance properties. The Bragg reflections in the X-ray diffractograms matched with the formation of cubic spinel phase along with the secondary phases of α-Fe2O3 and Mn2O3. The uneven variation of lattice parameter was found to be depending on the possible cation redistribution in the spinel structure/or grain sizes. From the histograms of SEM studies, the composition x = 0.6 comparatively has a narrow distribution of grain sizes (5–11 μm) than those of compositions x = 0.5 (3.5–8.5 μm) and x = 0.7 (2.5–8.5 μm). The higher and lower vibrational frequencies in the FTIR spectra occurred around 560 cm−1 and 470 cm−1 confirm the cubic spinel phase of present ferrite systems in the line of XRD confirmation. The change in the vibrational frequencies supports the variation of lattice parameter. The variation of lattice energy is supportive for the elastic properties, but not to the structural parameters. The same value of Poisson's ratio (∼0.35) for the three compositions is an indicative, representing the isotropic behaviour of spinel ferrite systems. The range (2.012–2.106) of Lande's g-parameter indicates the change in Fe3+–O–Fe3+ superexchange interaction. The results are interpreted based on the possible cation redistribution, the secondary phases presuming the core-shell interactions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The measuring of diffusion attenuation by nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is used to reveal information about the internal structure of various random magnetic composites including heterogeneous soft matter and biological tissues. The response of these materials on the applied external static and space-time varying magnetic fields encodes intrinsic dynamic correlations and depends on links between macroscopic effective diffusivity and structure on the microscopic scale. In the current work we carry out a computational analysis of the time dependent diffusion attenuation and tensor invariants and demonstrate their relation to the microscopic architectural elements while also considering Euclidean dimensionality. The proposed numerical method of hierarchical recursive iterations is efficient in the simulation of NMR (MRI) experiments in two- and three-dimensional heterogeneous magnetic media, by choosing and modelling the influence of the concentration of components of composites and internal hierarchical characteristics of physical parametres.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Foamed composite materials based on two thermoplastic elastomers reinforced with carbonyl iron particles (CIP) at 2% by volume were prepared by using foam injection molding. Nitrogen was used as physical blowing agent. Specimens were characterized by density measurements and morphological analysis. Foams based on neat polymers showed a well-developed cellular morphology only far from the injection point. On the contrary, composite foams showed a considerably increased homogeneity of the cellular structure morphology, with small cells found since the injection point. The magneto-elastic characterization of samples showed that reinforced samples (both unfoamed and foamed) showed a magneto-elastic behavior under a simultaneous application of a pre-strain and a magnetic field: the magnetic field induced response exhibited a butterfly shaped trend, typical of magnetostrictive materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Laser additive manufacturing (LAM) is a novel method for processing compositionally graded alloys and becomes increasingly important in the context of next-generation manufacturing technology. In this work, (Fe60Co35Ni5)78Si6B12Cu1Mo3 soft magnetic alloys with different laser power were designed and processed by the LAM. The magnitudes of magnetic properties were analyzed, and the relationships among composition-microstructure-magnetic properties assessed. Results show that the (Fe60Co35Ni5)78Si6B12Cu1Mo3 alloys by LAM exhibits relative uniform microstructure and comparable magnetic property compared with those conventional processed alloys. The bcc dominated microstructures exhibit a substantially higher saturation magnetization (Ms). With the increase in power, the average grain size of the alloy increased slightly and the increasing volume fraction of the Fe–Si phase leaded to the enhancement of magnetization. The (Fe60Co35Ni5)78 Si6B12Cu1Mo3 alloys with laser power of 3000 W exhibits the highest Ms (199 emu/g). The appearance of Fe3B results in coarse dendrites and high coercivity (Hc) in the multiple re-heating cycles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Neutron powder diffraction was used to analyse the La(Mn0.70Ga0.30)O3 compound under pressures of up to 6.1 GPa and temperatures down to 1.3 K. At ambient pressure, the magnetic ground state corresponds to a canted antiferromagnetic AxFy-type spin ordering. As the pressure increases, the Fy component is suppressed and a novel Ay-type ordering takes place coexisting with the Ax-type. The simultaneous occurrence of these spin orderings can be ascribed to a demixing of the pristine nuclear phase into a Jahn-Teller distorted phase (where the Ax-ordering takes place) and an undistorted nuclear phase which grows under pressure (where the Ay-ordering develops).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.As-deposit (AD) and field-anneal (FA) Fe60Co18Ga22 films have been made. We found that after FA treatment, both the macro-stress and saturation magnetostriction in the film increase greatly. Also, after FA treatment, the tetragonal L12 phase shows up, and coexists within the original two-phase (A2 + D03) field. In agreement with the theory, the occurrence of large stress and magnetostriction is related to the magnetic-field-induced flip of the tetragonal axis of the L12 phase crystal by FA. As a low-field sensor, FA could enhance the sensitivity of the Fe60Co18Ga22 film element up to 18.9 ppm/Oe.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Dy doped SmCo magnets with the nominal composition of Sm1−xDyx (Co, Fe, Cu, Zr)z were prepared by powder metallurgy method. The influence of Dy content on the remanence temperature coefficient and microstructure of magnets was investigated. XRD and TEM analysis showed that the magnets with different Dy content consisted of 2:17R cell phase and 1:5H cell boundary. Magnetic performance characterization showed that the remanence of the magnets decreased but the remanence temperature coefficient reduced as well with the increase of Dy content. When x was increased to 0.5, a comprehensive magnetic performance was obtained of which the remanence temperature coefficient (α) was 0.015%/°C in the temperature range of 20–300 °C and the maximum energy product descended tardily from 10.8 MGOe to 9.3 MGOe as the temperature rose from 20 °C to 300 °C. The two sub-lattice molecular field theory was used to calculate the temperature dependence of magnets remanence and to explain the temperature compensation effect of Dy content, the calculated results was in well correspondence with experimental results. Such method could also be used for the exploration of new thermal stability of magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, carbon-based iron nitride composite is prepared by hydrothermal synthesis, in-situ polymerization and nitriding, successively. The morphology, phase and chemical structure of the composite is characterized by scanning electron microscope (SEM), high resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM), X-ray diffractometer (XRD) and Fourier transform infrared spectrometer (FTIR). The electromagnetic and microwave absorbing property of the composites is investigated using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and a vector network analyzer (VNA). The results show that the carbon-based iron nitride composite is successfully fabricated by coating Fe4N magnetic particles with thin carbon layers. The minimum reflection loss (RL) of −44 dB is observed at 4.23 GHz (3.02 mm thickness), and the frequency band is 3.72–4.74 GHz when RL ≤ −10 dB. When the thickness is reduced to 1.00 mm, the effective bandwidth (RL ≤ −10 dB) could still reach to 4.00 GHz. In summary, the carbon-based iron nitride composite shows excellent microwave absorbing property at 2–4 GHz with relatively thin thickness.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, multiple magnetic transitions of Sm0.5Pr0.5FeO3 single crystal were systematically studied. By substituting Pr3+ in SmFeO3, spin reorientation temperature (TSR) was effectively decreased from 450 K–480 K (SmFeO3) to 180 K–220 K (Sm0.5Pr0.5FeO3). When the applied magnetic field is 500 Oe, spin switching was observed at 119 K (Tssw) for Sm0.5Pr0.5FeO3 and 180 K for SmFeO3, in which a spontaneous spin-flip transition of Sm/Pr- and Fe-sublattices at the same time, accompanied by an exchange of their FM vector directions. The compensation temperature (Tcomp) was raised from 4 K to 90 K which corresponds to zero magnetization. The possible mechanism for the modulation of magnetic transitions in SmFeO3 single crystal by Pr3+ substitution is discussed in detail. The dynamics of spin reorientation for Sm0.5Pr0.5FeO3 is also verified by Terahertz time-domain spectroscopy (THz-TDS), with the resonant excitation of quasi-antiferromagnetic (AFM) mode.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.SrFe12O19/Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 composites were synthesized by one-pot solution combustion method. The effects of NiZn ferrite content on phase, structure, microstructure and magnetic properties of composites were investigated by X-ray diffractometry, infrared spectroscopy, electron microscopy and vibrating sample magnetometry techniques. Strontium hexaferrite and NiZn ferrite phases were well crystallized following calcination at 900 °C without any impurities being formed. The composites were composed of platelet-like SrFe12O19 particles being mixed with quasi-spherical NiZn ferrite particles. The composites containing 10 wt% Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 exhibited a single magnetization curve with maximum saturation magnetization of 56 emu/g, as a confirmation of exchange coupling, while other composites had “bee waist” type hysteresis loop. The coercivity of composites decreased from 5143 to 1778 Oe with addition of NiZn ferrite phase. The microwave absorption measurements in X-band (8–12 GHz) showed a maximum absorption of −23.5 dB at 9.9 GHz for SrFe12O19-10 wt% Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 composite in comparison with the other composites.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, versatile triple-level cell (TLC) NAND flash memory control with four proposed techniques, Read-Hot/Cold Migration, Read Voltage Control (RVC), Edge Word-Line Protection (EWLP), and Worst Page Detection (WPD), is proposed for data center application solid-state drives (SSDs). To apply the optimal reliability enhancement techniques for stored data, first proposal of Read-Hot/Cold Migration separates read-hot/cold data into each region. Then, second proposal, Read Voltage Control applies the optimal read reference voltages (VREF) for each read-hot/cold region to improve the overall reliability of TLC NAND flash. Third proposal, Edge Word-Line Protection reduces the bit error rate (BER) of the edge word-lines (WLs), which have the worst reliability in read-hot data as reported in this paper. Finally, Worst Page Detection is proposed to predict the worst page BER in a block precisely to prevent judging entire block as bad and optimizes the refresh interval of read-hot block. By combining all of these techniques, the reliability of TLC NAND flash is enhanced for both read-hot and cold data.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ruddlesden-Popper (RP) La2−xSrxCoO4 (x = 0.7, 0.9, 1.1, 1.3) were synthesized by a modified sol-gel route. The synthesized samples were characterized by XRD, FE-SEM technique, iodometric titration, FT-FIR spectroscopy and VSM analysis. The variation of Co-O bond length obtained from Rietveld refinements and the related peak shifts in the FT-FIR spectra showed that Co3+ has both LS and IS spin states. It is found that the population of Co3+ in the LS state decreases and IS state increases with increasing Sr concentration. Jahn-Teller effect was identified in the FT-FIR absorption bands, corresponding to the vibration modes of Co bonds with the apical and equatorial oxygen atoms. The ferromagnetic characteristic of La0.7Sr1.3CoO4, obtained by VSM, revealed the increase of Co3+ IS population by Sr doping, in agreement with XRD and FT-FIR results. The shift and split of the IR absorption bands with the change in the structural parameters are proposed to be an applicable tool to probe the spin states and Jahn-Teller effect in La2−xSrxCoO4 compounds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Employing the all electron augmented plane wave + local orbital (APW + lo) method based on the density function theory (DFT), we have performed ab initio calculations of electronic structure and magnetic properties of dilute Fe impurity in PdHx alloys (0⩽x⩽1.0). Here we present our results for the H induced changes in the density of state (DOS), local magnetic moment and the macroscopic magnetic properties. The calculations performed for PdHx without the Fe impurity reveal H concentration dependent lattice expansion and Pd-H bonding which results in large change in electronic band structure and the DOS at the Fermi energy. The nonmagnetic DOS calculated for Fe doped PdHx is analyzed within Stoner model and the condition for local moment formation is found to hold for all concentrations of H. With an increase of the H content in the Pd matrix, the local moment of Fe declines from 3.43μB at x = 0 to 2.72μB at x = 1.0. More significantly, the giant magnetic moment, associated with the Fe impurity in Pd, progressively decreases with H concentration as the positive spin polarization of Pd-4d band electrons diminish and crossover to negative sign for x > 0.75. We show that H induced changes in s-d and d-d hybridization plays a crucial role on the magnetic properties of Fe doped PdHx alloys. In particular, we suggest that the rapid decline of the giant moment in PdHx alloys results from the weakening of ferromagnetic d-d exchange interaction between Fe-3d and Pd-d band electrons caused by changes in density of states arising from H induced filling up of the Pd-4d band.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have performed a systematic study of the critical properties of Pr0.8K0.2MnO3 manganite synthesized using two various methods in the vicinity of the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic phase transition. Our compound was successfully prepared by using the solid state reaction at high temperatures and Pechini sol-gel method. The X-ray diffraction pattern shows that all our samples adopt an orthorhombic structure with Pnma space group. Moreover, the critical exponents β, γ and δ are estimated through various techniques such as the modified Arrott plot, the Kouvel–Fisher method and the critical isotherm analysis founded on the data of the magnetic measurements on record near the Curie temperature. Compared to standard models, the estimated critical exponents are close to the theoretical values of 3D-Heisenberg model for the sample elaborated by solid state reaction and tricritical mean-field model for the sample elaborated by the sol-gel method. These results indicate the presence of a ferromagnetic short-range order in our samples. The calculated values using the Widom scaling equation are proximate to those obtained values from critical isotherm M (TC, µ0H). The accuracy of the critical exponents values was confirmed with the scaling hypothesis, the magnetization curves fall onto two sides independents below and above TC. Interestingly, the change of the universality class is due to the relevant the diminution of grain size. These results imply that the critical behavior of our samples depended sorely on the synthesis technique.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A large enough piece of ferromagnet is usually not magnetized uniformly, but develops a magnetization texture. In thin films these textures can be doubly-periodic. Such are the well known magnetic bubble domains and the recently observed “skyrmion” magnetization textures in MnSi. In this paper we develop a theory of periodic magnetization textures, based on complex calculus to answer the question – is there a difference between those two textures even if they seem to carry the same topological winding number (or topological charge)? We find that such difference exists, facilitated by a different role played by the magnetization vector's in-plane phase. We separate classical-like and quantum-like features of magnetization textures and highlight the role of magnetic anisotropy in favouring either of these cases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the magnetic fluid with various concentrations of well-dispersed dextran coated Fe3O4 nanoparticles were synthesized for hyperthermia application. The dextran-coated colloidal suspension, in the form of clusters of several Fe3O4 nanoparticles, maintains superparamagnetic behavior of Fe3O4 with the saturation magnetization of 59 emu/g at room temperature. The coated nanoparticles dispersed in aqueous medium agglomerate to form a monodisperse system and its average polydispersity index is 0.096. The inter-particle interaction caused the large susceptibility (1239 emu/gT) in dextran coated Fe3O4 nanoparticles. Effect of magnetic dipole interaction between the clusters on magnetic properties and heat capacity was examined by comparing specific loss power (SLP) of magnetic fluids at different Fe3O4 concentration. The intrinsic loss power (ILP) parameter increases with decreasing concentration of the dextran coated Fe3O4 and reaches the value of 15.6 nHm2/kg, which is 35% better than the best commercial equivalents. This result clearly shows that magnetic interaction between coated particles strongly influences induction heating efficiency of magnetic fluid. The in vitro toxicity experiments of magnetic fluids with Madin Darby Canine Kidney cells prove that our obtained magnetic fluids are promising for the hyperthermia cancer treatment application.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Linearly polarized absorption spectra and magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) spectra of ErFe3(BO3)4 single crystal were measured in the range of 9000–23000 cm−1 at 90 K. The absorption spectra of f-f transitions were decomposed into the Lorentz shape components and intensities of the components were found. MCD spectra permitted us to measure the Zeeman splitting of some transitions and so to determine changes of the Landé factor along the C3 axis of the crystal during these transitions. Optical and magneto-optical properties of f-f transitions in the ErFe3(BO3)4 crystal were compared with those in the ErAl3(BO3)4 crystal. Substantial difference of the properties connected with the difference of the Er3+ ions local symmetry in two crystals was revealed. Large splitting of one of the f-f transitions without magnetic field, which is not possible for the Kramers doublets, was observed. It was explained by appearance of two absorbing centers due to the local decrease of symmetry in the excited state. Appreciable difference of the local vibrations energy in some excited states was revealed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The lanthanum deficient La0.65− x□xCa0.35MnO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.12) have been elaborated by the solid-state reaction at high temperatures. All samples have been studied by several techniques including X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy (SEM), spectrum two FT-IR Spectrometer and vibrating sample magnetometer. Rietveld refinement shows that all samples crystallize in the orthorhombic structure with Pbnm space group and that lanthanum deficiency leads to a decrease of the unit cell volume. Magnetization measurements versus temperature exhibit a large ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition with decreasing temperature. The TC decreases from 270 K for x = 0 to 254 K for x = 0.12. A large magnetic entropy change associated with the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition has been observed. The maximum of the magnetic entropy change ΔSM Max decreases from 5 Jkg−1K−1 for x = 0 2.1 Jkg−1K−1 for x = 0.12. Moreover, the maximum magnetic entropy change exhibits a linear dependence with applied magnetic field. The relative cooling power (RCP) decreases from 214 J/Kg for x = 0 to 106 J/Kg for x = 0.12 under an applied magnetic field of 5 T.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The purpose of this particular study is the development of a high frequency –1 to 3 MHz – stable MnZn ferrite. The notion under which the study was held was the preliminary investigation of the dissipation mechanisms, and subsequently the hypothesis of the predominance of one. Accordingly the path of enhancement commenced with a selection of high frequency MnZn ferrite as the base – namely one exhibiting high ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) already – and the selective addition of Co2+ and Mg2+. Arguably the offspring of the study was a superb high frequency ferrite, stable throughout the temperature spectrum, 25–115 °C, presenting power losses as low as 87 mW cm−3 (1 MHz, 50 mT, 85 °C) and 319 mW cm−3 (3 MHz, 30 mT, 85 °C). Initial permeability (10 kHz, 0.1 mT) remains higher than the value of 850 (25–115 °C) and FMR appears no earlier than 7.1 MHz. To the authors’ knowledge these values are among the best reported.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Room temperature ferromagnetism (RTFM) in Ni/Co codoped CeO2 nanostructures has been studied. The samples are synthesized by hydrothermal method and further characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX), Raman spectroscopy (RS), photoluminescence (PL) spectroscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) measurements. The undoped CeO2 sample shows RTFM and a consistent enhancement in its RTFM is observed after doping. The Ni (5%)-Co (5%) codoped CeO2 nanostructures revealed interestingly, highest RTFM. The origin of RTFM in all CeO2 samples is explained by electronic density of states and magnetic moments calculated using density functional theory (DFT).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ni-Zn ferrite nanoparticles of smaller particle size and high saturation magnetization have gained a special attention for their use in biomedical applications. The development of such nanoparticles requires rigorous processing conditions in arriving at desired characteristics. Ni-Zn ferrite nanoparticles of three different compositions Ni0.65Zn0.35Fe2O4, Ni0.65Zn0.40Fe1.95O4 and Ni0.60Zn0.35Fe2.05O4 containing varying amounts of iron concentration 50.00 mol%, 48.75 mol%, and 51.25 mol% respectively were processed by the sol-gel method using polyethylene glycol (PEG) as a chelating agent and characterized by techniques X-ray diffraction, Transmission electron microscopy, field emission scanning electron microscopy and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy in elucidating the structural parameters. Ferrite compositions containing lower and higher iron content require the lower annealing temperature to produce higher saturation magnetization as compared to the stoichiometric composition. The composition of lower iron content favoured smaller particle size of 9 nm, while the material of higher iron content showed enhanced saturation magnetization of 91.9 emu/g. From the knowledge of literature and our previous works, it is opined that no other chelating agent than PEG proved to be an efficient one in controlling the particle size and improving the microstructure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We grew 7930 ± 93 nm thick Cr(0 0 1) films by molecular beam epitaxy on MgO(0 0 1) substrates achieving an atomically smooth staircase morphology. The c(2 × 2) surface structure of the Cr(0 0 1) surface was found via atomically resolved scanning tunneling microscopy images and dI/dV spectroscopy. A practical method of interpreting spin-polarized scanning tunneling microscopy dI/dV images was developed and applied to the c(2 × 2) Cr(0 0 1) surface structure. An in-plane 180° spin reversal between atomic layers creating a topological antiferromagnetic structure was observed. The spin quantization axes of the c(2 × 2) spins were found to depend on the atomic staircase with spin aligned along the [1 0 0], [0 1 0], and [1 1 0] crystal axes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This article comprises of the structural, magnetic, magneto-caloric and critical behavior study of single phase perovskite manganite LaMnO3+δ sample synthesized by traditional Solid State route. X-ray powder diffraction (XRD) at room temperature indicates the single phase trigonal crystalline structure of LaMnO3+δ with hexagonal setting R3‾c. Magnetic, magnetocaloric and critical behavior are studied using temperature dependent magnetization (M−T) and applied magnetic field dependent magnetization (M−H) data probed by Physical Property Measurement System (PPMS). The second order ferromagnetic to paramagnetic (FM-PM) phase transition is observe at Curie temperature (TC ∼ 180 K). This phase transition is responsible for maximum entropy change (ΔSM max) of 0.451(1) J/kg K at applied magnetic field of 6 Tesla with relative cooling power (RCP) of 54.293(5) J/kg. At TC, the order of magnetic phase transition is examined by employing Modified Arrott plots (MAP), Kouvel Fisher (KF) and simple isotherm analysis technique. The obtained values of critical exponent's β ≈ 0.365 ± 0.06, γ ≈ 1.14 ± 0.04 and δ ≈ 4.16 ± 0.10 elaborate that the magnetic phase transition coordinated well with the 3D-Heisenberg model at TC ≈ 180 K and are confirmed by scaling equations of state. Similarly the change in magnetic entropy (ΔSM) versus applied magnetic field recorded complies with the power law ΔS = (H)n with n = 0.64 at TC = 180 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The dynamic behavior of individual skyrmions is highly affected by the defects in the materials that host them. Here we develop a theory to account for the effect that defects produce over the skyrmion dynamics. The skyrmion-defect interaction mechanism is explained at an atomic level as a local modification of exchange, Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (DM) and/or anisotropy interaction. Relevant micromagnetic magnitudes as the energy density and effective magnetic fields arising from the presence of the defect are derived. We also find analytical expressions for the forces exerted by this defect over a skyrmion within Thiele's rigid approximation. Both point-defects as well as linear defects are considered.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study numerically the exchange bias effect in thin cylindrical nanowires composed of a ferromagnetic core and an antiferromagnetic shell implementing a classical spin Hamiltonian and Monte Carlo simulations. We address systematically the effect of shell polycrystallinity on the characteristic fields of the isothermal hysteresis loop (coercivity, exchange-bias) and their angular dependence upon the direction of the reversing and cooling fields. We relate the observed trends to modifications of the underlying magnetization reversal mechanism. We fit our simulation results to an extended Stoner-Wohlfarth model with effective off-axis unidirectional anisotropy and demonstrate that shell polycrystallinity leads to maximum exchange bias effect in an off-axis direction. Our results are in qualitative agreement with recent experimental studies of Co/CoO nanowires.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.ε-Fe3N@C nanocrystals without oxidation are one-pot synthesized by using the iron(II) acetylacetonate and tetraethylenepentamine (TEPA) as Fe and N precursors under a low temperature (533 K) in the presence of a small quantity of Pt atoms as the co-catalyst. The ε-Fe3N@C nanoparticles with a core-shell structure are nearly spherical and have a wide particle size distribution of 100–500 nm in diameter. Fe nanoparticles obtained by reduction of Fe2+ with TEPA are an effective catalyzer for decomposing TEPA to produce N and C atoms at a temperature much lower than the boiling point of TEPA. The diffusion of N atoms into Fe nanoparticles for the formation of ε-Fe3N@C is proposed, based on the results obtained by kinetically controlling the synthetic temperature and surfactants. The ε-Fe3N@C nanoparticles have an excellent saturation magnetization of 135.5 emu/g at room temperature. A significantly enhanced Curie temperature (TC) of 614 K is reached in the present ε-Fe3N@C nanoparticles, which is much higher than the TC values in the previously reported ε-Fe3Nx.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the enhancement of Kondo scattering in the heavy fermion compounds Ce2Ni3Ge1-xSix 5 by measuring electrical resistivity ρ(T), magnetic susceptibility χ(T), isothermal magnetization M(B), specific heat CP(T) and magnetoresistance. All the members of this series crystallize in U2Co3Si5-type orthorhombic structure with space group Ibam. Magnetic susceptibility and specific heat data show that two step antiferromagnetic transitions at x = 0 reduce to a single transition at x = 0.15 followed by a complete suppression of antiferromagnetic ordering at x = 0.20. Positive magnetoresistance below the transition temperature confirms that the transitions are antiferromagnetic up to x = 0.15 and the negative magnetoresistance in the paramagnetic region implies the freezing out of spin-flip scattering in Kondo compounds under the application of magnetic field. Kondo temperature, estimated from paramagnetic Curie temperature and magnetoresistance data, increases with increasing x in Ce2Ni3Ge1-xSix 5 for x⩽0.80. The γ values also indicate that the Kondo temperature enhances with increasing x after the suppression of antiferromagnetic ordering. Maximum γ value (∼76 mJ mol−1 K−2 Ce−1) is observed at x = 0.20 which indicates that the heavy fermion behavior is more pronounced at the magnetic-nonmagnetic boundary. A significant resistivity increase at a particular magnetic field is observed for T = 3.5 K, 3.8 K and 4 K (x = 0 sample) and it is observed for T = 3 K (x = 0.15 sample).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ion removal from sea and brackish water is essential for desalination process. A similar process takes also place after tertiary treatment of municipal and industrial waste water as a final treatment before discharge to the recipient. The ion removal from sea and brackish water using Reverse Osmosis (R.O.) technique is a certified and well-proven technology that can provide high-quality water supply; however it is relatively expensive. In this paper a study on the effectiveness of cation adsorbing behavior of a common zeolite takes place when combined with magnetite nanoparticles for facile magnetic removal from the bulk of water. The feasibility of selective removal of ions and the ability of producing directly potable water without the need for further enrichment is the basic subject of elaboration in this research.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe have fabricated and characterized Lg = 0.5 μm In0.52Al0.48As/In0.7Ga0.3As pseudomorphic high-electron-mobility-transistors (PHEMTs) on a 3-inch InP substrate. Stepper-based photo-lithography was used in all the process steps for device fabrication, aiming to miniaturize key device geometries, such as gate-to-source and gate-to-drain spacing. The fabricated device with Lg = 0.5 μm exhibits an excellent maximum transconductance (gm_max) of 1.9 S/mm at VDS = 1.5 V and an ON-resistance (RON) of below 0.4 Ω-mm. A high value of gm in our device leads to a fantastic combination of current-gain cut-off frequency (fT) of 120 GHz and maximum oscillation frequency (fmax) of 366 GHz at VDS = 0.8 V. These remarkable characteristics stem from the compact geometry design of the In0.52Al0.48As/In0.7Ga0.3As PHEMTs with LGS = LGD = 0.4 μm, coupled with an optimized gate recess process that yields tight control of side-recess spacing (Lside). More importantly, the product of fT and Lg in this work yields 60 GHz-μm which is the highest in any field-effect-transistor (FET) technology on any material system.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In insulating manganites, a semi-empirical model of orbital structure is proposed. The model allows us to account for the non-linear and non-local effects of a crystal structure on the orbital ordering of a trivalent manganese sublattice. This allows the variation of only two parameters for each degenerated manganese ion. They include the main part – the linear vibronic interaction – and additional parts (as long-range Coulomb fields or non-linear vibronic interactions). This is why one can define the orbital structure with respect of the magnetic structure without explicit microscopic definition of the non-linear and non-local terms. The continuous changes to the orbital mixing parameters are important for magnetic structure description. Within the framework of orbitally-dependent superexchange interaction, magnetic structures dependent on orbital orderings are considered. For manganite crystals LaMnO3, BiMnO3, La0.5Ca0.5MnO3, La0.333Ca0.667MnO3, phase diagrams of the orbital and magnetic structures with an unchanged crystal structure are drawn. The role of orbital ordering in frustrated magnetic structures is emphasized. The insufficiency of the linear vibronic approach is shown.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.X-type hexaferrites with nominal composition of [Ba2(Zr0.5Mn0.5)xFe28−xO44+0.25x] where x = 0, 1.5, 2 and 2.5 were synthesized using solid state reaction technique by applying two different sintering conditions of 1240 °C and 1300 °C for 5 h. Phase pure single phase formation of the synthesized hexaferrites were observed using XRD analysis. Surface morphologies of the sintered polished samples were analysed using SEM and found non spherical grains. The average grain size found to be ∼472.9 nm and ∼858.11 nm for the samples sintered using the recipe of 1240 °C and 1300 °C for 5 h respectively. Moreover, the grain size increases with the increase of (Zr,Mn) dopant concentration for the samples sintered at 1240 °C for 5 h and was found decreasing with the increase of (Zr,Mn) dopant concentration for the samples prepared at 1300 °C for 5 h. The average crystallite size estimated using Scherrer's formula was in the range of 2.4499 nm and 2.275 nm for the samples sintered at 1240 °C and 1300 °C respectively for 5 h. Magnetic measurements (M-H) and (M-T) were performed using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Highest remnant magnetization was found for the material (x = 2) irrespective of the sintering conditions. Saturation magnetisation was found decreasing with increasing of temperature in all the studied samples irrespective of the sintering conditions. Coercivity (Hc) of all the samples found decreasing with the increase in (Mn,Zr) dopant concentration. Electromagnetic interference (EMI) absorption was determined using E5063A Network Analyser (ENA) with the frequency range of (300 MHz-18 GHz). The sample Ba2(Zr0.5Mn0.5)2Fe26O44.5 (x = 2) sintered at 1240 °C, displayed maximum absorption of −36.2 dB (99.975%) at 15.4 GHz with the bandwidth that indicate frequency range in which RL was more than −20 dB (99% absorption) of 0.7 GHz (15.1 GHz–15.8 GHz). The rest of the studied samples displayed the bandwidth of 1.2 GHz (14.4 GHz–15.6 GHz) for minimum 99% absorption. The sample Ba2(Zr0.5Mn0.5)2Fe26O44.5 (x = 2) sintered at 1300 °C, displayed maximum absorption of −35.2 dB (99.97%) at 16.8 GHz with the bandwidth that indicated RL was more than −20 dB (99% absorption) of 1.6 GHz (16 GHz–17.6 GHz). Zr,Mn doped X-type hexaferrites showed better absorption properties in high frequency range (Ku band (12–18) GHz) and as a result, it can be used for EMI shielding for high frequency applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Skyrmions are the prime candidate as the information carrier of tomorrow's data storage devices. But they face the risk of annihilation on encountering a boundary. We show how skyrmions can avoid this undesired outcome through management of their anisotropy energies. Specifically we derive an edge potential and a contact interaction term which only operate close to the edge. We verify the accuracy of these two terms by modelling a realistic skyrmion system and comparing it with micromagnetic simulations. We not only observe and explain the speeding up of skyrmions near the edge (which had been expected) but also observe and explain a peculiar asymmetry in the motion (where it speeds up more on one edge compared to the other). We devise a means to stabilize a skyrmion against Magnus force (without the need for a transverse current) by modifying the damping parameters. Finally, we note a link between these damping parameters and the anisotropy energy. Our results will be of value in the design of skyrmion-based devices and would give fresh impetus to the study of magnetic anisotropy. Significance: Skyrmions are the prime candidate as information carrier of tomorrow's ever ubiquitous data storage devices. But they face the risk of annihilation on encountering a boundary. We propose a model for the skyrmion-edge dynamics by deriving an edge potential and a contact interaction, which are incorporated into the standard Thiele equation for the current-induced motion of skyrmions. We compare this model with micromagnetic simulations which leads us to observe and explain the speeding up of skyrmions near the edge. We also observe and explain a peculiar asymmetry in the motion (where skyrmions speed up more on one edge compared to the other) and discover the important role played by the damping constants of the Thiele equation. We devised a means to stabilize a skyrmion against Magnus force (without the need for a transverse current) by modifying the damping parameters. A connection with the anisotropy energy is noted.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Li-NiFe2O4 NPs have been prepared by a simple chemical co-precipitation method. The structural analysis of Li-NiFe2O4 nanoparticles with 2–31 nm demonstrates a face centered cubic spinel phase. The scanning electron microscopy and high resolution transmission electron microscopy images highlight moderate good nanocrystalline nature as compared to x = 0.4 concentration. The dielectric analysis shows that Li-NiFe2O4 NPs has a high dielectric constant at x = 0.2 concentration and then reduced with respect to annealing temperature and concentration. The magnetization curves demonstrate soft magnetic nature where, the saturation and remnant magnetization increases and then coercivity decreases due to increase of annealing temperature and concentration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A comprehensive study of structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties in the ternary Prussian blue analogue (PBA) Ni1.5[Fe(CN)6]x[Cr(CN)6]1-x·nH2O (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75 and 1) is presented. For all compounds the second-order magnetic phase transition from high temperature paramagnetic to the low temperature ferromagnetic state at the Curie temperature (Tc) is observed. We show the possibility of tuning the magnetic and magneto-caloric properties of PBA materials by changing the compositional factor of the metal centres involved in the cyano-bridging. An increase in Fe content leads to increase in the coercive field, whereas the critical temperature decreases from 60 to 22 K. The magnetic entropy change ΔS, as well as the related Relative Cooling Power (RCP), vary with x parameter in the regular way. The highest value of ΔS was observed for sample with x = 1 and was equal to 3.49 J mol−1K−1 under a magnetic field of 50 kOe, whereas the RCP varied from 62 J mol−1 (145.35 J kg−1) to 118 J mol−1 (273.33 J kg−1), when x decreased from 1 to 0.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the maximum alternating current (AC) magnetic susceptibility (χac) and optimal resonance frequency (fres) of (a) glass/Ru (X nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) and (b) glass/Ta(Y nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) films at room temperature (RT) were investigated through low-frequency AC magnetic susceptibility (χac) measurement, where X and Y each ranged from 5 to 10 nm. The variation of the highest χac at the optimal resonance frequency (fres), at which the spin sensitivity is maximal, was examined using an experiment. The results indicated that χac decreased as the frequency was increased. The maximum χac of glass/Ru(9 nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) and glass/Ta(8 nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) was 20.6 × 10−3 and 15.5 × 10−3 at fres 100 Hz and 1000 Hz, respectively. The maximum χac of glass/Ru(9 nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) was 1.3 times larger than that of glass/Ta(8 nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm). This indicated that the effect of the Ru seed layer is apparently suitable for low-frequency magnetic recording applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Saturation Magnetization (Ms) is one of the important states among all magnetic properties, it decides that the materials can be either used as a hard or soft magnet. Mechanical alloyed and spark plasma sintered at the promising levels of 40, 50 and 75 wt% Ni-Fe have been investigated to find out the Ms with the effect of the composition, grain size, particle size and extent of alloying. This study revealed that the value of Ms is increased due to the formation of a Ni3Fe compound, and it depends on the grain size. The introduction of the Ni3Fe compound was confirmed by X-ray diffraction analysis. It was found that ambient temperature played a critical role in sintering Ni-Fe alloy. The value of the Ms is found to be high at the intermediate particle size and become lower when the particle size is either larger or smaller. From this study, it was cleared that preparation of Ni-Fe alloy under the right temperature with the proper grain size favours for the potential downstream applications and generation of light materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A detailed physical meaning of the electronic phase transition in monolayer black phosphorus (BP) has been addressed in the presence of local gate voltage and Zeeman magnetic field. The main features of this transition characterize through the electronic density of states (DOS) in the vicinity of the Fermi level. The numerical calculations have been performed within the continuum approximation of tight-binding model and the Green's function method. The anisotropy crystal structure of BP causes different behaviors in each component of DOS. First, we have confirmed the Zeeman effect, i.e. the splitting of Van Hove singularities. Then, our results show that the electronic band gap of phosphorene along the x-direction decreases with weak magnetic fields when the gate voltage is absent and the system transits to the semimetallic phase at strong regimes, whereas there is no phase transition along the y-direction. Interestingly, turning on the gate, phase transition independent of the direction does not occur at both weak and strong magnetic fields. Another remarkable point refers to the increase of the band gap with gate voltage at both directions, leading to the semimetallic-semiconductor transition along the x-direction at strong magnetic fields. Tuning the band gap by the gate voltage and magnetic field are useful for future applications of BP.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe amorphous In-Ga-Zn-O (a-IGZO) thin-film transistor (TFT) current – voltage (I-V) characteristics can be significantly distorted by either series resistance, RS, associated with the source/drain (S/D) contact regions or/and density of states. To isolate Rs contribution we used the five terminals coplanar homojunction TFT structure. Experimental results have shown this device structure has a low S/D contact resistance that do not contribute to observed I-V nonlinearity. We have shown using combination of the experimental data and two- dimensional simulations that the observed nonlinearity can be associated with the conduction band-tail states.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticle hyperthermia (MNH) has shown substantial promise as an alternative therapy for deep-tissue tumors or resistant bacterial films. However, while great progress has been made in understanding the physical mechanisms of thermal energy dissipation in MNH, the influence of interparticle magnetic interactions in concentrated solutions remains a substantial challenge limiting progress toward clinical adoption. We have developed a well-dispersed suspension of magnetite nanoparticles which can be varied smoothly with nanoparticle concentrations ranging from 0 to 900 mg/mL. This material serves as a well-controlled experimental model for exploring the role of nanoparticle concentration on heating. We have measured the specific absorption rate (SAR) of the nanoparticles as a function of nanoparticle concentrations up to 320 mg/mL (10% v/v) in applied field frequencies from 86 to 460 kHz. Our results clearly indicate that SAR is non-monotonic with a maximum at concentrations of approximately 1% v/v, in strong agreement with recent theory. In addition, they suggest that optimal concentration is dependent on applied field frequency, and that the exponential dependence of SAR on frequency varies smoothly with concentration. These results provide experimental support for current theoretical efforts and lend insight into new investigations, ultimately leading to better prediction and control of heating in MNH.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Bulk cobalt ferrite, being a hard ferrite, shows high magnetization, high resistivity and high coercivity. If thin films of cobalt ferrite can be deposited at a low enough temperature and if its coercivity can be reduced, cobalt ferrite will make a very good candidate for use as a magnetic core of an integrated inductor in RF-CMOS ICs. Though polycrystalline and epitaxial thin films of cobalt ferrite have been made by various techniques, there are no reports of thin films of superparamagnetic cobalt ferrite. In this work, nanocrystalline cobalt ferrite thin films, which are superparamagnetic as deposited, have been prepared in the solution medium at ∼190 °C, using microwave irradiation. The as-prepared films have a saturation magnetization (MS) of 401 emu/cc and coercivity (HC) of 19 Oe at room temperature for a crystallite size of 2 nm. The cobalt ferrite powder obtained as a by-product during the same process has MS of 50 emu/g and HC of 5 Oe at room temperature, making it superparamagnetic. The as-prepared films were annealed in air at 300 °C for 5 min and 10 min. Annealing for 10 min results in an increase in crystallite size to 36 nm, MS increases from 401 emu/cc to 545 emu/cc, and HC increases from 19 Oe to 860 Oe. The change in magnetic properties can be directly associated with change in the crystallite size and degree of crystallographic inversion, as determined by neutron diffraction and deduced from X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We develop a theory of the reversible switching of the magnetic state of the ferromagnet-insulator-normal metal-ferromagnet (FINF) nanostructure. The switching is controlled by tuning the Coulomb blockade strength via the gate voltage on the normal metal granule. The proposed mechanism allows for realizing the switching without passing a dissipative current through the structure.© 2018Among the many types of preparation techniques, the non-conventional mechanochemical processing has been recognized as an alternative route to nanomaterials. It is integral to the preparation of ceramic materials, including magnetoceramics, such as spinels, garnets, and hexaferrites, among others. This technique imparts copious levels of kinetic energy through collisions of balls, chamber walls, and media particles resulting in not only physical mixing, attrition, and solid state reaction, but also vacancies, strain, and cation inversion. Here, we strive to elucidate the impact of mechanochemical processing upon a single step solid-state reaction and the inversion of cations in the zinc ferrite system and their impact upon important long-range magnetic properties of volumetric magnetization, Néel temperature, and nuclear magnetic properties, including hyperfine field distributions, isomer shifts, and quadrupole interactions.© 2018Ni0.15− xMg0.1Cu0.3Zn0.45BixCoxFe2− xO4 (x = 0, 0.01, 0.02, 0.03) ferrites were prepared by sol-gel auto-combustion method. The X-ray diffraction confirmed the formation of the single-phase spinel structure when x ≤ 0.02. The microstructures were examined by SEM. The liquid phase produced by high temperature sintering promoted the grain growth and decreased the porosity. Magnetic measurements showed that saturation magnetization decreased continuously with the substitution of Bi and Co contents, whereas, the initial permeability increased with increase in Bi-Co content up to 0.02 followed by a decrease. In addition, Incorporation of Bi-Co resulted in the increase in quality factor and the decrease in loss factor, which implies that NiMgCuZn ferrite doped with Bi-Co is suitable for high frequency applications. Moreover, the Ni0.13Mg0.1Cu0.3Zn0.45Bi0.02Co0.02Fe1.98O4 sample exhibited the largest density, the highest initial permeability, and the lowest loss.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the effect of Fe on the martensitic transitions in Ni47Mn40- xFexIn13 (x = 1 and 2) alloys and associated magnetocaloric effect. Structural and magnetic transitions are observed in x = 1 and 2 alloys. The martensitic transition shifts to low temperature with the increase of Fe concentration. The maximum positive entropy change (ΔSM) with quite large magnitude of 22 Jkg−1K−1 (x = 1) and 51.2 Jkg-1K-1 (x = 2) are observed for a field change of 50 kOe. Substitution of Fe enhances the magnetization as well as increases the ΔSM more than a twice in the x = 2 system.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.(x)BaTiO3–(1−x)Co0.7Fe2.3O4 (BTO-CFO) magnetoelectric nanocomposite ceramic with x = 0.0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, 1.00 were successfully designed and fabricated by sol-gel route. The structural, micro structural, dielectric, ferromagnetic, ferroelectric and magnetoelectric properties of these composites were investigated. The coexistence of tetragonal phase and cubic spinel phase, without any secondary phase in composites is confirmed by the X-ray diffraction measurement. The field emission scanning electron micrograph show well distributed ferrite and ferromagnetic phases in the composites. The energy dispersive X-ray results revealed the purity and stoichiometry of BTO-CFO nanocomposites. The dielectric constant and loss factor of the composites were studied as a function of frequency. The composite sample with x = 0.50, results in higher value of dielectric constant whereas CFO possess lowest value of dielectric constant. The magnetization hysteresis (M−H) loop of the composites show ferromagnetic behavior with saturation magnetization values, Ms varies from 15 to 67.68 emu/g and coercive field Hc from 1538 to 1862 Oe. All the composites exhibit typical ferroelectric hysteresis loops indicating the presence of spontaneous polarization. The magnetoelectric voltage coefficient increases linearly with increases in applied d.c. magnetic bias field up to 8 KOe. The maximum value of magnetoelectric voltage coefficient, αME=7.7 mV/cm Oe for BTO-CFO composite having 25% ferrite and 75% ferroelectric content. The high ME voltage coefficient of BTO-CFO composite may be suitable for storage device application.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper gives a model field-theoretic description of thermodynamic magnetization fluctuations and exchange interactions in localized ferromagnets and amorphous magnets. A local Ginzburg-Landau type Hamiltonian is used to describe the properties observed in the transition region. The approach provides another method of tackling interacting spin systems dominated by size effects, fluctuations and correlations, which lead to a dimensional phenomenology of critical behavior. It is also found that the competition between long- and short-range interactions gives rise to the redistribution of the density of spins and causes the anisotropy of the electron spectrum. Above the upper-critical dimension, the approach behaves like mean-field theory with however, thermodynamic quantities modified by intrinsic critical fluctuations, whereas it predicts correctly the universal quantities for dimension 4 and below. At all temperatures, the model matches the magnetic observables, thus providing a unified picture for both the Gaussian and critical regimes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Crystalline and magnetic microstructures of the iron-rich Sm(Co0.65Fe0.26Cu0.07Zr0.02)7.8 anisotropic sintered magnets after isothermal aging process were investigated systematically by using transmission electron microscope (TEM) and magnetic force microscopy (MFM). As the isothermal aging time (t) increases from 0.5 to 20 h, the remanences of the specimens almost keep constant (11.4 kGs), while the intrinsic coercivity (Hcj) shows an increase from 1.13 to 7.93 kOe, which is much higher than the well-known value of the order of 1 kOe. TEM investigation indicates that the cellular microstructures are incomplete together with partially phase transformation of 1:7H to 2:7R and 5:19H when t = 0.5 h. When t reaches 5 h, the phase transformation is almost completed. With t increasing from 2.5 to 20 h the average cellular size of the specimens increases from ∼90 to ∼150 nm and the density of the lamellae phase increases from ∼0.014 to ∼0.033 1/nm. MFM investigations show that the average surface width (Ws) decreases from 0.86 to 0.67 μm initially and then increases to 0.98 μm and the main domain width (Wm) decreases from 2.17 to 1.21 μm initially and then increases to 1.51 μm. And the Wm is about two times of Ws for the specimens because of the smaller magnetostatic energy of the surface layer of the specimens with c-axis parallel to the imaging plane. It is impressive that the domain walls form in straight line through cellular structures as t is less than 5 h, and in a zig-zag shape when t is over 5 h. This is the first time to reveal systematically the domain structures for the iron-rich 2:17-type Sm-Co magnets during isothermal aging process. The evolution of the magnetic microstructures is ascribed to the variation of the effective intrinsic magnetic properties of cell and cell boundary phases originating from both the phase transformation and development of cellular structures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The features of spin waves propagation in an array of ferromagnetic pillars are considered in a theoretical approach that takes into account dipole-dipole interaction between them. Calculations for a finite linear chain of pillars in macrospin approximation shows that such system has several resonant frequencies, which depend upon the edge effects and the geometrical parameters of the structure. Various configurations of the magnetization of the pillars are considered and it is shown that the frequency characteristics are differ in the cases of (i) unidirectional magnetization of the pillars (ferromagnetic configuration), (ii) opposite directions of the magnetization (antiferromagnetic configuration) and (iii) unidirectional magnetization with singular defects.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic heating and thermal conductivity of magnetic nanofluids (MNFs) are of great interest for biomedicine and electronic heat transfer. Here, we report the enhanced magnetic heating efficiency and thermal conductivity of MNFs fabricated by amorphous FeZrB nanoparticles with high saturation magnetization and good magnetothermal stability. Under external magnetic fields, the viscosities of FeZrB MNFs are almost twice that of Fe3O4 MNFs, enhancing the field-driving force in heat transfer applications. Under 250 Oe alternating current fields, the required time of heating FeZrB MNFs to the hyperthermic temperature (45 °C) is only 16.5% that of Fe3O4 MNFs, amplifying the specific absorption rate of the magnetic nanoparticles by about 2.4 times. Benefiting from the higher thermal conductivity of amorphous, the thermal conductivity enhancement for FeZrB MNFs is also larger than that of Fe3O4 MNFs—up to 34.0% enhancement for silicone oil-based FeZrB MNF at φ = 2 vol%. This investigation of amorphous-nanoparticle-including MNFs shall shed light on the potential of utilizing amorphous nanoparticles to fabricate MNFs for biomedicine or heat management applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The persistence of the current article is to discuss the iron nanoparticles' shape in flows due to highly oscillating magnetic field over a stretchable rotating disk. For ferrofluid, water is considered as base fluid with suspension of iron nanoparticles having sphere, oblate ellipsoid and prolate ellipsoid shapes with different sizes. The impact of the nanoparticles' shape on velocity and temperature profiles, convective heat transfer coefficient, radial and transverse shear stress is deliberated through graphs and tables. The presence of highly oscillating magnetic field forces the particles to rotate faster than the fluid and, as a result, the total viscosity is certainly reduced. The governing equations, which are firstly modeled and thereafter converted into nonlinear ordinary differential equations in dimensionless form using similarity approach, are analytically solved using the Mathematica package BVPh 2.0 which is based on the homotopy analysis method (HAM).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and structural properties of L10 Mn53Ga47 islands epitaxially grown onto MgO(1 0 0) substrates are discussed. The samples were fabricated by sputter-deposition at a substrate temperature Ts during deposition. The samples deposited at Ts above 500 °C were found to form the island structure of Volmer-Weber type. The average size of the islands fabricated at Ts = 600 °C is around 200 nm in width and 60 nm in height. The XRD and TEM analyses indicate that those islands are of the L10 phase with the 〈0 0 1〉 axis perpendicular to the substrate surface. The lattice constants a and c are 3.91 ± 0.01 Å and 3.65 ± 0.02 Å, respectively, which are larger by 0.8%, and smaller by 1.5% respectively, as compared to the bulk values of the same composition. The order parameter of these islands is found to increase from 0.7 to 0.8 for Ts = 450–500 °C, and then remains nearly constant (≈0.8) for higher Ts. The M-H hysteresis loops exhibit a high squareness for all the samples for Ts = 450–600 °C. The saturation magnetization Ms is about 220 and 350 emu/cm3 for Ts = 450 and 600 °C, respectively. The out-of-plane coercivity Hc is 5 and 13 kOe for Ts = 450 and 600 °C, respectively. The temperature dependence of Ms for the sample made at Ts = 600 °C was measured and fitted to an empirical relation in order to estimate Tc. The estimated Tc around 600 K is in reasonable agreement with the reported value of bulk L10 Mn53Ga47. The uniaxial perpendicular magnetic anisotropy constant Ku estimated by the out-of-plane torque curves is around 1.1 × 107 and 8.3 × 106 erg/cm3 at 5 and 300 K, respectively. The initial magnetization curves of these islands exhibit a typical pinning mode for the coercivity mechanism. A phenomenological discussion of the coercivity is presented on the basis of Kronmuller's formula. It is found that the coefficient α and effective demagnetizing factor Neff in the formula by Kronmuller are approximately 0.38 and 12. For the magnetic anisotropy mechanism, the power law relation between Ku(T) and Ms(T) is examined. It is found that the exponent n for Ku(T)∝Ms(T)n varies from 2.3 to 3.5 for T from 350 to 5 K. However, the n in a whole temperature range from 5 to 350 K is 2.6. The n = 2.6 suggests a deviation from the single-ion mechanism, and is consistent with the theoretical predictions of Ga contribution.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The spin Hall magnetoresistance effects (SMR) in four heterostructures consist of different boundaries of Pt layer has been investigated. The result in this work shows that the two boundaries of Pt layer in all heterostructures both influence the spin current absorption and reflection. The Pt/air interface would weaken the spin current absorption at the Co2FeSi/Pt interface on the other side of the Pt layer. On the contrary, the Pt/MgO(0 0 1) interface could boost the spin current absorption strongly at the Co2FeSi/Pt interface on the other side of the Pt layer. And this promotion effect is much stronger than the Co2FeSi/Pt interface on the spin current absorption at the other Co2FeSi/Pt interface. The MgO capping layer may avoid anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) induced SMR ratio decreasing at low temperature. This study provides a new way for modulating spin current absorption at the FM/HM interface.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Non-oriented electrical steel is widely used in the manufacturing of motor stators. The magnetic property will be influenced by the residual stress induced from manufacturing processes. The classical Jile-Atherton hysteresis model with constant parameters is widely used to describe the magnetization characteristic of ferromagnetic materials. In the model, the parameter a represents the domain density, k is the pinning factor reflecting the strength of the pinning effect, α is the domain coupling parameter affecting the slope of the mid-segment of the hysteresis loop and C is the coefficient of reversibility. However, all the four parameters are influenced by residual stress. Furthermore, the influence of magnetic peak induction on parameters can't be ignored according to our work. The classical Jile-Atherton hysteresis model cannot reflect the influence of residual stress and magnetic peak induction. In this paper, a modified residual stress dependent Jile-Atherton hysteresis model was proposed, whose parameters are extended to functions related to residual stress and magnetic peak induction. A novel device was designed to carry out magnetic property testing experiments under large stress. The parameters were identified by a MATLAB program and the influence of residual stress and magnetic peak induction was analyzed. The accuracy of parameters was validated by experiments, which showed that the modified model worked well in describing the magnetization characteristic under different stresses and magnetic peak inductions. This could provide some guidance for the manufacturing processes of motor stators.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Applying the Stöber method, silica spheres were obtained and arranged in an fcc lattice. Metallic Fe was introduced into the opal voids. Magnetization curves of the synthesized metallic nanoparticles and of the artificial opals with infiltrated nanoparticles were measured by using the vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) technique with an applied magnetic field oriented along the [1 1 1] direction of the opal matrix. Nonlinear Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation was numerically solved, in order to reproduce the experimental results. In solving LLG equation we have used Ewald summations to take into account the dipolar interaction between the spatially arranged magnetic nanoparticles. The theory reproduces the general features of the measured magnetization curves. In particular, the S-like shape of the magnetization curves produced by the ferromagnetic response of Fe nanoparticles and the diamagnetic one of the SiO2 opal matrix is well described. The observed small areas of the magnetization hysteresis loops are explained as a consequence of the random distribution of the magnetic anisotropy axes of the Fe nanoparticles. The effect of the dipolar interaction between the magnetic nanoparticles is predicted to be important at magnitudes of the external applied field, larger than the coercive magnetic field.© 2018The stability of the skyrmion magnetization configurations in ultrathin circular magnetic nanodots is calculated analytically and simulated micromagnetically considering realistic magnetic and geometrical dot parameters taken from recent experiments. The chiral Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya exchange interaction (DMI) is taken into account as an interfacial energy term. The diagram of single Néel skyrmion stability/metastability, skyrmion sizes and magnetization profiles are found as a function of the magnetic and geometrical dot parameters. It is shown that most of skyrmions are unstable or metastable and the stability region where the Néel skyrmion is the ground state is small. The Dzyaloshinskii criterion for the instability of ferromagnetic state in bulk ferromagnets with respect to the increasing DMI strength should be essentially modified to describe the stability of magnetic skyrmions in 2D systems like ultrathin ferromagnetic films and nanodots.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the spin dynamics of a vortex state in a core-shell magnetic nanodisk driven by an oscillating field applied perpendicular to the disk plane by means of micromagnetic simulations. The nanodisk comprises a Py (Fe0.2Ni0.8) core of 100 nm in radius, surrounded by a 50 nm thick Fe shell. Fourier transform analyses show that the Py core and the Fe shell dominate spin-wave oscillation at the fundamental and higher order radial modes, respectively. For oscillating driving field tuned to the fundamental eigenfrequency, the Py/Fe interface effectively confines spin-wave excitation in the Py core region. This effect leads to significantly more rapid vortex core (VC) reversal in comparison to homogeneous disks. Our work demonstrates that the higher order modes can drive much faster VC reversal than the fundamental mode, in sharp contrast to the results obtained in homogeneous disks. With excitation levels up to 30 mT, we find strong nonlinear spin-wave dynamics in the system, which results in mode frequency redshifting, therefore the observation of the most rapid VC reversals below eigenfrequencies and VC switching in wide ranges of frequencies.© 2018The compound EuPd2Si2 is a well-known fluctuating-valent compound with a largest variation of Eu valence in a narrow temperature interval (around 150 K). The ball-milled form of this compound was investigated to understand the Eu valence behavior in the nanoform. The compound is found to retain the ThCr2Si2-type tetragonal structure after ball-milling leading to a reduction in particle size, typically falling in the range 10–100 nm. We find that there is a qualitative change in the temperature dependence of magnetic susceptibility for such small particles, with respect to that known for bulk form. To understand this microscopically, Mössbauer spectrum as a function of temperature were taken. The Mössbauer spectra of the nanocrystalline compound is essentially divalent-like at room temperature, but becomes distinctly bimodal at all temperatures below 300 K, unlike that of the bulk form. That is, there is a progressive transfer of intensity from divalent position to trivalent position with a gradual decrease of temperature. We attribute it to a first-order valence transition, with extreme broadening by defects in the nano specimen. Thus there is a qualitative change in the valence behavior in this compound as the particle size is reduced by ball-milling. Such a particle size study is reported for the first time for a Eu-based mixed valent compound.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the method of quantitative ferrite phase control, which is based on thermomagnetometric analysis of the ferrite samples in magnetic field, was developed. The magneto-phase transitions in LiZn and LiTi ferrites with chemical formulas Li0.5(1 x )Fe2.50.5 xZnxO4 and Li0.5(1+ x )Fe2.51.5 xTixO4 were studied, and their phase compositions were analyzed by both the developed method and X-ray diffraction analysis. It was shown that the thermomagnetometry method compared to X-ray diffraction analysis allows to examine more precisely the magnetic phases in synthesized ferrites with inhomogeneous phase composition. However, a complex analysis, using both X-ray and thermomagnetometry methods, will be the most optimal in case of the formation of non-magnetic and poor magnetic phases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work a sensitive micrometric non-contact position sensor based on the Giant MagnetoImpedance effect (GMI) is analyzed. A nearly zero magnetostrictive CoFeSiBCr wire was employed as sensor nucleus. The sensing principle is based on the changes in the high frequency electric impedance, Z, of the soft magnetic element as a function of the relative position of a permanent magnet generating a non-uniform magnetic field along the wirés axis. The sensor sensitivity is analyzed in terms of the magnetic field gradient and wire's length. The comparison between the sensing response of a single wire element and a long wire (12 cm in length) with different voltage contacts along its axis is performed. Higher micrometric sensitivities are achieved in wires with a certain critical length. A slight enhancement of the sensor sensitivity is found under the single wire configuration below the critical wire length. These results are interpreted as the contribution of the characteristic closure domain structure at the sample ends in these soft magnetic wires. Finally, the application of the sensor for the detection of the daily micrometric trunk shrinkage variations in a lemon tree is presented. The results indicate that this type of magnetic sensors can be easily implemented in the agricultural sector, providing a low cost and sensitive detection technique regarding water monitoring purposes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of (Sm, Y)(Fe0.8Co0.2)12−xTix (x = 0.6, 1) prepared by arc melting are investigated. The formation of the ThMn12 structure was facilitated by the substitution of Sm with Y at low Ti concentrations (x = 0.6), and almost a single phase with the ThMn12 structure was obtained for (Sm0.8Y0.2)(Fe0.8Co0.2)11.4Ti0.6. This suggests that Y plays an important role in stabilizing the ThMn12 structure owing to the decrease in the atomic radius of the rare earth site. The intrinsic magnetic properties of (Sm0.8Y0.2)(Fe0.8Co0.2)11.4Ti0.6 exhibited μ0Ms = 1.50 T, μ0Ha = 11 T, and Tc = 820 K at room temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Pure and Ba-Zr co-doped multiferroic BiFeO3 nanopowders are synthesized via sol-gel method. X-ray diffraction demonstrates the transformation of crystal structure (from R3c to R3c + P4mm) and the absence of impurity phase. Scanning electron microscopy and transmission electron microscopy indicate that the co-doping leads to a decrease in particle size and the Bi0.85Ba0.15Fe0.95Zr0.05 sample has a particle size of 30–60 nm. Surprisingly, the room-temperature magnetization hysteresis loops change to be soft ferromagnetic with co-doping. The maximum and remnant magnetizations of the as-prepared nanopowders first increase and then decrease with increasing dopant concentration with the Bi0.85Ba0.15Fe0.95Zr0.05 sample having the best magnetic properties. The enhanced magnetization is due to the crystal lattice distortion caused by the ionic-radius difference between the substituent and host elements and the suppression of the antiferromagnetic spiral spin structure induced by the size effect of the nanopowders.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principles calculations based on density-functional theory we systematically investigate the effect of applied strain on the stability and on the electronic and magnetic properties of monolayer phosphorene with single-atom vacancy. We consider two types of single vacancies: the symmetric SV-55|66, which has a metallic and non-magnetic ground state, and the asymmetric SV-5|9, which is energetically more favorable and exhibits a semiconducting and magnetic character. Our results show that compressive strain up to 10%, both biaxial and uniaxial along the zigzag direction, reduces the formation energy of both single-atom vacancies with respect to the pristine configuration and can stabilize these defects in phosphorene. We found that the magnetic moment of the SV-5|9 system is robust under uniaxial strain in the range of −10 to +10%, and it is only destroyed under biaxial compressive strain larger than 8%, when the system also suffers a semiconductor-to-metal transition. Additionally, we found that magnetism can be induced in the SV-55|66 system under uniaxial compressive strain larger than 4% along the zigzag direction and under biaxial tensile strain larger than 6%. Our findings of small formation energies and non-zero magnetic moments for both SV-5|9 and SV-55|66 systems under zigzag uniaxial compressive strain larger than 4% strongly suggest that a magnetic configuration in monolayer phosphorene can be easily realized by single-vacancy formation under uniaxial compressive strain.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The SmCo3.1−xFe0.9CuxB (x = 0, 0.02, 0.06 and 0.1) ribbons were prepared by melt-spinning at 40 m/s accompanied by annealing at 800 °C for 30 min, and then their structures and magnetic properties were investigated. The results show that the annealed ribbons are composed of single Sm(Co,Fe)4B phase at x = 0, and single Sm(Co,Fe,Cu)4B phase at x = 0.02–0.1. These phases with different Cu contents have the same hexagonal CeCo4B-type structure with a space group of P6/mmm, and the lattice parameters a and c increase monotonically with increasing x from 0 to 0.1, while the axial ratio of c/a remains almost unchanged (c/a = 1.3495). In particular, the x = 0.06 ribbons consisting of short rod-shaped Sm(Co,Fe,Cu)4B grains, which contact with each other directly, show the high coercivity of up to 44450.0 Oe, and each in-plane grain exhibits preferred orientation along its long or short axis direction.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the evolution of the magnetic and dynamical properties as well as structural properties of diluted spin ice Dy2− xLaxTi2O7, where Dy was partially replaced by nonmagnetic La. It is found from Raman spectra that the anomalous phonons should be originated from the strong phonon-phonon anharmonic interaction in the system. Magnetic measurements show that the substitution of La3+ in Dy2Ti2O7 weakens ferromagnetic coupling between Dy-Dy ions, leading to the relaxation of spin ice state. Dynamical properties show that the change of local environment affects the crystal field level, which subsequently determines the energy barriers. We also demonstrate a statistical distribution of relaxation times and an acceleration of spin dynamics near 16 K. The distribution of relaxation times originates from some short-range ordered ferromagnetic glasses/clusters in the process of spin freezing. The vacancies introduced by magnetic dilution make reversing of spins more convenient, resulting in a faster relaxation processes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, U-type barium hexagonal ferrite (Ba4Co2Fe36O60) powder was synthesized by solid state reaction route. The synthesized ferrite powder was further transformed into a series of toroidal shaped ferrite-epoxy composites with different volume concentrations (42.6, 47.2, 50.6 and 54.3 volume percentages) of ferrite powder in epoxy matrix. The prepared U-type barium hexagonal ferrite powder and fabricated ferrite-epoxy composites were characterized for surface morphology, phase formation and magnetic properties by FESEM, XRD and VSM techniques respectively. Complex permittivity (εr = ε′ − jε″) and complex permeability (µr = µ′ − jµ″) of the fabricated composites were computed using an Agilent E8364B vector network analyzer in the frequency range of 2–18 GHz. The computed permittivity and permeability data of U-type ferrite composites were employed in the calculation of return loss (RL) of fabricated composites with varying thickness. The minimum RL was observed as −42.1 dB for the absorber with thickness of 3 mm and the bandwidth achieved was 8.5 GHz for RL ≤ −10 dB. Based on the above results these composites have potential use as excellent microwave absorbers in 2–18 GHz frequency range.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Hexagonal MnMX alloys present interesting properties like non-collinear magnetism, reentrant spin glass, novel skyrmion-domain formation, etc. In this work, we synthesized Mn1+ xCo1− xSn (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8, 1.0) alloys using arc melting and melt spinning techniques. A pure Ni2In-type structure was obtained in alloys of x = 0.4–0.8. The lattice parameters increase systematically with an increase in the Mn content. ZFC-FC measurements show reentrant spin-glass-like and non-collinear magnetic transition, reflecting the competition of several exchange interactions. The magnetic properties also show strong dependence on the anti-site disorder. First-principles calculations are applied to explain the evolution of the magnetic state. The magnetoresistance values for all alloy ribbons are negative and linearly changed, dominated by the spin-dependent scattering. Both magnetoresistance and anomalous Hall effect show hysteresis at low temperatures, consistent with the magnetization measurements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This study accentuates the magnetohydrodynamic effect on three dimensional rotating flow and heat transfer of ferrofluid over an exponentially permeable stretching/shrinking sheet with suction effect. The flow and heat transfer model in partial differential equations are simplified by employing the suitable similarity transformations to a system of ordinary differential equations. Numerical results are generated by using the Matlab solver bvp4c function. The computational outcomes give significant insight into the rotating flow. The influence of three different types of base fluids are also considered, namely water, methanol and kerosene. The skin friction coefficients and the rate of heat transfer are prominently affected by the intensity of suction, magnetic field, rotating scale, concentration of nanoparticles and Prandtl number. It is found that a rise in the rotation parameter causes the ferrofluid to exert a drag force on the surface of the shrinking sheet. High intensity of the magnetic field induces higher Lorentz force and leads to the increment of the skin friction. A large concentration of nanoparticles degenerates the rate of heat transfer. On the other hand, the presence of dual solutions within the shrinking region is observed for certain values of the governing parameters. The execution of stability analysis affirms the reliability and stability of the first solution while the second solution is unstable.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the direction of coercivity distribution gradient on the demagnetization behavior of anisotropic sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets was investigated via both experiments and simulations. In the grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) using Dy70Cu30, the magnet diffused parallel to the c-axis shows much higher squareness factor (Hk/Hcj, 0.92) than that diffused perpendicular to the c-axis (Hk/Hcj, 0.83). To simulate the different gradient of coercivity distribution with respect to the c-axis after the GBDP, composite Nd-Fe-B magnets composed of two different grades of Nd-Fe-B magnets were fabricated via diffusion bonding. The anisotropic demagnetization behavior of the composite magnets sandwiched in two directions is similar to that of the magnets after GBDP along two perpendicular directions. Micro-magnetic simulations further confirmed the dependence of demagnetization behavior on the direction of coercivity distribution gradient with respect to the c-axis. For the magnet with the direction of coercivity distribution gradient parallel to the c-axis, the initial demagnetization needs to overcome a much higher energy barrier than that perpendicular to the c-axis. It indicates that the gradient of coercivity distribution induced by GBDP parallel to the c-axis is much more effective to save the usage of heavy rare earth elements than that perpendicular to the c-axis.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.As a new evolutive grain boundary diffusion technology, rotating diffusion technology exhibits many advantages such as easy to achieve mass production and reutilization of heavy rare earth materials for diffusion. In this study, the magnetic properties and microstructure of sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets with enhanced coercivity by rotating diffusion using Dy strips were studied. The optimal rotating diffusion parameters was obtained at 800 °C for 8 h, and the coercivity of diffused magnet increased from 12.51 kOe to 17.38 kOe. A (Nd,Dy)2Fe14B core-shell microstructure was observed in the surface region of the Nd2Fe14B grains after the rotating diffusion. In order to evaluate the reutilization rate of heavy rare earth materials, multiple reutilization experiments of Dy strips by rotating diffusion were implemented. The coercivity enhancement declines slightly with the increase of rotating diffusion times. Due to the evaporation of Dy strips, the diffusion process results in uneven, rough surface of Dy strips with many small concaves, which reduces the saturated vapor pressure of Dy strips, leading to less Dy evaporation and diffusion, and in turn to lower coercivity. But it is worth to mention that the coercivity of the fifth rotating diffusion magnet still reaches to 16.67 kOe, which is 33% higher than that of the original magnet. It is therefore concluded that the reutilization of Dy strips in rotating diffusion for sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets with enhanced coercivity is feasible and rotating diffusion technology could realize the mass production.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Gilbert damping in nonmagnetic metal (NM)/permalloy (Py)/nonmagnetic metal (NM) trilayers was studied using ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) measurements for different constituent materials (NM = Pt, Ta, Cu, and Ti) of varying Py thickness (t = 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, and 10 nm) fabricated using an ultrahigh vacuum sputtering system. We found that the Gilbert damping constant increases with decreasing Py thickness and varies for different constituents of nonmagnetic metals. For NM = Pt, the damping constant of Py increases with decreasing Py thickness more remarkably than for other nonmagnetic metals. According to quantitative estimations of the effective spin-mixing conductance Geff mix, it was found that the value of Geff mix = 1.17 × 1015 Ω−1·m−2 for Pt is one order of magnitude greater than Geff mix = 0.13 × 1015 Ω−1·m−2 for Cu and 0.11 × 1015 Ω−1·m−2 for Ti. The large Geff mix value for Pt/Py/Pt is known to be caused by the strong spin-orbit coupling (SOC) of Pt. The effective spin-mixing conductance for Pt is 3 times greater than that (0.27 × 1015 Ω−1·m−2) for Ta despite the SOC of both Pt and Ta is similar in magnitude. This work allows not only for an understanding of the interface effect of the Gilbert damping constant on NM/Py/NM trilayers but also for optimal design of low-power-consumption spintronic devices that are composed of a variety of hetero-interfaces between the different magnetic and nonmagnetic layers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the effect of Al doping on structural, magnetic and electrical properties of La0.8Ba0.2Mn1-xAlxO3 (0⩽x⩽0.25) manganite annealed in 750° and 1350° temperatures. Results show Tc decreases as Al ion substitution in Mn site. The magnetic susceptibility measurement shows Griffiths and spin-glass phase in aluminum-doped samples. Recently, Narreto et al., reported dynamic distortion and polaronic effects in the paramagnetic state of La0.8Ba0.2Mn1-xAlxO3 manganites. Here we completed the phase diagram and show an occurrence of the spin-glass state in this manganite. The resistivity measurement shows, TMIT (metal-insulator) transition temperatures decreases and the system become an insulator. The insulator–metal transition occurs for the undoped sample annealed at the low temperature in near 165 K, while this transition is weak for the undoped sample annealed at high temperature due to oxygen non-stoichiometry. Using three models VIZ., Adiabatic small polaron hoping, Variable range hopping, and Percolation model, the resistivity have been studied.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have developed a tunneling theory to describe the temperature dependence of tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) of the magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs) with periodic grating barrier. Through the Patterson function approach, the theory can handle easily the influence of the lattice distortion of the barrier on the tunneling process of the electrons. The lattice distortion of the barrier is sensible to the temperature and can be quite easily weakened by the thermal relaxation of the strain, and thus the tunneling process of the electrons will be significantly altered with the variation of the temperature of the system. That is just the physical mechanism for the temperature dependence of the TMR. From it, we find two main results: 1. The decrease of TMR with rising temperature is mostly carried by a change in the antiparallel resistance (RAP), and the parallel resistance (RP) changes so little that it seems roughly constant, if compared to the RAP. 2. For the annealed MTJ, the RAP is significantly more sensitive to the strain than the RP, and for non-annealed MTJ, both the RP and RAP are not sensitive to the strain. They are both in agreement with the experiments of the MgO-based MTJs. Other relevant properties are also discussed.© 2018Interstitial iron (Fei) has strong influence on physical properties of Fe1+xSb (0.08 ⩽ x ⩽ 0.38) compounds. We synthesized Fe1.08Sb single crystals with Fei content close to the lower limit of solution area and investigated its transport and magnetic properties. The ac susceptibility and field dependence of magnetization measurements demonstrate that the transition at ∼9 K is a spin glass transition. By analyzing temperature dependence of susceptibility (χ vs T) and resistivity (d2ρ/dT2 vs T) results, we found a change of scattering in transport properties caused by the ordering of Fei moments in this compound. In addition, the Hall resistivity results reveal that the hole-type carrier is dominant and the topological Hall effect induced by spin chirality is negligible in Fe1.08Sb.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Monte Carlo simulation has been used to study the magnetic and thermodynamic properties of a ferrimagnetic mixed spin-1 and spin-3/2 Ising bilayer superlattice system on the honeycomb structure. The ground state phase diagrams of the system have been obtained for different single-ion anisotropies and exchange couplings. The system exhibits characteristic critical behaviors such as compensation points, the first- and second-order phase transition points as well as the tricritical points. The effects of the single-ion anisotropies and the exchange couplings on the magnetization, the susceptibility, the internal energy, the specific heat and the hysteresis loops are discussed in detail. Lots of interesting magnetic phenomena have been found, originating from the competitions among the anisotropies, the exchange couplings, the temperature and the external magnetic field. In particular, multiple cycle hysteresis loops behaviors such as the double and triple hysteresis loops have been discovered. Our results are in excellent agreement with previous theoretical studies.© 2018In order to improve the microstructure and sensing property for electrode material BiVO4 of potentiometric ammonia sensor, different MgO-doped (0, 1, 3, 5 and 8 at.%) BiVO4 powders were synthesized by solid-state reaction method. There is no significant difference in XRD spectrum for the different powders, but the particle size of the sensing electrode has an obvious refinement with the doping of MgO. The NH3 sensitivity of the sensor had a enhancement from 41.7 mV/decade to the highest value of 61.8 mV/decade when Mg-content reaches 5 at.%. The interfacial resistance Ri between the electrode and YSZ decreases with the increment of NH3 concentration and the Mg-doping based on impedance spectroscopy. The reduction of interface resistance is due to the enhancement of electrode reactions. The dopant MgO improves the conductivity of BiVO4 and the TPB area, and leads to a greater charge exchange rate for the electrode electrochemical reactions. The increased specific surface area due to the grain size refinement gets more NH3 involved in the reactions. This eventually leads to the increased sensitivity and decreased interface resistance. The optimal operating temperature is 600 °C based on the synthetical effects of various factors such as conductivity, the catalytic and gas adsorption performances of the sensing material.© 2018 Elsevier LtdEstimation of threshold voltage VT variability for NWFETs has been computationally expensive due to lack of analytical models. Variability estimation of NWFET is essential to design the next generation logic circuits. Compared to any other process induced variabilities, Metal Gate Granularity (MGG) is of paramount importance due to its large impact on VT variability. Here, an analytical model is proposed to estimate VT variability caused by MGG. We extend our earlier FinFET based MGG model to a cylindrical NWFET by satisfying three additional requirements. First, the gate dielectric layer is replaced by Silicon of electro-statically equivalent thickness using long cylinder approximation; Second, metal grains in NWFETs satisfy periodic boundary condition in azimuthal direction; Third, electrostatics is analytically solved in cylindrical polar coordinates with gate boundary condition defined by MGG. We show that quantum effects only shift the mean of the VT distribution without significant impact on the variability estimated by our electrostatics-based model. The VT distribution estimated by our model matches TCAD simulations. The model quantitatively captures grain size dependence with σ(VT) with excellent accuracy (6%error) compared to stochastic 3D TCAD simulations, which is a significant improvement over the state-of- the-art model with fails to produce even a qualitative agreement. The proposed model is 63× faster compared to commercial TCAD simulations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work reports an investigation into the redispersibility of magnetorheological suspensions (MR suspensions) by testing the rheological properties of suspension sediment. By using a new freeze-sampling method, slices of sediment were taken from the bottom of the container with little changes on shear history which makes it possible to employ rheological measurement. Size distribution of particles contained in sediment was studied by a laser scattering method. Oscillatory and steady shear was employed to studying the rheological viscoelastic and flow behavior. Also, thixotropy and recovery behavior was also studied. The results obtained proved that redispersibility is a multifactor-dependent property which can be reflected from rheological responses of MR suspensions’ sediment. Hydrodynamic force and particle interaction which have significant influence on those properties were analyzed in this study. In addition, indexes correspond to different rheological properties were put forward to make a comparison quantitatively between traditional MR suspensions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Synthesis of stable temperature sensitive magnetic fluids that can be used in heat exchange devices having desired magnetic properties and tunable Curie temperature is quite challenging as their performance parameters are strongly correlated with preparation conditions of magnetic nanoparticles. In this article, we report size dependence of Curie temperature and saturation magnetization of Mn0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 (MZ4) nanoparticles synthesized by co-precipitation method by controlling the pH, reaction temperature and reaction time. As-synthesized MZ4 nanoparticles have tunable Curie temperature that ranges between 392 K and 665 K. These magnetic nanoparticles are well suited for cooling applications in energy conversion electronic devices as their Curie temperatures are close to the working temperature of these devices. The observed tunability of Curie temperature and magnetization of MZ4 nanoparticles are analysed in terms of the corresponding changes in the magnetic particle size and distribution of Mn ions between tetrahedral (A-site) and octahedral (B-site) in an inverse spinel structure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The synthesis and characterization of ytterbium (Yb3+) and erbium (Er3+) co–doped Fe3O4 nanoparticles (NPs) was reported for the first time in this work. A set of samples with fixed Er3+ (1 mol%) and different Yb3+concentrations (1, 10, 20 and 50 mol%) were prepared and systematically characterized to study their structural, magnetic, thermal and optical properties. The superparamagnetic behavior of Fe3O4 and Yb3+ and Er3+co–doped Fe3O4 NPs was verified by the hysteresis loop. The co–doped Fe3O4 NPs also presented an upconversion emission in the green and red region. The Fe3O4 and Fe3O4: Yb3+, Er3+ NPs showed hyperthermic behavior for an externally applied AC magnetic field, observing that the introduction of Yb3+ and Er3+ induced a temperature increase of 34.4% in optimal conditions with respect to the non–doped Fe3O4 with a reduction in saturation magnetization of 7.8%. These observations suggest that Fe3O4: Yb3+, Er3+ NPs turns out to be an important candidate in biomedical applications for simultaneous optical imaging and hyperthermic therapy.© 2018Fe2CoSn Heusler alloy nanowires (NWs) were synthesized for the first time through alternating current (A.C) electrodeposition due to its manufacturing and size tailoring ease. To approach our desired goal, deposition potential was used to control the alloy composition of Fe, Co and Sn contents as it was almost inversely proportional to the composition ratio of Sn and (Fe, Co). The effects of deposition potential on morphology, chemical composition, crystal structure and electric/magnetic properties were investigated. According to the scanning electron microscopy (SEM) micrographs, the Fe2CoSn NWs exhibited diameter of about 40–60 nm range and the length existing in the range of 15 µm. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns reveal that two types of reflection were observed i.e. fundamental (A2-type crystal structure) and super-lattice (L21 crystal structure) reflection. Almost 35 nm was the average grain size calculated through XRD technique using full width half maximum (FWHM). The composition of Fe2CoSn nanowires has been confirmed by using EDX analysis, whereas surface chemistry of Heusler alloy (Fe2CoSn) NWs was examined through FTIR. Magnetic measurement indicated that Fe2CoSn Heusler alloy was ferromagnetic at room temperature with a maximum coercivity of 484 Oe at 17 V. Two probe (I-V) curve showed non-ohmic character and Hall measurement (Four probe) revealed the inverse relation between resistivity (ρ), mobility (µ) and followed excellent transport as well as spin dependent properties of Heusler alloy (Fe2CoSn) NWs. Half metallicity in (Fe2CoSn) Heusler alloy NWs was confirmed by full potential lineralized augmented plane wave methods (FP-LAPW) within density functional theory (DFT) in detail. These results revealed that Heusler alloy (Fe2CoSn) NWs have wide range of multifunctional properties such as combination of magnetism and exceptional transport properties in spintronic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.SrRuO3 presents a rare example of ferromagnetism among the 4d based oxides. While the nature of magnetic state in SrRuO3 is mostly believed to be of itinerant type, recent studies suggest a coexistence of both itinerant and localized model of magnetism in this material. Here, we have investigated the evolution of magnetic state in doped SrRu1-xTixO3 through studying the critical behavior using standard techniques such as, modified Arrott plot, Kouvel-Fisher plot and critical isotherm analysis across the magnetic transition temperature Tc. The substitution of nonmagnetic Ti4+ (3d0) for Ru4+ (4d4) would simply dilute the magnetic system apart from modifying the electron correlation effect and the density of states at Fermi level. Surprisingly, Tc does not change with x. Moreover, our analysis show the exponent β related to spontaneous magnetization increases while the exponents γ and δ related to initial inverse susceptibility and critical magnetization, respectively decrease with Ti substitution. The estimated exponents do not match with any established theoretical models for universality classes, however, the exponent obey the Widom relation and the scaling behavior. Interestingly, this particular evolution of exponents in present series has similarity with that in isoelectronic doped Sr1-xCaxRuO3. We believe that site dilution by Ti leads to formation magnetic clusters which causes this specific changes in critical exponents.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study the efficiency of the magnetoimpedance (MI) of thin-walled circumferentially-ordered nanotubes in sub-GHz and GHz frequency regimes, using micromagnetic simulations. We consider empty ferromagnetic tubes as well as tubes filled with non-magnetic conductors of circular cross-section (nanowire coverings), focusing on the low-field regime of MI (below a characteristic field of the low-frequency ferromagnetic resonance). In this field area, the efficient mechanism of MI is related to oscillations of the positions of (perpendicular to the tube axis) domain walls (DWs). Two mechanisms of driving the DW motion with the AC current are taken into account; the driving via the Oersted field and via the spin-transfer torque. The simulations are performed for Co nanotubes of the diameter of 300 nm. Achievable low-field MI exceeds 100%, while the field region of a high sensitivity of that DW-based giant MI is of the width of tens of kA/m. The later is widely adjustable with changing the density of the driving AC current, its frequency, and the nanotube length. Of particular interest is the resonant motion of DW due to the interaction with the nanotube ends, the conditions of whom are discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A comparative study of the magnetic properties (magnetic moment, magnetocrystalline anisotropy) and hyperthermia response in Co-Zn spinel nanoparticles is presented. The CoxZn1− xFe2O4 nanoparticles (x = 1, 0.5, 0.4, 0.3, 0.2 and 0.1) were synthesized by co-precipitated method and the morphology and mean crystallite size (around 10 nm) of the nanoparticles were analysed by TEM Microscopy. Regarding the magnetic characterization (SQUID magnetometry), Co-Zn nanoparticles display at room temperature anhysteretic magnetization curves, characteristic of the superparamagnetic behavior. A decrease in the blocking temperature, TB, with Zn content is experimentally detected that can be ascribed to the reduction in the mean nanoparticle size as x decreases. Furthermore, the reduction in the magnetocrystalline anisotropy with Zn inclusion is confirmed through the analysis of TB versus the mean volume of the nanoparticles and the law of approach to saturation. Maximum magnetization is achieved for x = 0.5 as a result of the cation distribution between octahedral and tetrahedral spinel sites, analysed by neutron diffraction studies. The occurrence of a canted spin arrangement (Yafet-Kittel angle) is introduced to properly fit the magnetic spinel structures. Finally, the heating capacity of these spinel ferrites is analyzed under ac magnetic field (magnetic hyperthermia). Maximum SAR (Specific Absorption Rate) values are achieved for x = 0.5 that should be correlated to the maximum magnetic moment of this composition.© 2018 The AuthorsWe have studied the hydrogenation, structural and magnetic properties of nanocrystalline Pr2Co7Hx (0⩽x⩽10.8) hydrides.We attempted to observe hydrogen absorption - desorption phenomena and understand the evolution of microstructure from the nanocrystalline Pr2Co7 alloy to the full-hydride phase using X-ray diffraction along the P-C isotherm.Two plateaus were clearly observed during the absorption-desorption process in the P-C isotherm.The crystal structure of Pr2Co7 compound transforms from hexagonal (P63/mmc) to orthorhombic (Pbcn) and monoclinic (C2/c) symmetry in hydrogenation.The absorption of hydrogen by Pr2Co7 compound leads to the enhancement of the Curie temperature TC from 600 K at x = 0 to 691 K at x = 3.75.Mean field theory was used to describe the magnetization curves M(T) of Pr2Co7Hx and deduce the exchange interactions Jij and Curie temperature.We have also applied the approach to saturation magnetization to our compounds.The results are discussed on the basis of the Random magnetic anisotropy modeling.The saturation magnetic moment μs increases from 8.32 to 14 μB/f.u with increasing H content from x = 0 to 2.5, then decreases.Similarly, the calculation of the anisotropy constant K1 reveals an increase from 5.24×107 to a maximum of 5.69×107 erg/cm3.The decrease of coercivity Hc and the maximum energy product(BH)max as a function H content could be mainly due to the decrease of magnetocrystalline anisotropy Hr resulting from the absorption of H. Therefore, it appears that the Pr2Co7H0.25 hydride has optimal magnetic properties: Hc = 0.61 T, (BH)max = 5.8 MGOe, Mr = 40 emu/g, remanence ratio Mr/Mmax = 0.62 and TC = 607 K. It follows from this that hydrogenation can be one of the effective means of raising the magnetic stiffness of materials for permanent magnets and magnetic recording.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) with nominal Fe18Ni82 composition were prepared by the electrophysical technique of the electrical explosion of wire. Although we were not able to experimentally estimate the magnetostriction coefficient for MNPs, this iron–nickel ratio is usually associated to close to zero magnetostriction. Different values of the overheating rate K between 0.9 and 2.0, where K is the ratio between the electrical energy ejected into the wire and the sublimation energy of Fe18Ni82 alloy, were used for the fabrication of the MNPs. Structural characterization (X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, low temperature nitrogen adsorption), magnetic and microwave measurements were used for the comparative analysis of the properties of MNPs. The increase of the overheating rate led to the increase of the specific surface value (Ssp) of the MNPs and the decrease of their average size. The fabricated MNPs were spherical in shape with a very high degree of sphericity and very weakly aggregated with the average weighted diameter in the range of 94–301 nm depending on the specific surface value for each batch. For 0.9 ≤ K ≤ 1.2 the MNPs were in the γ-phase, cubic (S.G: Fm-3 m) face-centered cubic lattice and very a small amount of material had a cubic Pm-3 m structure with lost symmetry. For 1.2 < K ≤ 2.0 they were single γ-phase, cubic (S.G: Fm-3 m) face cubic centered structure. Magnetic measurements and microwave absorption showed that the MNPs of all batches have high saturation magnetization and exhibit both microwave phenomena: significant zero field microwave absorption and resonant absorption in the vicinity of the ferromagnetic resonance field. Contrary to previous studies of FeNi MNPs with non-zero magnetostriction, the field for ferromagnetic resonance was very close to the one expected for MNPs with small contributions arising from magnetocrystalline anisotropy, strains and the deviations from sphericity. The magnetic and microwave characteristics in combination with a very high value of the single batch are promising for technological applications of these MNPs including the development of composites consisting of a polymer matrix filled with MNPs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Generating high actuation frequency (∼1.0 kHz) is one of the potential applications of Magnetic Shape Memory Alloys (MSMAs). In this work, dynamic responses of single crystal MSMAs due to variant reorientation are investigated. Time dependent part of the Maxwell equations becomes significant for a high frequency regime. Generation of an electric field and magnetic flux linkage due to the motion of the material points during deformation create a complex electro-magneto-mechanical coupling mechanism. We perform a thermodynamically consistent study to capture the variation of electromagnetic fields due to the deformation in the presence of fluctuating magnetic field, mainly focusing on eddy current and Joule heating. A comparison of MSMA responses with a typical ferromagnet/magnetostrictive material responses is discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A lattice of particles with dipolar magnetic moments is considered under the presence of quadratic Zeeman effect. Two types of this effect are taken into account, the effect due to an external nonresonant magnetic field and the effect caused by an alternating quasiresonance electromagnetic field. The presence of the alternating-field quadratic Zeeman effect makes it possible to efficiently vary the sample characteristics. The main attention is payed to the study of spin waves whose properties depend on the quadratic Zeeman effect. By varying the quadratic Zeeman-effect parameter it is possible to either suppress or stabilize spin waves.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principles electronic structure calculations based on density functional theory (DFT), we investigate the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of the layered ternary manganese tellurides: AMnTe2 (A = K, Rb, and Cs). Calculations are accomplished within the full-potential linearized augmented plane wave method (FP-LAPW) using the generalized gradient approximation GGA formalism for the exchange correlation term. We have treated all ferromagnetic, antiferromagnetic and non-magnetic phases and found that the ferromagnetic is the ground-state for all studied compounds. Moreover, all three compounds under study are half-metals with a total spin magnetic per formula unit of 4μB which is mainly localized at the Mn atoms. We express for these compounds a new version of the Slater-Pauling rule and discuss in detail the origin of the minority-spin gap. Finally, we have also calculated some other relevant quantities such as the bulk modulus B, the pressure derivative B’, the virtual semiconducting gap Eg, and the half-metallic gap EHM.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic materials have been investigated as emergent materials to application on new technologies, mainly BiFeO3 material, the most important multiferroic material actually. Others materials reported for multiferroic applications are NiTiO3 and NiPbO3. Therefore, we decide investigate a new series of materials from atoms with d0 and d10 orbitals to avoid magnetic coupling between [NiO6] and [BO6] clusters and to keep a high ferroelectric property. In this manuscript, a DFT/B3LYP investigation was employed to discuss new candidates to multiferroic materials based on NiBO3 (B = Ti, Ge, Zr, Sn, Hf and Pb) compounds in R3c structure. Our results describe as antiferromagnetic states as ferromagnetic states evidencing modifications very interesting on [NiO6] magnetic cluster from perturbation of t2g and eg degenerated energy levels controlled by chemical modifications in [BO6] clusters. The originality of our manuscript is the theoretical evidence that non-magnetic clusters can control the magnetic state of a material from perturbation on energy levels of the magnetic clusters. More amazing is these non-magnetic clusters are also responsible by a high spontaneous polarization naturally found in R3c structures. At end, the multiferroic effect in NiBO3 materials is clarified from coupling between magnetic and ferroelectric properties oriented along z and x directions, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Chromium substituted copper zinc ferrite of spinel crystal structure was synthesized in the form of nanoparticles using citrate nitrate combustion method. Phase composition, structure, magnetic and dielectric parameters were depicted by XRD, FTIR, HRTEM, VSM and dielectric measurements. Demeanor of magnetization has been elucidated on the basis of Neel's model of magnetic interactions and Yafet-Kittel angle existence. Dispersion of dielectric parameters proclaims the normal behavior of ferrites. Cole–Cole plot manifests the role of both grain boundary and bulk grain in conduction mechanism. The substitution of Cr3+ ions plays a decisive role in amending structural, magnetic and dielectric features of copper zinc nanoferrites. The optimum properties of the nanoferrite Cu0.8Zn0.2Cr0.02Fe1.98O4 make it primness for applications; especially data storage and magneto-electronic devices.© 2018Crystals of ludwigite Ni2.14Mn0.86BO5 were synthesized by flux growth technique. We show in the paper that it contains Mn3+ and Mn4+. A possible mechanism of the manganese valence states stabilization has been proposed. The structural and magnetic characterization of the synthesized samples has been carried out in detail. The cations composition and Mn valence states of the crystal were determined using X-ray diffraction and EXAFS technique. The comparative analysis was carried out between the studied crystal and Ni2MnBO5 synthesized previously. Magnetic susceptibility measurements were carried out. The magnetic transition in the studied composition occurs at the 100 K that is higher than in Ni2MnBO5 although the studied composition is more disordered. The calculations of the exchange integrals in the frameworks of indirect coupling model revealed strong antiferromagnetic interactions. The several magnetic subsystems existence hypothesis was supposed. The possible magnetic structure was suggested from the energies estimation for different ordering variants.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Strontium doped lanthanum cuprate perovskite-type nanostructures were synthesized by facile microwave assisted combustion method. The structural, optical, morphological, and magnetic properties were studied by using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), diffuse reflectance spectroscopy (DRS), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and energy dispersive X-ray analysis (EDX), photoluminescence (PL) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) techniques.The XRD patterns of pure La2CuO4 (LC) and La1.9Sr0.1CuO4 confirmed the formation of perovskite structure without impurities. However with the increase in Sr2+ content from (x = 0.2–0.5), phase transformation from orthorhombic to tetragonal structure, occurred. The average crystallite size of orthorhombic and tetragonal phases were in the range 39.6–47.4 nm and 22.3–88.0 nm, respectively. The presence of tensile strain in Sr2+ doped LC (LSC) was determined from Williamson–Hall (W–H) analysis. The appearance of FT-IR bands at around 688 and 521 cm-1 were correlated to the La-O and Cu-O stretching modes of orthorhombic La2CuO4 phase. The direct band gap estimated using Kubelka–Munk (K–M) method increased with increasing Sr2+ content (1.88–2.03 eV), due to quantum confinement. For LC and LSC, PL spectra showed emission bands in UV and visible regions, due to the defect centers acting as trap levels. The LSC system showed the formation of nanosized crystallized grains with pores and pore-walls due to fused grains. Magnetization–Field (M−H) hysteresis curves revealed the appearance of ferro-/para- magnetic behavior at room temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Microstructure and texture controlled 48Fe-52Co at% alloy was prepared by repeated cold-rolling and recrystallization through heat treatment at temperatures below order-disorder phase transformation using Fe and Co foils. Furthermore, distortion of controlled texture orientated cubic crystal structured 48Fe-52Co at% alloy along the 〈0 0 1〉 direction was attempted by introducing nitrogen interstitially through plasma nitriding. The textural analysis suggested that the microstructure is composed of micron-sized grains randomly aligned along rolling direction (RD). Furthermore, from the results of orientation distribution function (ODF), the dominance γ-fiber was confirmed in as-rolled samples. However, in recrystallized sample, the intensity of rotated-cube orientation increased while the presence of γ-fiber decreased. Furthermore, a complete rotated-cube orientation was realized in nitrided texture. The appearance of the prominent X-ray diffraction peak (2 0 0) in all samples indicated the presence of rotated-cube orientation. However, the FWHM of (2 0 0) peak of the nitrided sample was broader than the rest. This was attributed to the diffusion of nitrogen into the matrix during plasma nitriding and internal nitriding was confirmed from the EDX analysis. However, further investigation is necessary to understand the behavior of nitrogen. Magnetic properties of as-rolled 48Fe-52Co at% alloy inferred from in-plane magnetic hysteresis loops was similar Fe foil. Furthermore, magnetic properties of recrystallized and nitrided 48Fe-52Co at% alloy were different from Fe-Co particles or crushed bulk Fe-Co alloy prepared by arc melting. However, the internal diffusion of nitrogen was not adequate enough to bring about a considerable change in the magnetic properties. We believe that considerable crystal distortion to induce change in the magnetic properties can be exerted by introducing interstitial carbon and the addition of third or fourth elements.© 2018We study quantum phase transitions in the anisotropic Heisenberg model with a pseudodipolar interaction on the square lattice, at zero temperature, using the SU(3) Schwinger boson technique in a mean field approximation. We present the dispersion relation for several values of the parameters. When we take into account the effect of the next near neighbor interaction, the phase diagram, at zero temperature shows the existence of a region in the intermediate frustrated regime, even for zero anisotropy parameter, where the system is magnetically disordered. A prediction of our model is the existence of a finite gap in this region.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The ability of metal-doped magnetite (Fe3O4) thin films to resist oxidation during annealing in air was investigated. The films were prepared on glass substrates by radio-frequency sputtering using a target of metal chips set on a ceramic Fe3O4 disk. The metal elements used in this study were Ge, Mo, W, and Mg. The films were annealed at different temperatures in air and the activation energy of oxidation was estimated. The Ge-doped film was high stable against oxidation with an activation energy of 490 KJ/mol, which was 2.5 times larger than that of undoped film. Elemental mapping using energy dispersive X-ray microscopy (EDX) and selected area electron diffraction (SAED) revealed that the Ge-doped Fe3O4 film was composed of a heterostructure that consisted of α-Fe2O3 and Fe3O4 containing small amount of Ge.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanocomposite of BaTiO3 (BTO) and CoFe2O4 (CFO) exhibits magnetism which can be explained by assuming the surface interaction between BTO and CFO. The crystal phase of the nanocomposite has been studied by the X-ray diffraction (XRD) technique which has been supported by the Raman spectra analysis. Surface morphology has been studied using SEM (scanning electron microscopy) and TEM (Transmission electron microscopy). The ball milling has transformed diamagnetic microcrystalline of BTO to nanocrystal ferromagnetic BTO which could be due to oxygen vacancies at the surface of BTO. Thus there has been ferromagnetic exchange interaction between nanocrystalline BTO and CFO at their interfaces which ultimately affect the spin arrangement at the surface of CFO. This interaction leads to high saturation magnetization. A hump in the M–H loop at around ±4000 Oe has been observed for the BTO-CFO composites. It changes its shape with the increase in concentration of CFO. It is probably due to increase of superexchange interaction between CFO and BTO at the interface.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report detailed magnetic and magnetocaloric studies of a self-doped composition Mn0.9Ni1.1Ge in ambient as well as in high pressure situation. The alloy undergoes martensitic phase transition (MPT) around the room temperature and orders antiferromagnetically below 200 K. Room temperature structural analysis indicates clear signature of co-existing hexagonal and orthorhombic phases. Application of external hydrostatic pressure (P) results in a shift in the martensitic transition temperature towards the lower value. A significantly large magnetocaloric effect (MCE) around the MPT (ΔS=-6.1 J/kg-K at 295 K and −6.11 J/kg-K at 282 K during heating and cooling respectively for H changing from 0 → 50 kOe) has also been observed. The magnitude of MCE is hardly affected by the application of external P.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.For many applications of steel, e.g. for the evaluation of the fatigue state of components or structures, the characterization of the microscopic strain distribution in the material is important. We present a proof-of-principle for the visualization of such strain distributions by Kerr-microscopy of ferromagnetic tracer layers on nonmagnetic steel sheets. The influence of indentation induced strain on the magnetic domain pattern of 20 nm Galfenol and Permalloy tracer layers on austenitic AISI 904L steel sheets was investigated. The obtained Kerr-microscopy images show a characteristic domain pattern in the strained regions of the steel sheets, which is consistent with a dominant magneto-elastic contribution to the domain pattern formation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Biomedical application of magnetic nanoparticles is a rapidly growing research field. For medical diagnostic purposes, these nanoparticles are mostly used as imaging contrast agents. Magneto-motive ultrasound (MMUS) is an example of imaging techniques where superparamagnetic nanoparticles are used as contrast agent. Since it is a relatively new technique, much research is yet in progress to optimize the magnetic properties of these contrast agents. In this study, Zn-substituted magnetic (nominal composition ZnxFe1−xFe2O4, x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3 and 0.4) nanoparticles with aim of enhancing the saturation magnetization were successfully synthesized by the coprecipitation method. The effect of zinc on morphology, structure and magnetic properties of the prepared nanoparticles was studied and their potential for MMUS imaging was investigated. X-Ray diffraction results showed that all samples had spinel structure and incorporating zinc in magnetite structure led to an increase in its lattice parameter, on the other hand TEM images revealed that particle size was decreased with zinc concentration. EDX analysis of the samples confirmed the incorporation of zinc in magnetite structure with a relatively good agreement with nominal values. Low, room and high temperature magnetic properties of the samples were investigated using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Room temperature M-H curves along with zero-field-cooling measurements showed all samples were superparamagnetic and saturation magnetization at x = 0.1 zinc concentration increased drastically. All prepared samples were examined as contrast agents in MMUS imaging and the results confirmed the direct role of magnetization in enhancement of MMUS signals.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Gd70Y30− xFex (x = 0, 10 and 20) ribbon alloys were prepared by single-roller melt spinning method. The results show that all samples are single phase and crystallize with a hexagonal structure. The magnetic entropy change at 5 T are 8.8, 8.1 and 5.7 J·kg−1·K−1 near the Curie temperature of 277 K, 283 K and 291 K for Gd70Y30− xFex alloys with x = 0, 10 and 20, respectively. Furthermore, the values of full width at half maximum and refrigeration capacity under applied field 5 T increase by 55% and 6% compared with pure Gd respectively. The obtained spontaneous magnetization and adiabatic temperature (Δ2T) are 238, 241, 197 emu/g and 4.0, 3.5, 2.4 K for samples with x = 0, 10, and 20, respectively. The Arrott plots and universal curve are employed to investigate the magnetic phase transition, showing all samples undergo a second order ferro-paramagnetic phase transition. The results indicate that Gd70Y30− xFex alloys with large magnetocaloric effect and wide temperature span are a good candidate for room temperature magnetic refrigeration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The paper considers the results of measuring the electrodynamic parameters of a material based on barium hexaferrite with various degrees of substitution Ti(x) = 0; 0.25; 0.5; 1.0. The calculated dependences of dielectric permittivity and permeability obtained by measuring the powder material using the coaxial transmission line segment are presented.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recently has been observed for some one-dimensional models that exhibit unexpected pseudo-transitions and quasi-phases. This pseudo-transition resembles a first- and second-order phase transition simultaneously. One of those models is the spin-1/2 Ising-XYZ diamond chain, composed of Ising spin particles at the nodal sites and the Heisenberg spin particles at the interstitial sites. Where we assume Ising-type interaction between the nodal and interstitial sites, the Heisenberg-type interaction between interstitial sites, and with an external magnetic field applied along the z-axis. This model presents an exact analytical solution applying the transfer matrix technique, which shows 3 phases at zero temperature in the vicinity of pseudo-transition. The pseudo-transition separates quasi-phases, these quasi-phases still hold at a finite temperature most of the pattern configurations of a true phase at zero temperature. Here we study the quantum entanglement of pair spin particles in the quasi-phase regions, which can be measured through the concurrence. Then we observe an unexpected behavior in the concurrence, that is below pseudo-critical temperature the concurrence remains almost constant up to pseudo-critical temperature, but above the pseudo-critical temperature, the concurrence behaves as for the standard one-dimensional spin models. Further, we consider the entropy behavior of the system, below pseudo-critical temperature the entropy becomes almost null, while above pseudo-critical temperature the system exhibits standard behavior as for ordinary one-dimensional spin models.© 2018The paper overviews experimental and theoretical studies of photogalvanic effects induced in BiSbTe-based three dimensional topological insulators by polarized terahertz radiation. We present the state-of-the-art of this subject, including most recent and well-established results. We discuss a phenomenological theory based on symmetry arguments and models illustrating the photocurrents origin. We give a brief glimpse of the underlying microscopic theory, as well as an overview of the main experimental results.© 2018 Elsevier LtdAlthough metallic nanostructures in solar cells provide versatility in designing useful plasmonic architectures, understanding is still limited on how to exploit their multi-scale contribution as tunable performance. In this article, we suggest a characteristic model that develops into a simple and robust tool for guiding optimization of plasmonic solar devices. The model is conceptually based on the breakdown of the active region into intrinsic and plasmonic sub-circuits, by which the terminal currents are directly correlated with particle geometries and local improvement. Measurements from organic cells support the validity of our theory, and a series of simulation provides further insights into the critical trade-off between voltage and current generation, finally offering a strategy for efficiency enhancement.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the structural, optical, dielectric and magnetic properties of Bi1−xLaxFeO3 nanoparticles (x = 0.50 and 0.75) have been investigated at room temperature. Structural analysis indicated the coexistence of orthorhombic (Pbnm) and rhombohedral (R3c) phases. UV–visible absorption spectra of the samples exhibit two doubly degenerate d-d transitions and three charge transfer transitions. Using diffused reflectance UV–Vis spectra, the direct and indirect band gaps of the samples decreases with increasing La content. The dielectric constant (ε) of the samples in the microwave region exhibited an anomalous phenomenon at room temperature. Magnetic hysteresis loops (M−H) of the samples exhibit weak ferromagnetism and an antiferromagnetic order. Additionally, the exchange bias effect was observed in these samples at room temperature. These results demonstrate that the method presented may be considered an effective way to improve the magnetic and optical properties of Bi1−xLaxFeO3.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of new multiferroic BiFe0.5Sc0.5O3 perovskite which exists in two different orthorhombic polymorphs, the antipolar Pnma and the polar Ima2, were studied using a SQUID-magnetometer technique in magnetic fields up to 50 kOe in the temperature range of 5–300 K. Both polymorphs show a weak ferromagnetic component below the Néel temperature, TN∼220 K. A wide cusp-like anomaly of the temperature dependent magnetic susceptibility was revealed below 200 K. The anomaly is dependent on the magnetic field applied and can be associated with the glassy magnetic behavior of the compound. The best fit of the initial magnetization curves taken at each temperature can be obtained as a sum of two contributions, namely the nonlinear in field and the linear one. The nonlinear contribution appeared to be temperature and magnetic field dependent, which is in a good agreement with the magnetization experimentally obtained as a function of temperature in different magnetic fields applied. Increase of external magnetic field leads to a decrease of the nonlinear contribution to the total magnetic moment.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Ag/copper oxide film/Nb:SrTiO3/Ag device exhibits the resistive switching accompanied with the electric field control of ferromagnetism. The ferromagnetism could also be modulated by ultraviolet and violet light with certain frequency at room temperature. The bipolar resistive switching in Ag/copper oxide film/Nb:SrTiO3/Ag device may depend on the change in a Schottky-like barrier height. In the same saturation current, we can change the sweeping voltage to get a different resistance change ratio. The changes of sweeping voltage will affect the Schottky-like barrier height, resulting in the resistance switching. The accompanying electric field control of ferromagnetism is mainly from the changes in the amount of oxygen vacancies in copper oxide film when the resistance state changes. The light-modulated ferromagnetism may be due to the enhancement of indirect double exchange. The capture of photo-generated holes by Cu+ may lead to changes in valence of some Cu ions, affecting the indirect double exchange. Through the resistive switching and ferromagnetism modulation in this report, it is possible to achieve the multi-state memory in future work.© 2018Considering the strong correlation between 4f electrons in the rare earths has major effect on the calculated electronic and magnetic properties of compounds including rare earths, as neglecting this strong correlation in density functional theory (DFT) leads to the failing DFT for a proper description of mentioned properties. In this study, to consider the strong correlation between 4f electrons in Dy atom of DyFeSi compound, local Coulomb repulsion between 4f electrons, U, are treated both statically as in the LDA + U approximation and dynamically as in the dynamical mean-field theory in the Hubbard-I approximation (LDA + DMFT[HI]). In this regards, we apply first principle density functional calculation by using full potential linear muffin-tin orbital (FP-LMTO) method to present a comparative study between the calculated electronic and magnetic properties of DyFeSi within LDA + U and LDA + DMFT[HI] approaches and show that the LDA + DMFT[HI] approach presents so much better results compared to the LDA + U approach. In the magnetic properties we find that the calculation within LDA + DMFT[HI] reproduces the Dy magnetic moments in accordance to the observations and standard model of rare earth with the best accuracy. In the electronic properties we show that LDA + U just produces narrow energy bands of 4f-electrons and it is not able to produce atomic multiples features of 4f valance bands, while LDA + DMFT[HI] approach shows peaks caused by the formation of atomic multiples of the Dy atoms in DyFeSi compound.© 2018We propose a theoretical method based on Green's function technique within the tight-binding approach to consider the spin-dependent electronic conductance of a lengthy ladder-like magnetic nanoribbon. A part of this nanoribbon which is located in the middle is presumed to be different from other ideal parts. We utilize a unitary transformation to separate conductance modes in the ideal parts in order to insert them effectively by fully analytical self-energies in the middle part of Green's function. Finally, the model is examined to perform numerical calculation for some proposed configurations. The model can aid our understanding and design of the spin-filtering electronic narrow nanoribbons.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe propose a specialized gate-drain separation structure for use in investigation of the dynamic behavior of the thermal transport characteristics in AlGaN/AlN/GaN heterojunction transistors. Using this structure, the influence of the two-dimensional electron gas (2DEG) on the horizontal heat transfer in these transistors was identified experimentally. A temperature delay (i.e., the difference in temperature at the same time) of 1.3 °C, which accounts for 8.6% of the total temperature rise, was calculated to be caused by a 0.3 μm × 150 μm 2DEG depleted region. In addition, the temperature transients show that the 2DEG can accelerate the temperature to the steady state. Infrared measurements were also carried out to benchmark the results. In particular, the sample structure allows the measurement of a complete thermal process that includes both heating and cooling without interruption. Based on a comparison of the two processes, we demonstrated and corrected an error in the temperature rise that occurred when the Schottky junction voltage was used as the temperature-sensitive parameter.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effects (MCE) of α-Tb2S3 and α-Dy2S3 single crystals exhibiting successive antiferromagnetic (AFM) transitions have been investigated by analyzing specific heat measured in magnetic field. The temperature dependence of specific heat in the vicinity of the successive transitions shows obvious distinction depending on the orientations of the applied magnetic field for both α-Tb2S3 and α-Dy2S3 that having orthorhombic crystal structures. When the magnetic field is increased, the specific heat is as follows: For α-Tb2S3 in H‖b, the peak around TN2 shifts to lower temperature but the other one peak around TN1 barely moves; In H⊥b, the peak around TN2 has no shift almost within 3 T but suddenly moves to lower temperature in 4 T and the other one peak around TN1 shifts to lower temperature in specific heat versus temperature. In the case of α-Dy2S3, the two peaks around TN2 and TN1 shift to lower temperatures in H‖b but move to higher temperatures when the magnetic field is increased up to 5 T by H⊥b in spite of antiferromagnetic transitions. Therefore, the maximum value and corresponding temperature of both isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) and adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) in the magnetic field H⊥b are extremely different in low temperature range from that in the field of H‖b. The results propone that the MCE of α-Tb2S3 and α-Dy2S3 could be controlled at low temperature by the magnitude and orientation of magnetic field. It also indicates that the refrigerating capacity and thermal absorption capacity will be controlled by changing magnitude and orientation of magnetic field on the α-Tb2S3 and α-Dy2S3 single crystals.© 2018 Elsevier LtdDetailed analysis of device behaviour on the zero-temperature coefficient (ZTC) points for microwave GaAs based high-electron mobility transistor is presented by means of on-wafer measurements over the temperatures between −40 and 150 °C. This zero temperature coefficient points found not only in the transfer and transconductance curve but also in intrinsic transconductance gmo, output conductance gds, small signal gain S21, and minimum noise figure NFmin also exhibits ZTC. It is found that the zero temperature coefficients points are impacted by both threshold voltage and drain bias. The transfer current base, ZTCIds moved from 0.1 V to −0.2 V of Vgs trace and transconductance based, ZTCgm moved from −0.3 V to −0.6 V of Vgs trace with the drain bias, Vds varies from 1 V to 5 V. The behaviour of some intrinsic equivalent circuit parameters along with cut-off frequency, ft at both ZTC bias points opens some crucial insight and opportunities in microwave device design for low and high temperature applications.© 2018 Elsevier LtdCurrent-voltage (I-V) properties of indium-tin-oxide/Ag nanoparticles embedded in polyurethane film/Al devices exhibited a current bistability with ON/OFF ratio within the range of 105–103 with the variation of voltage from −0.85 to 3.95 V, which was nearly 102 larger than that for the device without Ag nanoparticles. The memory margin was obviously enlarged due to the existence of the Ag nanoparticles embedded in the polyurethane layer. I-V properties and write-read-erase-read voltage cycles test indicated the flash resistive switching properties. The data retention time reach up to 1.8 × 104 s, which manifested the stability of the memory devices. I-V property at ON state was attributed to the drift mechanism, and the property at OFF state was related to the space-charge-limited-current behaviors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Thermoelectric effects of CoFeB/MgO/InP/MgO/CoFeB double-barrier magnetic tunnel junctions (DBMTJs) are presented in the linear response regime. The nonequilibrium Green's function (NEGF) formalism is used within the effective mass approximation. There are descriptions of temperature and angular dependence for thermoelectric properties. The results show an enhancement in the DBMTJs thermoelectric compared to single-barrier MTJs due to the resonant tunneling effect through the DBMTJs. It is also found that the Seebeck coefficients may be increase in asymmetric DBMTJs. Effects of the temperature and magnetization alignments on the spin-dependent Seebeck coefficients are also described. Finally, the Seebeck coefficients are investigated considering the Rashba spin-orbit coupling at the insulator/semiconductor interfaces.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.On the basis of the grain boundary additive of Nd65Ni35 alloy with the melting temperature of 535 °C and different annealing treatment at 500 °C, 590 °C and 680 °C, respectively, a series of Nd-Fe-B based magnets with different grain boundary fine structures were produced. Their corrosion resistance is found strongly dependent on the grain boundary fine structure. A Ni-rich layer/Nd-rich layer/Ni-rich layer sandwich-structured grain boundary, in particular, contributes to the optimal anti-corrosion performance and magnetic properties for the magnet annealed at 590 °C. The results suggest that more anti-corrosive Nd-Fe-B based magnets could be fabricated by tuning their grain boundary fine structure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline [90 wt% Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 (NBT) – 10 wt% BaFe12O19 (BaM)] nanocomposite system has been fabricated with the help of solid state reaction method. The Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction (XRD) pattern and Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) have been provided the information about the pure phase formation and grain size of desired composite system. Microstructural electric and magnetic transport properties have been carried by complex impedance spectroscopic technique. From electric transport properties it is interestingly observed that, the system has shown double positive temperature coefficient of resistance (PTCR) behaviour due to different transport mechanism of BaM-NBT and NBT-NBT interfaces in different temperature ranges. Magnetoimpedance study has been revealed the negative magnetoresistance [MR (%)] behaviour of both the interfaces. From magnetotransport properties of this nanocomposite system it is explored that BaM-NBT interfaces obey the small polaron tunnelling where NBT-NBT interfaces obey the over lapping large polaron tunneling mechanism for charge transportation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, a magnetoelastic sensor (ME) without any coating was used to detect Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) for the first time in the literature. An amorphous 2605S3A (Fe77Cr2Si5B16) ribbon was used as an ME sensor, and samples were annealed in a furnace at 360 °C for 20 min to improve the ME response. A frequency shift of about 320 Hz was observed at 440 A/m magnetic field with the drop of 20 µl MNPs on the surface of an amorphous ribbon. MNPs of 10, 5, and 1 µl were dripped onto the surface of the ribbon and frequency shifts of about 220, 100, and 15 Hz, respectively, were obtained. The minimum number of MNPs was measured to be about 1.1 × 109, which corresponds to 0.025 mg or 1 µl of MNPs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite nanoparticles (d ∼ 11 nm, σd = 0.5) produced by coprecipitation at room temperature are heat treated up to 1000 °C after a preliminary dispersion in a sol-gel silica matrix to avoid aggregation and coarsening. This protected annealing allows for a significant increase of the crystallinity of the particles, as demonstrated by combined x-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy experiments. A large increase in the coercive field value is reported, from 1.0 to 1.6 Tesla after annealing at 600 °C. This enhanced coercivity can be explained by the cumulative effect of an increased magnetic anisotropy and of a decreased saturation magnetization (Ms). Mössbauer spectroscopy experiments show that these evolutions of the Ms and anisotropy constant (K) values originate from a small increase in canting angles and in inversion degree, i.e. a displacement of Co2+ ions from tetrahedral to octahedral sites of the spinel lattice. This study emphasizes the little impact of an improved crystallinity on saturation magnetization and canting angle values in coprecipitated CoFe2O4 nanoparticles and highlights that the main source of magnetic disorder is associated with the distribution of Co and Fe within the cationic sites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The influence of the nanoscale thicknesses of the ferrimagnetic Tb-Co layers on the structure and magnetic properties of magnetron sputtered Tb-Co/Ti and Tb-Co/Al2O3 magnetic multilayers were comparatively studied. Low angle X-ray diffraction patterns testified to the existence of a well defined layered structure in all the cases under consideration. For all samples, the magnetization was positioned in the plane of the films in the entire investigated temperature interval from 5 to 350 K. The temperature dependence of magnetization of the multilayered structures is the function of the Tb-Co layer thickness. The material of the spacers was shown to significantly influence the magnetic properties of the multilayers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.An equiatomic CrFeMnNiTi high entropy alloy (HEA) was synthesized through mechanical alloying (MA) technique. The synthesized HEA consists of FCC, BCC and a minor σ-phase. In order to investigate the phase evolution and magnetic characteristics, the synthesized HEA was annealed under different conditions (vacuum and open air) at two different temperatures (500 and 700 °C). After vacuum annealing at 500 and 700 °C the volume fraction of FCC and BCC phases are changed. However, after open air annealing, the volume fraction of synthesized phases (FCC and BCC) is altered effectively along with the formation of an oxide (Mn2O3) and a spinel type (Fe,Ti)3O4 phase. The synthesized sample exhibits ferromagnetic characteristic and the value of saturation magnetization (Ms) and coercivity (Hc) are found to be 13.39 emu/g (A-m2/kg) and 162.2Oe (12.9 × 103 A/m) respectively. After annealing in vacuum and open air at 700 °C the value of Ms. is found to be 2.95 and 11.63 emu/g (A-m2/kg) respectively. Open air annealed sample at 500 °C shows better magnetic characteristics with Ms = 32.85 emu/g (A-m2/kg) and Hc = 159.34Oe (12.67 × 103 A/m) as compared to the synthesized and annealed samples. The enhanced value of Ms for open air annealed HEA at 500 °C corresponds to increase in the volume fraction of BCC phase and the formation of Mn2O3 and (Fe,Ti)3O4 spinel phase. The effect of annealing conditions on the phase formation and their correlation with magnetic characteristic are discussed and described in detail.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe demonstrated an Au-free ohmic contact for un-doped AlGaN/GaN HEMTs with Ti/Al/Ti/TiW metal structure. The Au-free ohmic contact was fabricated by pre-ohmic recess etching and low annealing temperature. The contact characteristics of the Ti/Al/Ti/TiW Au-free ohmic contacts including current-voltage, contact resistivity, and microstructure are systematically investigated. The contact resistivity of Ti/Al/Ti/TiW ohmic contact with 22-nm recessed depth and 600 °C annealing temperature is 5.44 × 10−5 Ω⋅cm2, which is comparable with conventional Ti/Al/Ni/Au ohmic contact. In addition, the Ti/Al/Ti/TiW ohmic contact shows smooth surface morphology with an excellent surface roughness of 3.69 nm. Besides, AlGaN/GaN MISHEMTs based on Ti/Al/Ti/TiW Au-free low temperature ohmic contacts were fabricated and exhibited good DC characteristics. The reported Au-free AlGaN/GaN HEMT fabrication process can be used in standard Si fabs without the risk of contamination.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A colloidal ferrofluid (FF) with superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION) has been investigated for the AC breakdown strength during the accelerated thermal aging test. Three volume concentrations of a transformer oil based FF were subjected to the accelerated thermal tests at the temperature 90 °C. AC breakdown strength (BDS) tests were carried out every 200 h period for up to 600 h. The breakdown probabilities were calculated according Weibull distribution function. Measured BDS populations were compared with a base carrier oil. The BDS median of the clear carrier oil has been observed to fall down 1.54 times, however for particular FF samples it dropped 2.31, 2.90 and 3.63 times, respectively, when comparing properties of the samples before testing with the samples after aging. Final BDS probability distributions show that the dielectrics withstand voltage of FF became lower than that of the carrier oil. The long-term thermal load of the particular FF is critical for its colloidal stability, which is deduced to be the main reason of such a significant BDS reduction. The impact of the thermal aging on the AC magnetic susceptibility is briefly documented, too.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The design of a magnetic field source that can switch from a high field to a low field configuration by rotation by 90° of a set of iron pieces is investigated using topology optimization. A Halbach cylinder is considered as the magnetic field source and iron inserts are placed in the air gap of the Halbach cylinder. The ideal shape of these iron inserts is determined as function of the field generated by the Halbach cylinder and as function of the size of the iron segments. The topology optimized structures are parabolic shaped pieces and have a difference in flux density between the high and low positions that is on average 1.29 times higher than optimized regular pole pieces. The maximum increase is a factor of 2.08 times higher than the regular pole pieces.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Undoped and rare earth substituted manganese ferrite (MF) nanoparticles, Mn0.9R0.1Fe2O4 (where R = Nd, Pr, Eu and Gd) were synthesized by sol–gel technique. The structural, morphological and magnetic properties of the as-synthesized samples were determined and characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy (FTIR), Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) and Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM). The XRD spectra reveal the formation of the single-phase cubic spinel structure. The average crystallite size evaluated from XRD data was found to be in the range of 8.19–21.4 nm and is consistent with the results of TEM. In addition, lattice parameter is found to increase with the rare earth (Pr, Nd, Eu, and Gd) substitution. DC electrical resistivity as a function of temperature was studied by using two-probe technique and found to decrease with increase in temperature which reveals the semiconducting nature of the samples. Simultaneously, the optical analysis shows significant decreases in band gap energy with rare earth content and ranging from 2.03 to 1.73 eV. It is also seen that rare earth substituted manganese ferrites show soft ferrimagnetic behavior and saturation magnetization decreases with the substitution of rare earths. Because of the soft ferrimagnetic behavior, samples have expected application in magnetic hyperthermia for cancer therapy and various other applications.© 2018We present the study of transport properties of a superconducting wire with strong Rashba spin-orbit coupling for different orientations of an external magnetic field. Using the nonequilibrium Green's functions in the tight-binding approach the crucial impact of the relative alignment of lead magnetization and the Majorana bound state (MBS) spin polarization on the low-bias conductance and shot noise is presented. Depending on this factor the transport regime can effectively vary from symmetric to extremely asymmetric. In the last situation the suppression of MBS-assisted conductance results in current-switch effect allowing the electrical detection of the Majorana fermions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The present study investigates the magnetic properties of single crystal rutile TiO2 (110) implanted with cobalt ions for fluences between 5 × 1016 and 1 × 1017 ions/cm2 with energy of 200 keV. The temperature and field dependent magnetization for magnetic fields along [0 0 1] and [11¯0] directions of the as implanted TiO2 crystals show anisotropic super-paramagnetic behaviour due to formation of Co (hcp) nano-clusters unlike the complete ferromagnetic behaviour from previous reports. The ZFC and FC magnetization curves show a much higher blocking temperature (TB) along [11¯0] with values ranging from 30 to 150 K, while for field along [0 0 1] shows a lower TB ranging from 8 to 70 K. The magnetization isotherms above TB show a sharper rise and universal scaling behaviour, for field along [11¯0] direction. At 2 K, M - H curves show hysteresis behaviour similar of easy and hard axis of a ferromagnet. The magnetic anisotropy of Co nano clusters are coupled by the magneto crystalline anisotropy of secondary phases of cobalt with TiO2, thus indicating the highly oriented nature of the Co clusters. Role of dipole interactions and inter cluster exchange interactions have also been discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.An iron nanowire encapsulated in carbon nanotubes doped with copper (Fe@CuCNTs) can be described as anisotropic Ising model. General formulas of the magnetization and the magnetic susceptibility for the system are calculated based on the effective field theory with correlations (EFT). The effects of the exchange coupling, the anisotropy and the external magnetic field on the magnetic properties of the system have been discussed. The structure index N of armchair carbon nanotube plays an important role in magnetization, susceptibility, blocking temperature and hysteresis loop for the system. This system maybe has potential applications in information recording and spintronics.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the observation of the asymmetric shift of exchange bias loop in Ni-Ni(OH)2 core-shell nanoparticles where the average size of the ferromagnetic (FM) Ni nanoparticles is ∼30 nm and the thickness of antiferromagnetic (AFM) Ni(OH)2 shell is ∼5 nm. The exchange bias (EB) found below Néel temperature (TN ∼ 22 K) of Ni(OH)2 is path dependent, while the coercivity (HC) increases and decreases for positive and negative bias field respectively. In the present case, we found that the inversion symmetry of hysteresis loop is broken and the shift in EB loop is only observed in descending part of the hysteresis loop, which is conspicuous. We demonstrate that the asymmetric shift of EBs in these core-shell nanoparticles is due to the presence of frustrated super spin glass (SSG) at the interface which influences the reversal mechanism of the hysteresis loop. It is argued that the net interface moment from the SSG at the interface of core-shell nanoparticles sets a unidirectional anisotropy after field cooling, which is thought to be the origin of this path dependency of the EB and observed via descending part of the hysteresis loop, ushering potential for novel spin based applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The absorption spectrum and the magnetic mechanism of Ce-doped ZnO are controversial. To address these issues, we investigated the effects of Ce doping on the magnetic and optical properties of ZnO using geometry optimization and energy calculation based on the first-principle generalized gradient approximation +U(GGA + U) method of density functional theory. First, the undoped ZnO and Ce-mono-doped ZnO supercell models were calculated. Within a limited doping amount in range 3.13–6.25 mol%, higher Ce doping amount results were observed in terms of higher doping system volume, higher formation energy, and lower system stability. Compared with the band gap of pure ZnO, the band gap of each doping system narrowed, and the absorption spectrum showed red-shift. High Ce doping amount led to weak narrowing of the band gap and weak red-shift in the absorption spectrum. The ferromagnetism of the mono-doped systems increased with increasing Ce doping concentration and was mainly attributed to the hybrid coupling effect of the Ce-4f, Ce-5d, and O-2p states. Second, four Zn30Ce2O32 supercell models with the same doping concentration and different spatial arrangements were calculated. A relatively stable antiferromagnetic state was observed when -Ce-O-Ce- was doped along the a-axis bonding of the Ce double-doped ZnO system, whereas favorable ferromagnetic state was found when -Ce-O-Ce- was doped along the deflection of the c-axis. The Curie temperature of doping system can be higher than room temperature.© 2018The effect of doping non Jahn-Teller (JT) Cr3+ ion on the crystallographic structure and magnetic ordering has been studied in a series of polycrystalline compounds HoMn1−xCrxO3 (0 < x ≤ 1). These compounds crystallize in a mixture of hexagonal and orthorhombic phases for x < 0.125 whereas the orthorhombic phase is present for all higher concentrations. It is observed that Cr doping leads to decrease in the mismatch of the bond length in Mn-O6 octahedra indicating reduction in the static orbital ordering due to JT effect. In addition, doping with Cr3+ introduces ferromagnetic Mn3+-O-Cr3+ interactions in an antiferromagnetic matrix consisting of Mn3+-O-Mn3+ and Cr3+-O-Cr3+ interactions. A change in the magnetic structure from Г4 (AxFyGz) to Г2 (CxGyFz) is observed in samples with x > 0.75, which is attributed to the anisotropic interactions between the Ho3+ and Cr3+ spins. An incommensurate magnetic order corresponding to the wave vector (0.4, 0, 0) is observed in the orthorhombic phase associated with the x = 0.05 sample. The hexagonal phase in the Mn-rich end exhibits a reduced magnetic ordering temperature of 55 K and a spin reorientation at 15 K, in comparison to h-HoMnO3. The temperature variation of dielectric data shows weak magnetodielectric coupling in these compounds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we study the spin- and charge-transport behaviors of a single molecular magnet (SMM) coupled to external reservoirs with spin-dependent chemical potentials. By using the Hubbard operator Green's function method, we show that in the limit of a pinned macrospin the SMM can serve as an effective spin current filter or generator. Two configurations of spin bias are considered. For SMM coupled with symmetric dipolar spin bias, the system can generate spin-polarized current and pure spin current by adjusting the relative magnitude of spin bias and Coulomb interaction. It originates from the competition of two spin-opposite transport channels. Also due to this competition, one can observe a negative differential spin conductance. For SMM coupled with asymmetric dipolar spin bias, the system can only generate spin-polarized currents. The SMM as a spin current generator shows features different from the usual quantum dot system and these features can be useful in molecular spintronics.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic composites SrFe12O19/ZnFe2O4 were successfully synthesized by one-pot coprecipitation method. The as-prepared samples with different molar ratio of SrFe12O19 to ZnFe2O4 were characterized and analysed. XRD and SEM results show that the composites are highly crystalline with few impurities. Raman spectrum confirms the interactions between two phases in the composites. UV–vis spectra and photoluminescence spectra show the optical property of the samples. The magnetic properties analysis reveals that the coercivity of composites decrease evidently with the increase of the ZnFe2O4 phase. Furthermore, photocatalytic performance of the samples were investigated by the degradation of methylene blue (MB) under visible light irradiation. The maximum degradation ratio of MB with Sample-A was 90%. The recycling tests confirm that the photocatalytic activity was above 50% after three cycles. These all prove that the composite SrFe12O19 and ZnFe2O4 not only improve the magnetic and photocatalytic properties, but also effectively avoid secondary pollution of treated water.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Understanding spin dynamics in perpendicular exchange coupled ferrimagnetic materials is an issue of crucial importance for progress in information processing and recording technology. In this paper, the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation at atomistic-level is employed to model the perpendicular interfacial exchange effect in ferrimagnetic FeGd/FeTb soft/hard bilayer structures. Three types of magnetization switching features are identified by tuning the interfacial exchange strength to be weak coupling, partial coupling, and strong coupling. These features have been further verified by the dynamical simulations, showing the switched soft layer could also help the hard layer magnetization switching. Based on the coercivity difference of the soft layer and hard layer, the left- or right-shift perpendicular exchange bias effect has been theoretically modelled.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Electromagnetic interference (EMI) induced magnetic instabilities are an influential factor which can degrade the performance of magnetic read heads. In this paper, we investigate the influences of EMI on the playback response of the current perpendicular-to-the-plane giant magnetoresistance (CPP-GMR) read heads via micromagnetic simulations. The readback signal and the noise spectral density of the heads when subjected to the EMI were characterized. It was found that the readback signal could be significantly distorted, or become inaccurate, from the EMI through the induced spin transfer torque effect. Also, the incorrect readback signal results in a notable expansion of the noise spectral density which further impacts the head stability. Furthermore, the bit-error-rate of the head signal processing could be markedly increased by multiple EMI occurrences. Hence, the playback response distortion of the CPP-GMR read heads due to the EMI is another concerned factor for the read sensors at higher storage capacities.© 2018In this work, we investigate by means of simulations the performance of basic digital, analog, and mixed-signal circuits employing tunnel-FETs (TFETs). The analysis reviews and complements our previous papers on these topics. By considering the same devices for all the analysis, we are able to draw consistent conclusions for a wide variety of circuits. A virtual complementary TFET technology consisting of III-V heterojunction nanowires is considered. Technology Computer Aided Design (TCAD) models are calibrated against the results of advanced full-quantum simulation tools and then used to generate look-up-tables suited for circuit simulations. The virtual complementary TFET technology is benchmarked against predictive technology models (PTM) of complementary silicon FinFETs for the 10 nm node over a wide range of supply voltages (VDD) in the sub-threshold voltage domain considering the same footprint between the vertical TFETs and the lateral FinFETs and the same static power. In spite of the asymmetry between p- and n-type transistors, the results show clear advantages of TFET technology over FinFET for VDD lower than 0.4 V. Moreover, we highlight how differences in the I-V characteristics of FinFETs and TFETs suggest to adapt the circuit topologies used to implement basic digital and analog blocks with respect to the most common CMOS solutions.© 2018 Elsevier LtdContinuous scaling down NAND flash memory toward below 1Xnm node generation will result in serious floating gate (FG) poly depletion and significantly impact the cell reliability performance. In this study, the FG implantation before inter-poly-dielectric deposition was proposed. We have successfully explored the methods to minimize the FG implanted damage issue and hence the void-free control gate (CG) can be achieved after the CG poly-Si fill-in. After optimizing the FG implanted processes, the cell reliabilities on 1Xnm NAND flash device were verified. The FG poly depletion can be effectively reduced by the additional FG dopant, which results in the significant improvement on the natural threshold-voltage (Vt) distribution width, the program noise, and the program/erase Vt degradation. Moreover, there is no degradation on non-cycle data retention when adding the FG implantation, which suggests no extra FG dopant penetrated into tunnel oxide as the trap sites to enhance the trap-assisted tunneling leakage under high temperature baking.© 2018 Elsevier LtdLinear and nonlinear characteristics of a 0.5 μm × (2 × 100) μm gate double heterojunction AlGaAs/InGaAs/GaAs pseudomorphic high-electron mobility transistor have been investigated using a two-tone intermodulation distortion (IMD) measurement technique. The results indicate a significant modification on the IMD output power components such as fundamental, IMD2, IMD3, IMD4, IMD5 and IMD7 with the variation of biasing conditions, input power, frequency and temperature. Increase in input power affects the output current as well as the parasitic resistances and subsequently the threshold voltage reduces, resulting to an increase in the output IMD power. On the other hand, increase in frequency & temperature reduces the magnitude of the output IMDs. The temperature affects the output current as well as the parasitic resistances and the threshold voltage, results a decrease in the output IMD power. The threshold voltage shifts negatively with temperature and modifies the notch/null's position of the second and higher order IMD output power components. This investigation is valuable for the circuit designers to evaluate the best biasing option in terms of minimum distortion, maximum gain for future design optimizations.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA theoretical analysis of the current collected in semiconductors in the electron beam induced current technique in the case of a nano-Schottky contact is given. The electron beam is in normal incidence and the surface recombination velocity is taken to be equal to zero. The analysis is based on the use of new boundary conditions imposed by the nano-scale size and shape of the electrode. Different expressions of the induced current are obtained from the diffusion equation as a function of polar coordinates, and their reliability are analyzed for the purpose of describing the induced current profiles which can be used for the determination of the minority carrier diffusion length. All expressions of the current depend on the nano-contact size, which has a great importance in the charge collection process, but not on nano-contact area.© 2018 Elsevier LtdSilicon-based solid state plasma antennas were characterized by its wide radiation range, good stealth characteristic, and dynamic reconfigurability, which have broad application prospects in the future. In this paper, investigations of surface PiN diodes developed for silicon-based reconfigurable holographic antennas have been demonstrated for using millimeter-wave communication systems. The SPiN diodes have been extensively discussed, and the obtained results (simulations and experiments) confirm the applicability of these devices for dynamically reconfigurable antennas. A carrier concentration of 1018–1019 cm−3 has been achieved within the optimized SPiN diode. Reconfigurable holographic antennas based on SPiN diodes that were activated by the injection of dc current were demonstrated in this paper. The resonance frequencies at 60 GHz and 64.5 GHz have been easily achieved by turning on or off different sections of the reconfigurable dipole antenna, while the radiation efficiencies were 85.1% and 83.8%, respectively. A double-layer holographic structure was also investigated in this paper. The study reveals that a novel reconfigurable antenna with SPiN diodes has been formed in a single system and has numerous advantages over the traditional antenna.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA study of the small-signal response of a Field-Effect Transistor connected to a purely reactive load is proposed. In particular, this model, using the equivalent admittances approach, is applied to a transistor connected to an inductance L, a capacitance C and LC resonant and anti-resonant circuits. The influence of such frequency-dependent load on the dynamics of the transistor, dominated in the terahertz range by collective plasma behavior, is investigated. This leads to the possibilities of shifting, amplifying or softening resonances appearing in the voltage gain spectrum. The effect of a resistive part of the load is also estimated.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The investigation of crystal and magnetic structures of BaFe12-xMexO19 (Me=In3+ and Ga3+; x = 0.1–1.2) solid solutions has been carried out by time-of-flight neutron diffraction method. It was determined the influence of diamagnetic In and Ga ions to unit cell volume of partially substituted barium ferrites. The electric field-induced polarization was observed in the BaFe11.9Me0.1O19 (Me = In and Ga) solid solutions at room temperature. The refinement of crystal structure of barium ferrites has been carried out in frameworks of two possible space group: centrosymmetric P63/mmc (No. 194) and non- centrosymmetric P63mc (No. 186) that allowed to reveal reasons of appearance of nonzero dipole electric moment. For description of magnetic structure of BaFe12-xMexO19 (Me = In and Ga; x = 0.1–1.2) solid solutions was used the Gorter's model where magnetic moments of iron ions are oriented along the hexagonal axis that is the axis of easy magnetization.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic characteristics of Pd thin films on Fe(1 1 0) were investigated by means of Magnetic Circular Dichroism in the Angular Distribution of photoelectrons (MCDAD). For uncovered Fe it was found that significant photoelectron intensity differences occur for electrons emitted from the 3d band near the Fermi level in the situation of a fixed helicity of the incoming circularly polarized radiation and opposite magnetization of the magnetic layer. The corresponding MCDAD asymmetry shows a strong dependence on the excitation energy in the VUV range and exhibits values up to about 10%. After deposition of Pd in the submonolayer regime up to a thickness of a few layers, the new features which are present in the photoemission spectra exhibit asymmetries, too. A strong hybridization takes place at the interface which is due to the intermixing of Pd 4d and Fe 3d states. This interface state shows no dispersion and no change of the asymmetry value for different photon energies. Additionally, the sign of the asymmetry is opposite to that of the Fe substrate. The reason is the strong hybridization which results not in a rigid band shift as found for less-interacting adsorbates but in new states being different in the majority and minority spin band. As a consequence, the interface layer exhibits an induced magnetic polarization. The structure near the Fermi energy exhibit the same sign of the asymmetry but with lower values. For a thickness of 3 monolayers the spectrum is comparable to bulk measurements and shows no MCDAD asymmetries in the entire binding energy region.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Exchange bias in the bilayer of half-metallic La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 and multiferroic BiFeO3 has been applied for the electric field control of magnetization, which is strongly limited by the much low blocking temperature of about 100 K (Phys. Rev. Lett. 105, 027201 (2010)). One possible solution is to strengthen the interfacial exchange coupling, thus another half-metallic oxide Sr2FeMoO6 is selected. Tetragonal-like BiFeO3 has been successfully fabricated on (0 0 1) SrTiO3 substrate using Sr2FeMoO6 as buffer layer. By replacing the exchange coupling between Fe and Mn ions in BiFeO3/La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 bilayer, stronger exchange couplings between Fe and Fe ions are established at the interface, and the blocking temperature has been significantly increased to 160 K. A second blocking temperature at 110 K due to the exchange coupling between Fe and Mo ions is also observed. Detailed magnetization measurements confirm the conventional mechanism of exchange coupling between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic layers and exclude the contribution from surface spin glass. Furthermore, BiFeO3 still retains excellent ferroelectric properties with Sr2FeMoO6 acting as ferromagnetic conducting electrode, which may have important applications in multiferroic spintronics devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report crystal growth, magnetic properties and electron spin resonance (ESR) study of the one dimensional zigzag-chain compound FeNbO4. The single crystals were grown by the flux method using Na2WO4·12H2O and Na2W2O7 as the flux. Magnetic susceptibility and specific heat data show an antiferromagnetic ordering below 44 K. High-field magnetization data reveal a spin-flop transition at 12 T when magnetic field is applied along the magnetic easy axis. Multi-frequency ESR study on the single crystals reveal three resonance modes which can be understood by the molecule-field theory. Using a simple model with easy-axis type anisotropy, we estimate that the anisotropy field HA and the exchange field HE are 2.67 T and 27 T, respectively. The zero-frequency resonance field at 11 T corresponds to the spin-flop transition, demonstrating a close correlation between the high-field magnetization and the ESR spectra.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Cu or Fe or Co substituted off-stoichiometric Ni-Mn-Sn films of 500 nm thickness were deposited on Si (1 0 0) substrate by dc magnetron sputtering at ambient temperature and then annealed ex situ at 550 °C for 1 h under high vacuum. X-ray diffraction and atomic force microscopy analyses showed that the annealed films exhibited high degree of crystalline order with cubic L21 phase. Magneto-static evaluation of the films established room temperature ferromagnetic order with easy axis of magnetization along the film plane in all the annealed films. The ratio of magnetic resonance and magnetic saturation (Mr/Ms) increased drastically upon Co substitution. The analysis of polar angle dependence resonance field (Hr) and resonance linewidth (ΔH) measurement using resonant cavity FMR technique revealed the presence of negative effective perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (K1) and very low Gilbert damping constant (α) in all the films.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Metaheuristic algorithms offer a robust and convenient method to solve highly nonlinear optimisation problems in engineering applications. In this work we evaluate the effectiveness of a collection of canonical algorithms at performing parameter identification for nonlinear constitutive laws that describe coupled, magnetic-field responsive materials. To achieve this, we define an objective function that captures the influence of many physical measurements recorded during experimental analysis of a coupled material, and incorporates the influence of experimental uncertainty. A benchmark of the algorithms is conducted through the evaluation of a magneto-visco-elastic material by means of numerically-derived parallel-plate rotational rheometry. The effectiveness of each algorithm at matching the fictitious, but representative, experimental data was considered using two different metrics. In addition to the ranking based on a non-parametric statistical test, we consider an ad hoc criterion that accounts for only the top performing candidate solutions. It is determined that the continuous real and discrete bitstring genetic algorithm provide the best overall performance in terms of the accuracy of the predicted parameters, while globally-elitist simulated annealing provides the best compromise between accuracy and computational efficiency. When experimental uncertainties exist (which is always the case for data determined within a laboratory setting), it has been observed that the strong link between constitutive parameters and physical material properties, which is typically assumed, no longer holds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The striking effect of Ti-doping on the magnetic properties of La0.5Ca0.5MnO3 nanoparticles have been investigated by different methods. The half doped manganites are at the boundary between the ferromagnetic metallic and antiferromagnetic insulating phases. There is a delicate balance between ferromagnetic double exchange and antiferromagnetic superexchange interactions. In half doped La0.5Ca0.5MnO3 charge ordered antiferromagnetic state is destabilized below a critical size followed by development of ferromagnetism. We have seen that slight disturbance in magnetic exchange interactions by Ti-substitution (>5%) drastically changes the fraction of ferromagnetic clusters. The ferromagnetic Mn3+—O—Mn4+ interaction is suppressed by Mn3+—O—Ti4+ type of interactions. For more than 10% Ti doping the surface ferromagnetic character of the nanoparticles is largely weighed down. This suppression of ferromagnetic component by diamagnetic Ti-doping eventually leads to phase separated states with lower magnetization value.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The following structures are deposited under the conditions stated: (a) glass/Ru (X nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) and (b) glass/Ta(Y nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) at room temperature (RT), where each of X and Y is from 5 nm to 10 nm. The hysteresis loop of glass/Ru (X nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) and glass/Ta(Y nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) presents in-plane easy-axis magnetic anisotropy. The saturation magnetization (Ms) of glass/Ru(X nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) is decreased from 1490 emu/cm3 to 1050 emu/cm3 when the Ru thickness is increased. The maximum Ms of glass/Ru(5 nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) is about 1490 emu/cm3. The Ms of glass/Ta(Y nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) displays a concave-up feature. The maximum Ms of glass/Ta(10 nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) is about 1300 emu/cm3. The Ms varies with the Ru and Ta seed layer thicknesses due to various distances of spin-coupling interaction. In addition, the Hc values have very small ranges from about 1.2 Oe to 3.4 Oe in glass/Ru(X nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) and 1.0 Oe to 2.6 Oe in glass/Ta(Y nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm), suggesting that the magnetic characteristic is soft magnetism owing to a low Hc and high Ms. The transmittance percentage (%) of glass/Ru(X nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) and glass/Ta(Y nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) is decreased from 16.5% to 7% and decreased from 16% to 12%, respectively, as the Ru and Ta thicknesses change from 5 nm to 10 nm, because a greater thickness and interface effect can inhibit the transfer of photon signals through the film, causing low transmittance. According to magnetic and optical performance, the optimal seed layer thicknesses of glass/Ru(X nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) and glass/Ta(Y nm)/Co60Fe20V20(5 nm) are 5 nm and 10 nm, which are suitable for magnetic-optical recording medium applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper the processes of quasi-static and dynamic magnetization reversal are studied for square lattices of magnetic nanodipoles with cubic crystallographic anisotropy. The response of the total magnetic moment to the magnetic field pulse of different duration and polarization is determined for different orientational configurations of dipoles. The oscillation modes of the total magnetic moment under alternating magnetic field are also investigated. Regular, quasiperiodic and chaotic oscillatory regimes have been found. The conditions under which oscillations propagate from individual dipoles to the whole system have been revealed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Permanent magnet materials based on the MM2Fe14B (MM = Misch-metal) are widely noted. However, as a room temperature paramagnetic phase, the existence of CeFe2 phase in MM2Fe14B alloy is unavoidable. In order to eliminate the CeFe2 phase, the La substitution on MM in MM2Fe14B alloys was described. Alloys with nominal composition of (LaxMM1−x)33Fe66B (x = 0, 0.025, 0.05, 0.075, 0.1, 0.15) were prepared, and the crystal structure and magnetization of the (LaxMM1−x)33Fe66B alloys were investigated. XRD results reveal that the lattice parameter a, c, unit-cell volume V, and c/a ratio of (LaxMM1−x)33Fe66B alloys increase linearly with the La increase, indicating that La atoms enter into the main phase. Key to this study is the finding that CeFe2 phase disappears with the La content above 0.075. It is therefore concluded that La substitution could inhibit formation of CeFe2 phase. This is consistent with the observation from SEM-EDS. Another interesting finding is that La substitution would cause the change of Nd, Pr, La and Ce ratio in main phase, which means the ratios of four rare earth elements change with the La substitution. With the increase of x, the (Pr + Nd)/(La + Ce) ratio in main phase of (LaxMM1−x)33Fe66B alloys decreases first, showing the lowest point at x = 0.075, and then increases. As a result, the saturation magnetization (Ms) of (LaxMM1−x)33Fe66B alloys has the same tendency, which decreases from 11.78 kG (x = 0) to 11.35 kG (x = 0.075) first, and then increases to 11.96 kG (x = 0.15). And the Curie temperature (Tc) displays the same trend compared to the Ms. These facts show that the MM has a great potential to prepare the low cost sintered permanent magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigated local magnetism at the interface between Co2FeGe Heusler alloy and Ag by 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy. Interface-sensitive samples, where the 57Fe isotope was used only for several interfacial atomic layers of the Co2FeGe layer on the Ag layer, were prepared using atomically controlled alternate deposition at various deposition temperatures. The 57Fe Mössbauer spectra measured at room temperature indicated that the interface region of the Co2FeGe layers for the samples deposited below 500 °C retains the ferromagnetic B2 structure. On the other hand, interdiffusion between the Co2FeGe and Ag layers occurs and a nonmagnetic phase grows for the samples deposited at the substrate temperature higher than 550 °C. We observed magnetoresistance (MR) ratio of 3.6% at room temperature for Co2FeGe/Ag/Fe current-perpendicular-to-plane giant-magnetoresistive (CPP-GMR) structures grown at 300 °C, whereas we could not observe distinct MR effect for samples grown at 600 °C. These results support that the existence of interfacial nonmagnetic phase due to the interdiffusion between Heusler alloy and nonmagnetic-metal layers severely reduces the performance of CPP-GMR devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Here I would like to draw attention to so-called weak ferrimagnets (WFIMs), or mixed compounds with competing Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (DM) coupling, strictly speaking with different signs of the Dzyaloshinskii vector. Due to theoretical predictions ferrites-chromites RFe1−xCrxO3 (R is rare-earth or Y), Fe1−xCrxBO3, and Fe2−xCrxO3, as well as carbonates Mn1−xNixCO3 with competition of d3-d3, d3-d5, d5-d5, d5-d8, and d8-d8 DM couplings do reveal nontrivial concentration and temperature dependencies of magnetization, in particular, the compensation point(s). The weak ferrimagnets are believed to be perspective compounds for the exchange-bias effect materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Here, we report the effects of annealing treatments on magnetic textures, such as the formation of magnetic stripe domains and magnetic bubbles, in La0.825Sr0.175MnO3 (LSMO). Magnetization measurements suggest that the orientation of the easy axis, which was oriented along the [1 0 3]C direction in the as-grown sample, shifted to the [0 0 1]C direction after an annealing treatment was applied at 1273 K. Lorentz microscopy observations revealed that 180° magnetic domains with in-plane magnetization were formed in an as-grown sample in the absence of a magnetic field and that these domains were transformed into isolated elliptical magnetic domains when a magnetic field was applied along the [0 0 1]C axis. Conversely, in annealed samples, the magnetic stripe domains magnetized perpendicular to the thin film were formed in a zero magnetic field and transformed into magnetic bubbles with circularly rotating spins. These results suggest that annealing induces a change in the magnetic anisotropy from the [1 0 3]C direction to the [0 0 1]C direction. Thus, the spatial configuration of the spins in the magnetic textures of LSMO can be controlled by annealing.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work presents a novel fabrication technique called “UV-assisted Direct Write (UADW)”, which combines extrusion-based direct write (DW) and in situ layer-by-layer UV curing to fabricate polymer-bonded permanent magnets of arbitrary shapes at room temperature. The process requires minimal post heat treatment and therefore preserves the magnetic properties of the raw powder in the printed product. Experimentation achieved a maximum solid loading of printable ink of 60% by volume, or 91% by weight. Samples with 60 vol.% nominal particle concentration exhibited remanence of 3.80 kG (52% of raw powder value) and intrinsic coercivity of 9.50 kOe. Magnetized samples showed no reduction in intrinsic coercivity, which proves good curing of the final product and good bonding between particles and binder. Compared to other 3D-printed magnets reported in the literature, UADW magnets possess the highest intrinsic coercivity with one of the highest magnetic remanence values.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the effect of sintering temperature on structural, magnetic, magnetocaloric and critical behaviors of Ni0.4Cd0.3Zn0.3Fe2O4 ferrites synthesized using sol-gel method at 900 °C and 1100 °C. X-ray diffraction patterns indicated that samples crystallize in the cubic spinel structure (Fd3‾m space group) with an increase of lattice constant and average crystallite size as the sintering temperature increases. Magnetic measurements revealed that that the prepared samples undergo second-order ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) phase transitions. An increment in magnetization, Curie temperature, magnetic entropy change and relative cooling power has been observed with increasing the sintering temperature. The magnetic entropy change reached maximum values of about 1.11 J.kg−1.K−1 and 1.62 J.kg−1.K−1 for μ0H = 5 T corresponding to relative cooling power (RCP) of 152.09 J.kg−1 and 253.65 J.kg−1 for samples sintered at 900 °C and 1100 °C, respectively. These values are comparable favorably with those of some others ferrites considered as possible candidates for magnetic refrigeration. The estimated critical exponents obtained for sample sintered at 1100 °C are close to the tricritical mean-field model; whereas for sample sintered at 900 °C, the exponents belong to a different universality class. This change of critical exponents is mainly due to the increase of average crystallite size as the sintering temperature increases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Transition metal Zn shows a main group element-like behavior in Heusler alloys Ni2MnGa1−xZnx (x = 0, 0.25, 0.50, 075 and 1.00). Zn enters Ga (D) site when it substitutes for Ga in Ni2MnGa chemically. The equilibrium lattice constant decreases with increasing Zn content. But at the same time the magnetic properties do not change too much. Mn partial moment contributes most to the total moment and couples parallel to that of Ni in both austenite and martensite. The partly substitution of Zn for Ga can lead to an increase of martensitic transition temperature due to the competition between cell volume effect and valence electron concentration e/a. Accordingly, the largest energy difference ΔEM between the austenite and martensite was found when x = 0.5. This was further explained based on the electronic structure from the Jahn-Teller effect. Then Zn-doping can be used as a possible way to adjust the phase transition temperatures in Heusler type MSMAs. Zn is much cheaper than Ga or In, this can be quite meaningful for the development of high performance and low cost MSMAs and broaden their industrial applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study theoretically the magneto-topological property and gap engineering of two-dimensional ferromagnetic Lieb lattice by taking into account the next-nearest-neighbors (NNN) coupling and the important Dzyaloshinsky-Moriya interaction (DMI). In particular, the density of states and dispersion energy of the system in terms of various NNN and DMI in the presence of Zeeman field produce the main features in the context of Heisenberg model, Holstein-Primakoff transformation, and Green's function approach. It is found that the inclusion of NNN coupling opens a gap, leading to the metal-semiconductor-insulator transition depending on its intensity. Furthermore, DMI introduces two extra degenerate bands in the vicinity of Fermi-level due to the Stark effect. The magneto-topological property of the gap in our model is determined by the tunneling probability of particles at both weak and strong NNN and DMI regimes. Finally, we discuss the extension of nuclear spins to arbitrary values.© 2018Soft magnetic composites (SMCs) comprised of ferrimagnetic and electrically insulating coating materials for iron powder are capable of increasing frequency ranges and efficiency of electromagnetic devices, nominally electric motors. Soft ferrites can withstand stress relieving temperatures and allow for reduction in eddy current contributions while minimally effecting magnetic performance. This work demonstrates the effectiveness of a NiZnCu-ferrite coating material of 5 wt%, 10 wt%, and 15 wt% on iron powder using traditional press and cure (700 °C) powder metallurgy techniques. Powder properties such as apparent density and Hall flow rate are used to determine effect of acoustic mixing procedure on coating uniformity. An increase in resistance and porosity are found for increasing coating amount, with subsequent decreases in density, permeability, and magnetic saturation. We find lower core loss values for increasing coating amount, related to eddy current loss, however, lower induction levels are also seen. Our work highlights the importance of soft ferrites, more specifically Ni0.5Zn0.3Cu0.2Fe2O4, and their ability to vastly improve SMC developments using more traditional powder metallurgy (PM) techniques.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties, magnetocaloric effects, and martensitic transition in Ni50Mn35In14.25B0.75 have been investigated using specific heat and magnetic measurements as a function of hydrostatic pressure. A shift in the martensitic transition temperature (TM) toward room temperature (by 35 K to higher temperature) was observed with the application of pressure (P = 0.54 GPa). The isothermal entropy changes obtained from magnetization and heat capacity measurements were found to be in good agreement. A large inverse adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) of 2.7 K was determined from heat capacity data at TM for a magnetic field change of 1.8 T. The density of states and the Debye temperature were found to be 4.9 states/eV/f.u. and 322 K, respectively. The magnetic entropy analysis agrees fairly well with the theoretical maximal magnetic entropy, R ln(2J + 1).© 2018Electro- and magnetostriction mechanisms and temperature behavior of the length of bismuth-substituted neodymium iron garnet films on glass and gallium gadolinium garnet have been investigated. Electric- and magnetic-field and temperature dependences of the electro- and magnetostriction constants have been determined. It has been established that the magnetostriction constant changes its sign upon temperature variation. The experimental data are explained using a model of dipole glass with the magnetoelectric and magnetoelastic interaction.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The formation of new binary compounds between europium and manganese in the form of thin films has been studied. X-ray Reflectivity, Reflection High Energy Electron Diffraction and X-ray Photoelectron Spectroscopy confirmed intermixing at elevated temperatures. X-ray Diffraction indicated the formation of new Eu-Mn based compounds; cubic structure with the lattice parameters a = 6.98 Å and hexagonal EuMn5 (a = 5.20 Å c = 4.01 Å). Valence transitions from Eu2+ to Eu3+ were observed for certain stoichiometries. A transition to a magnetically ordered phase was observed for selected films in the Eu-Mn system at 15 K, 43 K and 62 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The particle size dependence of the mechanical properties and the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in La0.8Ce0.2(Fe0.95Co0.05)11.8Si1.2/Sn composites were studied. The compressive strength (σbc) was in the range of 180–200 MPa for composites with particle sizes less than 180 μm, which is much higher than the compressive strength of larger size powders (136 MPa). When the particles were larger than 45 μm, the observed maximum magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM)max of 7.66–7.99 J/(kg⋅K) shows that surface/interface anisotropy effects have a negligible impact on MCE. The adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) increased from 1.74 K@1.4 T, for particles in the size range of 0–45 μm, to 1.91 K@1.4 T for particles in the size range of 45–100 μm. The ΔTad was in the range of ∼2.0 K@1.4 T when the particle size increased from 100 to 250 μm. Magnetic hysteresis in these second-order phase transition alloys showed negligible change in the particle size range of 0–250 μm. These results are useful of La(Fe,Si)13-based compounds for magnetocaloric applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effects of additives Bi2O3 and MnCO3 on the structural and magnetic properties of M-type Sr-hexaferrites (SrFe12O19) prepared by a conventional solid-state reaction method were studied. The saturation magnetization value of undoped SrFe12O19 is 71.8 emu/g; it increases to 72.6 emu/g and 74.2 emu/g with Bi2O3 doping of 0.5 wt%and 1.0 wt%, respectively. However, abnormal grain growth occurs and the coercivity (HC) decreases significantly in the 1 wt% Bi2O3-doped sample. Co-doping of 0.5 wt% Bi2O3 + 0.5 wt% MnCO3 is effective, because a higher saturation magnetization (73.1 emu/g) than that of undoped SrFe12O19 could be achieved with a relatively large coercivity of ∼3.3 kOe. Based on the lattice parameter calculation, Bi3+ preferably substitutes into Fe3+ sites rather than Sr2+ sites in M-type Sr-hexaferrite. The enhanced saturation magnetization can be attributed to the selective substitution of nonmagnetic Bi3+ into the down-spin Fe3+ site (4f1 or 4f2).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and transport properties of ε-Fe3− xN (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) films were systematically characterized to identify the correlation among the nitrogen concentration x, magnetic structure, and electrical transport properties. It was found that increasing the nitrogen concentration x of ε-Fe3− xN not only resulted in a successive decrease in magnetization and Curie temperature, but also led to the contribution of magnetic scattering to the resistivity and magnetoresistance. All these experimental phenomena can be attributed to the distinctive exchange interaction in ε-Fe3− xN, which depends on the concentration and distribution of nitrogen atoms and causes the emergence of localized spin disorder. We believe this work would provide a new insight into the relationship between the magnetic and transport properties of iron nitrides.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Aiming at promoting the formation of hard magnetic 2:14:1 phase in La-Fe-B alloys, the effects of Nd substitution on the melt-spun nanocrystalline (La1-xNdx)yFe94-yB6 alloys (x = 0–0.5; y = 12–16) have been investigated. No hard magnetic phase was formed in the (La1-xNdx)16Fe78B6 alloys with x < 0.2. A soft magnetic phase (La,Nd)2Fe23B3 with Curie temperature of 649 K was observed in the x = 0.2 alloy and it disappeared as x increased to 0.3. 30% and above Nd substitution can dramatically enhance the formation of 2:14:1 phase and the magnetic properties of La-based permanent magnets. Three different alloy systems (y = 16, 14 and 12) show similar behavior of magnetic properties dependences on Nd substitution. (La0.7Nd0.3)16Fe78B6 alloy with mean grain size 10–20 nm exhibits high remanent magnetization, maximum energy product and intrinsic coercivity up to 0.71 T, 10.0 MGOe and 562 kA/m, respectively, indicating it is possible to achieve excellent magnetic properties in La-based rare earth permanent magnets. The present work provides a good understanding on the fundamental magnetism of La-based magnets and the potential to develop low cost rare earth permanent magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The detailed study of magnetic properties, including dc and ac measurements, has been carried out on the Bi-Cr-Sb-O pyrochlore. The region of pyrochlore phase existence was determined and photocatalytic properties have been also studied. We revealed that the Bi-Cr-Sb-O pyrochlore phase occurs along Bi2−xCr1+xSbO7 section within the region x = 0.1–0.4. The Cr3+ ions oxidation state in Bi-Cr-Sb-O pyrochlore was confirmed by XANES spectra. The best Rietveld refinement results for Bi1.8Cr1.2SbO7 composition were achieved for the disordered structure model (space group Fd-3m). According to the magnetic data Bi1.8Cr1.2SbO7 is a highly frustrated pyrochlore with short-range antiferromagnetic exchange interactions between the nearest Cr3+ ions. At Tg = 4 К this compound undergoes spin-glass transition.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Based on the first-principles calculations, the total energy and electronic structures of some new inverse Heusler-based ternary intermetallic compounds X2YZ (X = alkali metals: Li, Na, K, Rb; Y = Ag, Pd, Cu; Z = Sb, Te, As) have been investigated in detail. Our results reveal that most of them are stable in inverse Heusler structure and naturally exhibit band-inversion nature without the effect of spin–orbit coupling (SOC). That is to say, most of our studied compounds are newly designed topological semi-metals. We also study the effects of the uniform strain and the spin–orbit coupling on the band inversion. Moreover, for our predicted compounds, all of them have a negative formation energy, which makes them possible in material growth.© 2018Hyperthermia generally means as increasing the temperature of particular region of body to rise 5 °C above the body's physiological temperature. Here, we investigate the thermal therapy of PEGylated cobalt ferrite nanoparticles prepared by hydrothermal approach on cancerous cell line in the alternative current magnetic field. To characterize of the magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs), scanning electron microscopy, dynamic light scattering, X-ray diffraction, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy, and vibrating sample magnetometer were used. X-ray diffraction analysis confirmed the spinel phase formation of the MNPs. Cytotoxicity of MNPs using MTT assay on L929 cell lines showed the PEGylated MNPs extraordinary biocompatibility. Specific loss power (SLP) were calculated for neat and PEGylated MNPs in aqueous solution in radio frequency region (300–400 kHz). Power absorbed by neat and PEGylated cobalt ferrite were measured as a function of frequency and MNPs concentration. The maximum SLP was 31.8 W/g for coated nanoparticles (MNPs + PEG) in concentration of 0.0025 gr/mL at applied frequency of 350 kHz. Magnetic fluid hyperthermia of MCF7 breast cancer cells were shown up to 90 percent of cell death in 350 kHz. Simulation studies approved the elevated temperature of the PEGylated MNPs to 42 °C in the tumor after 10 min of MNPs intratumorally injection. This study shows increase in rate of heating in the tumor when the temperature of injected MNPs is approximately equal to the body temperature (i.e. 37 °C).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Single crystals of Fe-substituted Cu2Mn1-xFexBO5 ludwigites have been synthesized using flux technique (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.5 – in the initial flux system). Structural properties of the synthesized compounds were studied by the single crystal and powder X-ray diffraction analysis. Obtained results were analyzed in the relationship with parent compound Cu2MnBO5. It was revealed that the type of monoclinic distortions of Fe-substituted ludwigites is different from the structure of Cu2MnBO5. The real cation composition and local structure of Cu2Mn1-xFexBO5 ludwigites were studied using XANES and EXAFS techniques, respectively. Analysis of field and thermal dependencies of magnetization showed a high dependence of the magnetic properties of these ludwigites on x with changing the type of magnetic ordering.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Based on the supercell structures of Fe-Cr-Mn alloys having the composition Fe18Cr6Mn8, the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of the alloys have been investigated using first-principle calculations, and the effects of dissolved nitrogen on the properties of Fe18Cr6Mn8 alloys have been further discussed. The Fe18Cr6Mn8 alloys were considered to have two different structures, Cr6Fe6Mn8Fe12 and Fe6Cr6Mn8Fe12. The lattice constants of cells Cr6Fe6Mn8Fe12 and Fe6Cr6Mn8Fe12 are similar to each other, however the octahedral volumes in the center of the cell (VO) differ. After nitrogen solid solution, the lattice constants and cell volumes of Fe18Cr6Mn8 alloys slightly increase, while the octahedral volume sees a large increase: 11.6% for Cr6Fe6Mn8Fe12 and 18.2% for Fe6Cr6Mn8Fe12. The Fe18Cr6Mn8 (N) alloys are of high stability. Solute atoms (N) increase the stability of the Fe18Cr6Mn8 system, and Cr6Fe6Mn8Fe12-N is more stable than Fe6Cr6Mn8Fe12-N. Besides N atoms with negative charges (obtaining electrons), Fe atoms in different sites also display different electronegativity. After nitrogen solid solution, the magnetic moment of Cr6Fe6Mn8Fe12 decreases about 20%, and that of Fe6Cr6Mn8Fe12 decreases about 79%. The ratio of bulk modulus B to shear modulus G (B/G ratio), representative of the ductility of the alloy, of Cr6Fe6Mn8Fe12 decreases about 15%, and that of Fe6Cr6Mn8Fe12 decreases about 30%. The addition of nitrogen decreases the Zener anisotropy ratios of Fe18Cr6Mn8, which shows the elastic anisotropy of Fe18Cr6Mn8N is lower than that of Fe18Cr6Mn8.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Manganese added nickel oxide composite nanoparticles (1 − x)NiO-xMnO2 (x = 0.00, 0.5, 0.10, 0.15 & 1.0) were prepared using mechanical milling and subjected to different characterization techniques to study their structural, optical and magnetic properties. The microstructures, surface morphology, crystallite size of the nanoparticles were studied using X-ray diffractometer (XRD), field emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM). From these it was found that the nanoparticles were in cubic structure. Secondary phases were observed with increase of Mn concentration. The crystallite size of the particles was calculated using Scherer's relation and found that the nanoparticles were in the range of 25–35 nm. The magnetic properties of the composite nanoparticles were studied at room temperature and at 100 K using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) in the applied field range of ±75 kOe. The MnO2 nanoparticles exhibited paramagnetic nature at room temperature. The NiO nanoparticles exhibited soft ferromagnetic nature and strength of magnetization increased with applied external magnetic field (±50 kOe). The Mn doped nickel oxide composite nanoparticles also exhibited soft ferromagnetism at room temperature and at 100 K. The strength of magnetization increased with increase of Mn concentration and the composite nanoparticles at x = 0.15 (Ni0.85Mn0.15O) shown the highest magnetic moment of 6 emu/g at 100 K. The temperature dependent magnetic moments for (1 − x)NiO-xMnO nanoparticles at different x values were also discussed in detail.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic iron oxide nanobrushes with different morphologies prepared using an anodic aluminum oxide Template (AAO) template. Flexible polymers and the precursor iron oxide nanoparticles coated with polyacrylic acid (PAA) were assembled into iron oxide nanobrushes. The iron oxide nanobrushes with different morphologies were obtained by etching the alumina template with different degrees. The morphologies of the iron oxide nanobrush arrays were characterized with field emission scanning electron microscope (FESEM). The hysteresis loops of the iron oxide nanobrush arrays were measured using vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM), where the coercivity and remanence are almost zero, to achieve a typical superparamagnetism. The contact angle test shows that the iron oxide nanobrushes have hydrophilicity. These superparamagnetic and flexible iron oxide nanobrushes might be used in self-cleaning surfaces and sensors driven by a magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Presence of oxygen vacancy (VO) and the subsequent redistribution of electron are critical in the formation of ferromagnetism in oxides without magnetic impurities. However, the roles play by electron with diverse localization state in magnetism is still unclear. In this study, different VO related defect complex was obtained in CeO2 nanoparticles (NPs) by doping various content of Pr3+ and performing subsequent annealing process. Room temperature ferromagnetism was observed in all NPs. Combined systematic spectroscopy and microscopy analysis, it is demonstrated that magnetic behavior was strongly correlated to differences in electron localization. Two types of electron localization were revealed, which both result in the reduction of Ce ion. One is localized at the Ce ion adjacent to VO, while the other distributes at farther shell. Ce3+ formed by the later one was found to play the major role in ferromagnetism. To estimate the amount of ferromagnetic active Ce3+ ion, a normalization method was proposed based on Raman and X-ray absorption spectroscopy analysis and has been proven to be valid for several systems, including un-doped and doped with Y/Pr/Sm CeO2 NPs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The present study focuses on improving the magnetic properties and decreasing the anisotropy in non-oriented electrical steel by optimizing {1 0 0} recrystallization texture. As-cast Fe-1.3%Si strip with {1 0 0} texture produced by strip casting was subjected to hot rolling in the ferrite region, cold rolling, and recrystallization annealing. Magnetic properties and texture evolution after different stages of processing were studied. Annealed sample without hot rolling exhibited pronounced Cube and Goss texture, which led to high permeability but induced a large difference (∼0.15 T) in magnetic induction B50 between the maximum at 0° and minimum at 45° to the rolling direction. The introduction of hot rolling with 17–40% reduction weakened the intensity of recrystallization texture and had small influence on the nature of texture and magnetic induction. However, relatively complete {1 0 0} recrystallization texture was developed in the sample with hot rolling of 55% reduction. On the other hand, the average grain size of annealed sheets gradually increased with the increased hot rolling reduction. As a result, the magnetic induction and the core loss was optimized together with the improvement of anisotropy. The development of recrystallization texture is discussed on the basis of the deformed microstructure and nucleation mechanism, while the magnetic properties are correlated to the magnetic quality of the texture.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Giant magnetic anisotropy energies (MAEs), especially in systems that are well protected, are needed for the development of nanomagnetic devices. By using the first-principles calculations, we systematically investigated the structural and magnetic properties of 3d and 5d transition metal adatoms on a defected tungsten disulfide monolayer. Among these two-dimensional materials, Ir@D-WS2 and Os@D-WS2 possess extremely large MAEs (up to ∼40 meV/adatom). Furthermore, their large MAEs may sustain when we put a layer of graphene on top to protect them. The MAE of Os@D-WS2 can be tuned in a large range, up to 300%, by applying an external electric field of 0.5 V/Å. In addition, these systems exhibit unusual valley dependent topological features such as nontrivial band gaps and large Berry curvatures, and they hence are promising for technological innovations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We systematically explore the influence of I vacancy and a series of substitutional nonmetallic atoms, including F, Cl, Br, Si, P and S, on the stability, geometric structure, electronic structure and magnetic properties of single layer PbI2 using first-principles calculations. The results show that I vacancy and nonmetallic atoms X doped single layer PbI2 are stable at room temperature, although substitutional atom X and I vacancy lead to the local structure deformation. Moreover, substitutional F, Cl and Br dopants do not induce the magnetism in doped single layer PbI2 due to same number of valence electron of F, Cl, Br and I, while ground states of I vacancy, S, P and Si doped system are magnetic and the magnetic moments induced by one I vacancy, S, P and Si atom are 1.0, 1.0, 2.0 and 3.0 μB, respectively. It is found that the distribution of the magnetic moment induced by I vacancy and doping atom relate to the hybridization between doping atom and its neighboring Pb and I atoms or the hybridization between Pb and I atoms around vacancy. Remarkably, although the spin–orbit coupling (SOC) induce spin splitting of the electronic bands due to the absence of inversion symmetry in I vacancy and nonmetallic atoms X doped single layer PbI2, the SOC does not alter the electron occupation of the bands near the Fermi level. As a result, the magnetic moment induced by I vacancy, S, P and Si atoms are not changed and the magnetic moment of F, Cl and Br doped single layer PbI2 are still zero after the inclusion of SOC.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structure, phase transitions, magnetocaloric effect, and exchange bias effect in Mn49Ni42- xCoxSn9 (x = 0, 1, 3 and 5) ferromagnetic shape memory alloys have been systematically investigated. X-ray diffraction results measured at room temperature reveal that Mn49Ni42- xCoxSn9 alloys with x = 0, 1 present martensite structure, and Mn49Ni42- xCoxSn9 alloys with x = 3, 5 exhibit mixture phases of both martensite and austenite. The martensitic transformation and exchange bias field (HEB) are very sensitive to the Co content. In addition, large positive magnetic entropy changes were observed in these alloys due to the magnetic-field-induced transition from the paramagnetic martensitic phase to the ferromagnetic austenitic phase, and a large effective refrigeration capacity of 230.8 J/kg was obtained under the magnetic field change of 70 kOe in Mn49Ni37Co5Sn9 alloy. We realized a continuous tuning of the HEB from 534.7 Oe to 1113.0 Oe after field cooling in presence of 10 kOe.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the vertical hysteresis shift, the exchange bias, and the exchange spring effect in a polycrystalline sample of Bi0.84La0.16Fe0.96Ti0.04O3 at morphotropic phase boundary. The magnetic coupling at the phase boundary causes the formation of pinned spin region, which induces the spin rotation inside the two structural phases. The exchange coupling between the pinned spin and the two phases act as hard/soft coupling layers, respectively. Dependence on the strength of the spin pinning, we observed various types of the exchange coupling at different temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Dimensionality shapes the behavior of magnetism. Recent experiments on quasi two-dimensional (2D) van der Waals crystals have demonstrated unusual ferromagnetic orders and phase transitions distinct from their bulk counterparts. In this work, we present a method using renormalized spin-wave theory to study the ferromagnetic behavior in Heisenberg-type 2D ferromagnets, and apply our method to few-layer Cr2Ge2Te6 crystals. We present the details of the method, which includes a self-consistent updating scheme of the spin-wave spectra at the Hartree-Fock level. The theoretical results obtained quantitatively explain the experimental measurements, showing strong dimensionality effects and sensitive external magnetic-field dependence which leads to easily tunable magnetism in this class of 2D materials. This method can be generalized to study various magnetic phenomena in other systems.© 2018In the present study, the effect of complete replacement of Cr by Fe dramatically enhances the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of Co2(Cr1−xFex)Al (x = 0 and 1) Heusler alloys was studied. The present Heusler alloy systems were successfully prepared by mechanical alloying via high energy ball milling technique. Evolution of the B2 type disordered phase along with A2 type structure has been observed through X-ray diffraction. The substitution of Fe would lead to the development of remarkable enhancement of MCE observed near room temperature. The magnetic entropy (ΔSM) values of 10.77 J/kg-K and 17.46 J/kg-K, and refrigerant capacity (RC) 136.31 mJ/cm3 and 30.30 mJ/cm3 respectively are observed under an applied field of 20 kOe. The increment in magnetic entropy and refrigeration capacity with increasing Fe was associated with variation in lattice defects, and the presence of small amounts of magnetic/nonmagnetic secondary phases. Therefore, the increment in magnetic properties of these alloys was attributed to the enhancement of d-d exchange interaction due to the possible occupancy of vacant sites by Fe atoms, which indicates the development of relative anisotropy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work Sr doped BiFeO3 (BSFO) and CoFe2O4 (CFO), (BSFO-CFO) composite polycrystalline samples are prepared via simple solid state route. We report the existence of an irreversible room temperature field-induced a ferromagnetic (FM) transition that does not quench even after removing the magnetic field in BSFO and CFO composite system. The field induced FM order transition occurs over a long range of temperature from 330 K to 5 K and remain stable for at least 45 min after the field quenching. The fraction of field induced FM phase increases and its decay rate decreases at lower temperatures. The strong temperature dependence of the magnetic field induced FM phase is also observed. These findings will lead the researcher to design new composite materials system for desired applications.© 2018 Elsevier LtdFast-ion conductors are of broad interest in diverse fields such as electrochemical energy and non-volatile memory technologies. In this study, δ-phase Bi2O3 thin film was stabilized to room temperature via reactive magnetron sputter deposition and characterized by X-ray diffraction and Raman spectroscopy. The δ-phase Bi2O3 thin films were highly textured along (111) direction on various substrates and stable during annealing up to 400 °C in air and 200 °C in 5% H2 atmosphere. Electrochemical impedance measurements on δ-phase Bi2O3 thin films show an ionic conductivity of 0.001 S/cm at 400 °C and an activation energy of 0.98 eV. δ-phase Bi2O3 thin films based resistance switching cells (Ag/δ-Bi2O3/Pt or Ag/δ-Bi2O3/Au) show unipolar resistance switching phenomena. The voltage difference between the RESET and SET voltage is over 0.8 V and the resistance contrast between high resistance state (HRS) and low resistance state (LRS) is greater than 103. The resistance switching parameters, like FORMING voltage, SET voltage and RESET voltage can be controlled by the thickness of δ-Bi2O3. In the low resistance state, both the absence of superconductivity down to 2 K and magnetoresistance value indicates metallicity originates from non-stoichiometric bismuth oxide and not pure bismuth metal. The electric field required for SET and RESET operations are estimated to be 7 MV/m and 3.25 MV/m respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Systematic approach has been applied to obtain the boundary conditions for magnetization at an interface between ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) materials in the continuous medium approximation. Three order parameters are considered inside an interface of finite thickness magnetization M of FM, magnetizations of both sublattices M1 and M2 of AFM. The boundary conditions are defined in terms of some average properties of the FM/AFM interface. The interface has a finite thickness which is much less than spin wave length. This approach allowed to take into account the interface anisotropy, interface symmetric exchange coupling and interface coupling resulting from inversion symmetry breaking in the vicinity of the interface.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Exchange-coupled BiFeO3/ferromagnet thin film heterostructures are promising for a fast and power efficient control of magnetization of the ferromagnetic layer. In the paper, the results of the study of magnetic properties of the epitaxial Fe2B/BiFeO3 heterostructure on (0 0 1)-SrTiO3 substrate with ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectroscopy are presented. The hierarchy of magnetic anisotropies that determine the angular variation of the resonance field in-plane and in-/out-of the plane of the system include the tetragonal four-fold and uniaxial terms for the Fe2B layer, uniaxial term for antiferromagnetic BiFeO3 layer and the exchange coupling at the interface. We find out that the exchange bias direction can be switched by a strong enough applied magnetic field. Both the exchange bias and an in-plane FMR resonance field of the heterostructure are strongly affected by the illumination with λ = 405 nm light. An optical tunability of the exchange bias and ferromagnetic resonance fields of the heterostructure has been demonstrated.© 2018A co-precipitation synthesis method was used to obtain iron oxide nanoparticles coated with Yerba Mate (Ilex paraguariensis) extract. These particles have a core–shell structure with the iron oxide phase surrounded by an organic shell provided by an organic component which come from the Yerba Mate extract. Obtained nanoparticles were exhaustively characterized as powders and in aqueous colloidal suspensions using several techniques such as TEM, XRD, SAXS, TGA, ATR-FTIR, Raman and XPS spectroscopy, magnetic moment measurement and specimen ac susceptibility. All results together show that the obtained particles are single-crystal iron oxide particles with magnetite as the most probable phase. Yerba Mate extract shell mass to iron oxide core mass, mS/mc, could be increased up to 6.2 × 10−2, depending on the synthesis conditions. As a function of mS/mc the crystallite size of the nanoparticles decreased from about 15 nm to 11 nm, while saturation magnetization Ms and coercive field Hc of powders decreased. Ms. diminution was associated to increasing modification of core surface electronic states due to chemical bond of iron in iron oxide to Yerba Mate extract components; on the other hand, coercivity reduction was modelled on the basis of the increasing interparticle separation and dipolar interaction weakening, which occurs as shell thickness grows. Differences between the particle core mean size obtained with TEM, SAXS, XRD and magnetic measurements are observed. The fact that magnetic size was smaller than particle and crystallite sizes was attributed to the existence of intense dipolar interactions. It was found that low field susceptibility in a colloid sample was about 2.5 times that of the powder specimen, a result that shows that demagnetizing effects prevail in the powder specimen, while they may be absent in the colloid due to the larger interparticle mean separation expected in the latter. Analysis of powder and colloid susceptibility was done based on a recently developed model was in agreement with the one performed for the coercive field behaviour.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe demonstrate an electrically tunable terahertz (THz) modulator based on the single channel AlGaN/GaN high electrons mobility transistor (HEMT). HEMT integrated in the modulator structures is used to change the conductance of the modulator by the applied gate voltage Vg. Under the radiation of THz electromagnetic wave, the change of THz transmissivity through the modulator can be controlled by Vg. The THz modulation depth shows about 33% at the working frequency of 0.835 THz under the DC voltage Vg = −3 V. When the AC modulation voltage Vg is applied on the modulator, the THz modulation depth is about 23% at the modulation frequency of 20 MHz. The good agreement between experiments and finite difference time domain simulation indicates that the good performance of electrically tunable THz modulator can also be realized by using the single channel AlGaN/GaN heterostructure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work presents the preparation of a novel lightweight microwave absorber nanocomposite based on a combination of hollow microspheres of iron carbonyl (CI) and polyaniline (PANI) decorated with MWCNTs by a simple blending technique. The weight ratio of hollow CI to PANI decorated with MWCNTs is 2:1. The morphology of the hollow CI microspheres-prepared by Pitting corrosion of CI powder immersed into corrosive solution at different concentrations and for different periods of time-was investigated by scanning electron microscope (SEM). The complex permittivity, permeability and microwave absorption properties of the composite are studied in the frequency range of 8.5–12.5 GHz with 30 wt% of composite in paraffin. The optimal reflection loss (RL) of −25.5 dB is observed at 11 GHz with a matching thickness of 2.0 mm and a bandwidth of 3.6 GHz.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The spin-1/2 anisotropic Heisenberg model with antiferromagnetic exchange interactions in the presence of a longitudinal external magnetic field and a Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction is studied by employing the usual mean-field approximation. The magnetic properties are obtained and it is shown that only second-order phase transitions take place for any values of the theoretical Hamiltonian parameters. Contrary to previous results from effective field theory, no anomalies have been observed at low temperatures. However, some reentrancies still persist in some region of the phase diagram.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.To monitor the crack propagation and predict the fatigue life of ferromagnetic material, the metal magnetic memory (MMM) testing was carried out to the single edge notched specimen made from structural alloy steel under three-point bending fatigue experiment in this paper. The variation of magnetic memory signal Hp(y) in process of fatigue crack propagation was investigated. The gradient K of Hp(y) was investigated and compared with the stress of specimen obtained by finite element analysis. It indicated that the gradient K can qualitatively reflect the distribution and variation of stress. The maximum gradient Kmax and crack size showed a good linear relationship, which indicated that the crack propagation can be estimated by MMM testing. Furthermore, the damage model represented by magnetic memory characteristic was created and a fatigue life prediction method was developed. The fatigue life can be evaluated by the relationship between damage parameter and normalized life. The method was also verified by another specimen. Because of MMM testing, it provided a new approach for predicting fatigue life.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report magnetoelectric properties in Ga-doped α-Fe2O3 system in rhombohedral phase. The material is a canted ferromagnet at room temperature. The electric field controlled magnetic state switching provided a direct evidence of magneto-electric coupling in Ga-doped α-Fe2O3 system. At the first time, we report the unexplored electric field controlled magnetic state switching both in α-Fe2O3 and in Ga-doped α-Fe2O3 system. The response of magnetic state in Ga-doped α-Fe2O3 system under electric field is characteristically different from that in α-Fe2O3. The (un-doped) α-Fe2O3 system does not show electric field controlled magnetic exchange bias shift along magnetic field axis, unlike an extremely high electric field induced magnetic exchange bias shift up to the tune of 1120 Oe (positive) in Ga-doped α-Fe2O3 system. Moreover, the switching of magnetic state is highly sensitive to ON and OFF modes of the applied electric voltage, as well as to the change of polarity during in-field magnetic relaxation experiments. The switching of magnetic state to upper level for positive electric field and to down level for negative electric field excitation confirms a sufficiently strong coupling between electric and magnetic orders in Ga-doped hematite system. Such smart material in single phased lattice structure, very few in nature, is of increasing demand in today's technology for the multifunctional applications in next generation magnetic sensor, switching, non-volatile memory and spintronic devices.© 2018In this work, it is shown a comparative analysis of magnetic measurements that has been done over rapidly quenched melt-spinning alloyed ribbons with the formula NdyFe(86−y−x)B14Mx (X = 2, 4; Y = 7,8; M = Nb, Mo, Ti). The magnetic properties such as coercivity, saturation magnetization and energy product (B.H)max are analyzed for ribbons annealed for 20 min at 953 K in each case. It is observed that the sample with the highest saturation isNd7Fe77B14Mo2 (∼1400 kA.m−1) while the sample Nd8Fe74B14Nb4 has the lowest saturation value (∼600 kA.m−1). The sample Nd7Fe75B14Ti4 exhibits the lowest value (∼400 kA.m−1) while the Nd8Fe74B14Ti4 exhibits the highest value (∼700 kA.m−1) and the maximum (B.H)max value ∼110 kJ.m−3. The use of different experimental techniques, such as X-ray diffraction, Mössbauer spectroscopy, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, helped us to comprehend how M doping has influenced in a broad set of physical and chemical properties (e.g. crystalline phases, grain boundary doping enrichment, etc.) and how they correlate with the various observed magnetic features for these ribbons.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a novel eight-parameter empirical nonlinear current-voltage (I-V) model for gallium nitride (GaN) high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) is presented. A hyperbolic sine function is introduced in this model to describe the transfer characteristics between drain-source current, Ids, and gate-source voltage, Vgs. The self-heating and trapping effects have been considered and incorporated into the proposed model through expansion parameters. The proposed model has been verified on four different types of GaN HEMTs with good agreements between the simulated curves and the measured data. Comparison between the proposed model and other traditional non-square-law models indicates a significant accuracy improvement especially in linear region by the proposed model. This simple but accurate empirical I-V model can be easily implemented for computer aided circuit design and simulation with GaN HEMTs.© 2018Flake-like Fe@SiC composites were synthesized by a combined approach consisting of ball-milling and heat-assisted surface adhesion processes. The experimental results indicate that the Fe micropowders with an initial size of 30–40 μm can be completely milled into a flake-like shape with the diameter of 35 μm and the thickness of 10 μm after 5 h ball-milling, and then the flakes would be further fractured to smaller pieces as increasing the milling time. The as-made Fe flakes were subsequently encapsulated within SiC nanopowders by high-speed mixing at 120 °C for 2 h under nitrogen atmosphere. By turning the ball-milling time and the Fe/SiC ratios, the reflection loss (RL) could be optimized to −10 dB in the frequency ranges of 21.5–22.3 GHz and 20.1–26.5 GHz for the absorber thicknesses of 0.3 mm and 0.5 mm, respectively. In particular, the maximum RL peaks for the flake-like Fe@SiC composites shifted to higher frequencies compared with the spherical Fe@SiC composite due to the increased magnetic anisotropy. The enhanced microwave absorption properties are a synergistic effect of magnetic loss and dielectric loss, resulting from the heterogeneous components, and their proper electromagnetic impedance matching.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Mn55Al45, Mn55Al44C1, Mn52.2Al45.8C2 and Mn54.2Al43.8C2 were synthesized by the mechanical alloying method. It was the first time that a high purity τ phase up to 99% of weight percentage was obtained in Mn54.2Al43.8C2, which gave the highest saturation magnetization Ms = 570 kAm−1 ever reported by mechanical alloying up to date. The crystallite size of the τ phase of MnAl(C) alloy decreased with increasing carbon doping, varying from 79 to 159 nm. Additionally, the coercivity (Hc) was found to be inversely proportional to the crystallite size of τ phase. Effect of doping carbon and its position in the τ phase of MnAl(C) alloy were also investigated for the first time by first-principle calculations. It was found that by inserting carbon at the interstitial site in the tetragonal structure, a strong stabilization effect and an expansion of unit cell were observed, which are in good agreement with the experimental results. Moreover, our results indicate that carbon doping reduces the magnetic moment of Mn.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of lithium ferrite nanoparticles synthesized through the solution combustion route at different fuel to oxidizer ratio are studied using different techniques. Powder X-ray diffraction studies show that the fuel to oxidizer ratio is a critical parameter that determines the phase purity and degree of order of the samples. Magnetic studies show that the saturation magnetization and coercivity are comparable to those reported for lithium ferrites prepared using other methods. Saturation magnetization of Li0.8 sample at room temperature is 60 emu/g and is close to the bulk value. The hyperfine parameters obtained from the Mössbauer spectra of Li0.6 and Li0.8 also match the reported values of phase pure samples. Mössbauer spectra of samples prepared at stoichiometric and fuel rich conditions show the presence of Fe2+ cations in the ferrite phase, indicating that a reducing environment which reduces Fe3+ to Fe2+ ions is created as the fuel to oxidizer ratio is increased. The variation in the structural and magnetic properties of the samples, combined with TGA and FTIR studies, shows that the fuel lean condition is more appropriate for the direct formation of single phase lithium ferrite nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Coy(GdOx)1−y, CoyAg1−y, (Fe70Co30)y(AlOx)1−y superparamagnetic (SP) granular films were fabricated by magnetron co-sputtering technique and compared for their magnetic properties. The effect of the different matrix (GdOx, Ag, AlOx) is investigated for refining and separating magnetic particles in non-magnetic matrix by calculating the magnetic volume fraction (y), and the results indicate that the GdOx matrix can more effectively refine and separate magnetic particles. The Co0.44(GdOx)0.56 SP film with the maximum Co volume fraction (y = 0.44) approaches the highest magnetization of 608 emu/cm3 at 20 kOe, and initial susceptibility (1.74 × 10−5 H/m) as compared with Co-Ag, Fe70Co30-AlOx films and some systems of other researchers at room temperature (RT). The magnetic particle size and size distribution in these SP films is calculated by fitting with Langevin function and the results of calculation are consistent with the high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) results. To further confirm the SP behavior, the blocking temperature of the Co0.44(GdOx)0.56 film with the maximum Co volume fraction is measured as ∼145 K, which is below RT. Finally, the Co0.33(GdOx)0.67 thin film having a linear magnetization curve is used for the fabrication of the SP tip and further used for the A-MFM measurement on the bulk Sr-Ferrite (SrF) magnet. The fabricated Co0.33(GdOx)0.67 SP tip along with A-MFM shows an excellent result as compared to the state of art FePt hard magnetic tip using conventional MFM, and it can directly detect the intensity and identify the polarity of the stray field originating from a bulk Sr-Ferrite (SrF) permanent magnet without topography crosstalk in ambient atmosphere.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetostriction and 〈0 0 1〉 texture of anisotropic polycrystalline CoFe2O4. Slurries with well dispersion and low sintering shrinkage are aligned by the magnetic field of 2 T and sintered to prepare highly 〈0 0 1〉 textured CoFe2O4 samples. For the anisotropic sample, benefiting from the 〈0 0 1〉 fiber texture, a higher magnetostrictive property is achieved than that of isotropic polycrystalline sample prepared by dry compaction. The maximum magnetostriction up to −500 ppm at 1000 Oe is obtained, which reaches 85% of the highest value in single crystal (λ100 = −590 ppm). Meanwhile, the maximum strain-field derivative is also improved to −0.97 ppm/Oe at 250 Oe, which is highly beneficial for sonar detector and force sensor applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the efficient recycling method of sintered NdFeB waste was studied. The production process can be greatly simplified by crushing the recovered waste magnet into hundreds of micron-sized magnetic powder and preparing the magnet directly with orientating, molding and sintering. The magnetic properties of the magnet prepared by commercial N45 recovered waste can reach Br = 1.09 T, (BH)max = 196 kJ/m3 and Hcj = 601 kA/m. Adding a small amount of Dy2O3 can significantly improve the Br of the above magnet. The maximum Hcj can reach 1310 kA/m and (BH)max can reach 204 kJ/m3. The microstructure analysis shows that Dy2O3 diffused along the grain boundaries mainly and forms Dy-rich shell around the Nd2Fe14B grains which increase the difficulty of forming anti-magnetization.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The face- centered- tetragonal (FCT) or L10 phase of Fe50Pt50 (FePt) film is obtained on annealing FePt films at high temperature (∼600 °C), that usually grows as face-centered- cubic (FCC) phase. Cu as an additive up to ∼20 atomic%, which form ternary alloy FePtCu on mixing, is used to reduce the ordering temperature. We studied the formation of FePtCu ternary alloy: its structure, magnetic properties and grain growth at the interfaces of a FePt/Cu multilayer, as a function of annealing temperature (100 °C–600 °C), which is very less as compared to their melting temperatures. The study indicates the growth of a ternary alloy with composition of (FePt)0.42Cu0.58 in FCT phase on annealing the FePt/Cu multilayer at a moderate annealing temperature (∼400 °C). With a large addition of Cu at 56 atomic% in FePt, the ordering temperature reduces by ∼200 °C and form a ternary alloy with distinct magnetic properties. We observed rapid growth of ordered FCT phase with increase in crystallite size from 50 Å to 150 Å on annealing the multilayer in the range of 400 °C–600 °C. Interestingly, from macroscopic magnetization measurements we could identify the existence of a super-paramagnetic (SP) phase at room temperature with a typical particle size of ∼12 Å of ternary alloy on annealing the multilayer at 400 °C, which is much smaller than the crystallite size (∼50 Å). Annealing at 600 °C reduces the multilayer to a disordered magnetic phase. The room temperature SP nanoparticles of FePtCu alloy phase formed on annealing the multilayer at 400 °C are potential candidates in biomedical applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic measurements on oriented single crystals of Ho0.5Dy0.5FeO3 grown using optical floating zone furnace provide evidence for two spin reorientations of Fe3+ magnetic sublattice viz.,Γ4→Γ1→Γ2 at temperatures TSR1=49K and TSR2=26K. As magnetic field along c axis increases, the sample resumes Γ4 spin configuration and a large field is likely to disrupt the spin reorientation process. It is evident from isothermal magnetization along c axis that field induced Γ1→Γ4 transition is feasible within the intermediate temperature range of TSR1-TSR2 and can be triggered at a critical field. Such magnetic behavior is better understood as a consequence of anisotropic effective field, modified by the application of external magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on YIG film with small grain size (<12 nm) that has the potential to be used in microwave device application. The nanostructured film has been deposited on quartz substrate by a sol-gel spin coating technique, followed by annealing at temperatures in the range between 700 and 900 °C. The structural and magnetic properties of the film in the range 10–610 K were investigated. The X-ray diffraction results demonstrate that the films formed in a polycrystalline structure with lattice parameter in the range of 12.249–12.359 Å, lower than that of bulk materials. The saturation magnetization decreased not linearly with increasing the temperature from 10 to 300 K, differently from that reported for the bulk YIG. The coercivity value decreased with increasing temperatures (10–300 K), except for the film annealed at 800 °C. The Curie temperature of the film annealed at 700 °C was 554 K, however, other films showed higher Curie temperature values than that reported for bulk YIG. These properties are strongly influenced by the stress in the film's structure due to the different thermal expansion coefficient of the YIG and the quartz substrate.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A simple magnetometry of single ferromagnetic microparticles, which measures the falling velocity of a particle under the influence of magnetic Faraday force in air or liquid and characterizes the magnetic susceptibility of the particle, was constructed. Magnetic field gradient was applied to the falling particles and the velocity change of the falling particles was analysed taking into account the working forces to the particle. The feasibility of the present method was demonstrated by evaluating the magnetic susceptibility of ferromagnetic particles of cobalt, nickel and magnetic toner particles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Present paper describes variation of structure and magnetic properties in diamagnetically doped barium hexaferrites. Al3+ and In3+ diamagnetic ions were chosen for investigation of the correlation between the chemical composition, crystal structure, magnetic properties and microwave characteristics in BaFe12−xDIxO19 solid solutions. The changes of structure and electronic properties were investigated using neutron powder diffraction and Mossbauer spectroscopy. These data were used for discussion of the electromagnetic properties changes. It was demonstrated possibility of electromagnetic properties control in the samples. It was shown that all samples demonstrate correlation between electromagnetic properties and the level of chemical substitution. The transmission spectra of all the samples demonstrated a deep minimum in the frequency range 20–65 GHz which was associated with the natural ferromagnetic resonance (NFMR). Calculated data for electromagnetic absorption correlates well with experimental transmission spectra. External magnetic field leads to shift of the NFMR peak due to increase of magnetic anisotropy. It was concluded that the intrasublattice interactions were responsible for tailoring the magneto crystalline anisotropy and resonance parameters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the study of interlayer coupling between Co20Fe60B20 (CoFeB262) layers and the resulting magnetic properties of trilayer [CoFeB262 (y nm)/Cr (x nm)/CoFeB262 (20 nm)] films with symmetric (y = 20) and asymmetric (y = 100) structures. All as-deposited CoFeB262 films exhibit amorphous structure. Surface topography studies display clear and uniform surfaces with very fine and sparsely dispersed nanosized grains. The average surface roughness of the CoFeB262 films increases marginally as y is increased from 20 to 100 nm. The shape of magnetic hysteresis (M-H) loop of single-layer CoFeB262 (y nm) films transforms from rectangular shape for CoFeB262 (20 nm) film to transcritical one for CoFeB262 (100 nm) film. This is mainly due to change in magnetic domain structure from in-plane magnetization to dense stripe domain with increase in y. On the other hand, the shape of the M-H loops in trilayer films strongly depends on x, y and temperature. All symmetric trilayer films show single magnetization reversal process at room temperature with a kink in the first quadrant for films with x < 1. Coercivity (HC), saturation field (Hsat) and remanence ratio (MR/MS) show oscillatory behaviors as a function of x. For asymmetric films, the transcritical loop changes into rectangular one after the introduction of Cr interlayer. This also causes a large reduction in Hsat and enhances MR/MS sharply. Temperature dependent M-H loops at low temperatures reveal the disappearance of the kink in symmetric trilayer films and the formation of additional steps in asymmetric trilayer films with x > 0.5. The relative increase in HC with decreasing temperature is found to be larger for symmetric films as compared to asymmetric ones. The observed results are explained on the basis of change in the interlayer coupling between CoFeB262 layers with change in x, y and temperature dependent interfacial strain, which modifies the nature of interlayer coupling. These results also demonstrate that dense stripe domain of thicker CoFeB262 layers can be easily converted into simple in-plane magnetization using trilayer thin films.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization (both dc and ac) of pyrochlore Eu2Ti2O7 have been investigated. Ac susceptibility (χ/ & χ//) measurements reveal a new unusual spin freezing below 35 K for pure Eu2Ti2O7. Frequency dependence of these ac χ// peak positions indicate slow spin relaxation near this temperature and it follows the Arrhenius formula suggesting a thermally activated relaxation process. The origin of this spin freezing has been attributed essentially to a single ion process which is associated to Eu3+ spin relaxation. Non-magnetic dilution by Y3+ ions also confirms the single ion freezing.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effects of acid and heat treatment on the magnetic anisotropy of amorphous Fe67Co10Cr3Si5B15 ribbons are studied, using the angular-dependent magnetization and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR). The change of FMR spectrum after acid treatment indicates that the surface precipitates in raw sample contain some magnetic elements. A post annealing under the field of 2000 Oe is applied to modify the magnetic anisotropy of ribbons, with the annealing temperature varying from 370 to 410 °C. At 370 °C, a magnetoelastic anisotropy field of +40 Oe is found in the sample with 60 min acid-treatment, while it is −74 Oe for the sample with 30 min acid-treatment. However, it approaches to zero at 410 °C for all samples, indicating the internal stress is fully released. This study demonstrates that FMR is an effective technique on investigating the details of magnetic anisotropy configuration against various post-treatment conditions for amorphous ribbons.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoelectric properties of ferrite garnets are of great interest due to possibility of electric control of micromagnetic structures at room temperatures promising for applications in advanced technologies. However, the governing mechanisms underlying magnetoelectric coupling and origin of ferroelectricity in these materials remain under discussion. In this article, we appeal to polar mechanism related to electric dipole moments of Fe3+ and rare earth ions in order to explain ferroelectricity of epitaxial ferrite garnet film. We show that existence of electric dipole moments of ‘d’ (Fe3+) ions and ‘f’ (rare earth) ions is allowed by the local symmetry of the environments and calculate electric polarization related to electric dipole moments of the ‘d’ and the ‘f’ ions in inhomogeneously magnetized ferrite garnet film. Our results suggest that magnetoelectricity of iron garnets is attributed to polarizability of Fe3+ and rare earth ions; the conducted calculations demonstrate the difference between polarization impacts given by electric dipole moments of rare earth and iron ions. Polarization depend on ground state of the ions, local symmetry of the ions environments and the type of magnetic inhomogeneity.© 2018The inhomogeneity of the Curie temperature in large-sized LaFe13−x−yCoxSiyC0.15 alloys is studied. The Curie temperature of the large-sized LaFe13−x−yCoxSiyC0.15 alloys shows a decreasing tendency from the edge to the sub-edge region of the alloy, while the Curie temperature of the small-sized sheet-shaped LaFe11.2Co0.5Si1.3C0.15 alloy is same in different regions. Besides, chemical analysis shows that the Co and Si content reveals a decreasing tendency from the edge to the sub-edge region in large-sized alloys as well, which may be attributed to the segregation of Co and Si element during slow solidification in large-sized LaFe13−x−yCoxSiyC0.15 alloys. So it can be inferred that the segregation of Co and Si could result in the inhomogeneity of Curie temperature in large-sized LaFe13−x−yCoxSiyC0.15 alloys. Moreover, both the experiment and the calculation find that the mixed usage of the inhomogeneous LaFe13−x−yCoxSiyC0.15 alloys will reduce the maximum magnetic entropy change, which needs more attention in industrial application of La(Fe1−xSix)13 based alloys.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Low-cost Ce-Fe-B permanent magnets has stimulated considerable research efforts as the most potential alternative for those relying on expensive rare earth elements Nd, Pr, Dy, Tb. However, the intrinsic magnetic properties of Ce-Fe-B alloys are much inferior to those of Nd-Fe-B alloys. In this paper, we substitute Ce with La to get more advanced magnetic properties. The phase stability and magnetic properties of (Ce1−xLax)2Fe14B (x = 0–0.7) compounds prepared by melt spinning technique are studied systematically by experiments and first principle calculations. The calculated substitution energy is positive which indicates that La substitution will lower the structural stability and the decomposition of 2:14:1 phase was founded from the X-ray diffraction patterns. The enhancement of the magnetic properties can be explained by the magnetovolume effect. According to the computational result, the unit cell volume expands slightly with La substitution, which agrees well with the fact that the radius of La is larger than Ce. Furthermore, the moments of Fe are volume-dependent and increase with volume expanding.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The classical Heisenberg type spin Hamiltonian is widely used for simulations of finite temperature properties of magnetic metals often using parameters derived from first principles calculations. In itinerant electron systems, however, the atomic magnetic moments vary their magnitude with temperature and the spin Hamiltonian should thus be extended to incorporate the effects of longitudinal spin fluctuations (LSF). Although the simple phenomenological spin Hamiltonians describing LSF can be efficiently parameterized in the framework of the constrained Local Spin Density Approximation (LSDA) and its extensions, the fundamental problem concerning the integration in classical spin space remains. It is generally unknown how to integrate over the spin magnitude. Two intuitive choices of integration measure have been used up to date – the Murata-Doniach scalar measure and the simple three dimensional vector measure. Here we derive the integration measure by considering a classical limit of the quantum Heisenberg spin Hamiltonian under conditions leading to the proper classical limit of the commutation relations for all values of the classical spin magnitude and calculate the corresponding ratio of the number of quantum states. We show that the number of quantum states corresponding to the considered classical spin magnitude is proportional to this magnitude and thus a non-trivial integration measure must be used. We apply our results to the first-principles simulation of the Curie temperatures of the two canonical ferromagnets bcc Fe and fcc Ni using a single-site LSF Hamiltonian with parameters calculated in the LSDA framework in the Disordered Local Moment approximation and a fixed spin moment constraint. In the same framework we compare our results with those obtained from the scalar and vector measures.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe two-finger stacked bottom gate and top gate fin indium gallium zinc aluminum oxide thin-film transistors (IGZAO TFTs) were fabricated. Since the bottom induced channel layer and the top induced channel layer were formed in the stacked TFTs using the bottom gate and the top gate, simultaneously. Consequently, drain-source current and transconductance of the stacked TFTs were enhanced about twice as those of the bottom gate TFTs and the top gate TFTs. The optimal performances of the stacked TFTs could be obtained, when the whole channel layer was induced as the carrier transportation path.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanocarriers combining two or more different approaches in the same particle has been a new trend in research worldwide. Among the strategies studied, magnetic nanoparticles with dual properties related to drug delivery and diagnostic imaging represent a significant improvement in the response of chemotherapy and in a real-time monitoring of drug distribution. Nanocarriers combining dual properties such as thermal and magnetic, enable controlling the release and modulate a treatment giving more specificity of action. This is possible since a magnetic external field can allow the adequate movement of nanoparticles and provide a means to remotely heating the target tissue safely. The temperature increase can trigger changes in the structure of nanocarriers leading to the release of drugs. This field of study known as magnetic fluid hyperthermia (MFH), currently in order to improve the selective heating process has been used superparamagnetic nanostructured, mainly made up of iron oxide, coated or encapsulated in, mostly, polymeric nanoparticles. In this way, this review aims to provide an updated review of the state of art of nanostructured systems that combines simultaneously magnetic hyperthermia and thermal properties in the preclinical level investigation.© 2018 Elsevier LtdOrganic semiconductors (OSCs) are nowadays called upon as promising candidates for next generation electronics devices. Due to disorder structure of these materials, a high density of traps are present in their energy band gap which affect the performance of these devices. In the present manuscript, we have investigated the role of traps on charge transport in PCDTBT thin film by measuring the temperature dependent J(V) characteristics in hole only device configuration. The obtained results were analyzed by space charge limited (SCL) conduction model. It has been found that the room temperature J(V) characteristics follow Mott-Gurney square law for trap-free SCL conduction. But below 278 K, the current increases according to trap-filling SCL law with traps distributed exponentially in the band gap of semiconductor. Furthermore, after reaching a crossover voltage of VC ∽ 12 V, all the traps filled by injected carriers and the trap-filling SCL current switch to trap-free SCL current. The hole mobility of trap-free SCL current is about one order higher as compared trap-filling SCL current and remains constant with temperature.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the hot-carrier-induced current capability degradation of a 600 V lateral insulated gate bipolar transistor (LIGBT) on thick silicon on insulator (SOI) substrate is investigated. Our experiments found that, for the SOI-LIGBT, the worst stress condition is the maximum gate voltage (Vgmax) condition and the current degradation is dominated by the damages in the channel region under the Vgmax stress condition. However, further analyses show that the influence of channel region damages on the collector current degradation increases with the increase of measured collector voltage and is maximum in the current saturation region. Therefore, in our opinion, the hot-carrier-induced current capability degradation of the SOI-LIGBT should be evaluated by the degradation of saturation current under the Vgmax stress condition. In addition, a novel SOI-LIGBT structure with an external p-type region was also proposed, which can alleviate the damage in the channel region by reducing the lateral electric field peak. Our experimental results demonstrate that the proposed structure could optimize the hot-carrier reliability effectively with the other characteristics maintained.© 2018The rare-earth giant magnetostrictive material has received considerable attention in recent years and is known as a new type of high efficient magnetic – mechanical conversion material. Its performance is far superior to that of other materials such as piezoelectric ceramic and so on. Giant magnetostrictive actuator has been widely used in precise driving occasions for its excellent performance. The experimental analysis system for giant magnetostrictive material is designed. Several important parameters have been discussed separately by static and dynamic experiment. Further, the nonlinear magnetic hysteresis characteristic is analyzed by theoretical method. The turning machining analysis model is established and the analytical solution is verified by comparison with the test result. The influence of various parameters is discussed at the same time. Obviously, the research results and methods provide a basis for giant magnetostrictive actuator.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Tailoring of properties by changing morphology or by doping is very much required for the suitable application of any materials. Here we report the effect of yttrium doping on microstructure, magnetic and electrical properties of cobalt ferrite nanoparticles prepared through citrate auto-ignition method. Rietveld refinement analysis of X-ray diffraction pattern confirms the growth of pure and single phase cobalt ferrite nanoparticles which corroborates with transmission electron microscopy (TEM) study. Microstructural parameters, obtained from Rietveld analysis showed that oxygen vacancy is maximum and inter-ionic bond lengths and bond angles attain optimum values for 15 mol% yttrium doped sample. An observed value of saturation magnetization indicates the existence of spin canting phenomenon which was explained by Yafet-Kittel model. Magnetic parameters such as anisotropy constant, anisotropy field have been estimated using Law of Approach (L.A.) formalism. Existence of interparticle dipolar interaction (IPDI) in the system was established with the help of Mr/Ms ratio around room temperature. Maximum electrical conductivity has been observed for the 15 mol% doped sample as estimated from Mott's 3-D V.R.H. model, which can be attributed to the optimum values of microstructural parameters at this composition.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Neodymium iron boron (NdFeB) based magnets have high magnetic energy densities and thus are the material of choice for motor designs in electric vehicles, where traction motors must be as small, lightweight, and efficient as possible. However, recent fluctuations in the price of rare-earth minerals have made NdFeB a far less attractive material. Recycling NdFeB magnets is one method to mitigate price fluctuations going forward. Indeed, magnet-to-magnet recycling allows the manufacture of NdFeB magnets using end-of-use waste NdFeB feedstock materials. These recycled magnets display substantially improved magnetic and physical properties compared to precursor alloys. Herein, the performance of two identical electric motors are compared; one motor powered by recycled NdFeB magnets produced via magnet-to-magnet processing, and the other powered by conventional NdFeB magnets made from virgin elements. The results demonstrate that flux linkage measured at open circuit and the torque measured at closed circuit are 7.0% and 6.4% higher, respectively, for the motor containing recycled magnets versus the motor containing conventional magnets. This was achieved despite the 15% lower Dy content of the recycled magnets as compared to conventionally produced magnets. This performance advantage demonstrates the utility of magnet-to-magnet recycled NdFeB technology in real world applications.© 2017The critical behavior of La0.6Sr0.4Mn0.9Al0.1O3 compound was investigated based on the data of static magnetic measurements in the vicinity of its critical temperature TC. Through various techniques such as modified Arrott plot, Kouvel-Fisher method and critical isotherm analysis, the estimated critical exponents were found to be β = 0.45, γ = 1.1, δ = 3.44 at TC = 321 K which is close to Mean-Field model values. The reliability of the critical exponents’ values was confirmed by the Widom scaling relation and the universal scaling hypothesis. In order to estimate the spontaneous magnetization MS (T) at a given temperature, we used a process based on the analysis, in the mean-field theory, of the magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM) versus the magnetization data. An excellent agreement was found between the spontaneous magnetization determined from the entropy change ((−ΔSM) vs. M2) and the classical extrapolation from the Arrott curves (µ0H/M vs. M2). Moreover, the local exponent n was studied in terms of the field dependence of the magnetic entropy change. It was noted that n evolves with field in the entire studied temperature range of our sample, indicating the validity of the mean-field theory for our compound.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe studied how substrate thinning affected the electronic transport characteristics of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs. By thinning their sapphire substrate from 460 µm to 80 µm, we varied the residual stress in these HEMTs. The thinned sample showed decreased drain–source current and occurrence of kink effect. Furthermore, shown by current transient measurements and time constant analysis, the detrapping behaviors of trap states shifted toward a larger time constant, and the detrapping behavior under the gate and in the gate–drain access region showed increased amplitude. By using pulsed current-voltage measurements, the thinned sample showed a positive shift of the threshold voltage, a decrease in peak transconductance, and an aggravation in current collapse, as compared with the thick one. The degradation of electrical behavior were associated with the structural degradation, as confirmed by the increase of pit density on the thinned sample surface.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Diluted bulk magnetic alloy semiconductors DyxGe1−x (x ≤ 0.02) were prepared by a two-step fabrication procedure and studied experimentally by XRD, EDX and magnetic methods. The polycrystalline materials had the ccp (cubic closed-packed) structure of the host Germanium up to ≈2 at.% of Dysprosium. They exhibited different low-temperature and high-temperature behavior. Low-field dc magnetic susceptibility data showed sharp peaks and irreversibility between zero-field cooled and field-cooled states for x < 0.02. A stable antiferromagnetic phase with temperature of the antiferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition TN = 25 K was observed at x = 2 at.% of Dysprosium. The solubility range of the binary DyxGe1−x alloy system is limited to ∼2 at.% due to the large atomic radius of the solute. The low-temperature magnetic phase is characterized as spin-glass below 2 at.%. The magnetic relaxation and non-linear susceptibility χnl of Dy0.01Ge0.99 were analyzed, and the spin-glass phase was defined with the critical exponents of the phase transition β = 0.52 ± 0.10, γ = 2.85 ± 0.10 and δ = 6.49 ± 0.02. From the Curie-Weiss behavior of the susceptibility at high temperatures, we determined an average effective Dy-Dy exchange constant J1 = −6.90 K and effective magnetic moment per Dy ion µeff = 10.08 µB. The rare-earth Dy atoms behave as isolated in Ge matrix at high-temperatures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We studied the evolution of the magnetic state of a majority logic gate consisting of a cluster of five dipolarly-coupled nanomagnets, fabricated by e-beam lithography, under the application of a clocking field, using a combination of magneto-optical Kerr effect and magnetic force microscopy. The data were interpreted by advanced GPU-based micromagnetic simulations, where, in addition to the single ideal-shaped gate, a 3 × 3 array of “realistic gates” whose shape is directly derived from scanning electron microscopy images, is considered. A fairly good agreement between measurements and simulations has been achieved, showing that asynchronous switching of nominally identical gates may occur, because of unavoidable structural and morphological imperfections. Moreover, a slight misalignment of 1°−2° of the clocking field with respect to the hard axis of the dots may be detrimental for the correct logic operation of the gates. It follows that reliable, error-free and reproducible operations in future magnetologic devices would require tight control and precision of both the lithographic process and the direction of the clocking field. Moreover, a significant improvement could be insured by a stronger dipolar coupling between the dots, for instance increasing their thickness and/or using materials with larger magnetization.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The dependence of spin wave resonance (SWR) frequency on the surface anisotropy, the interlayer coupling, the ferromagnetic layer thickness and the external magnetic field in the bilayer ferromagnetic film have been investigated by using the linear spin wave approximation and Green's function technique. We find that the SWR frequency of the ferromagnetic bilayer film are shifted to higher values corresponding to those of above factors, respectively. The lowest four modes can be controlled by the surface anisotropy of A, B layer and the symmetry of the film. The SWR frequency of the energetically lowest mode is no affected except for applied magnetic field. A notable rapidly increasing behavior appears in frequency with the increasing of interlayer coupling.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this research, electro-magnetic (EM) absorption was investigated for M-type strontium hexaferrite with chemical composition, Sr0.85La0.15(MnZr)xFe12-2xO19 (x = 0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, 1.0) at microwave frequencies. Complex permittivity (ɛ′-jɛ′′) and complex permeability (µ′ - jµ′′) was measured using transmission and reflection (T/R) based waveguide method in the K-band (18–26.5 GHz) and Ka-band (26.5–40 GHz) frequency range. The variation of reflection loss (RL) with sample thickness, frequency and substitution has been analyzed. The matching thickness of the synthesized ferrite was successfully predicted from quarter-wavelength (λ/4) mechanism which helps to optimize the minimum reflection loss (RL) in the material. In K-band, the minimum reflection loss (RL) of −47.8 dB was obtained for composition x = 1.0 with −10 dB (90%) bandwidth of 7.97 GHz and −20 dB (99%) bandwidth of 5.6 GHz at sample thickness 1.1 mm. In Ka-band, the maximum absorption with minimum RL of −29.9 dB with −10 dB bandwidth of 8.72 GHz was obtained for composition x = 0.50 at 0.85 mm sample thickness. These synthesized ferrites find application as thin sheet of microwave absorber with broad bandwidth for EMI (electromagnetic interference) shielding and radar camouflaging.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetism sources and mechanism of Nd doping and point defect are frequently controversial. To solve these controversies, ZnO supercell models with different doping modes of Nd were constructed, and the geometric structure optimization and energy calculation of the established models were calculated based on the generalized gradient approximation method of density functional theory. Calculation results indicated that the formation energy of Nd doped ZnO systems completely followed the sequence Zn15NdO16 > Zn15NdO15 > Zn14NdO16. For systems in which Nd doping and Zn vacancy coexist, a strong hybrid coupling electron exchange effect was present among the unpaired O-2p that was nearest to the Zn vacancy, the Zn-4 s orbit that was second nearest to the Zn vacancy, and the Nd-3d orbit. Therefore, the magnetism originated from the RKKY double-exchange interaction, which was based on the hole carriers in the complexus as the medium. In contrast with the Nd doping system, systems with coexisting Nd doping and O vacancy did not exhibit increased magnetism. Thus, the systems are worthless in designing and preparing dilute magnetic semiconductors. The magnetic moment of the systems with coexisting Nd doping and Zn vacancy was the largest. Thus, the systems are valuable in such design and preparation. The absorption spectra of Zn16NdiO16 and Zn15NdO16 were red shifted under the condition without stress, whereas the absorption spectrum of Zn15NdO16 with stress was blue shifted and the magnetic moment increased. The Curie temperature of Nd double-doped ZnO system was higher than room temperature when the Nd-Nd distance was the shortest.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, bulk anisotropic sintered Sm2Fe17N3 magnets were prepared from submicron-sized Sm2Fe17N3 powder by spark plasma sintering. The pure sintered Sm2Fe17N3 magnets contain high α-Fe content and have a very low coercivity of 4.1 kOe and poor squareness of 7.1%. The SmCu nanoflakes were added as oxygen absorber to provide a low-oxygen sintering condition. The resultant sintered magnets contain low α-Fe content and show a high coercivity of 10.3 kOe. In this SmCu added sintered magnets, the decomposition of Sm2Fe17N3 phase was suppressed and SmCu powder was oxidized instead. The experimental results of this study suggest that an addition of suitable high activity oxygen absorber may be effective in preventing the formation of α-Fe precipitates and improving the coercivity in the fabrication of R-TM compounds based nanostructured bulk magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Single phase samples of Gd1−xYxCrO3 (x = 0.0–1.0) were prepared by sol-gel method. Lattice parameters obtained from the Rietveld refinement are found to decrease from a = 5.3129 Å, b = 5.5210 Å, and c = 7.6040 Å for x = 0 to a = 5.2428 Å, b = 5.5208 Å and c = 7.5340 Å for x = 1.0. The temperature variation of magnetization measurements show that all samples exhibit antiferromagnetic transitions and the Neel temperature (TN) decreases from TN = 174 K for x = 0.0 to 142 K for x = 1.0. Interesting magnetization reversal behavior is observed as the temperature is lowered from TN under field cooled condition and the magnetic compensation temperature, Tcomp is found to decrease from 136 K for x = 0 to 42 K for x = 0.70. These samples exhibit tunable positive and negative exchange bias fields with a maximum negative value of −1.17 kOe for x = 0.50. The origin of magnetization reversal and exchange bias field is explained by considering the competition between the paramagnetic moment of Gd3+ ions under the influence of negative internal field and the weak ferromagnetic component of Cr3+ ions due to canted antiferromagnetic ordering.© 2018Tailoring writability and obtaining better signal-to-noise ratio performance by tuning the magnetic and microstructural properties of FePt media is of great interest in the bid to achieve high areal densities for next generation hard disk drives (HDDs). Conventional ways to tune FePt media are primarily by either the insertion of additional layers, or by inclusion of segregants such as B, C, Ni, SiO2 etc. Here we describe an approach that involves modifying growth kinetics by N inclusion, via plasma treatment in FePt bilayers (consisting of a hard and a soft FePt layer). The soft FePt layer aids in obtaining easy writability, while nitrogen plasma treatment of the interface of the two FePt layers facilitates suitable tailoring of the microstructure. This approach contributed to lowering of grain dimension as well as reduction in domain sizes in the FePt bilayers, but with the unwanted side-effects of reduction in squareness and ordering. However, we further propose a method to alleviate these concerns by the deposition of the soft FePt layer in partial nitrogen atmosphere, that restored the squareness and ordering while retaining the smaller domains obtained by nitrogen plasma treatment. Thus, the proposed approach provides a potential direction towards meeting the mutually conflicting requirements of easy writability and better signal-to-noise ratio performance in FePt media.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic phase transitions and their thermal transformation arrest (TTA) behavior of Cr-substituted Mn2Sb were investigated. Mn1.92Cr0.08Sb showed the first-order magnetic transition between antiferromagnetic (AFM) and ferrimagnetic (FRI) state. The TTA phenomenon was observed in field-cooling process under magnetic field of μ0H ≥ 4 T. The relaxation process from the arrested FRI to AFM state was explained by stretched exponential function. As decreasing temperature, the magnetic relaxation changed from Arrhenius-type to non-Arrhenius ones. The characteristic relaxation time was evaluated to be the order of 105 ∼ 106 s, which indicated indeed arresting of the magnetic transition. During the process, the decrease in the magnetization due to the relaxation changed into an increase with the thermal fluctuation of ∼1%. These relaxation behaviors are explained by the density and the frequency of the reversal of triple-layered magnetic moments.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The properties of the one-dimensional antiferromagnetic chain with frustrated side spins are studied by means of the spin wave theory, the exact diagonalization method and the density matrix renormalization group method. The results show that the Lieb–Mattis type ferrimagnetic state is always the ground state when α<αc1 . The system undergoes a first-order phase transition accompanied by a spontaneous symmetry breaking and its acoustic excitation spectrum softens completely near k=0 at the critical point αc1 . In the intermediate parameter region αc1 <α<αc2 , the ground state is a nonmagnetic state called dimer-tetramer state with a small spin gap. A gapped-gapless Berezinskii-Kosterlitz-Thouless phase transition occurs at another critical point αc2 beyond which the nonmagnetic dimer–monomer state becomes the ground state. The value of the critical point αc2 can be precisely determined not only by the level-spectroscopy method, but also the method based on comparing the magnitude of the two types of correlation functions and the method of a scaling analysis of the gap.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Powder samples of La0.95T0.05CrxMn1− xO3 (T = Ca or Sr, 0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.30), two series of ABO3 perovskite manganites, were synthesized using the sol–gel method. X-ray diffraction analysis showed that all the samples had a single ABO3 perovskite phase with space group R3‾c. Unique magnetic properties were obtained for the oxides: (i) the Curie temperature of each series of samples first increased and then decreased with increasing Cr content (x); (ii) the average molecular magnetic moment reached the maximum value when x = 0.08 for the Ca-doped samples, but it monotonically decreased with increasing x for the Sr-doped samples. This behavior was explained using an O 2p itinerant-electron model for magnetic oxides.© 2018Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) and coaxial line techniques are employed for studying the high-frequency magnetic properties of thin Fe films deposited onto a flexible polymer substrate by magnetron sputtering. Multiple resonances are observed in the FMR spectra measured in X frequency range for films with thickness from 0.1 to 2.0 μm. The resonance magnetic fields are found to depend on of the film thickness and on the orientation of external magnetic field relative to the film plane. The variation of the FMR parameters with the layer thickness may be attributed to differences in the shape and size of nanocrystallites formed during the deposition of films of different thicknesses. Low-field resonance modes are found in addition to the homogeneous FMR of saturated magnetization. Qualitative agreement is observed between values of the resonance magnetic fields determined by FMR and coaxial line techniques.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a serious of CoFeB films of 30 nm prepared by a DC magnetron sputtering on Si substrates with different roughness etched by NaOH solution are investigated. It is found that the coercivity (Hc) and effective damping coefficient α are influenced by the substrate roughness of the films. As the substrate roughness increased to 73.9 nm, the Hc ranged from 14.4 Oe to 81.4 Oe; the α, from 0.012 to 0.11 at the same time. It is attributed to the function of magnetic moment pinning and magnon-magnon scattering caused by the rough substrate. Thus, the tunable performances of soft magnetism and high frequency of CoFeB films make them become potential candidates for microwave-based devices and other tunable microwave devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic, magnetic and elastic properties for type (1) structure of half-Heusler compounds Mn2GexAs1−x (x = 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, 1.00) have been investigated within GGA and GGA + U methods. Firstly, the Mn2Ge0.5As0.5 has a tetragonal structure, while the Mn2Ge0.25As0.75, Mn2Ge0.75As0.25 and Mn2Ge present a cubic structure. Secondly, the four compounds are all half-metallic (HM) ferrimagnets and their total magnetic moments Mt satisfy with the Slater–Pauling rule Mt = 18-Zt. Thirdly, the formation energy and cohesion energy show that they are all thermodynamic stable with GGA method, while with GGA + U method the Mn2Ge0.25As0.75 is still thermodynamic stable but the rest three compounds are thermodynamic meta-stable. Finally, with GGA method both Mn2Ge0.25As0.75 and Mn2Ge0.5As0.5 are mechanical stable under pressure 0–4 GPa, while the Mn2Ge0.75As0.25 and Mn2Ge lose mechanical stable when the pressure exceed 1.3 and 0.5 GPa, respectively. But with GGA + U method the four compounds are all mechanical stable under pressure 0–4 GPa.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Ni-Cr ferrites were prepared by the technology sol-gel with participation of auto-combustion (SGA). The effect of Cr3+ ions addition on the microstructure, chemical composition, mechanical, magnetic, optical, dielectric, and electric properties of NiCrxFe2−xO4 ferrites were systematically studied. The added of Cr3+ ions significantly affects the formation of pores and grain size of ferrites. The micro-hardness values decreases from 9.93 GPa to 5.76 GPa with increasing chromium content. The Hall coefficient, conductivity type, concentration of charge carriers, and specific conductivity were found. In Ni-Cr ferrites dc-conductivity increases with Cr-concentration and is within the limits from 2.86·10−5 Ω−1∙m−1 to 1.35·10−2 Ω−1∙m−1. It is shown that with the increasing temperature the conductivity of NiCrxFe2−xO4 ferrites also increases. It is found that at low temperatures the Verwey jump conductivity mechanism is dominant, and in high temperature range the conductivity is described by the band model. The substituted samples showed broad sextet, which is resolved into subsextets, corresponding to tetrahedrally and octahedrally coordinated Fe cations. Experimental Mössbauer spectra of nickel-chromium ferrite powders also contain doublets. Cation distribution calculated using XRD and Mössbauer data indicates a decrease in Fe3+[B]/Fe3+(A) ratio with increasing chromium concentration. The Curie temperature, initial permeability, and saturation magnetization decrease with increasing substitution of Cr3+ ions. The decreasing of saturation magnetization from 33.9 A·m·kg−1 to 7.7 A·m·kg−1 is due to the fact that the Cr3+ ions occupy exclusively B-sites in the spinel structure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The colloidal nanoparticles FemOn–SiO2 have been obtained using the sol–gel method. Based on the data obtained with transmission electron microscopy and dynamic light scattering, a lognormal size distribution of nanoparticles with an average size of 20–30 nm have been constructed. The shape of Mössbauer spectra implies that they have the characteristic relaxation time of the order of 10–9–10–10 s that corresponds to the grain size of about 10 nm. X-ray diffractometry indicates that the crystalline phase of the particles is magnetite. Hysteresis loops have been traced with a vibration sample magnetometer and the demagnetization curve of anhysteretic remanent magnetization measured with a SQUID magnetometer. Theoretical analysis of magnetization data based on a model of magnetostatically interacting superparamagnetic nanoparticles confirms the presence of both separate superparamagnetic magnetite particles (less than 20 nm in size) and those organized into clusters with an average size of about 30 nm.© 2018The complex impact of partially substituting Fe and Nb by Co and Ge on the thermal, microstructural and soft magnetic characteristics was investigated for melt spun and annealed Fe72.7- xCoxAl0.8Si17.5B5Cu1Nb3- yGey (x = 4, 8; y = 0, 0.4) alloys. The onset temperatures of the primary crystalline (Tx1) and the secondary crystalline (Tx2) are both declined and the Curie temperature of amorphous phase (TC am) is enhanced when Co content increase from x = 4 to x = 8. Although the crystallization temperatures are not affected by the partial substitution of Nb with Ge for x = 8, the TC am increases with respect to the alloy without Ge. When Co content x = 4, Ge substitution is found to not only decrease the Tx1 but also enhance the TC am. Fe64.7Co8Al0.8Si17.5B5Cu1Nb2.6Ge0.4 alloy has the highest TC am about 410 °C in all investigated alloys, and exhibits excellent high-temperature magnetic properties, and its higher initial permeability μi about 5000 at 10 kHz can be held up to 475 °C, which exhibits a potential prospect for the elevated temperature application.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The optical, magnetooptical, electrical, and magnetic properties of La0.67Ba0.33MnO3 films grown on the SrTiO3 and ZrO2(Y2O3) substrates have been studied. The temperature and magnetic field dependences of magnetotransmission of light in the La0.67Ba0.33MnO3/ZrO2(Y2O3) film with a variant structure exhibit features which can be attributed to an optical response to tunnel magnetoresistance – tunnel magnetotransmission. Unlike the optical response to colossal magnetoresistance, existing near the Curie temperature only, the tunnel magnetotransmission increases at T → 0 K, has a complex hysteresis behavior with the change of sign of the effect, and saturates in magnetic fields above 1 kOe. The observed tunnel magnetotransmission has been interpreted within the magnetorefractive effect theory developed for granular films.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A method of dimensionless quantities for the analysis of hysteresis phenomena is proposed. Dimensionless hysteresis quantities of zero, first, second and third orders are introduced. Analytic expressions are obtained for dimensionless hysteresis quantities in a weak magnetic field. In the Rayleigh region, the order of dimensionless hysteresis quantities coincides with the exponent of the power function that relates these quantities with a hysteresis factor κr. It is shown that the scaling in the Rayleigh region extends over the entire region of the magnetic field in which permeability increases. Analytical expressions for the hysteresis losses and permeability are obtained, which are confirmed experimentally.© 2018 Elsevier LtdZnO/BiFeO3/ZnO multilayer was fabricated on silicon (Si) substrate by radio-frequency magnetron sputtering system. The resistive switching characteristics in ZnO/BiFeO3/ZnO devices are observed, and the resistive switching behavior can be modulated by white light.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic anisotropy of Co80Pt20 films deposited directly on glass substrates (without any seed layer) at room temperature tends to be inclined. The degree of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy can be slightly increased by introducing a Cu layer or a Cu/Ru (Cu on Ru) bilayer under the Co80Pt20 film. However, when Co80Pt20 films are deposited onto a Ru/Cu (Ru on Cu) bilayer, the magnetic anisotropy of the films becomes perpendicular. Moreover, from this study, we found that an fcc Cu (1 1 1) under-layer can promote the hcp Ru (0 0 0 2) seed layer, which can, in turn, induce a good (0 0 0 2) texture in the hcp Co80Pt20 magnetic layer. As a result, Co80Pt20/Ru/Cu/glass films display excellent (or improved) perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. In conclusion, our results showed that columnar Co-rich Co-Pt nano-grains with perpendicular coercivity of 4580 Oe and perpendicular squareness of 0.77 can be achieved by depositing Co80Pt20 (50 nm) film onto a Ru (30 nm)/Cu (100 nm) bilayer, with a glass substrate, at room temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A technique is developed to calibrate the performance of a permeameter for measuring soft magnetic materials, having a C-shaped magnetic potential H-coil near the sample surface and a B-coil surrounding the sample, by using cylindrical standard samples. The true M(H) curve for the standard samples of large length-to-diameter ratios is obtained by the demagnetizing-corrected solenoid method recently developed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic moments of five different doping configurations of Co, Mn, and Co-Mn codoped ZnO were investigated by using first-principles based on density functional theory (DFT), respectively. The total energy, electronic structure, density of state (DOS), partial density of states (PDOS), spatial spin density distribution and Curie temperature of doping ZnO were also studied and analyzed. The energy calculation results show that Co doped ZnO performance ferromagnetism and antiferromagnetism, Mn doped ZnO exhibits only antiferromagnetism, and the Curie temperature of both Mn and Co doping cannot reach the room temperature, but Co-Mn codoping can obtain a high Curie temperature and better ferromagnetism. The electronic structures illustrate that compact structures show better room temperature ferromagnetism. The DOS and PDOS illustrate the magnetic moment is mainly consisted of exchange interaction between Co and Mn, and there are a little exchange interaction between Mn and O atoms. It can be inferred that Co-Mn codoping is a better dopant than Co and Mn in the field of room temperature ferromagnetic materials.© 2018 Elsevier LtdTunable-sensitivity and flexibility are considered as two crucial characteristics for future pressure sensors or electronic skins. By the theoretical calculation model, we simulated the relationship curve between the sensitivity and PDMS pyramids with different spacings, and found that the spacing of pyramids is a main factor to affect the sensitivity of the capacitance pressure sensor. Furthermore, we fabricated the capacitance pressure sensors using graphene electrodes and the PDMS pyramid dielectric layers with different spacings. The measurement data were consistent with the simulation results that the sensitivity increases with the spacing of pyramids. In addition, graphene electrode exhibits prefect flexibility and reliability, while the ITO electrode would be destroyed rapidly after bending. These graphene pressure sensors exhibit the potential in the application in the wearable products for monitoring breath, pulse, and other physiological signals.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Al1− xZnxN polycrystalline powders were synthesized by a modified solid state reaction method. The obtained samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), Raman spectra, photoluminescence (PL), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), and superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID, MPMS-7) magnetometer. The characterized results showed that Zn atoms were doped into the AlN lattice. The obtained Al1− xZnxN showed high crystalline quality. A broad blue band centered at about 450 nm was observed in Zn-doped AlN. Room temperature ferromagnetism was also observed in the doped samples. The substitution of 3-d transition metal of Al in AlN provides a new opportunity to design optical and magnetic materials with good performance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the element-specific magnetic properties at interfaces of Fe (1 nm)/Mn1.5Ga and Co (1 nm)/Mn1.5Ga using X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD). We found that the spins in the Fe and Co layers were coupled with and parallel to those in the Mn1.5Ga under the as-grown conditions, while the post-annealing at 350 °C changed the interface magnetic coupling to antiferromagnetic in Co. The element-specific hysteresis curves at each XMCD absorption edge revealed large coercive fields in Fe and Co through the exchange coupling with Mn1.5Ga. After the annealing process, XMCD spectral line shapes indicate that the interfacial reactions promote the formation of Mn2CoGa-like secondary alloys, which influences the performance of tunnel magnetoresistance using the interfaces between transition metals and MnGa.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this manuscript, magnetite nanoparticles have been synthesized via an optimized method that consists in the thermal degradation of a polymer-metal complex prepared from an appropriated mix of polyvinyl alcohol and iron nitrate. Negatively charged (Zeta potential) nanoparticles, with a cubic spinel structure (Fd3¯ space group) and a narrow size distribution (mean particle size close to 5 nm) were successfully processed. Magnetic characterizations reveal a single-domain superparamagnetic-like behavior with a decreased saturation magnetization (11 emu/g) due to surface effects. Nanoparticle dispersions were investigated by SAXS (hard spheres, Beaucage model) and the average gyration radius (2.1 nm) and Porod's length (2.4 nm) are found to be close to the nanoparticle's physical and magnetic sizes. The results revealed that this easy, reproducible and cheap method is suitable to synthesize high-quality single-domain magnetite nanoparticles that can be functionalized for future biological applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The spin polarised density functional theory along with self-consistent plane wave pseudopotential is used to investigate the electronic and magnetic properties of V-doped ZnSe at Se and interstitial sites. The generalized gradient approximation is used for the exchange-correlation potential. The equilibrium lattice constants, bulk modulus and its pressure derivatives are calculated. It is found that the lattice parameter enhances while V is at the Se and interstitial sites. The ZnV0.125Se0.875 and ZnV0.25Se with V at the body centre interstitial sites configurations are ferromagnets while ZnV0.25Se0.75 and ZnV0.25Se with V at the edge interstitial sites are antiferromagnets. The antiferromagnetic phase with V at the edge interstitial sites is the most stable. The configuration ZnV0.125Se0.875 is half-metallic with band gap of 0.18 eV while the configurations ZnV0.25Se0.75 and ZnV0.25Se with V at the body centre and edge interstitial sites are metallic.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A classical-quantum chain composed of regularly alternating Ising and Heisenberg spins is rigorously solved by considering two distinct local anisotropy axes of the Ising spins. The ground-state phase diagram and magnetization curves are examined depending on a spatial orientation of the applied magnetic field. The phase diagram totally consists of four distinct phases and a few macroscopically degenerate points, where an outstanding coexistence of perfect order and complete disorder occurs within the so-called ‘half-fire, half-ice’ state. The zero-temperature magnetization curves generally exhibit a smooth dependence on a magnetic field owing to a canting angle between two coplanar anisotropy axes of the Ising spins, which enforces a misalignment of the magnetization vector from a direction of the applied magnetic field. It is evidenced that the investigated spin-chain model reproduces magnetic features of the heterobimetallic coordination compound Dy(NO)3(DMSO)2Cu(opba)(DMSO)2 (DMSO = dimethylsulfoxide, opba = orthophenylenebisoxamato). The high-field magnetization data reported for the powder sample of this polymeric coordination compound generally display a substantial smoothing on account of a powder averaging.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports on the ferromagnetism of MgO powder and degraded powder at room temperature. The starting material, Mg(OH)2 was analyzed by X-ray fluorescence (XRF) spectrometry and then calcined at 450 °C for 5 h to obtain fresh MgO powder. The calcined powder was separated into two batches (i) kept in vacuum sealed (MgO-F) and (ii) kept at ambient environment (30–32 °C at 45–55% relative humidity) for 2 days (MgO-D). The samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) including X-ray absorption near edge structure (XANES) and extended X-ray absorption fine structure (EXAFS). XRD and EXAFS confirmed that MgO phase in MgO-F. Both Mg(OH)2 and MgO compositions were found in MgO-D. The origin of ferromagnetism at room temperature of MgO-F and MgO-D is attributed to the Mg vacancies in the MgO structure that revealed and verified by XANES and EXAFS results.© 2018Aims: The magnetic technique using a magnetic tracer and handheld magnetometer was successfully evaluated in breast surgery. Residual tracer at the injection site can cause susceptibility artefacts on breast magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), therefore for lesion localization a solid marker would be preferable. Four magnetic markers were developed for localization to evaluate its clinical applicability. Methods: Comparison was made of the maximum magnetic counts and artefact-volume on MRI. Results: All markers were successfully detected, the spring marker showed the highest mean magnetic counts (627.8 ± 400.2, mean ± SD) with unequal variances (p <.001) and the butterfly marker showed the smallest mean artefact-volume (11.1 ± 2.3 cm3) with a significant difference between markers (p =.049). Conclusion: Localization using a magnetic marker is feasible and further evaluation is required within a clinical trial.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis work details the analysis of wafer level global process variability in 28 nm FD-SOI using split C-V measurements. The proposed approach initially evaluates the native on wafer process variability using efficient extraction methods on split C-V measurements. The on-wafer threshold voltage (VT) variability is first studied and modeled using a simple analytical model. Then, a statistical model based on the Leti-UTSOI compact model is proposed to describe the total C-V variability in different bias conditions. This statistical model is finally used to study the contribution of each process parameter to the total C-V variability.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.CoFe2O4 thin film is expected to be used as the spin filter in spintronics. In order to prepare high-quality CoFe2O4 thin films for spin filtering, we studied the influence of oxygen vacancies on the structure and magnetic properties of cobalt ferrite (Co1− xFe2+ xO4, CFO) films prepared in different atmosphere, and obtained the CFO films without significant soft magnetic phase under optimum Ar and O2 atmosphere condition. We further investigated the magnetic properties of the CFO/La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (CFO/LSMO) bilayers containing various thicknesses of CFO films, and found that the CFO/LSMO bilayers with the ultrathin CFO films primarily display the soft magnetic properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.One of the major concerns regarding the use of Metal Magnetic Memory (MMM) technique is the complexity of residual magnetization effect on output signals. The present study investigates the influence of residual magnetic field on stress induced magnetization. To this end, various initial magnetic fields were induced on a low carbon steel sample, and for each level of residual magnetic field, the sample was subjected to a set of 4-point bending tests and, their corresponding MMM signals were collected from the surface of the bended sample using a tailored metal magnetic memory scanning device. Results showed a strong correlation between sample residual magnetic field and its corresponding level of stress induced magnetic field. It was observed that the sample magnetic field increases with applying the bending stress as long as the initial residual magnet field is low (i.e. <117 mG), but starts decreasing with higher levels of initial residual magnetic fields. Besides, effect of bending stress on the MMM output of a notched sample was investigated. The result, again, showed that MMM signals exhibit a drop at stress concentration zone when sample has high level of initial residual magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Room-temperature ferromagnetism in single-walled carbon nanotubes (SWNTs) was observed and investigated in this work. Sizeable magnetization was observed in SWNTs aged in air, further increasing by hydrothermal treatment. The magnetic moment appears to arise from a spin-1 species in the pristine sample and from a spin-3/2 species in the hydrothermally treated samples. The spin-1 state may be attributed to the carbon vacancies, whereas the spin-3/2 state may be attributed to hydrogen adsorbed to the carbon vacancies by the hydrothermal treatment.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Metal-bonded magnets based on the nanocrystalline YCo4.8Fe0.2 powder were produced by hot-compaction using a spark plasma-sintering device. Zn and Zn/Al metallic binders with a melting temperature close to 420 °C were employed to fabricate dense cylindrical magnets. Two different pressures were used for compaction. The higher pressure of 400 MPa provided a metal-bonded magnet with Vickers hardness (HV10) of 460 ± 20 Vickers units. The temperature coefficients for remanence (α) and coercivity (β) were derived from magnetization measurements in the temperature range 20 °C–150 °C. α and β for the Zn/Al-bonded magnet pressed with 400 MPa were −0.055%/°C and −0.201%/°C. Scanning electron microscopy revealed ‘core-shell’-type microstructure. The pure YCo4.8Fe0.2 phase was detected in the core region whereas the shell was enriched with non-magnetic Zn or Zn/Al phases. High-resolution transmission electron microscope revealed the presence of ∼10 µm clusters with ∼20 nm YCo4.8Fe0.2 grains. In the Zn/Al-bonded magnet pressed at 400 MPa, the coercivity μ0Hci, remanent magnetization σ and energy product (BH)max were 0.87 T, 39.3 Am2/kg and 23.4 kJ/m3, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study we modelled and measured the U-turn trajectories of individual magnetotactic bacteria under the application of rotating magnetic fields, ranging in amplitude from 1 to 12 mT. The model is based on the balance between rotational drag and magnetic torque. For accurate verification of this model, bacteria were observed inside 5 μm tall microfluidic channels, so that they remained in focus during the entire trajectory. From the analysis of hundreds of trajectories and accurate measurements of bacteria and magnetosome chain dimensions, we confirmed that the model is correct within measurement error. The resulting average rate of rotation of Magnetospirillum gryphiswaldense is 0.74 ± 0.03 rad/mTs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this article, numerical studies are done to examine the effects of non-uniform magnetic field on the heat transfer of ferrofluid inside 90° elbow channel. In order to simulate the flow inside the domain, the finite volume method with the SIMPLEC algorithm is applied to reveal the effects of non-uniform magnetic field on the thermal and friction factor of ferrofluid. The ferrofluid inside elbow is assumed single phase and laminar and constant heat flux is applied on the wall while a single wire is chosen as a source of non-uniform magnetic field in the center of the elbow. The effects of magnetic field on the flow feature and temperature distribution in the vicinity of magnetic source are comprehensively explained. Comprehensive parametric studies are done to study the influence of various factors such as intensity of magnetic field and Reynolds number on the heat transfer. Obtained results demonstrated that the average Nusselt number of ferrofluid increases more than 28.6% as the magnetic field with strength of Mn=9.32×106 is applied in the vicinity of the elbow. Furthermore, heat transfer augments approximately 18% as the Reynolds number inside the elbow is increased from 50 to 100.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we calculate the energies corresponding to the different magnetic phases present in a ferromagnetic cylinder by means of analytical calculations. From the comparison of these energies, it is possible to construct magnetic phase diagrams as a function of the uniaxial anisotropy of the sample and the applied external magnetic field. As proof of concept, we analyzed the magnetic phase diagrams for a cobalt dot of 240 nm in diameter and 70 nm in length, with an easy axis parallel to the dot axis, and with a magnetic field applied towards or perpendicular to this axis. From these diagrams we have obtained the stability regions for a Bloch skyrmion (Sk), a vortex core (VC) and a ferromagnetic (F) configuration, which can point in any ψ direction. Our results provide a pathway to engineer the formation and controllability of a skyrmion in a ferromagnetic dot to different anisotropy constants and magnetic fields.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates the densification process of nanocrystalline NdFeB powder by electro-discharge sintering (EDS) and the associated magnetic properties. The EDS technique is used as a fast and energy-saving compaction process for metal powders. A large current is discharged from capacitors into a pre-compacted loose powder, thus resulting in complete compaction. In this study, the microstructure, magnetic, and mechanical properties of the compacted, hard magnetic NdFeB specimens were investigated under variation of the energy EEDS and compression load pEDS. For all specimens, the intrinsic coercivity HcJ decreases on increasing the discharge energy. However, the compaction load has apparently no influence on the coercivity HcJ, whereas the residual induction Br decreases only with increasing discharge energy. An increase in the compression load pEDS causes an increase in the specimens’ density and thus promotes residual induction Br. The applied EDS parameters led to the formation of three different microstructures (insufficiently densified zone, fully densified zone, and remelted zone) along the cross-section of the EDS-densified specimens. Volume fractions of the three different microstructures that form during the EDS process determine the resulting mechanical and magnetic properties of the specimens.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The influence of rare earth site substitution on structural, transport and magnetic characteristics of polycrystalline Ln2CoMnO6 (Ln = La, Sm and Gd) has been systematically investigated in details. The room temperature X-ray diffraction data confirm the monoclinic crystal structure of the samples, having P21/n space group. The magnetic study reveals that the ferromagnetic transition temperature (TC1 ∼ 233.2 K) of La2CoMnO6 decreases very fast due to a decrease of ionic radii in Ln site and TC2 (∼150 K) disappears in the Gd2CoMnO6 system due to the presence of only Co2+ and Mn4+ ion pair. The field dependent magnetization data at 5 K exhibit antiferromagnetic ordering induced in the Sm2CoMnO6 and Gd2CoMnO6 systems due to structural distortion and 4f-3d negative magnetic interactions. The temperature dependent resistivity data of La2CoMnO6 display semiconductor like behavior in a temperature range of 150–300 K and this behavior has been best described by the variable range hopping conduction mechanism. On the other hand, the resistivity of Sm and Gd based samples follows variable range hopping model in the temperature range of 200–300 K. Large magnetoresistance of ∼−26.35% has been observed at 160 K at a magnetic field of 60 kOe in La2CoMnO6 and it decreases to −8.28% for Sm2CoMnO6, and −1.01% for Gd2CoMnO6 as ionic radii decrease at the Ln site.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Curie temperature of bulk and nanostructured Fe5Si3 is investigated using experiments, density-functional simulations, and many-body model calculations. The bulk intermetallic, which crystallizes in the hexagonal D88 structure, exhibits several intriguing features: it does not exist as a room-temperature equilibrium phase, is close to the onset of ferromagnetism, and exhibits two crystallographically very different Fe sites. The samples, produced by rapid quenching (bulk) and cluster deposition (nanoparticulate thin films), have Curie temperatures of about 400 K. Interatomic exchange constants are calculated using the Kohn-Korringa-Rostoker (KKR) method and used to solve the multisublattice mean-field problem for the system. The Vienna ab initio simulation package (VASP) is employed to study the dependence of the Fe moment on the thermally induced spin misalignment, and a model calculation yields an estimate for quantum-spin-liquid corrections. The theory includes Heisenberg exchange but overestimates the Curie temperature, and a discussion is given regarding additional approaches to handle weakly ferromagnetic multisublattice intermetallic compounds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ferrite-ferroelectric core-shell nanoparticles were prepared by deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) assisted self-assembly and the strained mediated magneto-electric (ME) interactions between the ferroic phases were studied. The nanoparticle type and size were varied and the DNA linker sequence was also varied. Two kinds of particles, one with 600 nm barium titanate (BTO) core and 200 nm nickel ferrite (NFO) shell and another with 200 nm BTO core and 50 nm nickel cobalt ferrite (NCFO) shell were prepared. The particles were linked by three different oligomeric DNA containing 19, 18 or 30 base pairs. The core–shell structure was evident from electron microscopy and scanning microwave microscopy images. Films and disks of the core-shell particles were assembled in a magnetic field and used for measurements of low frequency ME voltage coefficient (MEVC) and magnet-dielectric effect. The MEVC data on films indicate that particles assembled with DNA with 30 base pairs exhibit the strongest ME coupling suggesting a more fully integrated heterogenous nanocomposite and the weakest interaction for DNA with 18 base pairs. These results indicate that the longer linker region in DNA is the key factor for forming better composites. This result may be due to the irregular shape of the nanoparticles. Longer DNA strands would be able to bridge better generating more linkages. Shorter strands would not able to bridge the irregularly shaped particles as well and therefore result in linkages and less heterogeneity in the composites.© 2018The authors regret that some of the results have been taken from studies/experiments carried out at Vietnam National University Hanoi that have been published in Journal of Korean Physical Society 52 (2008) 1423 DOI: http://doi.org/10.3938/jkps.52.1423 as the conference proceeding. The authors would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The results of a detailed investigation of the magnetocaloric effect (negative isothermal magnetic entropy change, -ΔSM(T,H)) in Cr70Fe30 and Cr75Fe25 thin films are presented. The generalized magnetic scaling equation of state in nonlinear scaling variables, which makes use of the previously reported critical exponents, not only reproduces the observed -ΔSM(T) at constant magnetic fields (1kOe⩽H⩽70kOe) over a wide temperature range around the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic phase transition temperature, T=Tc, but also describes correctly the functional dependence of -ΔSM on H at T=Tc. Reasonably large relative cooling power (RCP) and magnetic refrigerant capacity (RC), primarily due to the unusually large (130 K–180 K) full-width at half-maximum (FWHM) of the -ΔSM(T)|H curve, is observed for the magnetic field change ranging between 20 kOe and 70 kOe. This work clearly bears out that the film thickness can be used as a control parameter to tune both the peak value of -ΔSM as well as the FWHM, and hence RCP and RC. Another important result is the observation of giant isothermal magnetic entropy change at T = 2 K within the reentrant regime (where long-range ferromagnetic order coexists with cluster spin glass order) when the film thickness is reduced to ≃20nm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetoelastic properties of nano-crystalline zinc ferrite (ZnFe2O4) thin films prepared by Pulse laser deposition on amorphous fused quartz substrates have been investigated by means of the strain-modulated ferromagnetic resonance, as a function of the substrate temperature during the deposition, and as a function of the annealing temperature. Magnetoelastic constants reveal the same trends as the magnetization, showing correlation between these two parameters. The results are similar to that obtained earlier for the Y3Fe5O12 ferrite.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The evolution of microstructure and magnetic properties of Fe73.5Si13.5B9Nb3Cu1 amorphous alloys caused by ion bombardment were investigated by using X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and magnetic property analysis. Ion bombardment first induced structural relaxation and then crystallization of amorphous alloys, and it produced residual stress and magnetic anisotropy in the crystallized sample. The residual stress was calculated by XRD analysis and the value of magnetic anisotropy constant was estimated by applying the law of approach to saturation. The structural relaxation leads to the improvement of permeability of amorphous alloys. The permeability of the crystallized sample induced by ion-bombardment was lower than that of thermal annealed sample, which can be attributed to residual stress and magnetic anisotropy induced by ion bombardment.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The current-driven magnetization dynamics in spin torque oscillators is investigated because of its high potential for high-frequency applications. The system consists of a pinned layer with a fixed magnetization and a single-domain free layer, such that it is governed by the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert-Slonczewski equation. In particular, we study the effect of a time-dependent quasi-periodic current. We numerically characterize the dynamical behavior of the system by monitoring the Lyapunov exponents, and by calculating the Fourier spectra. We find a rather complicated landscape of sometimes closely intermingled chaotic and non-chaotic areas in the parameters space. Finally, we compute a phase diagram of the existence of the strange non-chaotic attractors.© 2018The influence of the crystal structure inhomogeneities on the magnetic properties of cobalt nanoparticles with different aspect ratio and spherical nanoparticles of chromium dioxide, cobalt ferrite and magnetite has been studied by means of numerical simulation. The polycrystalline nanoparticles are modeled by means of subdivision of the nanoparticle volume into tightly bound single-crystal granules with randomly distributed directions of the easy anisotropy axes. The probability of appearance of quasi uniform and vortex states in sufficiently large assemblies of polycrystalline nanoparticles of various types have been calculated depending on the nanoparticle diameter. It is shown that the subdivision of a nanoparticle into single-crystal granules with different orientations of the easy anisotropy axes substantially reduces the effective single-domain diameters for particles with uniaxial type of anisotropy of individual granules. However, for particles with cubic type of magnetic anisotropy the influence of the crystal structure inhomogeneities on the equilibrium properties of the particles is not so important even for magnetically hard cobalt ferrite nanoparticles. It is practically absent for magnetically soft magnetite nanoparticles.© 2018The effects of Zr-substitution on the microstructure and magnetic properties of [(PrNd)0.32La0.22Ce0.46]22.0Fe76.7−xZrxB1.3 (x = 0, 2.5, 5, 7.5 wt%) melt-spun powders have been investigated. It is shown that the Zr addition can prevent the formation of CeFe2 phase and α-Fe phase, increasing the volume fraction of 2:14:1 phase. Furthermore, the Zr addition can refine the grain sizes of α-Fe and 2:14:1 phases. Meanwhile, the formation of Fe2Zr phase and the decrease of CeFe2 phase improve its antioxidation. And the magnetic properties of bonded magnets are found to increase significantly. The coercivity Hcj increases from 2.57 kOe for the Zr-free sample to 5.86 kOe for the Zr-doped sample. The maximum energy product (BH)max of bonded magnets increases from 3.13 MGOe to 6.19 MGOe correspondingly, which attribute to the fine microstructure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Rare earth Ce doped NiZn with composition of Ni0.8Zn0.2CexFe2−xO4 at x = 0.00, 0.02, 0.04, 0.06, 0.08 and 0.10 were synthesized via sol-gel route. Rare earth Ce was doped to tune the structural and magnetic properties of the spinel ferrites. Therefore, the systematic effect of Ce on the structural, morphological and magnetic studies was carried out. FTIR, XRD, FESEM and VSM were carried out to investigate the metal stretching vibrations, structure, phase, morphology and magnetic characteristics of Ni0.8Zn0.2CexFe2−xO4 nanoferrites respectively. The size of the crystallites, cell volume and lattice parameters (theoretical and experimental) were decreased with Ce3+ doping. The size of the crystallites was in the range of 41–9 nm. The physical characteristics such as X-ray density, bulk density and porosity were also decreased with Ce3+ substitution. However, the lattice strain was increased with Ce3+substitution in the NiZn ferrite lattice. The cations distributions study was determined using Bertaut method. Force constants at tetrahedral and octahedral sites were calculated from the FTIR studies. Saturation magnetization, remanent magnetization, coercivity, anisotropy constant (K) and Bohr magneton were evaluated from the magnetic hysteresis loops. Saturation, remanence, initial permeability and Bohr magneton were decreased whereas the coercivity was increased with Ce3+ doping. Yafet and Kittle (Y-K) angles were increased with Ce doped NiZn nanoferrites from x = 0 to x = 0.04 respectively. Switching field distribution (SFD) evaluations for Ce doped NiZn nanoferrites were determined by taking first derivative of the demagnetization data respectively. In conclusion, Single phase Ce doped NiZn nanoferrites have large magnetic saturation, remanence whereas other samples have higher coercivity accordingly. Ce-doped NiZn nanoferrites with varying structural and magnetic properties have potential applications in various fields such as switching, security, core, microwave absorption applications, nanofabrication and nanodevices.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe mechanism of reverse gate leakage current of AlGaN/GaN HEMTs with two different surface treatment methods are studied by using C-V, temperature dependent I–V and theoretical analysis. At the lower reverse bias region (VR >− 3.5 V), the dominant leakage current mechanism of the device with N2 plasma surface treatment is the Poole-Frenkel emission current (PF), and Trap-Assisted Tunneling current (TAT) is the principal leakage current of the device which treated by HCl:H2O solution. At the higher reverse bias region (VR <− 3.5 V), both of the two samples show good agreement with the surface leakage mechanism. The leakage current of the device with N2 plasma surface treatment is one order of magnitude smaller than the device which treated by HCl:H2O solution. This is due to the recovery of Ga-N bond in N2 plasma surface treatment together with the reduction of the shallow traps in post-gate annealing (PGA) process. The measured results agree well with the theoretical calculations and demonstrate N2 plasma surface treatment can reduce the reverse leakage current of the AlGaN/GaN HEMTs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the context of increasing energy efficiency, manufacturers are developing more efficient electrical converters which are designed to operate at high temperatures. Indeed, the maximum reduction in mass and volume imposes a high compactness of the components inside the electrical systems. The magnetic materials which are in the heart of the electrical energy conversion are, therefore, exposed to work in severe environment of high temperatures and high frequencies (volume reduction). In this sense it is necessary to carry out ageing treatments of these magnetic materials under different operating conditions. The proposed paper studies the thermal ageing of high permeability nanocrystalline alloys under two magnetization conditions: with and without remaining magnetization. The high permeability nanocrystalline alloys of chemical composition Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si15.5B7 were chosen. This ageing study is based on monitoring magnetic properties for four continuous thermal ageing treatments: 100, 150, 200 and 240 °C.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the phase boundary of ferromagnetic metallic and ferromagnetic insulator state (FMM-FMI) on magnetotransport and magnetocaloric properties in the Pr0.775Sr0.225MnO3 compound has been described in this study. An enhancement of magnetoresistance (MR) has been observed in the Pr0.775Sr0.225MnO3 compound compared to the compounds, reside on both sides of the phase boundary (i.e. FMI and FMM phases for Sr doping 0.2 and 0.3 respectively in Pr1-xSrxMnO3). Moreover, a large relative cooling power (RCP), an important parameter for utilization of magnetocaloric materials, has also been achieved in this compound. The large value of RCP has been attributed to the formation of ferromagnetic clusters, formed above the ferromagnetic ordering temperature (T>TC). On the other hand, enhancement of MR is achieved because of the suppression of enhanced phase fluctuations, arises due to the closeness of FMM-FMI phases.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe investigated the mechanism of formation of the hump that occurs in the current-voltage I-V characteristics of amorphous InGaZnO (a-IGZO) thin film transistors (TFTs) that are exposed to long-term drain bias stress under illumination. Transfer characteristics showed two-stage degradation under the stress. At the beginning of the stress, the I-V characteristics shifted in the negative direction with a degradation of subthreshold slope, but the hump phenomenon developed over time in the I-V characteristics. The development of the hump was related to creation of defects, especially ionized oxygen vacancies which act as shallow donor-like states near the conduction-band minimum in a-IGZO. To further investigate the hump phenomenon we measured a capacitance-voltage C-V curve and performed two-dimensional device simulation. Stretched-out C-V for the gate-to-drain capacitance and simulated electric field distribution which exhibited large electric field near the drain side of TFT indicated that VO 2+ were generated near the drain side of TFT, but the hump was not induced when VO 2+ only existed near the drain side. Therefore, the degradation behavior under DBITS occurred because VO 2+ were created near the drain side, then were migrated to the source side of the TFT.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic anisotropies and crystallographic structures of cobalt-iron nanospinels obtained with the co-precipitation synthesis process are revealed using X-ray Absorption Spectroscopy and X-ray Magnetic Circular Dichroism. The chemical process allows to obtain nanoparticles of various sizes and chemical composition, but it is the site symmetry environment of Co2+ that is found to be the crucial parameter that governs the magnetic anisotropies of the nanospinels. The distribution of Co2+ among the crystallographic sites of the structure is directly linked to the temperature of the synthesis process. In parallel, the results also revealed that a superficial rich shell of iron is formed for the iron-cobalt nanospinels stable in acidic medium leading to chemically inhomogeneous nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier LtdMemories based on graphene that could be mass produced using low-cost methods have not yet received much attention. Here we demonstrate graphene ferroelectric (dual-gate) field effect transistors. The graphene has been obtained using electrochemical exfoliation of graphite. Field-effect transistors are realized using a monolayer of graphene flakes deposited by the Langmuir-Blodgett protocol. Ferroelectric field effect transistor memories are realized using a random ferroelectric copolymer poly(vinylidenefluoride-co-trifluoroethylene) in a top gated geometry. The memory transistors reveal ambipolar behaviour with both electron and hole accumulation channels. We show that the non-ferroelectric bottom gate can be advantageously used to tune the on/off ratio.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Fe3O4 nanoparticles have been made by a co-precipitation method with an average size of 13 nm. Raman measurements show that there is also a small fraction of maghemite that is not seen in the XRD data. The saturation magnetization is high for this preparation method and the coercive field is low at 300 K. The high field magnetic moment cannot be fitted to a Bloch temperature dependence over the full temperature range, which is likely due to the effect of the Verwey transition at 120 K. Pressed powders shows a magnetoresistance of up to −6.5% at 8 T and 300 K. The magnetoresistance can be fitted to a model where there is a spin-dependent tunnelling between nanoparticles with a spin-disordered shell. The temperature dependence of the resistivity can be attributed to nanoparticle electrostatic charging effects.© 2018Single crystals of Pr2PdGe5.7Sn0.3 with the orthorhombic structure (Amm2 space group) have been grown by means of the Sn-flux method. The magnetic ordering temperature of Pr2PdGe5.7Sn0.3 was found to be 14 K. The temperature dependence of magnetization measured at 100 Oe drops abruptly at about 14 K when the applied magnetic field H is parallel to the c axis of the crystal (H//c), while it exhibits a λ–shape for H//a and H//b. A distinct hysteresis loop with a coercivity of 700 Oe and small net magnetization was observed when H//c, suggesting that Pr2PdGe5.7Sn0.3 may be in a complex antiferromagnetic state, but with a small net magnetic moment along c axis. A field-induced antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic (or ferrimagnetic) phase transition occurs at about 10 kOe for H//b.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA new numerical reverse recovery model of silicon pin diode is proposed by the approximation of the reverse recovery waveform as a simple shape. This is the first model to calculate the reverse recovery characteristics using numerical equations without adjusted by fitting equations and fitting parameters. In order to verify the validity and the accuracy of the numerical model, the calculation result from the model is verified through the device simulation result.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this study, the influence of the emitter efficiency on the forward current–voltage characteristics, especially the conductivity modulation of bipolar SiC-diodes was analyzed. It was determined that the emitter efficiency of p-emitters formed by ion implantation is significantly lower compared to p-emitters formed by epitaxy. In contrast to comparable studies, experimental approach was arranged that the influence of the quality of the drift-layer or the thickness of the emitter on the conductivity modulation could be excluded for the fabricated bipolar SiC-diodes of this work. Thus, it can be established that the lower emitter injection efficiency is mainly caused by the reduced electron lifetime in p-emitters formed by ion implantation. Therefore, a significant enhancement of the electron lifetime in implanted p-emitters is mandatory for e.g. SiC-MPS-diodes where the functionality of the devices depends significantly on the injection efficiency.© 2018 The AuthorsThis paper investigates the properties of thin films of chromium-doped Ni80Fe20 (Permalloy) that could potentially be useful in future low-power magnetic memory technologies. The addition of chromium reduces the saturation magnetization, Ms, which is useful for low-energy switching, but does not significantly degrade the excellent switching properties of the host material even down to 10 K, the lowest temperature measured, in films as thin as 2.5 nm. As an example, an alloy film composed of 15% chromium and 85% Ni80Fe20 has an Ms just over half that of pure Ni80Fe20, with a coercivity Hc less than 4 Oe, an anisotropy field Hk less than 1 Oe, and an easy-axis remanent squareness Mr/Ms of 0.9 (where Mr is the remanent magnetization). Magnetodynamical measurements using a pulsed inductive microwave magnetometer showed that the average Landau Lifshitz damping λ was relatively constant with changing Cr content, but increased significantly for thinner films (λ ≈150 MHz for 11 nm, λ ≈250 MHz for 2.5 nm), and at low bias fields likely due to increased magnetic dispersion. Density functional theory calculations show that chromium reduces Ms by entering the lattice antiferromagnetically; it also increases scattering in the majority spin channel, while adding almost insignificant scattering to the minority channel.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using the Quantum Monte Carlo simulation (QMCS), the dynamic blocking temperature of a nano-graphene bilayer has been investigated within the framework of the Transverse Ising Model (TIM) with mixed spins, under the existence of the time-dependent oscillating longitudinal magnetic field (h(t)=hb+h0cos(ωt)) and the transverse field (Ω). The influence of the time-dependent oscillating longitudinal magnetic field, the period of magnetic field (τ) and the transverse field (Ω) on the thermal behavior of the total longitudinal and transverse dynamic order parameters, the total dynamic magnetic susceptibility and the dynamic hysteresis of the nano-graphene bilayer are also studied. As results, we remark the appearance of multiple hysteresis loops and the system exhibits the superparamagnetic behavior at the dynamic blocking temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Publisher regrets that in the line directly under equation B.4 in Appendix B, the type-setting of the argument of arcsin is not correct. The correct expression is: [Formula presented] The Publisher would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, using the magneto optical Kerr effect, the magnetic properties of [Glass/Co/ZnS] structure has been investigated. Initially, by co-precipitation method, zinc sulfide was prepared and then by X-ray diffraction pattern, its structure was confirmed. In the structure of [Glass/Co/ZnS], cobalt was used as a magnetic material and zinc sulfide acts as a capping layer. Before fabrication process, the optimums cobalt and zinc sulfide thicknesses were calculated using the MATLAB simulation software and the desired thicknesses were selected. To obtain layers with variable thicknesses, the oblique thermal evaporation technique was used and different thicknesses of about 5–90 nm for cobalt and 45 nm for zinc sulfide on the glass substrate were coated. The longitudinal Kerr signal (LKS) of the [Glass/Co/ZnS] samples were measured in different cobalt thicknesses. By using the magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE), the hysteresis loop of samples in the longitudinal geometry have been measured samples and it was observed that the sample has an easy axis in the plane of the film and in the direction of its large diameter. The results have shown that the capping layer with suitable thickness, by creation of an optical cavity, has been able to amplify the Kerr signal by more than 1.5 times, which is noticeable by considering the simplicity of the technique. This structure can be applied as a highly accurate magneto-optical sensor.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Preparation of spinel ferrites using limonite laterite ore as raw materials was proposed. The effect of Zn substitution on the structure, magnetic properties of as-prepared spinel ferrites were systematically characterized and discussed. The results show that single-phase spinel ferrite was directly synthesized from the precursor solution with the leaching temperature and leaching acid concentration of 200 °C and 2.25 mol·L−1, respectively, and after calcination at 1000 °C for 2 h. Moreover, single-phase of spinel ferrites with different Zn substitution contents (x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.23, 0.35, 0.47, 0.58) could be also obtained. All the lattice constant (a), average grain sizes (d) and X-ray density (Dx) increase with increasing Zn substitution content. With Zn substitution content increasing from 0.00 to 0.58, the saturation magnetization (Ms) value increased from 34.0 to 65.9 emu·g−1 for x = 0.35, and then decreased to 50.7 emu·g−1 while the coercivity (Hc) value decreased from 50 Oe to 14 Oe. This paper provides a pathway for comprehensive utilization of limonite laterite ore and synthesis of spinel ferrites with excellent magnetic performance.© 2018 Elsevier LtdGaN gate-all-around (GAA) vertical nanowire MOSFET (VNWMOSFET) with channel length of 300 nm and diameter of 120 nm, the narrowest GaN-based vertical nanowire transistor ever achieved from the top-down approach, was fabricated by utilizing anisotropic side-wall wet etching in TMAH solution and photoresist etch-back process. The VNWMOSFET exhibited output characteristics with very low saturation drain voltage of less than 0.5 V, which is hardly observed from the wide bandgap-based devices. Simulation results indicated that the narrow diameter of the VNWMOSFET with relatively short channel length is responsible for the low voltage operation. The VNWMOSFET also demonstrated normally-off mode with threshold voltage (VTH) of 0.7 V, extremely low leakage current of ∼10−14 A, low drain-induced barrier lowering (DIBL) of 125 mV/V, and subthreshold swing (SS) of 66–122 mV/decade. The GaN GAA VNWMOSFET with narrow channel diameter investigated in this work would be promising for new low voltage logic application.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of the near-stoichiometric Tm2Fe16 and Tm2Fe19 compounds under hydrostatic pressures up to 1 GPa were studied. We have revealed that the high-temperature ferrimagnetic state easily magnetized in the basal plane is very sensitive to the volume changes and even moderate pressure is sufficient to its complete suppression and transformation to a helimagnetic state. At the same time, the low-temperature ferrimagnetic state easily magnetized along the hexagonal axis does not disappear under pressure and the temperature of its transition to the high-temperature magnetic states increases under pressure. The remarkable stability of the ground ferrimagnetic state under external pressure can be attributed to the strengthening of the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and to the mutual perpendicular orientation of the magnetic moments in the ground and the high-temperature magnetic states.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The detail magnetic measurements of the polycrystalline La0.2Gd0.5Ba0.3MnO3 (LGBMO) compound have been presented in this manuscript. The compound shows high value of magnetocaloric effect (MCE) (-ΔS=9.1J/kg-K at 12 K) at low temperature. The experimental results of magnetization and magnetic memory effect confirm the existence of glassy magnetic phase in the compound at the low temperature (T<35K). The rejuvenation study further substantiates the presence of glassy phase. This high value of MCE in the LGBMO compound has been addressed by the presence of the glassy phase.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structure of magneto-optic images of the planar component of stray fields on the faces of prismatic hard magnetic elements is determined experimentally and by means of computer simulation. Magneto-optical images were registered using the longitudinal magneto-optical Kerr effect. FeCo films with in-plane anisotropy were used as indicator films. A qualitative explanation to the structure of magneto-optical images was given on the ground of the symmetry of the plane field, produced by hard magnetic elements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present the low temperature magnetic properties in Ni1.5Fe1.5O4 ferrite as the function of pH at which the material was prepared by chemical route and post annealing temperature. The material is a ferri/ferromagnet, but showed magnetic blocking and random spin freezing process on lowering the measurement temperature down to 5 K. The sample prepared at pH ∼12 and annealed at 800 °C showed a sharp magnetization peak at 105 K; the superparamagnetic blocking temperature of the particles. The magnetization peak remained incomplete within measurement temperature up to 350 K for rest of the samples, although peak temperature was brought down by increasing applied dc magnetic field. The fitting of temperature dependence of coercivity data according to Kneller′s law suggested random orientation of ferromagnetic particles. The fitting of saturation magnetization according to Bloch′s law provided the exponent that largely deviated from 3/2, a typical value for long ranged ferromagnet. An abrupt increase of saturation magnetization below 50 K suggested the active role of frozen surface spins in low temperature magnetic properties. AC susceptibility data elucidated the low temperature spin freezing dynamics and exhibited the characters of cluster spin glass in the samples depending on pH value and annealing temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The switching of a vortex core of a single disk in an array of a multilayer system is investigated by micromagnetic simulation. We found that the perpendicular uniaxial anisotropy decreases the frequencies of the azimuthal mode in disks with magnetic vortex configuration. We obtained a phase diagram of magnetic field intensity vs. frequency of the azimuthal mode, as a function of the value of perpendicular uniaxial anisotropy. We demonstrated that rotating magnetic fields (CW and CCW) with frequency equal to azimuthal modes can be used to switch the vortex core of single disks in a disk array. This allows obtaining different memory states with a single array of nanodisks, and therefore writing information through the application of rotating fields.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect (MCE) and transition order in Nd(Co0.8Fe0.2)2 Laves phase compound were studied by dc magnetization measurement. In order to make the inexpensive NdCo2 Laves phase compound for room-temperature magnetic refrigeration possible, the Curie temperature of the NdCo2 (∼100 K) was tuned to 263 K with 20 at.% of Fe substituting for Co. An entropy change of 1.66 J/kg K was obtained in Nd(Co0.8Fe0.2)2 at 265 K under an external magnetic field change of 30 kOe. Meanwhile, a wide operating temperature range of 102 K for MCE and a large refrigerant capacity of 121.6 J/kg at an external field change of 30 kOe were observed. Specially, at an external field change of 20 kOe, the operating temperature of Nd(Co0.8Fe0.2)2 (81 K) is even twice wider than that of Gd (39 K). To confirm the transition order of the compound, Banerjee criterion as well as the universal scaling of the magnetocaloric effects were employed. These two criteria agree well with each other, indicating a second-order transition in Nd(Co0.8Fe0.2)2.© 2018In order to investigate the structural, magnetic and electric properties, Co-based Co2Mn0.5Fe0.5Sn full Heusler compound nanowires were synthesized for the first time using alternating current (AC) deposition in anodized alumina oxide (AAO) templates. The half-metallicity, band gap and 100% spin polarization was also confirmed using the art of full potential linearized augmented plane wave methods (FP-LAPW) within density functional theory (DFT). The SEM images have confirmed the average diameter of templates and nanowires 62 nm and 58 nm respectively. The XRD confirms the formation of full Heusler alloy, L21 (A2 & B2 type disorder) type crystal structure. Energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX) technique shows Tin (Sn) decreases whereas (Co, Fe & Mn) almost increases with increase in deposition potential. The M−H loops show the variation of coercivity and saturation magnetization with respect to deposition potential. Two probe I-V curves show that resistance decreases w.r.t deposition voltage. The resistivity and carrier concentration were decreased in a similar fashion w.r.t increased in deposition voltage where as mobility was increased with increase in deposition voltage which show the increment of the grain size and diminishing the scattering of electron in grain boundary. So we have done a great effort to study the effect of deposition voltage on crystal structure, composition, morphology, electric and magnetic properties of Co-based Co2Mn0.5Fe0.5Sn full Heusler compound nanowires. The spin properties in Co2Mn0.5Fe0.5Sn Heusler alloy is of great interest for their practical use which is vigorous study in present as well as in future spintronics devices.© 2018First-principles calculations were carried out to predict the stability, electronic, and hydrogen passivation properties of PdS2 nanoribbons (PdS2NRs) with either zigzag- or armchair-terminated edges. Based the energy analysis, we reveal that the armchair NRs are more stable than the zigzag ones. Bare zigzag PdS2NRs are metallic, irrespective of the ribbon width. On the other hand, bare armchair NRs change from metal to semiconductor when the ribbon width is greater than 1.24 nm. In addition, different hydrogen passivation type in the armchair direction leads to distinct electronic and magnetic properties of the PdS2NRs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt ferrite nanoparticles were synthetized by co-precipitation technique from nitrate precursors. X-ray diffraction confirms the formation of the spinel ferrite. SEM and HRTEM micrographs corroborate the formation of agglomerated nanoparticles of 8–35 nm size range with 21.7 nm average size. The broad size distribution and considerable agglomeration of the particles hamper the superparamagnetic state of the sample, provoking a weak coercivity at room temperature. In contrast to several other magnetic nanostructures, the ZFC-FC curves of cobalt-ferrite nanoparticles revealed an unusually large magnetostriction, evidenced by larger values of magnetization in their ZFC curves than the FC curves in the measured temperature range 20–375 K. The behavior could be reversed on applying high magnetic fields. However, the maximum of ZFC curve reduces on increasing the applied magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The domain width and domain wall energy of the Ce2Fe14-xCoxB solid solution are studied for the first time in this work. The influence of Co content on these properties has been analyzed with the aid of magnetic force microscopy using diffusion couple and key alloys. The domain widths of Ce2Fe14-xCoxB decreased with increasing Co content at about 0.02 μm per 1 at.% Co. In Ce2Fe14-xCoxB, phase shift, domain width and saturation magnetization are related in a way that lower average domain width is associated with higher phase shift and higher saturation magnetization. The highest domain wall energy of Ce2Fe14-xCoxB is measured as 31.7 erg/cm2 after dissolving 14 at.% Co (x = 2.38). The effects of Ni and Cu on the domain width and domain wall energy of Ce2Fe14-xCoxB (x = 1.02) are also studied and reported using response surfaces. The domain width and domain wall energy of this solid solution increased after doping with 1 at.% Ni at constant Co content of 6 at.%, measuring 1.39 μm for domain width and 33.4 erg/cm2 for domain wall energy. Both properties were determined as 0.71 μm and 18.6 erg/cm2, respectively, after doping with 0.8 at.% Cu, while keeping Co content constant at 6 at.%. When Ce2Fe14-xCoxB (x = 1.02) is doped with both Ni (1 at.%) and Cu (0.8 at.%), the domain width and domain wall energy measured 0.99 μm and 33.8 erg/cm2, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, an as-cast strip of Fe-3.2Si wt% non-oriented electrical steel was processed successfully by a new compact and low cost twin-roll strip casting process. After hot rolling, both the hot rolled bands with and without annealing were subjected to cold rolling and final annealing. The aim of the study is to elucidate the effect of hot band annealing on the microstructure, texture and magnetic properties of non-oriented electrical steel processed by twin-roll strip casting using a combination of optical microscopy (OM), X-ray diffraction (XRD), electron back-scattered diffraction (EBSD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM). The study indicated that the AlN and MnS particles precipitated during hot band annealing process affected crystal rotation of the cold rolled sheet. {1 0 0}〈0 1 1〉 texture with a higher intensity and {1 1 0}〈1 1 0〉 texture with a lower intensity was observed after cold rolling compared to the cold rolled sheet without hot band annealing. The recrystallization and growth behavior of grains was impeded because of the precipitation during final annealing, and a strong λ-fiber texture with a smaller average grain size was obtained in the annealed sheet without hot band annealing process. However, the recrystallization texture in the final annealed specimen subjected to the hot band annealing process was characterized by pronounced {4 1 1}〈1 4 8〉 texture and the average grain size was significantly larger than without hot band annealing. The results suggested that hot band annealing is a suitable route to remarkably improve the magnetic properties of non-oriented electrical steel.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Experimental results of the complex magnetic permeability (µ) and the electrical conductivity (σ) of a granular paramagnetic Gadolinium Gallium Garnet (GGG: 0.3–26 vol%) and Teflon (PTFE) system are presented and discussed in relation to previously published (conductivity) and unpublished (permeability) studies on granular Fe3O4 – talc and Ni – talc wax systems. In these systems plots of the real conductivity (σm ′) against the volume fraction (φ) lie on characteristic sigmoid curves that when fitted to the Two Exponent Phenomenological Percolation Equation (TEPPE) confirm the existence of “percolation microstructures” with critical volume fractions (φc). The plots of the real and imaginary permeability (μm ′) and (μm ″) satisfactorily fit to the TEPPE using the φc obtained in each case from the “conductivity” measurements. In all three cases the conductivity results gave the exponent t > 2, and the permeability results gave t < 1.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the role of carriers in the presence of oxygen vacancies (Vo) in mediating the ferromagnetic order and spin-polarized gap states of Cu-doped ZnO nanoparticles. We demonstrate the tuning of magnetic order via post-annealing under Ar/O2. Carrier (Vo)-rich condition (Ar-treatment) is found to favor higher magnetic order of the nanoparticles with enhanced thermal stability and wide spin-polarized gap states from ultra-violet (UV) to visible energy range. Conversely, carrier (Vo)-poor condition (O2-treatment) reduces resistance to thermal fluctuations and quenched spin-polarization due to lack of carrier mediation. The proposed method is effective to tailor the magnetic order as well as the wide polarized band-gap states, of oxide opto-spintronic compounds by finding the physical equivalency between charge carriers and spin electrons.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Lanthanum (La3+ ions) doped magnesium ferrite nanoparticles i.e. MgLaxFe2−xO4 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.075, 0.1, 0.125) have been prepared using sol-gel technique. These as-prepared nanomagnetic particles were characterized by using X-ray diffractometer (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), High resolution field emission scanning electron microscopy (HRFESEM) with energy dispersive spectroscopy (EDS), Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) techniques. X-ray diffraction analysis reveal that the samples are single phase cubic spinel crystals with size 12–15 nm. Lattice parameter increases with the increase in La3+ ion concentration. The induced strain calculated from Williamson-Hall plots shows that strain decreases from x = 0.0 to x = 0.075 and then increases from x = 0.1 to x = 0.125. FTIR spectra show that Fe–O stretching vibration peaks of octahedral (FeO6) and tetrahedral (FeO4) group broadness increases with lanthanum content due to gradual decrease in the grain size. These variations are attributed to lattice deformation induced by interparticle interactions, cation distribution, and La3+ ions concentration in the spinel structured samples. SEM micrographs revealed the existence of superfine particles and agglomerated patterns for higher La3+ ion content. The average particle size obtained from TEM images are in close agreement with the crystallite size calculated from the XRD patterns. The magnetic studies exhibited the saturation magnetization, retentivity, anisotropy constant and magnetic moment of the particles decrease with increasing La3+ ions concentration indicating the superparamagnetic nature of lanthanum doped magnesium ferrite samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the structural and magnetic properties of BiFeO3 (BFO) thin films grown over (1 0 0)-oriented Si substrates by rf magnetron sputtering in a new route under O2 free low pressure Ar atmosphere. Single-phase BFO films were deposited in a heated substrate and post-annealed in situ. The new routed allows high deposition rate and produce polycrystalline BFO pure phase, confirmed by high resolution X-ray diffraction. Scanning electron and atomic force microscopy reveal very low surface roughness and mean particle size of 33 nm. The BFO phase and composition were confirmed by transmission electron microscopy and line scanning energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy in transmission electron microscopy mode. The surface chemistry of the thin film, analyzed by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, reveals the presence of Fe3+ and Fe2+ in a 2:1 ratio, a strong indication that the film contains oxygen vacancies. An hysteretic ferromagnetic behavior with room temperature high saturation magnetization ∼165 × 103 A/m was measured along the film perpendicular and parallel directions. Such high magnetization, deriving from this new route, is explained in the scope of oxygen vacancies, the break of the antiferromagnetic cycloidal order and the increase of spin canting by change in the surface/volume ratio. Understanding the magnetic behavior of a multiferroic thin films is a key for the development of heterogeneous layered structures and multilayered devices and the production of multiferroic materials over Si substrates opens new possibilities in the development of materials that can be directly integrated into the existent semiconductor and spintronic technologies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the electronic and magnetic properties of SrRu1-xSnxO3 by carrying out density-functional-theory calculations to show that a half-metallic ferromagnetic ground state emerges for the Sn doping of x≳0.5. To examine the effect of on-site Coulomb interactions for the Ru d orbitals, which was suggested to enhance the half-metallicity in SrRuO3, we employed both the local spin-density approximation (LSDA) as well as the LSDA + U method. For all the possible configurations of Sn doping for x=1/8,1/4,1/2,5/8,3/4, and 7/8 within the 2×2×2 unit cell, we monitor the Ru t2g bandwidth as well as the valence band maximum in the majority-spin channel and demonstrate that the Ru d electron hopping is blocked by the Sn-substituted sites so that the Ru t2g bandwidth becomes reduced as the doping x increases. For x<0.5, the valence band maximum still touches the Fermi level so that SrRu1-xSnxO3 remains as a usual ferromagnetic metal. A further reduction of the Ru t2g bandwidth for the range of 0.5≲x≲0.7 turns it into a half-metallic ferromagnet. As for x>0.7, the Ru t2g bandwidth gets so narrow that even a small on-site Coulomb interaction, e.g., Ueff=1.0 eV induces a band-gap, which indeed corresponds to a gap of the Ru impurity bands in the SrSnO3 oxide semiconductor.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The stability of binary intermetallic Laves phase YFe2 and its hydride YFe2Hx (x = 0–5) are studied using first-principles calculation. Accompanied with the analysis of the hydrogen binding energy and the formation enthalpy in various interstitial sites in YFe2Hx, a transition of the stability from cubic to orthorhombic phase is found when hydrogen concentration increases to 1.5H/f.u. It is found that the hydrogen binding energy is very sensitive to the magnetic property of neighboring atoms. To get a further insight of the transition, we take into account external strains, as well as chemical substitution at Y site. It turns out that the transition point can be tuned by strain and chemical bonding.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Doped spinel ferrites (Ni0.4Cu0.2Zn0.4R0.05Fe1.95O4 (R = Eu3+, Sm3+, Gd3+ and Pr3+) were synthesized via co-precipitation method with ultrasound irradiation for 2 h at T = 90 °C and dissipated power Pdiss = 46.27 W. The prepared samples were characterized by different techniques: X-ray diffraction (XRD), Energy-Dispersive Spectrometry (EDS), Fourier transform spectroscopy (FTIR), vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) and photoluminescence (PL) emissions. The experimental results show that co-precipitation method coupled with ultrasound irradiation can lower the crystallite size (15–18 nm) and favors in getting a single spinel phase. Analysis of EDS and FTIR spectra indicates the fruitful insertion of the rare earth cations into ferrite lattice. The saturation magnetization (Ms) measured using VSM at room temperature increases with increasing ionic radius (Eu3+ ≥ Gd3+ > Sm3+ > Pr3+). The photoluminescence properties of these samples are investigated using 240 nm excitation wavelength radiation sources. No changes in PL peaks positions are noted for all samples except their intensities during the experimental analysis.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and transport properties of triangular-lattice Ni1.8Ge single crystal have been studied. The results reveal that Ni1.8Ge is a metal with an obvious magnetic anisotropy. The compound exhibits ferrimagnetic correlations along both directions. However, the long-range magnetic order was not observed due to the geometrical frustration arising from the triangular nickel lattice. At low temperature, the electron-magnon scattering and spin fluctuation have obvious contributions to the resistivity and magnetoresistance, indicating the existence of short-range dynamic magnetic ordering.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Co@Cu nanocomposite films with different Cu volume fraction (x) were prepared by the plasma-gas-condensation method and their electrical transport behaviors were systematically studied. Our results showed that a small amount of Cu would effectively improve the residual resistivity and saturated anomalous Hall resistivity, while the short-circuiting effect governed the residual resistivity and saturated anomalous Hall resistivity as the x further increased. We constructed the scaling relation between anomalous Hall conductivity and residual longitudinal conductivity at 5 K by changing the x. The results indicated that the scaling relations could be divided into two distinct regions and x = 18.8% was the demarcation point. The universal character of the scaling relation was valid in the range x < 18.8% (scattering dominated); for x > 18.8%, the experimental data obviously diverged from the 1.6 exponent scaling, which might be mainly ascribed to the short-circuiting effect. The experiment provided a distinctive way to study the anomalous Hall effect (AHE) in granular films by altering the composition without changing the grain size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Publisher regrets that Figs. 6a and 6b. have been misprinted in J. Magn. Magn. Mater. 441 (2017) 672–677. The correct version of Fig. 6a (Room temperature Mössbauer spectra of CoCrFeO4 samples) and Fig. 6b (Room temperature Mössbauer spectra of NiCrFeO4 samples) is presented below. Despite the Fig. 6a and Fig. 6b have been presented incorrectly, the discussion of the results is kept unchanged, since the arguments are correct. The Publisher would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2018Using X-ray Magnetic Linear Dichroism (XMLD) measurement, we investigate the antiferromagnetic (AFM) NiO spin reorientation transition (SRT) in epitaxial NiO/CoO/MgO(0 0 1) system at room temperature and constructed a complete NiO spin phase diagram. Then utilizing Magneto-Optic Kerr Effect (MOKE) combined with a rotation magnetic field (ROTMOKE), we investigated the effect of NiO SRT on the magnetic anisotropy of a ferromagnetic (FM) Py overlayer in Py/NiO/CoO/MgO(0 0 1) system. We find that the Py coercivity and anisotropy only slightly enhanced for Py on top of out-of-plane NiO spins but greatly enhanced for Py on top of in-plane NiO spins. Both the uniaxial and fourfold anisotropies of the Py showed a clear dependence on the NiO spin orientation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.To enhance the magnetization as well as to optimize the anisotropy of a mixed spinel nanocrystalline system, Ni2+, Zn2+ and Co2+ are chosen proportionally (0.3, 0.4 and 0.3) in Ni-Zn-Co-ferrite (NZCF). The nanoparticles of such Ni0.3Zn0.4Co0.3Fe2O4 (N3Z4C3) are prepared by co-precipitation method. Prepared nanoparticles are incorporated in the matrix of multi-walled carbon nanotubes (MWCNT) to enhance the microwave absorption. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns and their Rietveld analyses confirm the desired phases of N3Z4C3 and N3Z4C3-MWCNT. Distributions of cations in A- and B-sites are determined using Rietveld method. Morphological analyses are carried out by analyzing the observed electron-graphs recorded in high resolution transmission electron microscope (HRTEM). Magnetic and hyperfine behaviors are studied and interestingly, high magnetization (∼84 emu/g) is achieved at room temperature (RT). Microwave absorption capability is investigated by recording reflection losses (RL) in the range of 8–18 GHz. A maximum RL of ∼−22 dB is obtained at 15.24 GHz for 1 mm thick layer of N3Z4C3-MWCNT nanocomposite. Besides, microwave absorption study of Ni0.4Zn0.4Co0.2Fe2O4 (N4Z4C2) encapsulated in MWCNT is included for comparison. AC induction heating capability of NZCF nanoparticles for hyperthermia applications in cancer treatment is carried out and the same for Ni0.3Zn0.4Co0.2Cu0.1Fe2O4 (N3Z4C2C1) is included to make a comparative study. Among all the considered nanoparticles, N4Z4C2 nanoparticles with crystallite size (dcryst) of ∼34.7 nm exhibits maximum specific absorption rate (SAR) of 200 W/gFerrite. Our study suggests that NZCF nanoparticles are important for their applicability as good microwave absorber as well as efficient AC induction heat mediator.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetostatic interaction in multilayered structure materials has long been a key to optimize the magnetic devices due to the modulation of their magnetic properties. In this study, the multi-shell Ni80Fe20(tout)/Ni80Fe20(tin)/Cu composite wires were prepared by magnetron sputtering. The results show that the hysteresis loops of the multi-shell composite wires do not present significant changes compared with the single shell composite wire. A four-peak structure GMI profile may appear when both the inner and outer Ni80Fe20 shell have a preferred circular anisotropy, which indicated that the strong dipole interactions existed between the shells. In such multi-shell system, the response of dipole field Hdi to the driving frequency is against the compensation field Hcomp. If the inner shell has axial anisotropy structure, there are almost no dipole interaction observed according to disappearance of the interaction energy. All the results suggest a facile way to achieve a higher GMI response, and a sensitive method, especially in the low magnetic field region, to investigate the magnetic interactions in complicated composite structure materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Zero field cooling (ZFC) and field cooling (FC) protocols are commonly used to investigate the properties of magnetic nanoparticle systems. For non-interacting conditions the particle properties are fairly well correlated with the shape of the ZFC/FC curves. However, that is not the case when significant dipolar interparticle interactions (DII) are present, which frequently occurs in experimental samples (e.g. aggregates in biological systems; or the dried powder often used for the ZFC/FC measurements). The purpose of this work is to show how the influence of the DII on the ZFC/FC curves, computed by the volume sample concentration c, can be described in a general way if scaled by the dimensionless parameter c0=2K/MS 2; where K and MS are the anisotropy and saturation magnetization constants of the particles, respectively. This scaling parameter, which is straightforwardly derived from the energy equation governing the system, has an analogous meaning to the normalization of the external magnetic field H by the anisotropy field of the particles HA=2K/MS. We use a Monte Carlo technique to illustrate how apparently different TB vs. c curves of various particles types (where TB is the blocking temperature), follow the same trend if scaling c/c0.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we seek for detectable modifications in system properties induced by the Coulombian interactions between magnetic monopoles in an artificial spin ice system as an attempt to provide theoretical support to experiments devoted to measure the magnetic charge of monopole excitations. To this end an emergent vertex model was developed, validated and afterwards used to explore Coulombian interaction modifications on the distribution of monopole-like excitations in a magnetization reversal process. Our results show that the analysis of the skewness and kurtosis of the distribution of monopoles can be used to identify the presence of Coulombian interactions. These results are shown to be robust against the presence of disorder and temperature fluctuations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this paper is to introduce a novel methodology for nondestructive determination of microstructural and mechanical properties (due to the various heat treatments), as well as thickness variations (as a result of corrosion effect) of dual phase steels. The characterizations are based on the variations in the electromagnetic properties extracted from magnetic hysteresis loop and eddy current methods which are coupled with a data fusion system. This study was conducted on six groups of samples (with different thicknesses, from 1 mm to 4 mm) subjected to the various intercritical annealing processes to produce different fractions of martensite/ferrite phases and consequently, changes in hardness, yield strength and ultra tensile strength (UTS). This study proposes a novel soft computing technique to increase accuracy of nondestructive measurements and resolving overlapped NDE outputs related to the various samples. The empirical results indicate that applying the proposed data fusion technique on the two electromagnetic NDE data sets nondestructively, causes an increase in the accuracy and reliability of determining material features including ferrite fraction, hardness, yield strength, UTS, as well as thickness variations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.An increase in the electromagnetic wave pollution generated from wireless telecommunication devices has devoted to a great request for exploiting microwave absorbing materials for themselves. The combination of inherently conducting polymers such as polypyrrole (PPy) with metal oxides has led to design ideal microwave absorbing materials which benefit both advantage effects of ICPs and metal oxide nanoparticles. Herein, the quaternary nanocomposite of Epoxy-PPy/Fe3O4-ZnO was prepared and tested for the absorption of X-band microwaves. Simultaneous application of metal oxides and conducting polypyrrole in the epoxy matrix was evaluated in order to increase the absorption intensity and broadness of microwaves in X-band region. The morphology, microstructure, and phase structure of Fe3O4, ZnO, and PPy, as well as quaternary nanocomposite were characterized and studied using FTIR, XRD, FESEM and TEM techniques. The presence of nanoparticles in the quaternary nanocomposite was confirmed by EDS. The magnetization of iron oxide was studied by VSM. The synergetic effect of iron oxide and zinc oxide nanoparticles in different weight ratios (Fe3O4/ZnO) on the electromagnetic wave absorption was evaluated. The electromagnetic parameters have been evaluated by the vector network analyzer in the frequency range of 8.2–12.4 GHz which is named as X-band region and is adequate for radar applications. The electromagnetic wave absorbing outcomes indicated that Epoxy-PPy/Fe3O4-ZnO quaternary nanocomposite has wide absorption area and high attenuation, which is believed to be due to dielectric loss properties related to the polypyrrole, magnetic loss factor of Fe3O4, and synergetic effects of components. The maximum reflection loss reached to −32.53 dB at 9.96 GHz with a nanocomposite thickness of 2 mm which is dedicated to the Epoxy-PPy/Fe3O4-ZnO with iron oxide to zinc oxide ratio of 2:1. The absorption bandwidth with the reflection loss lower than −10 dB (90% attenuation) was up to 4.2 GHz that covering a frequency range of 8.2–12.4 GHz. Results showed that absorber having %15 (w/w) polypyrrole/epoxy resin in Epoxy-PPy/Fe3O4-ZnO nanocomposite with iron oxide to zinc oxide ratio of 2:1 displays the best reflection loss properties. The loss curves illustrated the values of dielectric loss tangent and magnetic loss tangent of prepared nanocomposites which are in the range of 0.25–0.7 and −0.08 to 0.09 respectively. Therefore, microwave absorption mechanism is probably attributed to dielectric loss.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The main objective of this work is to study the influence of thermal oxidation on the chemical composition and magnetic properties of iron nanoparticles which were manufactured in a simple chemical reduction of Fe3+ ions coming from iron salt with sodium borohydride. The annealing processing was performed in an argon atmosphere containing the traces of oxygen to avoid spontaneous oxidation of iron at temperatures ranging from 200 °C to 800 °C. The chemical composition and magnetic properties of as-prepared and thermally-treated nanoparticles were determined by means of X-ray diffractometry, Raman spectroscopy, Mössbauer spectroscopy and vibrating sample magnetometry. Due to the magnetic interactions, the investigated iron nanoparticles tended to create the dense aggregates which were difficult to split even at low temperatures. This caused that there was no empty space between them, which led to their partial sintering at elevated temperatures. These features hindered their precise morphological observations using the electron microscopy techniques. The obtained results show that the annealing process up to 800 °C resulted in a progressive change in the chemical composition of as-prepared iron nanoparticles which was associated with their oxidation. As a consequence, their magnetic properties also depended on the annealing temperature. For instance, considering the values of saturation magnetization, its highest value was recorded for the as-prepared nanoparticles at 1 T and it equals 149 emu/g, while the saturation point for nanoparticles treated at 600 °C and higher temperatures was not reached even at the magnetic field of about 5 T. Moreover, a significant enhancement of coercivity was observed for the iron nanoparticles annealed over 600 °C.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Zein films in two configurations with magnetite nanoparticles (zein/NPs) and magnetite-acetaminophen (zein/NPs/Drug) were used as magnetically stimuli-responsive systems to propose a model of controlled release by dissolution and diffusion mechanism. Composite material films of zein/NPs and zein/NPs/Drug were made by dispersion of magnetite nanoparticles into zein solution then solvent casting of the solution on a flat Teflon substrate. The properties of composite films were analyzed by magnetization curves of (MvsH) and measurements of magnetic force microscopy (MFM). Drug release from the zein/NPs/Drug composite films was determined using a type II dissolution apparatus for a period of 2 h under applied magnetic field conditions. In addition, the diffusion mechanism was tested with zein/NPs films into diffusion cell containing acetaminophen solution for 24 h and using a permanent magnet as a remote trigger device. The results showed that the magnetite nanoparticles contained in the zein/NPs and zein/NPs/Drug composite films are stable, i.e., they do not undergo sufficiently high levels of oxidation as to alter their magnetic properties. Furthermore, the dissolution and diffusion results lead us to conclude that zein composite films effectively behave as stimuli-responsive systems triggered by an external magnetic field applied. The result is a model controlled release system whereby drug release can be controlled by adjusting the magnitude of the applied magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this work, Gate-All-Around Nanowire MOSFETs have been studied at very low temperatures. DC behaviors have been investigated in the linear operation and saturation regions, giving access to several analog parameters. Static characteristics at 4.2 K and low polarization exhibit step- like variations of the drain current, which can be linked to energy subband scattering. First results on the impact of quantum transport mechanism on the low frequency noise are shown. Finally the low frequency noise spectroscopy has led to the identification of silicon film traps.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe band-modulation and sharp-switching mechanisms in Z2-FET device operated as a capacitorless 1T-DRAM memory are reviewed. The main parameters that govern the memory performance are discussed based on detailed experiments and simulations. This 1T-DRAM memory does not suffer from super-coupling effect and can be integrated in sub-10 nm thick SOI films. It offers low leakage current, high current margin, long retention, low operating voltage especially for programming, and high speed. The Z2-FET is suitable for embedded memory applications.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis paper reports the fabrication and electrical characterization of planar SOI Tunnel FETs (TFETs) made using a Low-Temperature (LT) process designed for 3D sequential integration. These proof-of-concept TFETs feature junctions obtained by Solid Phase Epitaxy Regrowth (SPER). Their electrical behavior is analyzed and compared to reference samples (regular process using High-Temperature junction formation, HT). Dual ID-VDS measurements verify that the TFET structures present Band-to-Band tunnelling (BTBT) carrier injection and not Schottky Barrier tunnelling. P-mode operating LT TFETs deliver an ON state current similar to that of the HT reference, opening the door towards optimized devices operating with very low threshold voltage VTH and low supply voltage VDD.© 2018 Elsevier LtdGraphene photodetectors exhibit a low photoresponsivity due to their weak light absorbance. In this study, we fabricated a graphene/black phosphorus (BP) heterostructure, in which the multilayer BP flake with a ∼0.3 eV direct band gap functions as an enhanced light-absorption material. Further, the photoexcited electrons are trapped in the trap states of the BP, which creates a photogating effect and causes holes to flow into the graphene layer driven by the built-in potential between BP and graphene. The photocarrier lifetime is therefore prolonged by trapping, and as a result of the high carrier mobility of graphene, the holes that transfer into the graphene channel can travel through the circuit before they recombine with trapped electrons. These combined effects result in a high photoresponsivity: 55.75 A/W at λ = 655 nm, 1.82 A/W at λ = 785 nm, and 0.66 A/W at λ = 980 nm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the effects of synthesis method and dopant neodymium ion on the ferroelectric properties and photocatalytic activity of bismuth ferrite were studied. BiFeO3 (BFO) and Bi0.8Nd0.2FeO3 (BNFO) nanoparticles were prepared through a facile sol-gel combustion (SG) and hydrothermal (HT) methods. The as-prepared products were characterized by X-ray powder diffraction (XRD), Furrier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) and transmission electron microscope (TEM) images. Both nanophotocatalysts have similar crystal structures, but the SG products have semi-spherical morphology. On the other hand, HT samples have rod-like morphology. The ferroelectric properties of BNFO nanoparticles were improved compared to the undoped bismuth ferrite. The photocatalytic activity of as-synthesized nanoparticles was also evaluated by the degradation of methyl orange (MO) under visible light irradiation. The SG as-prepared nanoparticles exhibited a higher photocatalytic activity compared to powders obtained by HT method. Also substitution of Nd into the BFO structure increased the photocatalytic activity of bismuth ferrite.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Barkhausen noise, driven by thermal fluctuations in stationary magnetic field, and Barkhausen jumps, driven by sweeping magnetic field, are demonstrated to be effects of different orders of magnitude. The critical magnetic field for domain walls depinning, followed by avalanched and irreversible magnetization jumps, is determined. Magnetoresistive response of NiFe/M/NiFe (M = Au, Ta, Ag) trilayers to stationary and sweeping magnetic field is studied by means of anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) and planar Hall effect (PHE) measurements. Thermal fluctuations result in local and reversible changes of magnetization of the layers in thin film magnetic junctions, while the sweeping magnetic field results in reversible and irreversible avalanched domain motion, dependently on the ratio between the values of sweeping magnetic field and domain wall depinning field. The correlation between AMR and PHE responses to Barkhausen jumps is studied. The value of this correlation is found to be dependent on the α angle between the directions of magnetic field and current path.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.FeCoB films were deposited by composition gradient sputtering, and an ultrathin Ru spacer was inserted in the middle of the 50 nm FeCoB films. The static and high frequency magnetic properties of the FeCoB/Ru/FeCoB trilayer films were systematically studied. The films show a good in-plane uniaxial anisotropy, and the anisotropy field increased greatly from 85 Oe to 417 Oe, while the corresponding resonance frequency was dramatically enhanced from 4.23 GHz to 8.36 GHz. Furthermore, the trilayer films also show a low damping of 0.012. This study provides a simple and effective technique to further increase the resonance frequency of soft magnetic films by inserting an ultrathin nonmagnetic spacer, which can be applied to high frequency microwave devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the temperature dependence of the electron spin resonance (ESR) linewidth above the critical region in Co3O4. The focus is on the temperature dependence of the one and two-phonon processes. We express the linewidth as a sum of three terms, a constant, associated with spin-spin interactions, a one-phonon term, and a two-phonon term, and use a least-squares fit over the temperature range 50 K ≤ T ≤ 500 K in analyzing the data. It is found that the spin-spin mechanism is dominant below 100 K, while the two-phonon mechanism is most important above 250 K. In the intermediate region, all three mechanisms make significant contributions. The success of the high temperature approximation for the phonon terms, which occurs well below the Debye temperature of 525 K, is attributed to the exchange narrowing of the bandwidth of the phonons contributing to the linewidth. The phonon mechanisms for the ESR linewidth in magnetic insulators are compared with the phonon linewidth mechanisms for magnetic impurities in non-magnetic crystals.© 2018Indium zinc oxide (IZO) thin film transistor (TFT) deposited by solution method is of considerable technological interest as it is a key component for the fabrication of flexible and cheap transparent electronic devices. To obtain a principal understanding of physical properties of solution-processed IZO TFT, a new drain current model that account for the charge transport is proposed. The formulation is developed by incorporating the effect of gate voltage on mobility and threshold voltage with the carrier charges. It is demonstrated that in IZO TFTs the below threshold regime should be divided into two sections: EC − EF > 3kT and EC − EF ≤ 3kT, where kT is the thermal energy, EF and EC represent the Fermi level and the conduction band edge, respectively. Additionally, in order to describe conduction mechanisms more accurately, the extended mobility edge model is conjoined, which can also get rid of the complicated and lengthy computations. The good agreement between measured and calculated results confirms the efficiency of this model for the design of integrated large-area thin film circuits.© 2018The structural, elastic and half-metallic properties of Fe2LiAs Heusler compound have been investigated by using first-principles calculations. Both Cu2MnAl-type and Hg2CuTi-type structures have been considered for both nonmagnetic and ferromagnetic states. It is found that the ferromagnetic state is more stable than the nonmagnetic one for both structures, and the ferromagnetic Hg2CuTi-type structure is the most energetically preferable. For the Hg2CuTi-type ferromagnetic Fe2LiAs, the elastic properties have been studied and the Debye temperature has been estimated from the average sound velocity. It is found that the compound is mechanically stable at ground state, exhibits ductile and anisotropic behaviors, and has a Debye temperature of 413.52 K. From the calculated electronic and magnetic properties, the compound is also found to be a half-metallic ferromagnet with a total magnetic moment of 4.0 μB within the relatively wide range of lattice constant. These results suggest that Fe2LiAs is a promising material for spintronic applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the microstructural and magnetic characterization of single phase nanocrystalline partially inverted Zn0.3Ni0.7Fe2O4 mixed spinel ferrite. The samples were annealed at 200 °C, 400 °C, 600 °C, 800 °C and 1000 °C. X-ray diffraction results indicate phase purity of all the samples and application of Debye- Scherrer yielded a crystallite size variation from 5 nm to 33 nm for the different samples. Magnetic measurements have revealed the freezing of interfacial spins which were the cause of the large horizontal M-H loop shift causing large exchange bias with high anisotropy. The magnetic measurements show a hysteresis loop with high effective anisotropy constant due to highly magnetically disordered surface spin at 5 K.© 2018Two different approaches for contacting graphene in a 200 mm wafer silicon technology environment were tested. The key is the opportunity to create a thin SiN passivation layer on top of the graphene protecting it from the damage by plasma processes. The first approach uses pure Ni contacts with a thickness of 200 nm. For the second attempt, Ni is used as the contact metal which substitutes the Ti compared to a standard contact hole filling process. Accordingly, the contact hole filling of this “stacked via” approach is Ni/TiN/W. We demonstrate that the second “stacked Via” is beneficial and shows contact resistances of a wafer scale process with values below 200 Ohm µm.© 2018Tailoring magnetic properties in nanocluster assembled cobalt (Co) thin films was achieved by admitting a small percentage of H2 gas (∼2%) into the Co gas phase cluster formation chamber prior to deposition. The oxygen content in the films is considerably reduced by the presence of hydrogen during the cluster formation, leading to enhanced magnetic interactions between clusters. Two sets of Co samples were fabricated, one without hydrogen gas and one with hydrogen gas. Magnetic properties of the non-hydrogenated and the hydrogen-treated Co nanocluster assembled films are comparatively studied using magnetic force microscopy and vibrating sample magnetometry. When comparing the two sets of samples the considerably larger coercive field of the H2-treated Co nanocluster film and the extended micrometer-sized magnetic domain structure confirm the enhancement of magnetic interactions between clusters. The thickness of the antiferromagnetic CoO layer is controlled with this procedure and modifies the exchange bias effect in these films. The exchange bias shift is lower for the H2-treated Co nanocluster film, which indicates that a thinner antiferromagnetic CoO reduces the coupling with the ferromagnetic Co. The hydrogen-treatment method can be used to tailor the oxidation levels thus controlling the magnetic properties of ferromagnetic cluster-assembled films.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of magnetic and electric fields on the electrical and magnetic properties of BiMnO3 films within the framework of Landau-Ginzburg theory had been investigated. We also calculated and discussed the hysteresis loops of polarization and magnetization as a function of electric and magnetic fields. The results reveal that, the possibility of electric-field control of magnetization switching, and vice versa. By decreasing the film thickness of BiMnO3 film, it is shown that the coercive fields and remnant order parameters are suppressed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, nano-sized particles of BaCrxFe12−xO19 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) hexaferrite were fabricated through citrate auto gel combustion process and the impact of Cr-ion substitution on ac magnetic susceptibility properties of Ba-hexaferrite were explored. X-ray powder diffraction (XRD) measurements approved the purity of prepared samples and showed a reduction of the average crystallite size with increasing the content of Cr. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) observation indicated the hexagonal morphology of all samples. AC susceptibility measurements displayed a frequency dependence of the magnetic responses. These measurements indicated that there are strong magnetic interactions (which is the highest for BaCr0.3Fe11.7O19 NP) between particles which cause a superspin glass-like (SSG) behavior at low temperatures. Estimating the values of loss power density revealed an increase of loss power density with increasing Cr-substitution element. The relative sensitivity of the prepared MNPs to the variation of applied frequency is very influenced by Cr-substitution and is highest in BaCr0.3Fe11.7O19 MNPs, suggesting that this sample can be considered as magnetic nanomaterial for hyperthermia and for many other applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Conventional magnetometry is irreplaceable in evaluating bulk magnetization of materials over broad temperature and field ranges. The technique is also effective in quantifying hysteresis that may be associated with magnetic and structural phase transitions that occur during the magnetizing/demagnetizing cycling, and the derived magnetic field-induced isothermal entropy change – one of the most important properties in the field of magnetocalorics. Both systematic and random errors present during the measurements of magnetization, however, may lead to erroneous conclusions. Using two well-known materials – elemental Gd and intermetallic Gd5Si2Ge2 as examples, we consider best practices in performing reliable and rapid magnetization measurements for proper characterization of magnetocaloric properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The training effect property of the exchange bias in the reactively sputtered polycrystalline Fe3O4 thin films of varying thicknesses in the range 25–200 nm are studied. Structural studies by X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy and selected area electron diffraction confirm the formation of single phase Fe3O4. The scanning electron spectroscopy images show that the grains are uniformly distributed. All the samples show clear and consistent exchange bias training behaviour due to the dynamics of the spins at the interface of the ferrimagnetic core and the spin glass-like surface of the grains. The analysis of the training effect data of the exchange bias field HE measured at 2 K by using three different models show that the model based on the relaxation of the frozen and rotatable spin components at the interface gives the best description for all the samples. From this model, it is found that the reversible interface spins relax around 7 times faster than the frozen interface spins at 2 K for all the samples and that their relative relaxation rates are independent of the sample thickness. This constancy show that the relative relaxation rates of the interfacial frozen and rotatable spin components is a material dependent property. The frozen component of the interfacial spins of each sample is found to be dominated at the initial stage of the training. A direct equivalence between the HE and remanence asymmetry ME is observed. Above the spin freezing temperature, the training effect measurements at 75 K show that the HE decreases sharply with successive field cycling as compared to the measurements made at 2 K and the HE vanishes after first few cycles.© 2018The electronic, acoustic and anharmonic properties of Mn2RuZ (Z = Si and Ge) Heusler compounds were systematically studied by first-principles calculations combined with homogeneous deformation theory. The calculated lattice constants, electronic, magnetic and elastic properties were found to agree with the available experimental and theoretical values. Based on the obtained elastic properties, the acoustic velocities, Debye temperatures and thermal conductivities were calculated for both compounds. Their acoustic velocities and thermal conductivities were found to exhibit anisotropic behavior. Mn2RuSi has larger acoustic velocities, higher Debye and thermal conductivities for its lower density and larger second-order elastic constants. The pressure derivatives of second-order elastic constants, mode Grüneisen constants of long-wavelength acoustic modes, and nonlinear ultrasonic parameters were also obtained. The predictions on the acoustic and anharmonic properties are useful for further study of the related materials in the near future.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this letter, we have discussed the implications of nonlocal-in-time kinetic energy approach recently introduced by Suykens on the dynamics of charge particles spin in a magnetic field with spin. It was observed that both the Landau quantization of the energy and their levels positions are modified. Besides, massive photons are generated in magnetic materials similar to the one encountered in massive quantum electrodynamics. These massive photons depend on the electron mass and on the nonlocal relaxation time. For solid copper, we found M≈3.4×10-20α-2eV/c2 where α is a real free parameter.© 2018 Elsevier LtdOrganic/inorganic lead halide perovskite solar cells have recently attracted much attention in photovoltaic research, due to the devices show promising ways to achieve high efficiencies. The perovskite devices with high efficiencies, however, are typically fabricated in tandem solar cell which is complicated. In this research work, we introduce a solar cell device with the combination of CH3NH3PbI3−xClx perovskite and bulk heterojunction PCDTBT:PC70BM polymer without any tandem structure. The new integrated perovskite/polymer hybrid structure of ITO/PEDOT:PSS/perovskite/PCDTBT:PC70BM/PC70BM/TiOx/Al provides higher power conversion efficiency (PCE) of devices compared with conventional perovskite cell structure. With the optimized PCDTBT:PC70BM thickness of ∼70 nm, the highest PCE of 11.67% is achieved. Variation of conducting donor polymers in this new structure is also preliminary demonstrated. This study provides an attractively innovative structure and a promising design for further development of the new-generation solar cells.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the structural, compositional, and magnetic properties as well as the AC magnetic hyperthermic response of CoFe2-xLaxO4 (x=0.0,0.2,0.5) nanoparticles. We found that the La3+ ions substituted into the Fe3+ ion sites, and resulted in an increased magnetocrystalline anisotropy with x, and altered the time-dependent magnetism. To provide a better understanding of the AC magnetic hyperthermia response, a series of temperature versus time measurements were done by varying the magnetic field amplitude, the carrier medium viscosity and the concentration of the nanoparticles as parameters that governed the heating efficiency. A decrease of specific loss power was observed with an increase of the viscosity of the carrier medium for x=0 and x=0.25 substituted Co-ferrite nanoparticles, while a small increase was observed with the x=0.1 La3+ substituted Co-ferrite nanoparticles (due to their higher intrinsic magnetocrystalline anisotropy).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The graphene foam (GF) was prepared by reducing graphene oxide (GO) with L-ascorbic acid (L-AA), followed by freeze-drying. Through changing the initial concentration of GO solution, several GFs with different microstructure could be obtained. The higher the initial concentration of GO, the more obviously the layered stacking of graphene sheet. According to the study, GFs with honeycomb microstructure possessed excellent performance on microwave absorption (MA). When the concentration of GO was 2 mg/ml, the resulting sample GF2 showed the best MA properties. When the thickness of the sample GF2 was 2 mm and the mass content of GF2 in the sample was only 3 wt%, the absolute value of the maximum reflection loss (|RLmax|) of GF2 could reach 41.0 dB at 16.2 GHz. And 11 GHz bandwidth of RL less than −5 dB, covering the whole Ku, X and half the Xc band, was achieved by GF2 with the thickness of 3 mm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic properties of the disordered and ordered Fe2MnAl Heusler alloys have systematically been investigated by local and bulk experimental methods. Plastic deformation, induced by cold-work, leads to a structural phase transformation from the ordered L21 to a disordered A2-structure, concomitantly with a change from paramagnetic PM to ferromagnetic FM state; an effect attributed to the strain-induced ferromagnetism. This transition is explained assuming a gradual transformation of the L21-structure to the anti-phase boundary APB tubes, which result in Fe-cluster formation. Plastic deformed ribbon annealed at low temperatures (Tan < 673 K) favors stabilization of L21-structure with (4 0 0) preferential orientation and magnetic ordering temperature of about 120 K. Considering that Fe atoms order magnetically at 120 K, as seen by Mössbauer, and the measured reduction of total magnetization for temperatures below 50 K, one proposes that Mn and Fe sublattices interact magnetically in a non-collinear magnetic structure that is established due to Fe-Fe, Mn-Mn and Fe-Mn frustrated magnetic couplings. High temperature annealing (Tan > 673 K) favors a strong Mn segregation, concomitantly with formation of disordered Fe-Mn-Al alloys that also have magnetic ordering temperature approaching to 300 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic shape memory alloys experience magnetic-field-induced torque due to magnetocrystalline anisotropy and shape anisotropy. In a homogeneous magnetic field, torque results in bending of long samples. This study investigates the torque on a single crystal of Ni-Mn-Ga magnetic shape memory alloy constrained with respect to bending in an external magnetic field. The dependence of the torque on external magnetic field magnitude, strain, and twin boundary structure was studied experimentally and with computer simulations. With increasing magnetic field, the torque increased until it reached a maximum near 700 mT. Above 200 mT, the torque was not symmetric about the equilibrium orientation for a sample with one twin boundary. The torque on two specimen with equal strain but different twin boundary structures varied systematically with the spatial arrangement of crystallographic twins. Numerical simulations show that twin boundaries suppress the formation of 180° domains if the direction of easy magnetization between two twin boundaries is parallel to a free surface and the magnetic field is perpendicular to that surface. For a particular twin microstructure, the torque decreases with increasing strain by a factor of six due to the mutual compensation of magnetocrystalline and shape anisotropy. When free rotation is suppressed such as in transducers of magneto-mechanical actuators, magnetic-field-induced torque creates strong bending forces, which may cause friction and failure under cyclic loading.© 2018The magnetoresistance of superconducting Bi/Ni bilayers is investigated around the superconducting transition temperature. At temperatures within the superconducting transition, the magnetoresistance presents a superposition of symmetric peaks and hysteresis behaviors. The magnetoresistance peaks show the evidence of TC suppression due to stray fields from domain walls appearing during magnetization switching. The hysteresis behaviors show the effect of vortices motion on the superconductivity of Bi/Ni bilayers. This unusual magnetoresistance controlled by both stray fields and vortices provides a new understanding of the interaction between superconductivity and ferromagnetism in Bi/Ni bilayers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Pure-phased orthorhombic RMn0.5Fe0.5O3 (R = Tb, Dy, and Ho) were successfully synthesized via the low-temperature hydrothermal technique. The nucleation and crystal growth of RMn0.5Fe0.5O3 (R = Tb, Dy, and Ho) were influenced mainly by medium alkalinity, reaction temperature and time. All the three samples are of orthorhombic structure with +3 valences of Mn and Fe. They present morphologies of spheres that are assembled by smaller tabular crystals. Spin reorientation transitions were observed in RMn0.5Fe0.5O3 (R = Tb, Dy, and Ho), and magnetization reversal was observed in TbFe0.5Mn0.5O3. The spin reorientation temperatures show a linear relation with the magnetic field intensity, and the spin reorientation and magnetization reversal disappear when the applied field is big enough. Antiferromagnetic transition of R3+ was observed in TbFe0.5Mn0.5O3 and DyFe0.5Mn0.5O3 at lower temperatures. All the three samples show the characteristics of spiral magnetic ordering at 2 K and show residual magnetism at both 2 K and 300 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.First principles calculations on structural, electronic, magnetic and thermoelectric properties of newly synthesized perovskite Sr2HoNbO6 are carried out at the behest of much reliable density functional theory (DFT). The equilibrium lattice parameters at the cost of structural optimizations are observed to agree with the available experimental data. Three different methods for exchange correlations are utilized to investigate the electronic structure of this oxide. Spin polarized band structure calculations predict the semiconducting nature of this compound along with a large energy gap of 3.6 eV. Ferromagnetic interactions among the constituent atomic spin moments determine the total magnetic moment μ = 4.0 μB for this material with a maximum contribution from μHo = 3.95 μB. In addition, the temperature dependent thermoelectric properties based on the electronic results of Sr2HoNbO6 in temperature range from 50 to 1000 K are investigated. The total negative Seebeck coefficient signifies the p-type conduction or holes as charge carriers along the selected temperature range. The outcome of this study specifies the maximum value of dimensionless figure of merit zT ≈ 0.97 at room temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The ordered crystalline Invar alloy Fe3Pt is in a special magnetic critical state, under which the lattice dynamic stability of the system is extremely sensitive to external pressures. We studied the pressure dependence of enthalpy and magnetism of Fe3Pt in different crystalline alloys by using the first-principles projector augmented-wave method based on the density functional theory. Results show that the P4/mbm structure is the ground state structure and is more stable relative to other structures at pressures below 18.54 GPa. The total magnetic moments of L12, I4/mmm and DO22 structures decrease rapidly with pressure and oscillate near the ferromagnetic collapse critical pressure. At the pressure of 43 GPa, the ferrimagnetic property in DO22 structure becomes apparently strengthened and its volume increases rapidly. The lattice dynamics calculation for L12 structures at high pressures shows that the spontaneous magnetization of the system in ferromagnetic states induces the softening of the transverse acoustic phonon TA1 (M), and there exists a strong spontaneous volume magnetostriction at pressures below 26.95 GPa. Especially, the lattice dynamics stability is sensitive to pressure, in the pressure range between the ferromagnetic collapse critical pressure (41.9 GPa) and the magnetism completely disappearing pressure (57.25 GPa), and near the pressure of phase transition from L12 to P4/mbm structure (27.27 GPa). Moreover, the instability of magnetic structure leads to a prominent elastic modulus oscillation, and the spin polarizability of electrons near the Fermi level is very sensitive to pressures in that the pressure range. The pressure induces the stability of the phonon spectra of the system at pressures above 57.25 GPa.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The fabrication of Co32Fe67B1 thin films by AC electrodeposition method over the bed of 1-D nanostructures using boric acid as boron source has been done successfully for the first time. It is shown that Co32Fe67B1 thin films can easily be deposited electrochemically on anodized aluminum oxide (AAO) templates without employing any complexing agent in the bath solution. The structural properties measured from XRD shows that Co32Fe67B1 thin films are polycrystalline in nature with BCC structure having average grain size of 62 nm. The magnetic measurements reveal that the 1-D nanostructures array influences the characteristics of hysteresis loop such as squareness and as a result the shift in conventional in-plane easy axis of thin film leading to perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA). The shape anisotropy and magnetostatic interactions determine the overall magnetic behavior. The coercivity decreases from 59 Oe to 54 Oe and saturation magnetization increases from 14 emu to 25 emu with the increase of film thickness. The resistance obtained from I-V curves fluctuates between 3–13 MΩ with the increase of film thickness. The measurement of Hall Effect in perpendicular Co32Fe67B1 thin films at room temperature shows that for a certain thickness the value of resistivity reaches as high as 4.21 × 10+01 Ω-cm. The Hall mobility shows a fluctuating trend between 19 and 34 cm2/Vs. The Hall measurements taken without external magnetic field is explained on the basis of Spin Hall Effect which opens a door for future device application and in-field switching of magnetic tunnel junctions. Our work opens a new avenue to manipulate the magnetic anisotropy of Co32Fe67B1 by modification of 1-D and 2-D interface.© 2018Superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION) Fe3O4 nanoparticles were prepared using different approaches: co-precipitation and sonochemical methods. This article is a comparative study on how different synthesis techniques greatly affect the magnetic properties and heating efficiency of such nanomaterial. Another important issue addressed here is the correlation between microstructure, colloidal stability, magnetization and specific absorption rate (SAR) of the nanoparticles. The results reveal that the sonochemical method for polyethylene glycol (PEGylated) Fe3O4 with size 5 nm leads to pseudo single domain with smallest loop area. Additionally, large SAR values are obtained within 10–15 min using low magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Fe thin films were deposited on commercial CD substrates using the magnetron sputtering technique, to examine the effect of the patterned underlayer on their structural and magnetic properties. We report that the coercive field and magnetic anisotropy of these iron grained thin films are strongly depended on the patterned substrate, in accordance with Monte Carlo simulations performed using the Metropolis algorithm. The model developed well explains the role of the exchange and dipole-dipole interparticle magnetic interactions between the Fe grains, and predicts the optimum conditions for advanced magnetic sensor applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Electron structure of self-doped La1− xMnO3+δ perovskites is studied with X-ray absorption spectroscopy by measuring the spectra at manganese L-edges and oxygen K-edge, and analyzing the results for Mn K-edge spectra and magnetization data. The observed change of Curie temperature is explained by the change of level of hybridization of Mn 3d states and the O 2p states, which was manifested by the parallel change of 2p3/2 and 2p1/2 spectra with x and TC.© 2018This article has been retracted: please see Elsevier Policy on Article Withdrawal (https://www.elsevier.com/about/our-business/policies/article-withdrawal). This article has been retracted at the request of the Editor-in-Chief. The article duplicates information reported in a paper that has already been published in Advanced Materials Letters, vol. 8, 2017, pages 1188–1192. DOI: 10.5185/amlett.2017.1525. One of the conditions of submission of a paper for publication is that the corresponding author declares explicitly that the paper is not under consideration for publication elsewhere and should inform the co-authors of the submission. As such this article represents a severe abuse of the scientific publishing system. The scientific community takes a very strong view on this matter and apologies are offered to readers of the journal that this was not detected during the submission process.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and magnetic properties of Mn-doped 2D LiZnP with and without vacancy are investigated within the framework of density functional theory. Our results indicate that the pristine 2D LiZnP still exhibit semiconductor character with a narrower band gap about 1.3 eV due to change of crystal structure. The Mn-doped 2D LiZnP favors spin-polarized ground states. The magnetic coupling results show that the Mn-doped 2D LiZnP exist the ferromagnetic stable state, which is mediated by the stronger interaction between Mn-3d and P-2p state. Both Li and Zn vacancies acting as acceptor defect increase the carrier concentration and thus enhance the magnetism. Among them, Li vacancies system can result in antiferromagnetic coupling among Mn impurities, while Zn vacancies system enhances the ferromagnetic stable state.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study the nonlinear gyrotropic motion of a magnetic skyrmion in a nanodisk by means of micromagnetic simulations. The skyrmion is driven by a linearly polarized harmonic field with the frequency of counterclockwise gyrotropic mode. It is found that the motion of the skyrmion displays different patterns with increasing field amplitude. In the linear regime of weak driving field, the skyrmion performs a single counterclockwise gyrotropic motion. The guiding center of the skyrmion moves along a helical line from the centre of the nanodisk to a stable circular orbit. The stable orbital radius increases linearly with the field amplitude. When the driving field is larger than a critical value, the skyrmion exhibits complex nonlinear motion. With the advance of time, the motion trajectory of the skyrmion goes through a series of evolution process, from a single circular motion to a bird nest-like and a flower-like trajectory and finally, to a gear-like steady-state motion. The frequency spectra show that except the counterclockwise gyrotropic mode, the clockwise gyrotropic mode is also nonlinearly excited and its amplitude increases with time. The complex motion trajectory of the skyrmion is the result of superposition of the two gyrotropic motions with changing amplitude. Both the linear and nonlinear gyrotropic motions of the skyrmion can be well described by a generalized Thiele's equation of motion.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.La1.5Ca0.5CoIrO6 is a re-entrant spin-glass (SG) that exhibits antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic couplings at T∼95 and ∼86 K, respectively, and at T∼25 K a SG phase emerges. In this work we investigated the effect of hydrostatic pressure (P) on La1.5Ca0.5CoIrO6 magnetic properties. By means of magnetization as a function of temperature measurements, carried under different applied pressures and/or magnetic fields, we have found that the freezing temperature of the SG phase exhibits an initial increase followed by a decrease with increasing P, and that the maximum P = 7.9 kbar was not sufficient to prevent the formation of the frozen state. Since the ordering temperatures of the antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic phases are also affected by P, we discuss the results here found in terms of changes on the balance between the magnetic phases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In order to enhance the microwave-absorbing and shielding properties of the composites, the flaky FeSiAl particles embedded in an epoxy polymer were aligned with a two-dimensional rotating magnetic field. The morphologies, electromagnetic (EM) characteristics, and microwave-absorbing and shielding properties of the unaligned and aligned FeSiAl/epoxy composites were investigated. The results showed that after alignment treatment, the flaky FeSiAl particles tend to orient uniformly in the rotating magnetic field, and the permittivity and permeability of the aligned composites were increased in the frequency range of 1–18 GHz compared with that of randomly distributed composites. The calculated microwave-absorbing properties indicated that the peak value of the return loss (RL) of the aligned composites can reach 8.8 dB, compared with 5.8 dB of the unaligned composites of 2.5 mm in thickness (60 wt%); and the bandwidth with RL value more than 6 dB is in a wider frequency range from 1 to 2.8 GHz. And the calculated shielding effectiveness (SE) of the aligned composites is 1.1–3 times higher than that of unaligned one in every thickness, and the maximum SE of the aligned one is 31.8 dB at 18 GHz with a thickness of 2.5 mm.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA new charge-based model of the electric field distribution for Junction Barrier Schottky (JBS) diodes is presented, based on the description of the charge-sharing effect between the vertical Schottky junction and the lateral pn-junctions that constitute the active cell of the device. In our model, the inherently 2-D problem is transformed into a simple but accurate 1-D problem which has a closed analytical solution that captures the reshaping and reduction of the electric field profile responsible for the improved electrical performance of these devices, while preserving physically meaningful expressions that depend on relevant device parameters. The validation of the model is performed by comparing calculated electric field profiles with drift-diffusion simulations of a JBS device showing good agreement. Even though other fully 2-D models already available provide higher accuracy, they lack physical insight making the proposed model an useful tool for device design.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a new metal–insulator-metal (MIM) antifuse was fabricated with the high κ Al2O3 deposited by atomic layer deposition (ALD) as the dielectric. On this high κ antifuse structure, the very low on-state resistance was obtained under certain programming conditions. It is the first time that the antifuse on-state resistance has been found decreasing along with the increase of dielectric film thickness, which is attributed to a large current overshoot during breakdown. For the device with a dielectric thickness of 12 nm, very large overshoot current (∼60 mA) was observed and extremely low on-state resistance (∼10 Ω) was achieved.© 2018 Elsevier LtdGallium nitride (GaN) nanowire transistors are analyzed using hydrodynamic simulation. Both p-body and n-body devices are compared in terms of threshold voltage, saturation behavior and transconductance. The calculations are calibrated using experimental data. The threshold voltage can be tuned from enhancement to depletion mode with wire doping. Surface states cause a shift of threshold voltage and saturation current. The saturation current depends on the gate design, with a composite gate acting as field plate in the p-body device.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA multi-scale simulation study of Ni/InAs nano-scale contact aimed for the sub-14 nm technology is carried out to understand material and transport properties at a metal-semiconductor interface. The deposited Ni metal contact on an 11 nm thick InAs channel forms an 8.5 nm thick InAs leaving a 2.5 nm thick InAs channel on a p-type doped (1 × 1016 cm−3) AlAs0.47Sb0.53 buffer. The density functional theory (DFT) calculations reveal a band gap narrowing in the InAs at the metal-semiconductor interface. The one-dimensional (1D) self-consistent Poisson-Schrödinger transport simulations using real-space material parameters extracted from the DFT calculations at the metal-semiconductor interface, exhibiting band gap narrowing, give a specific sheet resistance of Rsh = 90.9 Ω/sq which is in a good agreement with an experimental value of 97 Ω/sq.© 2018 Elsevier LtdHgCdTe based mid-wave infrared focal plane arrays (MWIR FPAs) are being developed for high resolution imaging and range determination of distant camouflaged targets. Effect of bandgap grading on the response time in the n+/ν/p+ HgCdTe electron avalanche photodiode (e-APD) is evaluated using impulse response measurement. Gain normalized dark current density of 2 × 10−9 A/cm2 at low reverse bias for passive mode and 2 × 10−4 A/cm2 at −8 V for active mode is measured in the fabricated APD device, yielding high gain bandwidth product of 2.4 THZ at the maximum gain. Diffusion of carriers is minimized to achieve transit time limited impulse response by introducing composition grading in the HgCdTe epilayer. The noise equivalent photon performance less than one is achievable in the FPA that is suitable for active cum passive imaging applications.© 2018 Elsevier LtdCircular organic thin film transistor (OTFT) structures are proposed to reduce the impact of variable grain alignment on the drive current of the polycrystalline organic thin film transistor (OTFT). As the circular structure is planar symmetric, the orientation of the grain cannot affect the drive current of the circular OTFT. Thus, circular electrodes expected to provide a lower variation. Top-gate, bottom-contact circular and conventional OTFTs with drop-casted polycrystalline 6,13-Bis(triisopropyl-silylethynyl) (TIPS)-Pentacene organic semiconducting layer (OSC) are fabricated to verify the theoretical variation reduction. The relative standard deviation (RSD), defined as the ratio of standard deviation and the average of drive current is used as the degree of variations in different structures. According to our fabrication result, circular transistors have a significantly lower variation (20% RSD), compared to the variation of conventional OTFTs (61% RSD).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Alloys of Mn-Bi, MnBi-Al and MnBi-Cu were prepared by arc-melting followed by homogenization treatment. All the alloys exhibited hexagonal NiAs crystal structure. Weight fraction of the Low Temperature Phase (LTP) MnBi phase in the Mn-Bi alloy was found to be 88% with a magnetization of 51 emu/gm at 20 kOe, whereas Al and Cu doping resulted in the decrease of the weight fraction of the LTP MnBi phase as well as saturation magnetization. The coercivity is found to increase with the increase in the doping concentration. Upon ball milling the alloys, phase decomposition and a decrease in the magnetization were observed in undoped Mn-Bi alloy. On the other hand, there was no significant phase decomposition and change in the magnetization in doped MnBi alloys due to ball milling. A change in the magneto structural phase transition temperature of MnBi was observed with doping, which is attributed to the lattice modifications occurring in the MnBi system. Doped and undoped Mn-Bi alloys shows increase in coercivity with temperature. Details of investigation are presented in this paper.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The onset of thermomagnetic convection in ferrofluid in a vertical transient hot-wire cell is analytically and experimentally investigated by studying the temperature rise of an electrically-heated wire. During the initial stage of heating, the temperature rise is found to correspond well to that predicted by conduction only. For high electrical current densities, the initial heating stage is followed by a sudden change in the slope of the temperature rise with respect to time as a result of the onset of thermomagnetic convection cooling. The observed onset of thermomagnetic convection was then compared to that of natural convection of deionized water. For the first time, the critical time corresponding to the onset of thermomagnetic convection around an electrically-heated wire is characterized and non-dimensionalized as a critical Fourier number (Foc). We propose an equation for Foc as a function of a magnetic Rayleigh number to predict the time for the onset of thermomagnetic convection. We observed that thermomagnetic convection in ferrofluid occurs earlier than natural convection in non-magnetic fluids for similar experimental conditions. The onset of thermomagnetic convection is dependent on the current supplied to the wire. The findings have important implications for cooling of high-power electronics using ferrofluids and for measuring thermal properties of ferrofluids.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A new Sm(Co,Fe,Cu)4B/Sm2(Co,Fe,Cu)7 cell structure is found, and its phase composition, microstructure and magnetic properties are investigated. Particularly, the atom structure of main phase is analyzed by extended X-ray absorption fine structure. It was found that as-spun SmCo2.94FeCu0.06B ribbons were composed of amorphous phase and approximate equiaxed Sm(Co,Fe,Cu)4B nanocrystallines. The high disorder of the nanocrystallines leads to the low magnetic anisotropy. After the as-spun ribbons were annealed at 800 °C for 30 min, the amorphous phase disappeared completely. The short rod-shaped Sm(Co,Fe,Cu)4B grains have a staggered distribution accompanied by ∼8 vol% lamellar Sm2(Co,Fe,Cu)7 phase at grain boundaries, and the new cell/cell-wall-type Sm(Co,Fe,Cu)4B/Sm2(Co,Fe,Cu)7 microstructure is produced. The annealed ribbons show an ultra-high coercivity of up to 5.01 T at room temperature, 40.64 T at 5 K (obtained by extrapolating), and estimated to be ∼ 41.96 T at 0 K. The microstructureal models of both ribbons are created and the coercivity mechanism is discussed in detail.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, single phase Mn0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4 powders were synthesized by solution combustion method and embedded in PVA matrix by mechanical alloying. X-ray diffraction, infrared spectroscopy, electron microscopy and vibrating sample magnetometry techniques were employed for characterization of phase, cation distribution, microstructure and magnetic properties. The spongy microstructure of as-combusted Mn0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4 powders collapsed and particles disintegrated during ball milling and transformed to bulky microstructure in the presence of PVA. The higher coercivity of milled Mn0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4/PVA composites than that of milled Mn0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4 powders was attributed to their smaller crystallite size. However, the saturation magnetization decreased from 69 ± 3 to 58 ± 3 emu/g in milling, due to the residual lattice strain as well as the decrease of crystallite size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic β-NaFeO2 nanoparticles of particle size 37 nm with orthorhombic crystal structure and space group Pn21a have been prepared by sol-gel method. Temperature dependent magnetic study has been performed. Its systematic analysis has been done to calculate the Curie and blocking temperatures along with its magnetic susceptibility. The Langevin fitting of the magnetic data has been carried out. It has been shown that the synthesized nanoparticles exhibit superparamagnetic behavior. The Neel's relaxation time has been calculated to further support its superparamagnetic nature. The synthesized β-NaFeO2 nanoparticles behave like ferromagnets below 80 K; they are superparamagnetic above 80 K–340 K and thereafter as paramagnetic. The possible mechanism of superparamagnetism has been discussed. It has been concluded that these nanoparticles can find wide applications in the area of biomedical sciences.© 2018The magnetic properties (phase diagrams and magnetizations) of an Ising bilayer film with non-magnetic inter-layers are investigated by the use of the effective field theory with correlations. The system is consisted of two magnetic layers where upper and lower layers are respectively consisted from spin-1/2 atoms and spin-1 atoms with a single-ion anisotropy Di. The value of Di is randomly distributed by a bimodal distribution function. The possibility of multi-compensation points and the reentrant phenomena are obtained.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA new integration method is presented for the extraction of the parameters of a single exponential diode model with series resistance from the measured forward I-V characteristics. The extraction is performed using auxiliary functions based on the integration of the data which allow to isolate the effects of each of the model parameters. A differentiation method is also presented for data with low level of experimental noise. Measured and simulated data are used to verify the applicability of both proposed method. Physical insight about the validity of the model is also obtained by using the proposed graphical determinations of the parameters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ultrafast spin dynamics in ferromagnetic nanodot arrays with dot diameter 100 nm and thickness 20 nm arranged in honeycomb and octagonal lattice symmetries are studied to explore the tunability of the collective magnetization dynamics. By varying the inter-dot separation between 30 nm and 300 nm drastic variation in the precessional dynamics from strongly collective to completely isolated regime has been observed by using all-optical time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr microscope. Micromagnetic simulation is exploited to gain insights about the resonant mode profiles and magnetic coupling between the nanodots. A significant spectral and spatial variation in the resonant mode with increasing dipolar interaction is demonstrated with increasing inter-dot separation. The spins driven by effective field inside single nanodots are prone to precess independently, generating two self-standing centre and edge modes in the array that are influenced by the relative orientation between the inter-dot coupling direction and bias magnetic field. The anisotropic behavior of dipolar field is rigorously investigated here. Splitting of the centre mode in case of octagonal lattice is experimentally observed here as a consequence of the anisotropic dipolar field between the nanodot pairs coupled horizontally and vertically, which is not found in the honeycomb lattice. In addition, proper understanding of the modification of dynamic mode profile by neighboring dipolar interaction built up here, is imperative for further control of the dynamic dipolar interaction and the corresponding collective excitation in magnonic crystals. The usage of nanodot lattices with complex basis structures can be advantageous for the designing of high density magnetic recording media, spin-wave filter and logic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have synthesized the new YbMn6−yFeySn6 alloys (y = 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, and 1.00) and investigated their crystal and magnetic properties using X-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements. All alloys crystallize in the orthorhombic HoFe6Sn6 type of structure (Immm) with cell parameters shrinking upon increasing the iron content. In these alloys, the T = Mn/Fe sublattice orders ferromagnetically near TC ∼ 270 K. Yb does not magnetically order and its valency is estimated to be υ ∼ 2.6–2.7 from lattice constants. Guidelines are proposed to go through the Yb magnetic instability and the quantum phase transition associated with. The YbMn5.75Fe0.25Sn6 compound is a pure ferromagnet over the whole ordered temperature range, as the ternary YbMn6Sn6 parent compound, while the richer Fe alloys evolve upon cooling towards a low-magnetization state through a first-order transition. A field-induced metamagnetic transition allows recovering the ferromagnetic alignment and the alloys present maximal magnetizations of close magnitude (∼12.5 µB/f.u. at 5 K).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.To minimize the signal degradation, many electronic devices require efficient microwave absorbers with very low reflection-losses within the X-band. We prepared a series of trivalent neodymium-ion (Nd3+) substituted barium-natural ferrite using a modified solid-state reaction method. The effect of the Nd3+-ion content on the structure, surface morphology, magnetic properties, and microwave reflection loss was studied. The composites were characterized using X-ray diffraction, a vibrating sample magnetometer, scanning electron microscopy, and a vector network analyzer. The XRD patterns of the sample without Nd3+ reveal the presence of BaFe12O19 (hexagonal) and BaFe2O4 (rhombohedral) phases. Furthermore, a new hexagonal crystal phase of Ba6Nd2Fe4O15 appeared after substituting Nd3+. The average size of the prepared barium-natural ferrite particles was estimated to be between 0.4 and 0.8 μm. Both saturation magnetization and microwave reflection losses of these barium-ferrites were significantly reduced by increasing the Nd3+ content.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The samples of Ga-doped Cr2O3 system in rhombohedral crystal structure with space group R3¯C were prepared by chemical co-precipitation route and annealing at 800 °C. The current-voltage (I–V) curves exhibited many unique non-linear properties, e.g., hysteresis loop, resistive switching, and negative differential resistance (NDR). In this work, we report non-equilibrium properties of resistive switching and NDR phenomena. The non-equilibrium I–V characteristics were confirmed by repetiting measurement and time relaxation of current. The charge conduction process was understood by analysing the I–V curves using electrode-limited and bulk-limited charge conduction mechanisms, which were proposed for metal electrode/metal oxide/metal electrode structure. The I–V curves in the NDR regime and at higher bias voltage regime in our samples did not obey Fowler-Nordheim equation, which was proposed for charge tunneling mechanism in many thin film junctions. The non-equilibrium I–V phenomena were explained by considering the competitions between the injection of charge carriers from metal electrode to metal oxide, the charge flow through bulk material mediated by trapping/de-trapping and recombination of charge carriers at the defect sites of ions, the space charge effects at the junctions of electrodes and metal oxides, and finally, the out flow of electrons from metal oxide to metal electrode.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Since the first fabrication of (In, Mn)As diluted magnetic III–V compound semiconductors reported, much effort has been made to find ferromagnetic semiconductors. Mn-doped zinc-blende AlP has more stable ferromagnetic state than Mn-doped AlN, but has received little attention due to its indirect band-gap. Note that, a direct band-gap in AlP nanotubes or strained-single layer AlP film were demonstrated by theoretical calculations. We therefore investigate the magneto-optical properties of Mn-doped AlP by density functional theory within the generalized approximation + U (GGA + U). After Mn doping, an unexpected optical absorption in the visible range was observed compared with pure AlP. The absorption onset exhibited blue shift at highest Mn concentrations (MnP). The high optical adsorption and bandgap tenability in the visible optical range make Mn-doped AlP highly desirable for magneto-optical and lighting applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The flexibility and diversity of organic chemistry have yielded many materials in which magnetism can be varied. However, most methods used for changing magnetism are inefficient or destructive to the magnetic material. Here we report high-performance magnetic control of a gas-responsive single-molecule magnet (SMM). The results exhibit that the magnetic properties of the SMM can be significantly changed according to the gas environment it is in and some of the magnetic states can be reversibly transformed or coexistent in the SMM through artificial control. More importantly, the single crystalline structure of the SMM is almost the same during the transformation process except for slight change of the lattice constant. Thus, this work opens up new insights into the stimuli-responsive magnetic materials which have great prospects for application in artificial design magnetic network and also highlight their potential as smart materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A significant enhancement in coercivity of Nd7.92Pr2.20Fe83.91ZrxB5.57Al0.4−x powders was achieved by Nd80Cu10Al10 grain boundary diffusion. The room temperature coercivity was drastically increased from 7.4 kOe to 23.14 kOe by the diffusion process with the content 30% of Nd80Cu10Al10 alloy. Nd-Cu-Al alloy diffusion process resulted in grain growth and formed continuous grain boundary phases. The boundary layers were very effective in pinning the motion of domain walls, leading to an increased coercivity. In addition, an increased coercivity was also obtained from 3.1 kOe to 9.8 kOe at 175 °C in the bonded magnets with the diffusion of 30% content NdCuAl alloy. So the thermal stability of the bonded magnets was improved.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The focus of this study is on the magnetic properties of the very recently synthesized doubly ordered perovskite family NaLnCoWO6 (Ln = Y, La, Pr, Nd, Sm, Eu, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, and Yb). Magnetic characterizations were performed by magnetic susceptibility vs. temperature, isothermal magnetization and heat capacity measurements. All these compounds have been determined as antiferromagnets with Néel temperatures from 4 K to 13.1 K. When the lanthanide is magnetic, additional transitions were observed below the Néel temperature which are attributed to the polarization of the magnetic Ln3+ sublattice by the ordered Co2+ one. Taking into account the magnetic ordering found in this study and the polar structure in the nine compounds NaLnCoWO6 (Ln = Y, Sm, Eu, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, and Yb) reported before, these compounds can be classified as new Type I multiferroics.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have investigated the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) and its modulation by electric field in La0.325Pr0.3Ca0.375MnO3 (LPCMO) films grown on (0 1 1)-oriented PMN-PT substrates. As a typical perovskite manganite with phase separation, the LPCMO bulk shows a considerable MCE, but the MCE of the LPCMO films has never been investigated. We found that the LPCMO films exhibit a MCE over a wide temperature range. A modulation of magnetization by electric field has been observed in the temperature dependent (M−T) and magnetic field dependent (M−H) curves. As a result, enhanced magnetic entropy change and refrigeration capacity by about 4% under an electric field of +6 kV/cm has been demonstrated.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic behavior of monodispersed uncoated Fe3O4 nanoparticles (average particle size = 6 nm) and silver coating of mean thickness 1.5 nm and 2 nm prepared in an emulsion was investigated. The structural and magnetic analysis indicated the formation of a tri layer structure comprising of a disordered magnetic layer of diffused core present in between magnetic core and non-magnetic shell. The nanocrystals with thicker nanoshells exhibit superparamagnetic properties showing decrease in blocking temperatures with increasing shell thickness, whereas the particles of larger diameter are ferrimagnetic at room temperature. The value of saturation magnetization are smaller than those obtained for bulk magnetite emphasizing the presence of a disordered spin layer due to unsaturated iron ions at the surface in case of uncoated magnetite nanoparticles and at the interface for coated ones. The spin canting at the interface, surface strain and increased magnetoelastic anisotropy are some other factors influencing the magnetic properties of these nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis paper focuses on the modeling of an 8–12 GHz RF (radio frequency) receiver front-end based on an in-line MEMS (microelectromechanical systems) frequency discriminator. Actually, the frequency detection is realized by measuring the output dc thermal voltage generated by the MEMS thermoelectric power sensor. Based on this thermal voltage, it has a great potential to tune the resonant frequency of the VCO (voltage controlled oscillator) in the RF receiver front-end application. The equivalent circuit model of the in-line frequency discriminator is established and the measurement verification is also implemented. Measurement and simulation results show that the output dc thermal voltage has a nearly linear relation with frequency. A new construction of RF receiver front-end is then obtained by connecting the in-line frequency discriminator with the voltage controlling port of VCO. Lastly, a systemic simulation is processed by computer-aided software and the real-time simulation waveform at each key point is observed clearly.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The calcium (Ca2+) substituted M-type barium hexaferrite (Ba1-xCaxFe12O19) for Ca2+ (x = 0.00, 0.025, 0.050, 0.075, 0.100, 0.150, and 0.200) have been synthesized by the citrate sol-gel method. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns with Rietveld refinement reveal the formation of hexagonal crystal structure with P63/mmc space group. The lattice parameters a = b and c decrease, whereas lattice strain found to increase with the increase in Ca concentration in the samples. The analysis of Raman spectra well supports the XRD patterns analysis. The average particle size is obtained from the FE-SEM (Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscopy) micrographs and these are similar to that of crystallite size obtained from the XRD pattern analysis. The saturation magnetization and magnetocrystalline anisotropy have been obtained by employing the “Law of Approach (LA) to Saturation magnetization” technique at room temperature. The saturation magnetization and magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant are maximum for 5% Ca substitution in barium hexaferrite. It could be due to lattice strain mediated magnetism. However, these magnetic properties decrease for more than the 5% Ca substitution in barium hexaferrite. It could be due to decrease of magnetic exchange interaction (Fe-O-Fe) in the sample. A correlation between magnetic interaction and lattice strain has been observed in Ca2+ substituted M-type barium hexaferrite.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Controllable manipulation of skyrmion motion is important for next-generation spintronics. Here, a gradient of voltage-controlled magnetic anistropy (VCMA) induced skyrmion motion in a Co/Pt nanotrack was reported using micromagnetic simulations. The results show that a magnetic skyrmion, driven by the gradient of VCMA, can move straightly along the nanotrack without deflection due to boundary effects. The velocity and diameter of the magnetic skyrmion increases in proportion to the gradient of VCMA, which are in agreement with the analytical model. Effects of notch on the VCMA gradient-induced skyrmion motion are also investigated. This work provides an effective approach to drive skyrmion motion, which can give guidance for next-generation spintronic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using a vibrating-sample magnetometer with a maximum field of 20.5 kOe, we have measured over 50 samples of annealed 304 stainless steel, which is usually considered to be non-magnetic. In almost every case, we observe the presence of a small, usually less than 0.01, fraction of a ferromagnetic phase, which we believe to be equilibrium bcc delta ferrite. The consequences of this observation for the measurement and specification of the magnetic properties of annealed 304 stainless are discussed. Our measurements also establish the most likely value for the magnetic permeability of the fcc austenitic phase in 304 stainless steel austenite as 1.0033 ± 0.0003.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have presented the magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect of Sm1-xCaxMnO3 compounds (x = 0.50, 0.55, 0.60 and 0.70) in this work. In association to the experimental verification regarding the formation of the ferromagnetic droplets in robust charge ordered materials through exchange bias and training effect measurements, utilization of the magnetocaloric effect for treating the same problem have been addressed here. Our present study indicates that magnetocaloric effect (isothermal magnetic entropy change) at low temperature regime gets drastically modified according to the influence of the stability of the charge ordering in the host matrix. Additionally, the modifications of the ground states was also addressed accordingly.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn present work, photocurrent, current-voltage (I-V) and capacitance/conductance-voltage-frequency (C/G-V-f) measurements were analyzed for the photodiode and diode parameters of Al/TiO2/p-Si structure. The TiO2 thin film structure was deposited on p-Si by using atomic layer deposition technique (ALD) and its thickness was about 10 nm. The surface morphology of TiO2 coated on p-Si structure was observed via atomic force microscope (AFM). Barrier height (Φb) and ideality factor (n) values of device were found to be 0.80 eV, 0.70 eV, 0.56 eV and 1.04, 2.24, 10.27 under dark, 10 and 100 mW/cm2, respectively. Some photodiodes parameters such as fill factor (FF), power efficiency (%η), open circuit voltage (Voc), short circuit current (Isc) were obtained from I-V measurement under different light intensity. FF and η were accounted 49.2, 39,0 and 0.05, 0.45 under 10 and 100 mW/cm2 light power intensity, respectively. C−2-V graph was plotted from C-V-f measurements and zero bias voltage (V0), donor concentration (Nd), Fermi energy (EF), barrier height (Φb) and maximum electric field (Em) were determined from C−2-V data for different frequencies. The electrical and photocurrent values demonstrated that it can be used for photodiode, photo detector and photo sensing applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A scheme is presented to estimate the magnetic hyperfine field due to orbital and spin current densities of 3d transition metal free ion and in a crystal field. Orbital and spin contributions to magnetic hyperfine fields of most of the 3d transition metal free ions are presented. The application of the formulae offered is tested on the ground state of the free ion Fe2+ and when this ion is in the compound FeF2. The estimated orbital and spin contributions to magnetic hyperfine fields of Fe2+ free ion are in good agreement with previously measured and estimated in the literature. The values of estimated orbital and spin contributions to magnetic hyperfine fields of Fe2+ in FeF2 compound depend on the effective 〈reff-3〉 values of the 〈r-3〉. The 〈reff-3〉=3.0 a.u. produces values of orbital and spin contribution to magnetic hyperfine fields that are also in good agreement with the measured and estimated ones in the literature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We studied the multiferroic property of Ca1-xLaxTi1-xFexO3 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) perovskite. We showed that multiferroic property can be triggered by strain mediation due to different ion doping. The prepared samples were characterized by X-ray to check for its phase purity. Increasing the La3+ ion concentration is found to induce a crystal distortion. A pseudo-tetragonal phase is found at the highest La3+ ion concentration. The changes in crystal symmetry induce different effects on the electrical polarization that can be seen in the electrical hysteresis of the perovskite. The correlation between magnetic and electric ordering reduces as the concentration of La3+ ion increases in which the lattice symmetry are more close to space invariant. The changes in the vibrational bands due to changes in the crystal structure were investigated by FTIR.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The single crystalline and powder samples of multiferroic CuCrO2 have been investigated by 17O NMR techniques in the paramagnetic and magnetically ordered states. The unusual negative hyperfine field on oxygen nuclei, Hhf = −5.2 kOe/µB, has been determined in paramagnetic state. The 17O NMR spectrum in ordered state has a shape typical for incommensurate magnetic structure. It can be well described taking into account only dipole fields which are produced by Cr3+-ions with magnetic moment μ = 2.2 μB. The parameters of the EFG (electric field gradient) tensor – the quadrupole frequency (νQ) and the asymmetry parameter, have been determined. The value of νQ increases monotonously with decreasing temperature in the range 90 K > T > 1.5 K. The estimates of the population of the ligands p – orbitals have been obtained.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Periodic micro-stripes arrays with stripe domains structures upon continuous permalloy (Py) film were fabricated by sputtering, photolithography and ion beam etching technology. These samples display in-plane magnetic anisotropy, and stripe domains structure is observed by the magnetic force microscopy (MFM) in the area of the micro-stripes. The periodic micro-stripes show an effective impact on static and dynamic magnetic properties of Py continuous film. In the case of dynamic magnetic properties, the resonance frequency fr of these samples can be tuned by periodic micro-stripes arrays. Compared to continuous film with resonance frequency fr of 0.64 GHz, the fr of composite structures can be tuned by the separation gap of periodic micro-stripes arrays from 0.8 GHz to 2.3 GHz at zero-field. At the same time, the fr could be also tuned by rotating the samples within the plane. This attributes to the competition of shape anisotropy induced by micro-stripes and the dynamic anisotropy originating by stripe domains structure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.An exact analytical expression for the magnetic field of a cylinder of finite length with a uniform, transverse magnetization is derived. Together with known expressions for the magnetic field due to longitudinal magnetization, the calculation of magnetic fields for cylinders with an arbitrary magnetization direction is possible. The expression for transverse magnetization is validated successfully against the well-known limits of an infinitely long cylinder, the field on the axis of the cylinder and in the far field limit. Comparison with a numerical finite-element method displays good agreement, making the advantage of an analytical method over grid-based methods evident.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Mn substituted Ni-Zn ferrite nanoparticles, Ni0.4Zn0.6-xMnxFe2O4 (x = 0.00–0.25 in steps of 0.05), using metal nitrates were prepared by sol-gel autocombustion in citric acid matrix. The samples were examined by X-ray diffraction and vibrating sample magnetometer techniques. Rietveld structural refinements using the XRD data were performed on the samples to consolidate various structural parameters like phase (spinel), crystallite size (24.86–37.43 nm), lattice constant (8.3764–8.4089 Å) etc and also to determine cation distributions based on profile matching and integrated intensity ratios. Saturation magnetization values (37.18–68.40 emu/g) were extracted from the measured M−H loops of these nanoparticles to estimate their magnetic moments. Experimental and calculated magnetic moments and lattice constants were used to confirm the derived cation distributions from Rietveld analysis. The results of these ferrite nanoparticles are discussed in terms of the compositional modifications, particle sizes and the corresponding cation distributions as a result of Mn substitutions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Effects of the distribution of rare-earth elements on 2:14:1-type Ce-based sintered magnet with same nominal composition were investigated by respectively doping Nd-Fe and Ce-Fe eutectic alloys. The coercivity and the thermal stability of the magnet doping Nd-Fe alloy revealed more excellent performance (iHc = 12.19kOe,α = −0.1474%/°C, β = −0.5129%/°C) than those of the magnet doping Ce-Fe alloy (iHc = 10.13kOe, α = −0.1665%/°C, β = −0.5271%/°C). The difference of the newly formed grain boundary phases and elemental enrichment variation of the matrix phase grain for the processed magnets were two major reasons of the coercivity discrepancy. Ce-based magnet with optimized structure was obtained and this method was promising to maximize the utilization of abundant rare-earth element Ce in 2:14:1-type magnet.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Availability of a restricted heat capacity data range has a clear influence on the accuracy of calculated magnetocaloric effect, as confirmed by both numerical simulations and experimental measurements. Simulations using the Bean-Rodbell model show that, in general, the approximated magnetocaloric effect curves calculated using a linear extrapolation of the data starting from a selected temperature point down to zero kelvin deviate in a non-monotonic way from those correctly calculated by fully integrating the data from near zero temperatures. However, we discovered that a particular temperature range exists where the approximated magnetocaloric calculation provides the same result as the fully integrated one. These specific truncated intervals exist for both first and second order phase transitions and are the same for the adiabatic temperature change and magnetic entropy change curves. The effect of this truncated integration in real samples was confirmed using heat capacity data of Gd metal and Gd5Si2Ge2 compound measured from near zero temperatures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Crystal and magnetic structure of the doped BaFe12−xInxO19 samples were refined by the results of investigations using high resolution neutron powder diffraction and vibration sample magnetometry at different temperatures. The refinements were realized in frame of two space groups. The P63/mmc (No 194) centrosymmetric nonpolar and P63mc (No 186) noncentrosymmetric polar space groups were used. The unit cell parameters, ionic coordinates, thermal isotropic factors, occupation positions, bond lengths and bond angles, microstrain values were established. The magnetic and dipole moments were also defined. It is established that the In3+ cations may be located only in the Fe1 – 2a and Fe2 – 2b crystallographic positions with equal probability for the sample with lowest substitution level x = 0.1. At the x = 1.2 substitution level about half of the In3+ cations occupies the Fe5 – 12 k positions. For the last sample the remaining half of the In3+ cations is equiprobably located in the Fe1 – 2a and Fe2 – 2b positions. The spontaneous polarization was established for these compositions at 300 K. It is studied the influence of the type of substitutive cation and structural parameters on the Fe3+(i) – O2− – Fe3+(j) (i, j = 1, 2, 3, 4, 5) indirect superexchange interactions with temperature. With substitution level increase the superexchange interactions between the magnetic positions inside and outside the sublattices are broken which leads to a decrease in the value of their magnetic moments.© 2017The magnetoelectric (ME) nanocomposite material contain ferromagnetic phase of yttrium iron garnet (Y3Fe5O12) and ferroelectric phase of yttrium perovskite ferrite (YFeO3) with an equation (x)YFeO3 + (1 − x)Y3Fe5O12 (x = 0.0, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75, 1.0) is synthesized by sol–gel auto combustion method. The composite powder obtained by two phases of composite material sintered at 1100 °C for 6 h. The prepared samples were investigated by using powder X-ray diffraction (XRD) to study the structural properties, that confirm the existence of two phases of Y3Fe5O12 and YFeO3. The crystallite size of material decreased from 23 to 13 nm with increasing the concentration of YFeO3 in composite. The morphological investigation of samples was studied by field emission scanning electron microscopy that gives size, shape and distribution of grains in material and confirmed that material has nano-crystalline in nature. Saturation magnetization (Ms) studied by using vibrating sample magnetometer shows the decrement in its value from 23.9 to 0.48 emu/g with the increase in YFeO3 content. Maximum magnetoelectric coefficient (αME) of 10.711 mv/cm-Oe is observed for composition x = 0.50. Similarly, ferroelectric characteristics of sample such as dielectric constant and dielectric loss were measured in the frequency range 20 Hz to 10 MHz at room temperature. The value of dielectric constant is decreases with increasing frequency and ferroelectric hysteresis loop at room temperature is study by using P-E loop tracer it's nature is unsaturated due to presence of Y3Fe5O12 phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Anisotropic bonded NdFeB/SmFeN hybrid magnet, with high density and magnetic properties, are prepared by mixing ultra-fine SmFeN powders and coarse NdFeB powders under a magnetic field that is characterized by a surface magnetic induction density of ∼3000 Gs using digital tesla meter. Magnetic powders and bonded magnets are characterized and analysed by scanning electron microscopy. The maximum energy product ((BH)max), degree of alignment (DOA) and density of 25 wt% NdFeB/SmFeN magnet mixing powders with magnetic field (114 kJ/m3, 0.556, 6.12 g/cm3) are increased by 10.68%, 16.32%, −1.13% than these of mixing powders without magnetic field (103 kJ/m3, 0.478, 6.19 g/cm3) and 35.71%, 7.75%, 9.68% than these of NdFeB magnets (84 kJ/m3, 0.516, 5.58 g/cm3). Effects of SmFeN powders entering into gaps between NdFeB powders and substitution of SmFeN on NdFeB make the actual density reach the maximum at the ideal mass ratio of 25%. And the oriented SmFeN agglomerate, produced by mixing powders with magnetic field, results in the increase of DOA of NdFeB/SmFeN magnet.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect (MCE) and electric-dielectric properties of the Nd-cobaltate perovskites Nd0.6Sr0.4Co1−xMnxO3 (x = 0, 0.3, 0.7 and 1) were investigated for possible use in magnetic cooling applications. Upon Mn substitution, the magnetic exchange interaction is affected by the (Mn4+/Mn3+) ratio, which in turn impacts several physical properties. The XRD patterns of the synthesized composites revealed a single phase with an orthorhombic structure with space group Pbnm (62). The orthorhombic lattice distortion increases linearly with the Mn content, reaching a maximum value (D = 7.377 × 10−3) for Nd0.6Sr0.4MnO3. The temperature and frequency dependence of the dielectric permittivity was studied and analyzed using Maxwell-Wagner interfacial polarization and Koops phenomenological theory. The rapid increase in magnetic susceptibility around the paramagnetic (PM)–ferromagnetic (FM) transition temperature TC is greatly affected by Mn substitution. The decrease in susceptibility with increasing temperature can be attributed to a charge ordering effect. The PM-FM transition occurs in the temperature range of 150–200 K. Moreover, the presence of spontaneous magnetization with second-order phase transitions is observed from Arrott plot isotherms. The MCE was also investigated by determining ΔSM and the relative cooling power (RCP), and the maximum value is found for Nd0.6Sr0.4Co0.3 Mn0.7O3. These results compare favorably with those reported for similar materials, indicating our materials as a possible candidate for use in magnetocaloric refrigerators.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effects of different rolling conditions on the microstructure and texture of primary and secondary recrystallization in magnetostrictive Fe82Ga9Al9+0.1at%NbC alloy sheets were investigated. After the primary recrystallization annealing at 850 °C for 5 min, the as-rolled sheets prepared by warm-cold rolling with an intermediate annealing, can be fully recrystallized, and obtain the homogeneous matrix in which the fine dispersed NbC precipitate particles are distributed. The primary recrystallization textures of sheets with different rolling conditions consist mostly of strong {1 0 0} textures, γ-fiber textures, {4 1 1}〈1 4 8〉 texture and weak Goss texture. In the primary recrystallized sheets prepared by warm-cold rolling with an intermediate annealing, the high energy grain boundaries and ∑9 boundaries have the highest proportion. After high temperature annealing, the secondary recrystallizations of Goss grains in these sheets are more complete, and the size of abnormal grown Goss grain is up to several centimeters, which results in the strongest Goss texture. Correspondingly, the largest magnetostriction of 183 ppm is observed. The sample prepared by warm-cold rolling with an intermediate annealing, has homogeneous primary matrix, special texture components and grain boundary distribution, all of which provide a better surrounding for the abnormal growth of Goss grains. This work indicates that the control of rolling conditions of Fe-Ga-Al alloy sheets is necessary to achieve the strong Goss texture and obtain a possible high magnetostriction if other appropriate conditions (stress, domain structure) are achieved.© 2018Two-dimensional (2D) materials comprising of graphene, hexagonal boron nitride (hBN) and transition metal dichalcogenides (TMDs) have revealed fascinating properties in various spintronic architectures. Here, we review spin valve effect in lateral and vertical magnetic junctions incorporating 2D materials as non-magnetic layer between ferromagnetic (FM) electrodes. The magnetic field dependent spin transport properties are studied by measuring non-local resistance (RNL) and relative magnetoresistance ratio (MR) for lateral and vertical structures, respectively. The review consists of (i) studying spin lifetimes and spin diffusion length thereby exploring the effect of tunneling and transparent contacts in lateral spin valve structures, temperature dependence, gate tunability and contrasting mechanisms of spin relaxation in single layer graphene (SLG) and bilayer graphene (BLG) devices. (ii) Perpendicular spin valve devices are thoroughly investigated thereby studying the role of different 2D materials in vertical spin dynamics. The dependence of spin valve signal on interface quality, temperature and various other parameters is also investigated. Furthermore, the spin reversal in graphene-hBN hybrid system is examined on the basis of Julliere model.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Due to the effect of spin transfer torque, negative imaginary parts of permeability (μ″ < 0) are reported in a ferromagnetic nanowire. It is found that negative μ″ values are resulted from the interaction of spin polarized conduction electrons with the spatially non-uniform distributed magnetic moments at both ends of nanowires. The results are well explained from the effect of spin transfer torque on the precession of magnetization under the excitation of both the pulsed magnetic field and static electric field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electric-field induced modifications of the symmetric and asymmetric exchange stiffness constants for the prototypical transition-metal system of a Co monolayer on Pt(111) are determined from first-principles calculated total energy differences of spin-spiral states with oppositely rotating magnetizations in the presence of both the external field and spin–orbit coupling. The trend underlying the modifications is shown to be linked to orbital magnetism. The results demonstrate that an electric field may be a promising approach to manipulate macroscopically magnetic textures.© 2018 Elsevier LtdDue to its mechanical flexibility, large bandgap and carrier mobility, atomically thin molybdenum disulphide (MoS2) has attracted widespread attention. However, it still lacks a facile route to fabricate a low-power high-performance logic gates/circuits before it gets the real application. Herein, we reported a facile and environment-friendly method to establish the low-power logic function in a single MoS2 field-effect transistor (FET) configuration gated with a polymer electrolyte. Such low-power and high-performance MoS2 FET can be implemented by using water-soluble polyvinyl alcohol (PVA) polymer as proton-conducting electric-double-layer (EDL) dielectric layer. It exhibited an ultra-low voltage (1.5 V) and a good performance with a high current on/off ratio (Ion/off) of 1 × 105, a large electron mobility (µ) of 47.5 cm2/V s, and a small subthreshold swing (S) of 0.26 V/dec, respectively. The inverter can be realized by using such a single MoS2 EDL FET with a gain of ∼4 at the operation voltage of only ∼1 V. Most importantly, the neuronal AND logic computing can be also demonstrated by using such a double-lateral-gate single MoS2 EDL transistor. These results show an effective step for future applications of 2D MoS2 FETs for integrated electronic engineering and low-energy environment-friendly green electronics.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study bubble domain wall dynamics using micromagnetic simulations in perpendicularly magnetized ultra-thin films with disorder and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. Disorder is incorporated into the material as grains with randomly distributed sizes and varying exchange constant at the edges. As expected, magnetic bubbles expand asymmetrically along the axis of the in-plane field under the simultaneous application of out-of-plane and in-plane fields. Remarkably, the shape of the bubble has a ripple-like part which causes a kink-like (steep decrease) feature in the velocity versus in-plane field curve. We show that these ripples originate due to the nucleation and interaction of vertical Bloch lines. Furthermore, we show that the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction field is not constant but rather depends on the in-plane field. We also extend the collective coordinate model for domain wall motion to a magnetic bubble and compare it with the results of micromagnetic simulations.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis work demonstrates pentacene-based organic thin-film transistors (OTFTs) fabricated by inserting a 6,13-pentacenequinone (PQ) carrier injection layer between the source/drain (S/D) metal Au electrodes and pentacene channel layer. Compared to devices without a PQ layer, the performance characteristics including field-effect mobility, threshold voltage, and On/Off current ratio were significantly improved for the device with a 5-nm-thick PQ interlayer. These improvements are attributed to significant reduction of hole barrier height at the Au/pentacene channel interfaces. Therefore, it is believed that using PQ as the carrier injection layer is a good candidate to improve the pentacene-based OTFTs electrical performance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, the effect of stress-relaxation treatment (Tstress-relaxation < Tglass transition) on the magnetic texture, nanomechanical properties, and variation of free-volume in FeSiBNb amorphous alloy was investigated using Mössbauer spectroscopy, nanoindentation, dynamic mechanical analysis (DMA), and positron annihilation lifetime spectroscopy (PALS) techniques. It was shown that stress-relaxation treatment slightly improved the magnetic texture by 6% at T≪Tg due to small-scale displacement of atoms whereas the magnetic texture was deteriorated due to thermal treatment at temperatures around the glass transition point (large-scale displacement of atoms). According to nanoindentation results, the hardness (H) and reduced modulus (Er) of the amorphous ribbon increased by 15% and 13%, respectively, after stress-relaxation treatment at 716 K for 5 min. Increasing the stress-relaxation time from 5 min to 60 min at 716 K resulted in decreases in the hardness and reduced modulus which are attributed to the increase of free-volume defects (increase of τ2 lifetime measured by PALS). Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) showed the formation of extremely fine embryos of α-Fe (3–5 nm in size) after stress-relaxation treatment.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.0.1 mm-thick 6.5 wt% Si electrical steel sheets with strong cube texture were successfully produced by surface energy effect and three-stage rolling method. The texture evolution and magnetic properties during the processing were briefly investigated, special attention was paid on the development of cube texture. The study shows that cube texture component was originated from the deformed cube grains existed in center layer of hot rolled sheet. During three-stage rolling and intermediate annealing, the cube texture component was enhanced. Attributed to the frequencies as well as size advantages of cube recrystallized grains during nucleation, a homogeneous microstructure associated with cube texture was produced after primary recrystallization. The mechanism responsible for the microstructure and texture of primary recrystallization was explained by strain induced boundary migration. After high temperature annealing for a long time, complete secondary recrystallization microstructure consisting of entirely large cube grains was produced by means of the surface energy effect. Both the strong cube texture and proper grain size enable final annealed sheets have excellent magnetic properties. The present study provides a new efficient way to optimize the recrystallization texture and improve the magnetic properties of double grain-oriented 6.5 wt% Si electrical steel.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Ho3+ substitution on the structural, magnetic and transport properties of a series of CoFe2-xHoxO4 (referred to CFHO) ferrites, (where, x = 0.00–0.20 in steps of 0.05) were studied. All the samples investigated were synthesized by the standard solid state reaction technique. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns confirmed the formation of single phase cubic spinel structure in all the compositions. The increases in the values of lattice parameter with the increase in Ho3+ concentrations suggested the expansion of unit cells. Bulk density was found to be decreased, and porosity increased for CFHO with composition x = 0.05 due to some structural distortion. Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM) images showed that Ho3+ had a significant effect on the grain growth of the samples. The substitution of Ho3+ strongly influenced the magnetic characteristics which were confirmed from the magnetization measurements examined by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Curie temperature (Tc) was found to be decreased linearly with the increase of Ho content ascribed to the weakening of A-B exchange interaction. The initial permeability was found to be independent of frequency up to a high frequency region for all the studied composites. All the samples showed very low loss factor at high frequency region and remained almost constant. AC electrical resistivity was found to be decreased with the composition up to 0.15 and then increased for x = 0.20. Frequency dependent dielectric constant measurements showed that Ho3+ substitution improved the dielectric constant values of the CFHO ferrites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Dynamic response of magnetic hysteresis, magnetic Barkhausen noise and magneto-acoustic emission in a soft ribbon and electrical steels was studied comprehensively. The measurements were performed under controllable magnetization conditions: sinusoidal/triangular waveforms of the magnetic induction and a triangular waveform of the magnetic field. Magnetizing frequency was varied in a wide range: fmag=0.5–500 and 0.5–100 Hz for the ribbon and the electrical steels, respectively. Magnetization amplitude was fixed on a near-saturation level Hmax≃100 A/m. Barkhausen noise signal was detected by a sample-wrapping/surface-mounted coil and differently filtered. It was found that intensity of the Barkhausen noise rises approximately as a square root function of the magnetizing frequency. Whereas, level of the magneto-acoustic emission follows the hysteresis loss trend with an additional linear term (classical loss component).© 2017In this paper, we introduced attapulgite (ATP) into the system of ferrite composites for the first time. By sol-gel self-propagating combustion method, attapulgite/barium ferrite (ATP/BaFe12O19) was prepared, and then ternary composites of attapulgite/barium ferrite/polyaniline (ATP/BaFe12O19/PANI) were obtained by in-situ oxidative polymerization of aniline on ATP/BaFe12O19 mixture. The phase composition, morphology and electromagnetic properties of the as-prepared composites were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Transmission election microscope (TEM), Fourier transform infrared (FTIR), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analyzer (VNA). We found that the ATP/BaFe12O19/PANI composites at a thickness of 2 mm have the minimum reflection loss of −11.89 dB at 11.28 GHz, besides the effective absorption bandwidth (less than −5 dB) reached 6.39 GHz (from 8.42 GHz to 14.81 GHz).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.57Fe and 151Eu Mössbauer spectra were obtained versus temperature for Eu0.57Ca0.43Fe2As2 compound with 3d and 4f magnetic order and Eu0.73Ca0.27(Fe0.87Co0.13)2As2 re-entrant superconductor, where the finite resistivity reappears while approaching the ground state. They were compared with previously obtained spectra for parent compounds EuFe2As2 and CaFe2As2. It was found that substitution beyond the Fe-As layers does not lead to the rotation (canting) of the Eu2+ magnetic moments and does not generate Eu3+ states. On the other hand, re-entrant superconductor exhibits rotation (canting) of the Eu2+ moments on the c-axis of the unit cell leading to the transferred hyperfine magnetic field on iron nuclei. Divalent europium orders magnetically within the bulk of the re-entrant superconducting phase. The re-entrant superconductor remains in the inhomogeneous state close to the ground state with about 27% of the volume being free of 3d magnetism, while the remainder exhibits weak spin density wave. Those two regions slightly differ by the electric field gradient and electron density on iron nuclei.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure, magnetic transitional behaviors and magnetocaloric effect were investigated in Nd6Fe13Pd compound. The results show that Nd6Fe13Pd crystallizes in the tetragonal Nd6Fe13Si-type structure (space group I4/mcm) with the lattice parameters a = b = 8.0765 Å and c = 22.3747 Å and two magnetic transitions from the ferromagnetic to the antiferromagnetic states with Ttr = 173 K and from the antiferromagnetic to the paramagnetic states with the Néel temperature of 369 K occurred in the Nd6Fe13Pd compound. The magnetic transition between the ferromagnetic and the antiferromagnetic states can be induced by either changing temperature or applying a magnetic field with very small thermal and magnetic hystereses and the transition temperature is very sensitive to the applied field. The experimental results indicate a broad working temperature span and negative magnetic entropy changes around Ttr = 173 K. For a magnetic field change of 2 T, the maximum magnetic entropy change −ΔSM reaches to 4.4 J kg−1 K−1 with the corresponding refrigeration capability of about 125 J kg−1.© 2018Non-volatile memories (NVMs) using nanocrystals (NCs) as active materials can be applied to soft electronic devices requiring a low-temperature process because NCs do not require a heat treatment process for crystallization. In addition, memory devices can be implemented simply by using a patterning technique using a solution process. In this study, a flexible NiO ReRAM device was fabricated using a simple NC patterning method that controls the capillary force and dewetting of a NiO NC solution at low temperature. The switching behavior of a NiO NC based memory was clearly observed by conductive atomic force microscopy (c-AFM).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Monodisperse cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) nanoparticles (NPs) were synthesized by thermal decomposition of metal precursors in the presence of surfactants and then assembled on mesoporous graphitic carbon nitride (mpg-C3N4) via sonication of two components in ethanol solution. The yielded nanocomposite, namely CoFe2O4/mpg-C3N4, were characterized by using many advanced analytical techniques (TEM, HR-SEM, EDX, XRD, BET, PPMS-VSM, UV–vis DRS and ICP-MS). The magnetic properties of the CoFe2O4/mpg-C3N4 nanocomposite were studied by using M-H and M-T loops and the magnetic saturation and blocking temperature of the nanocomposite were found to be 6.1 emu/g and 269 K, respectively. The nanocomposite were then tested in the photocatalytic degradation of Malachite Green (MG) and showed considerably high photocatalytic activity under UV-light irradiation. The effects of various key operating parameters comprising catalyst amount, initial dye concentration, pH and reaction time span for the degradation of MG dye were studied to optimize the reaction conditions. The maximum degradation efficiency (DE %) of 93.41% was obtained by using 0.08 g L−1 catalyst and 10 mg L−1 MG dye at pH 5 within 120 min reaction time. Besides MG, the photocatalytic degradation of several other organic dyes (methylene blue, acid orange 7 and rhodamine B) was also studied to exhibit the performance of CoFe2O4/mpg-C3N4 nanocomposite under the optimized conditions. The results revealed that the kinetic of dye removal process could be designated through the application of pseudo-first-order kinetic model. In addition to high photocatalytic activity, CoFe2O4/mpg-C3N4 nanocomposite could be magnetically recovered after the dye degradation and reused for consecutive five runs without a significant loss (nearly 17%) in their initial performance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The growth of nanoparticles from the gas phase in combination with deposition under ultrahigh vacuum conditions enables one to obtain pure and mass-selected nanoparticles with variable particle density from a wide range of materials on virtually any solid support and is therefore of great interest for many applications. While the magnetic, chemical, and optical properties of such deposits are intensively investigated, less work has been undertaken so far to achieve ordered arrangements of nanoparticles deposited from a cluster beam. In this work we demonstrate a first step towards the control of nanoparticle spatial distribution for iron nanoparticles with a size of about 12 nm. We find that while deposition onto a bare Si substrate results in a random distribution of isolated nanoparticles, the introduction and subsequent desorption of a Xe buffer layer induces mobility and agglomeration of nanoparticles on the Si surface. The agglomerates are extended and exhibit a height equal to about 15 nanoparticles. The vertical growth of the agglomerates is assigned to the presence of a magnetic field which was applied perpendicular to the substrate surface. We suggest that by tuning the magnetic field and deposition conditions, the spatial arrangement of magnetic nanoparticles could be controlled.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the sixteenth century, medical specialists were of the conclusion that magnet can be utilized for the treatment or wipe out the illnesses from the body. On this basis, the research on magnet advances day by day for the treatment of different types of diseases in mankind. This study aims to investigate the effect of magnetic field and their applications in human body specifically in blood. Blood is a non-Newtonian fluid because its viscosity depends strongly on the fraction of volume occupied by red cells also called the hematocrit. Therefore, in this paper blood is considered as an example of non-Newtonian Casson fluid. The blood flow is considered in a vertical cylinder together with heat transfer due to mixed conviction caused by buoyancy force and the external pressure gradient. Effect of magnetic field on the velocities of blood and magnetic particles is also considered. The problem is modelled using the Caputo-Fabrizio derivative approach. The governing fractional partial differential equations are solved using Laplace and Hankel transformation techniques and exact solutions are obtained. Effects of different parameters such as Grashof number, Prandtl number, Casson fluid parameter and fractional parameters, and magnetic field are shown graphically. Both velocity profiles increase with the increase of Grashoff number and Casson fluid parameter and reduce with the increase of magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis work investigates the use of Resistive Random Access Memory (RRAM) as an analog trimming device. The analog storage feature of the RRAM cell is evaluated and the ability of the RRAM to hold several resistance states is exploited to propose analog trim elements. To modulate the memory cell resistance, a series of short programming pulses are applied across the RRAM cell allowing a fine calibration of the RRAM resistance. The RRAM non volatility feature makes the analog device powers up already calibrated for the system in which the analog trimmed structure is embedded. To validate the concept, a test structure consisting of a voltage reference is evaluated.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nickel doped bismuth ferrite powders, BiFe1−x NixO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5), were synthesized by high-energy ball milling followed by an annealing at 700 °C. A detailed study about the substitution of Fe3+ by Ni2+ on the crystal structure and multiferroic properties is presented. The X-ray diffraction patterns reveal the formation of rhombohedral structure with small amounts of Bi2Fe4O9 as a secondary phase for x < 0.1. Also it is inferred the stabilization of a Bi25FeO40, sillenite phase, as the amount of Ni2+ substitution increases, reaching up 95.23% of sillenite for x = 0.5. The magnetic behavior indicates the frustration of the G-antiferromagnetic order typical of the un-doped BiFeO3, caused by the presence of small amounts of Ni2+ (x < 0.1) on the structure. The DC conductivity exhibited a little increment with increasing Ni content (up to x = 0.1). Although the conductivity increases, for nickel concentrations of 0.2–0.5, the bismuth ferrites doped with nickel retain their property of being an electrical insulating material. Behavior modifications of electrical conductivity, permittivity and dielectric loss versus frequency are related with crystal structure transformations, when nickel concentration is increased.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Heat-resistant austenitic stainless steels have become the principal alloys for use in steam reformer tubes in the petrochemical industry due to its mechanical properties. These tubes are typically exposed to severe operational conditions leading to microstructural transformations such as the aging phenomenon. The combination of high temperatures and moderate stresses causes creep damages, being necessary to monitor its structural condition by non-destructive techniques. The tube external wall is also subjected to oxidizing atmospheres, favoring the formation of an external surface, composed by an oxide scale and a chromium depleted zone. This external surface is usually not taken into account in the tube evaluation, which can lead to erroneous estimations of the service life of these components. In order to observe the magnetic influence of this layer, two samples, exposed to different operational temperatures, were characterized by non-destructive eddy current testing (ECT), scanning DC-susceptometer and magnetic force microscopy (MFM). It was found that the external surface thickness influences directly in the magnetic response of the samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Co1-xZnxFe2O4 (0.08 ≤ x ≤ 0.56) powders prepared by a sol-gel auto-combustion method have been investigated through the combined use of structural and dc/ac-magnetization measurements under a wide range of applied magnetic field values. EDS spectra are performed to evaluate the samples chemical composition, whereas the X-ray diffraction measurements indicate the formation of the typical nanocrystalline mixed cubic spinel structure and allow to determine the cationic distribution as well as the lattice parameter and the oxygen position as function of Zn content. Magnetic characterization improves the knowledge about the correlation between the structural properties and magnetic behavior. The magnetization curves show a hysteretic behavior at room temperature and they are analyzed as function of Zn content taking in account the Yafet-Kittel's model. The replacement of non-zero magnetic moment Co2+ ions with zero magnetic moment Zn2+ ions induces a gradual reduction of magnetocrystalline anisotropy and a lowering of the magnetic coercivity. The energy lost in a static and alternating magnetic field (frequency of 69 kHz) at selected vertex field values for the studied samples has been calculated in order to evaluate their prospective usage to operate in different field conditions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A series of Co2FeAl Heusler alloy films, fabricated on Si/SiO2 substrates by magnetron sputtering-oblique angle deposition technique, have been investigated by magnetization and transport measurements. The morphology and magnetic anisotropy of the films strongly depended on the deposition angle. While the film deposited at zero degree (i.e. normal incidence) did not show any anisotropy, the films deposited at higher angles showed unusually strong in-plane anisotropy that increased with deposition angle. The enhanced anisotropy was well-reflected in the direction-dependent magnetization and the coercivity of the films that increased dramatically from 30 Oe to 490 Oe. In a similar vein, the electrical resistivity of the films also increased drastically, especially for deposition angles larger than 60°. These anisotropic effects and their relation to the morphology of the films are discussed.© 2018The dynamic fracture of the Nd-Fe-B magnets under uniaxial compression is investigated using a split Hopkinson pressure bar (SHPB). The surface deformation and fracture processes of the Nd-Fe-B specimens are recorded adopting a high-speed photography (HSP) with digital image correlation (DIC). The load and work applied to the specimens in the SHPB tests are determined with the strain signals of the transmitted and reflected waves. The surface strain distributions of the Nd-Fe-B specimen during the SHPB testing are revealed with DIC. It is shown by the HSP with DIC that when the load is near the maximum, the cracks at some positions on the surface of the expanding Nd-Fe-B specimen are formed and ran along certain directions. The work applied to the specimen per unit volume which corresponds to the maximal load is used to characterize the impact stability of the Nd-Fe-B specimen. The localized fracture strains at some positions on the surface of the expanding specimens at some characteristic times are determined with DIC, which are the projections of the strains onto the DIC plane.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Surface plasmon in nano-sized particles, such as gold, silver, copper and their composites, has recently attracted a great deal of attention due to its possible uses in many applications, especially in life sciences. It is desirable for application devices with a tenability of surface plasmon wavelength and optical properties enhancement. This article presents enhanced optical light absorption and tunable wavelength in gold-coated magnetite (Fe3O4@Au core-shell) nanoparticles embedded in water using the theoretical method of discrete dipole approximation (DDA). The absorption spectra in the wavelengths from 350 to 900 nm were found to be the spectra obtained from Fe3O4@Au core-shell nanoparticles, and when compared with pure Fe3O4 nanoparticles, the surface plasmon resonance can be enhanced and tuned over the entire visible spectrum (viz. 350–800 nm) of the electromagnetic spectrum by varying the Au shell thickness (2–5 nm). Similarly, the Faraday rotation spectra can also be obtained.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The dynamic behaviors of vortex domain walls (VDWs) in ferromagnetic nanowires driven by a magnetic field above Walker breakdown field (Hw) were investigated using micromagnetic simulation. It was found when nanowire has proper geometrical dimensions, the VDW may oscillate in a chirality invariant mode or a chirality switching mode depending on applied field and damping constant. At fixed damping constant, the oscillation mode can be controlled by applied field – with the increase of applied field, the oscillation of VDW change from a chirality invariant mode to a variant one. As the oscillation of VDW changes from chirality invariant regime to chirality switching regime, the oscillation frequency and amplification will undergo an abnormal change, which may offer a fingerprint for the switch of oscillation mode. Our finding proposes a simple way to control the chirality of a VDW by properly manipulating nanowire geometry and applied field, which may have important applications in VDW-based devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Co/Ti-substituted Sr-based M-type hexagonal ferrite containing composite sheets are used for the demonstration of electromagnetic noise suppression at and above 6 GHz. Three different compositions (SrCoxTixFe12 − 2xO19 with x = 1.0, 1.2, and 1.4) and two different size groups with the average diameter of ∼10 µm and ∼1 µm have been studied to understand the effect of Co-Ti substitution level and size on the high frequency magnetic characteristics of SrM hexaferrites. A drop in coercivity from 285 Oe to 40 Oe and 710 Oe to 90 Oe was observed as the Co/Ti substitution level, x, increases from 1.0 to 1.4 in the case of 10-µm and 1-µm particles respectively. Complex permeability was measured by two methods – by microstrip probe, and by all-shielded and shorted microstrip line. Ferromagnetic resonance frequency drops from ∼20 GHz to ∼3 GHz as x increases from 1.0 to 1.4, while it decreases a little as the particle size decreases. Electromagnetic noise suppression was demonstrated by measuring the ratio of power loss in the magnetic element to the input power by placing it on top of a microstrip line. With a 500-µm thick composite sheet, electromagnetic noise suppression up to 20% was achieved.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically study the Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yosida (RKKY) interaction in two-dimensional black phosphorus, phosphorene. The RKKY interaction enhances significantly for the low levels of hole doping owing to the nearly valence flat band. Remarkably, for the hole-doped phosphorene, the highest RKKY interaction occurs when two impurities located along the zigzag direction and it tends to a minimum value with changing the direction from the zigzag to the armchair direction. We show that the interaction is highly anisotropic and the magnetic ground-state of two magnetic adatoms can be tuned by changing the rotational configuration of impurities. Owing to the anisotropic band dispersion, the oscillatory behavior with respect to the angle of the rotation and the distance of two magnetic impurities, R is well-described by sin(2kFR), where the Fermi wavelength kF changes in different directions. We also find that the tail of the RKKY oscillations falls off as 1/R2 at large distances.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In conventional magnetic devices such as magnetic tunnel junctions, a steady oscillation of a soft layer magnetization could find its application in various electronic systems. However, these devices suffer from their low output signal and large spectral linewidth. A more elegant scheme based on domain wall oscillation could be a solution to these issues if DW dynamics could be controlled precisely in space and time. In fact, in DW devices, the magnetic configuration of domain wall and its position are strongly dependent on the device geometry and material properties. Here we show that in a constricted device with judiciously adjusted dimensions, a DW can be trapped within the central part and keep oscillating with a single frequency f. For 200 nm by 40 nm nanowire, f was found to vary from 2 GHz to 3 GHz for a current density between 4.8 × 1012 A/m2 and 5.6 × 1012 A/m2. More interestingly, the device fabrication is simply based on two long nanowires connected by adjusting the offset in both x and y directions. This new type of devices enables the conversion of dc-current to an ac-voltage in a controllable manner opening thus the possibility of a new nano-oscillators with better performance.© 2017Circular transmission line model (CTLM) measurements were applied to study the contact formation mechanism of the silver paste metallization on n-type emitter of crystalline silicon solar cells. The electrical performance parameters ρc,Rsk, and Lt, which are related to the physical and chemical states of the multiphase materials at the interface, were extracted from the CTLM measurements, and were found to be sensitive to sintering temperature. As the temperature increased from 585 °C to 780 °C, initially the ρc value decreased rapidly, then flattened out and increased slightly. The order of resistivity magnitude was restricted by the SiNx passivation layer in the early sintering stages, and relied on the carrier tunneling probability affected by the precipitated silver crystallites or colloids, emitter doping concentration and molten glass layer. Based on the calculations that the sheet resistance underneath the electrode was reduced form 110 Ω/□ to 0.186 Ω/□, it could be inferred that there was formation of a highly conductive layer of silver crystallites and colloids contained glass on the emitter. The transfer length Lt exhibited a U-shaped variation along with the temperature, reflecting the variation of the interfacial electrical properties. Overall, this article shows that the CTLM method can become a new powerful tool for researchers to meet the challenges of silver paste metallization innovation for manufacturing high-efficiency silicon solar cells.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, poly (ε-caprolactone) (PCL) microspheres loading magnetic Fe3O4 nanoparticles and anti-cancer drug of doxorubicin hydrochloride (DOX) were successfully prepared by a modified solvent-evaporation method. The obtained magnetic composite microspheres exhibited dual features of magnetic resonance imaging and controlled drug delivery. The morphology, structure, thermal behavior and magnetic properties of the drug-loaded magnetic microspheres were investigated in detail by SEM, XRD, DSC and SQUID. The obtained composite microspheres showed superparamagnetic behavior and T2-weighted enhancement effect. The drug loading, encapsulation efficiency, releasing behavior and in vitro cytotoxicity of the drug-loaded composite microspheres were systematically investigated. It was found that the values of drug loading and encapsulation efficiency were 36.7% and 25.8%, respectively. The composite microspheres were sensitive to pH and released in a sustained way, and both the release curves under various pH conditions (4.0 and 7.4) were well satisfied with the biphase kinetics function. In addition, the magnetic response of the drug-loaded microspheres was studied and the results showed that the composite microspheres had a good magnetic stability and strong targeting ability.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present the modulation of magnetic order on the orbital selective Mott phases (OSMP) and the metal-insulator transitions (MIT) of multi-orbital Hubbard models by employing the rotationally invariant slave-boson methods. We show that at half filling, the well-known paramagnetic (PM) OSMP is completely covered by an antiferromagnetic (AFM) Slater insulator, and the PM Mott phase by an AFM Mott insulator when electron correlation strength varies from intermediate to strong both in two- and three-orbitals Hubbard systems. Away from half-filling, we find that a partial-polarized AFM orbital-selective Slater phase appears in the intermediate correlation regime, and an almost full-polarized AFM OSMP fully covers the paramagnetic OSMP. In addition, the ferromagnetic phase in the three-orbital case is more robust than that in the two-orbital case. These results demonstrate that the modulation of magnetic correlation to the quasiparticle spectra leads to much rich and more interesting MIT scenario in multiorbital correlated systems.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe developed a Multi-Subband Ensemble Monte Carlo simulator for non-planar devices, taking into account two-dimensional quantum confinement. It couples self-consistently the solution of the 3D Poisson equation, the 2D Schrödinger equation, and the 1D Boltzmann transport equation with the Ensemble Monte Carlo method. This simulator was employed to study MOS devices based on ultra-scaled Gate-All-Around Si nanowires with diameters in the range from 4 nm to 8 nm with gate length from 8 nm to 14 nm. We studied the output and transfer characteristics, interpreting the behavior in the sub-threshold region and in the ON state in terms of the spatial charge distribution and the mobility computed with the same simulator. We analyzed the results, highlighting the contribution of different valleys and subbands and the effect of the gate bias on the energy and velocity profiles. Finally the scaling behavior was studied, showing that only the devices with D=4nm maintain a good control of the short channel effects down to the gate length of 8nm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the structure and magnetic properties of Ni-Cu-Zn ferrite-silicone coated iron-based soft magnetic composites (SMCs). Scanning electron microscopy coupled with a energy-dispersive spectroscopy (EDS) analysis revealed that the Ni-Cu-Zn ferrite and silicone resin were uniformly coated on the surface of iron powders. By controlling the composition of the coating layer, low total core loss of 97.7 mW/cm3 (eddy current loss of 48 mW/cm3, hysteresis loss of 49.7 mW/cm3, measured at 100 kHz and 0.02 T) and relatively high effective permeability of 72.5 (measured at 100 kHz) were achieved. In addition, the as-prepared SMCs displayed higher electrical resistivity, good magnetic characteristics over a wide range of frequencies (20–200 kHz) and ideal the D-C bias properties (more than 75% at H = 50 Oe). Furthermore, higher elastic modulus and hardness of SMCs, which means that the coating layer has good mechanical properties and is not easily damaged during the pressing process, were obtained in this paper. The results of this work indicate that the Ni-Cu-Zn ferrite-silicone coated SMCs have desirable properties which would make them suitable for application in the fields of the electric-magnetic switching devices, such as inductance coils, transformer cores, synchronous electric motors and resonant inductors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.High performance lead-free multiferroic composites with strong magnetoelectric coupling effect are desired to replace lead-based ceramics in multifunctional device applications due to increasing environmental issues. We report crystal structure, ferroelectric, magnetic, dielectric and magnetoelectric properties of (1-x)Ba0.85Ca0.15Ti0.90Zr0.10O3-(x)CoFe2O4 (BCTZ-CFO) lead-free composites with x = 0.1, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7 and 0.9 synthesized by chemical solution method. BCTZ power was synthesized by sol-gel method while CFO was prepared by metallo-organic decomposition (MOD) method. The XRD results confirm successful formation of the BCTZ-CFO composites without presence of any impurity phase. At room temperature, the BCTZ-CFO composites show multiferroic behavior characterized by ferroelectric and ferromagnetic hysteresis curves. The composite having 10 wt% of CFO exhibited maximum polarization, remnant polarization and coercive field of Ps ∼ 5.1 µC/cm2, Pr ∼ 1.4 µC/cm2 and Ec ∼ 11.6 kV/cm respectively. The BCTZ-CFO composite with 90 wt% of CFO incorporation exhibits improved ferromagnetic properties with Ms ∼ 32 emu/g, Mr ∼ 11.7 emu/g and Hc ∼ 504 Oe. Mӧssbauer spectra analysis show two sets of six-line hyperfine patterns for BCTZ-CFO composites, indicating the presence of Fe3+ ions in both A and B sites. Increasing BCTZ content was found to decrease the hyperfine field strength at both sites and is consistent with the decreasing magnetic moment observed for the samples. The maximum dielectric constant value ε′ ∼ 678 is obtained at 1 MHz for composite with 10 wt% of CFO phase. The results indicate that the BCTZ-CFO composites are potential lead-free room temperature multiferroic systems.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Fe3−xRExO4 (RE = Er, Dy and Gd) nanoparticles with x varying from 0 to 0.1 were synthesized using co-precipitation method. The synthesized nanoparticles were characterized using X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and UV-Vis spectroscopy techniques. TEM images reveal round shaped particles of ∼8–14 nm diameter in case of undoped magnetite (Fe3O4) nanoparticles whereas there is evolution of rod like structures by the doping of RE ions with aspect ratio in the range of 6–16. The room temperature saturation magnetization (Ms) values show gradual increase with doping till a critical doping level which is found to depend on the ionic radius of dopant ion (x = 0.01 for Er, 0.03 for Dy and 0.04 for Gd). There is a variation in the maximum value of saturation magnetization which is directly proportional to the number of unpaired 4f electrons in the dopant element. Low temperature magnetization study, carried out at 5 K and 120 K reveal an increase in the value of Ms as well as coercivity. The direct bandgaps calculated from UV-Visible data are found to decrease with increasing number of unpaired electrons in the dopant ions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The method for evaluating the integral defects level and chemical homogeneity of ferrite ceramics based on temperature dependence analysis of initial permeability is suggested. A phenomenological expression for the description of such dependence was suggested and an interpretation of its main parameters was given. It was shown, that the main criterion of the integral defects level of ferrite ceramics is relation of two parameters correlating with elastic stress value in a material. An indicator of structural perfection can be a maximum value of initial permeability close to Curie point as well. The temperature dependences of initial permeability have analyzed for samples sintered in laboratory conditions and for the ferrite industrial product. The proposed method allows controlling integral defects level of the soft ferrite products and has high sensitivity compare to typical X-ray methods.© 2018The thermoelectric power (TEP) and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) for (Nd0.6Sr0.4MnO3)1-x/(CrO3)x composites have been measured. The TEP measurements show a negative sign value of the Seebeck coefficient (S), in microvolts. TEP data construe in the low range of temperature by the magnon and phonon drag model, whereas at high temperature by small polaron conduction mechanism. Magnetic measurements exhibit that all composites show a paramagnetic–ferromagnetic transition with decreasing temperature. The Arrott plots of composites reveal the occurrence of a second order phase transition. The maximum value of magnetic entropy change (ΔS) is 2.37 J kg−1 K−1, achieved fore the composite with x = 0.015. Moreover, the maximum value of relative cooling power (RCP) is 122.1 J kg−1, achieved for the composite with x = 0.020. These composites may be appropriate for magnetic application near room temperature.© 2018The evolution of local structure and defects in the Fe81Si4B10P4Cu1 amorphous alloy during the structural relaxation has been investigated by Mössbauer spectroscopy, positron annihilation lifetime spectroscopy and transmission electron microscopy to explore their effects on magnetic properties of the nanocrystalline. The atomic rearrangements at the early stage of the structural relaxation cause the density increase of the amorphous matrix, but the subsequent atomic rearrangements contribute to the transformation of Fe3B-like atomic arrangements to FeB-like ones with the temperature increasing. As the structural relaxation processes, the released Fe atoms both from Fe3B- and Fe3P-like atomic arrangements result in the formation of new Fe clusters and the increase of Fe-Fe coordination number in the existing Fe clusters and the nucleation sites for α-Fe gradually increase, both of which promote the crystallization. However, the homogeneity of amorphous matrix will be finally destroyed under excessive relaxation temperature, which coarsens nanograins during the crystallization instead. Therefore, soft magnetic properties of the Fe81Si4B10P4Cu1 nanocrystalline alloy can be improved by pre-annealing the amorphous precursor at an appropriate temperature due to the atomic level structural optimization.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the resistance, magnetoresistance and Hall effect of AlCu2Mn Heusler alloy thin films prepared by flash evaporation on substrates cooled at 4He liquid temperature. The as-prepared samples were amorphous and were annealed stepwise to induce the transformation to the crystalline phase. The amorphous phase is metastable up to above room temperature and the transition to the crystalline phase was observed by means of resistance measurements. Using transmission electron microscopy, we have determined the structure factor S(K) and the pair correlation function g(r), both results indicate that amorphous AlCu2Mn is an electronic stabilized phase. The X-ray diffraction of the crystallized film shows peaks corresponding to the well ordered L21 phase. The resistance shows a negative temperature coefficient in both phases. The magnetoresistance (MR) is negative in both phases, yet larger in the crystalline state compared to the amorphous one. The magnetic properties were studied further by anomalous Hall effect measurements, which were present in both phases. In the amorphous state, the anomalous Hall effect disappears at temperatures below 175 K and is present up to above room temperature in the case of crystalline AlCu2Mn.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effects of beam losses on the performance of undulators equipped with Sm2Co17 magnets were investigated at the 855 MeV beamline of the Mainzer Microtron MAMI. Therefore, different cases containing undulator components as well as complete undulator assemblies were irradiated. Different types of shielding were used to distinguish the magnetic field degradation caused by neutrons from the degradation caused by electrons and photons. The results of each case were put in relation with the expected beam losses of a conceptional 10 kW free-electron-laser (FEL) based on an electron beam with 34 MW beam power.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Large-grain La1–xSrxMnO3 ceramic samples of compositions x = 0.45 and 0.55, representing the ferromagnetic (FM) and A-type antiferromagnetic (AFM) ground states, were produced via classical sintering at 1500 °C of cold-pressed sol-gel prepared single-phase nanoparticles. Using the same precursors, nanogranular forms of both manganite ceramics were prepared by fast spark plasma sintering at low temperature of 900 °C, which limits the growth of crystal grains. The magnetotransport of both the bulk and nanogranular forms was investigated in a broad range of magnetic fields up to 130 kOe and analyzed on the basis of detailed magnetic measurements. Both the large-grain and nanogranular systems with x = 0.45, possessing a pure FM state with similar Curie tempereature TC ≈ 345 K), show nearly the same conductivity enhancement in external fields when expressed relatively to the zero-field values. This positive magnetoconductance (MC) can be separated into two terms: (i) the hysteretic low-field MC that reflects the field-induced orientation of magnetic moments of individual grains, and (ii) the high-field MC that depends linearly on external field. In the case of large-grain ceramics with x = 0.55, a partially ordered FM state formed below TC = 264 K is replaced by pure A-type AFM ground state below 204 K. This A-type AFM state is characterized by positive magnetoconductance that is essentially of quadratic dependence on external field in the investigated range up to 130 kOe. On contrary, the nanogranular product with x = 0.55 exhibits a mixed FM/AFM state at low temperatures, and, as a consequence, its magnetotransport combines the features of FM and A-type AFM systems, in which the quadratic term is much enhanced and clearly dominates at high fields. For interpretation of observed behaviors, the theory of grain-boundary tunneling is revisited.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present a systematic study on the chemical ordering pattern and the magnetic properties of NixPt1-x (0⩽x≤1) nanoparticles having a size of 1.5 nm by means of an approach which combines basin hopping structure sampling technique and spin-polarized density functional theory. We found exotic chemical ordering patterns for different Ni/Pt ratios. In addition, we observed a sharp phase transition from non-magnetic to ferromagnetic behaviour around x = 67%. We show that this is a direct consequence of a unique atomic arrangement on the surface in which Ni atoms club together causing the strong Ni-Ni magnetic interaction. The observed magnetic properties are correlated to the electronic density of states.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a new magnetically tunable substrate integrated waveguide (SIW) with composite right/left-handed (CRLH) response is presented. The structure consists of an array of interdigital slots on the upper wall of a SIW line with normally magnetized ferrite substrate. The electromagnetic properties of this structure are studied and the dispersion diagram is considered. The simulated results show that the proposed structure has a separate right- and left-handed leakage frequency region which can be simply controlled by varying the applied ferrite magnetic bias field. As an application, this leakage frequency band is exploited to build a new leaky-wave antenna (LWA) which its radiation pattern can be independently scanned by varying the frequency or the magnetic bias field. As another advantage, there is not any mechanical switch or electrical tuning chip in the proposed leaky-wave antenna.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study spin wave propagation in quasiperiodic magnonic superlattices that follow the so-called Octonacci quasiperiodic sequence, where the N-th stage can be obtained through the recurrence rule SN=SN-1SN-2SN-1, for N⩾3, and starting with S1=A and S2=B. The multilayered magnonic nanostructure is composed of two simple cubic ferromagnetic materials, labeled A and B, which interact through bilinear and biquadratic exchange couplings at their interfaces. The ferromagnetic materials are described by the Heisenberg model, and a transfer matrix treatment is employed, with the calculations performed for the exchange-dominated regime, taking the random phase approximation (RPA) into account. The obtained numerical results show the effects of both (i) the Octonacci quasiperiodic sequence and (ii) the biquadratic exchange coupling on the band structure and transmission spectra of spin waves. Comparisons are also performed with the spectra found in other periodic and quasiperiodic structures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The non-stationary response of local magnetic moment to abrupt switching “on” and “off” of external magnetic field was studied for a single-level quantum dot (QD) coupled to a reservoir. We found that transient processes look different for the shallow and deep localized energy level. It was demonstrated that for deep energy level the relaxation rates of the local magnetic moment strongly differ in the case of magnetic field switching “on” or “off”. Obtained results can be applied in the area of dynamic memory devices stabilization in the presence of magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we present the results of theoretical calculation of entanglement within a spin structure of Gd3N@C80 under the influence of rectangular impulses. Research is conducted using general spin Hamiltonian within SSNQ (spin system of N-qubits). The calculations of entanglement with various impulses are performed using the time-dependent Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation with spin-spin correlation function. We show that long rectangular impulse (t = 850 ps) can be used for sustaining entanglement value. This allows us to offer a new algorithm which can be used to solve the problem of decoherence in the logical scheme optimization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have revisited the mean-field treatment for the Blume-Capel model under the presence of a discrete random magnetic field as introduced by Kaufman and Kanner (1990). The magnetic field (H) versus temperature (T) phase diagrams for given values of the crystal field D were recovered in accordance to Kaufman and Kanner original work. However, our main goal in the present work was to investigate the distinct structures of the crystal field versus temperature phase diagrams as the random magnetic field is varied because similar models have presented reentrant phenomenon due to randomness. Following previous works we have classified the distinct phase diagrams according to five different topologies. The topological structure of the phase diagrams is maintained for both H-T and D-T cases. Although the phase diagrams exhibit a richness of multicritical phenomena we did not found any reentrant effect as have been seen in similar models.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The quantum spin and valley characteristics in normal silicene/ferromagnetic silicene/normal silicene junction are investigated under the effects of both electric field and the exchange field of the ferromagnetic silicene. The spin resolved conductance and valley resolved conductance are deduced by solving the Dirac equation. Results show resonant oscillations of both spin and valley conductance. These oscillations might be due to confined states of ferromagnetic silicene. The spin and valley polarizations are also computed. Their trends of figures show that they might be tuned and modulated by the electric field and the exchange field of the ferromagnetic silicene. The present investigated silicene nanodevice might be good for spin-valleytronics applications which are needed for quantum information processing and quantum logic circuits.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work we address the interplay between two phenomena which are signatures of the out-of-equilibrium state in phase separated manganites: irreversibility against thermal cycling and aging/rejuvenation process. The sample investigated is La0.5Ca0.5MnO3, a prototypical manganite exhibiting phase separation. Two regimes for isothermal relaxation were observed according to the temperature range: for T > 100 K, aging/rejuvenation effects are observed, while for T < 100 K an irreversible aging was found. Our results show that thermal cycles act as a tool to unveil the dynamical behavior of the phase separated state in manganites, revealing the close interplay between static and dynamic properties of phase separated manganites.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnesium nano ferrite with composition MgFe2O4, MgGd0.05Fe1.95O4 and MgFe2O4 – 5 wt% GO was synthesized using a citrate auto-combustion method. The crystal structure, morphology, and magnetic properties of the investigated samples were studied. High Resolution Transmission Electron Microscopy (HRTEM) images show that the substitution of small amounts of Gd3+/GO causes a considerable reduction of the grain size. Studies on the magnetic properties demonstrate that the coercivity of GO-substituted magnesium nano ferrites is enhanced from 72 Oe to 203 Oe and the magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant increases from 1171 to 3425 emu Oe/gm at 300 K. The direct effects of graphene on morphology, crystal structure as well as the magnetic properties reveal that the studied sample are suitable for turbidity color and removal. The magnetic entropy change is estimated from magnetization data using Maxwell relation. The calculated Curie temperature from the Curie-Weiss law and the maximum entropy change are in good agreement with each other. Based on UV diffuse reflectance spectroscopy studies, the optical band gaps are in the range of 1.4–2.15 eV. In addition, the combination of small particle size and good magnetic properties makes the investigated samples act as a potential candidates for superior catalysts, adsorbents, and electromagnetic wave absorbers.© 2018Using the s-d microscopic model including the electron-phonon interaction and the Green's function theory we have considered the origin of room temperature ferromagnetism (RTFM) in pure and ion doped In2O3 nanoparticles (NPs). The magnetization M increases with decreasing particle size. M of Fe, Tb and Mn doped In2O3 NPs is investigated, which increases, decreases and has a maximum, respectively, with increasing doping concentration. The RTFM is due to surface oxygen vacancies and different ionic radius of the dopants compared to that of the host ions. This differences lead to different strains which changes the exchange interaction constants. We have calculated the dependence of the band gap energy on the particle size in In2O3 NPs and the Fe concentration of Fe doped In2O3 NPs. The results are in good qualitative agreement with the experimental data.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of binary intermetallic compound Er3Pd2 were studied. It exhibits a paramagnetic (PM) to antiferromagnetic (AFM) transition at Néel temperature (TN) = 10 K. A large reversible MCE was observed which is related to a second order magnetic transition from PM to AFM state. The values of maximum magnetic entropy change (-ΔSMmax) and adiabatic temperature change (ΔTadmax) reach 8.9 J/kg-K and 2.9 K respectively for the field change of 50 kOe with no obvious hysteresis loss. The effective magnetic moment was determined to be 10.16 µB/Er3+, which is notably higher than that of free ion value of Er3+ (9.59 µB), suggests that Pd ions also have considerable amount of magnetic moments in this compound.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the current study, Fe3O4/NaA nanocomposites with various amounts of Fe3O4 (3.4, 6.8 & 10.2 wt%) were synthesized and characterized to study the effect of nano iron oxide content on the magnetic resonance (MR) image contrast. The cell viability of the nanocomposites was investigated by MTT assay method. T2 values as well as r2 relaxivities were determined with a 1.5 T MRI scanner. The results of the MTT assay confirmed the nanocomposites cytocompatibility up to 6.8% of the iron oxide content. Although the magnetization saturations and susceptibility values of the nanocomposites were increased as a function of the iron oxide content, their relaxivity was decreased from 921.78 mM−1 s−1 for the nanocomposite with the lowest iron oxide content to 380.16 mM−1 s−1 for the highest one. Therefore, Fe3O4/NaA nanocomposite with 3.4% iron oxide content led to the best MR image contrast. Nano iron oxide content and dispersion in the nanocomposites structure have important role in the nanocomposite r2 relaxivity and the MR image contrast. Aggregation of the iron oxide nanoparticles is a limiting factor in using of the high iron oxide content nanocomposites.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present two different types of magnetization reversal behaviors for the identically-configured Co/Pd multilayers with rounded-rectangular nanodots and nanorings for various edge-to-edge distances (s), by using focused magneto-optic Kerr measurements and magnetic force microscopy measurements. For the nanodots with a fixed outer diameter of d = 580 nm, the switching field Hsw and switching field distribution (SFD) are almost invariant with respect to s. However, the Hsw and SFD for the nanodot arrays could be easily modulated by varying d, which is ascribed to the size effect. In contrast, the Hsw and SFD are strongly dependent on s for the nanorings. Compared to the strongly coupled magnetic moments of the closely-packed nanorings, the magnetostatic interaction among nanodots is negligible, which should be responsible for the observed different magnetization reversal behaviors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have observed the propagation of spin waves across a thin yttrium iron garnet film on (1 1 1) gadolinium gallium garnet for magnetic fields inclined with respect to the film plane. Two principle planes were studied: that for H in the plane defined by the wave vector k and the plane normal, n, with limiting forms corresponding to the Backward Volume and Forward Volume modes, and that for H in the plane perpendicular to k, with limiting forms corresponding to the Damon-Eshbach and Forward Volume modes. By exciting the wave at one edge of the film and observing the field dependence of the phase of the received signal at the opposing edge we determined the frequency vs. wavevector relation, ω = ω (k), of various propagating modes in the film. Avoided crossings are observed in the Damon-Eshbach and Forward Volume regimes when the propagating mode intersects the higher, exchange split, volume modes, leading to an extinction of the propagating mode; analysis of the resulting behavior allows a determination of the exchange parameter. The experimental results are compared with theoretical simulations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous Nd-Co thin films exhibit stripe shaped periodic magnetic domains with local out-of-plane magnetization components due to their perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. This anisotropy has been quantified in a fairly simple way by reproducing the experimental magnetization curves by means of micromagnetic numerical simulations. The simulations show that the first (K1) and second (K2) anisotropy constants must be used to properly describe the variation of the stripe domains with the in plane applied magnetic field. A strong temperature dependence of both K1 and K2 has been obtained between 10 K and room temperature. This anisotropy behavior is characteristic of two magnetically coupled 3d-4f sublattices with competing anisotropies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We consider electron drag in a system of two ferromagnetic layers separated by an insulating interface. The source of it is expected to be magnon-electron interactions. Namely, we assume that the external voltage is applied to the “active” layer stimulating electric current through this layer. In its turn, the scattering of the current-carrying electrons by magnons leads to a magnon drag current within this layer. The 3-magnons interactions between magnons in the two layers (being of non-local nature) lead to magnon drag within the “passive” layer which, correspondingly, produce electron drag current via processes of magnon-electron scattering. We estimate the drag current and compare it to the phonon-induced one.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe DC and RF characteristics of metal-semiconductor field-effect-transistors (MESFETs) on conventional CMOS silicon-on-insulator (SOI) substrates are compared to nominally identical devices on high-resistivity, trap-rich SOI substrates. While the DC transfer characteristics are statistically identical on either substrate, the maximum available gain at GHz frequencies is enhanced by ∼2 dB when using the trap-rich substrates, with maximum operating frequencies, fmax, that are approximately 5–10% higher. The increased fmax is explained by the reduced substrate conduction at GHz frequencies using a lumped-element, small-signal model.© 2018A series of MnxFe1-xNb2O6 compounds (0⩽x⩽1) is investigated by both X-ray and neutron powder diffraction, as well as specific-heat and magnetic measurements. The samples present orthorhombic Pbcn crystal symmetry, and exhibit weakly coupled magnetic chains. These chains are of Heisenberg type (weak anisotropy) on the Mn-rich side, and Ising-like (strong anisotropy) on the Fe-rich side. Except for 100% Fe (x=0), which has weakly-interacting ferromagnetic Ising chains, a negative Curie-Weiss temperature is obtained from the magnetic susceptibility, indicating dominant antiferromagnetic interactions. At the lowest probed temperature, T=1.5K, true long-range magnetic order is only observed for x=1, 0.8, and 0. Although the ordering is globally antiferromagnetic in all cases, the first two are characterized by a two-sublattice structure with propagation vector k=(0,0,0), while the latter presents alternatingly oriented ferromagnetic chains described by k=(0,[Formula presented],0). For other compositions, short-range magnetic correlations are extracted from diffuse neutron-scattering data.© 2018Selenospinels, CuCr2−xMxSe4 (M = Zr and Sn), were synthesized via conventional solid-state reactions. The crystal structure of CuCr1.5Sn0.5Se4, CuCr1.7Sn0.3Se4, CuCr1.5Zr0.5Se4, and CuCr1.8Zr0.2Se4 were determined using single-crystal X-ray diffraction. All the phases crystallized in a cubic spinel-type structure. The chemical compositions of the single-crystals were examined using energy-dispersive X-ray analysis (EDS). Powder X-ray diffraction patterns of CuCr1.3Sn0.7Se4 and CuCr1.7Sn0.3Se4 were consistent with phases belonging to the Fd3¯m Space group. An analysis of the vibrational properties on the single-crystals was performed using Raman scattering measurements. The magnetic properties showed a spin glass behavior with increasing Sn content and ferromagnetic order for CuCr1.7Sn0.3Se4.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural, mechanical, electronic and magnetic properties of Fe8−xCrxB4 (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8) have been investigated by first-principles calculation. It was found that the calculated structural parameters are well consistent with available experimental data. Moreover, all studied compounds are thermodynamically stable phases. On the whole, the moduli of the compounds firstly increase and then decrease with the increase of Cr concentration, whereas the variation of hardness exhibits more fluctuations. All Cr-doped Fe2B have better ductility than Fe2B except Fe2Cr6B4 and Fe5Cr3B4. Interestingly, Fe4Cr4B4 is of not only the slightly larger hardness, but also much better ductility than Fe2B. As the Cr concentration is lower than 20 wt%, the hardness of Cr-doped Fe2B slightly decreases with increasing Cr, whereas the sharply increased hardness of (Fe, Cr)2B in Fe-B alloys or boriding layer should be attributed to the multiple alloying effects resulting from Cr and the other alloying elements. The electronic structures revealed that the Fe-B and/or Cr-B bonds are mainly responsible for their mechanical properties, and the M-N (M = Fe or Cr, N = Fe or Cr) bonds in 〈2 2 0〉 and 〈1 1 3〉 orientations show covalent character. Additionally, the magnetic moments (Ms) of the compounds do not monotonically decrease with increasing Cr.© 2018The first principles calculation of the structural, electronic and associated properties of the Fe50Al50 alloy (B2 phase) doped by s-p elements (Im = Si, Ga, and Ge) are performed as a function of the atomic concentration on the basis of the Full Potential Linear Augmented Plane Wave (FP-LAPW) method as implemented in the WIEN2k code. The Al substitution by Im (Si and Ge) atoms (principally at a concentration of 6.25 at%) induces a pronounced redistribution of the electronic charge leading to a strong Fe-Im interaction with covalent bonding character. At the same time, decrease the lattice volume (V) while increase the bulk modulus (B). For the alloys containing Ga, the Fe-Ga interaction is also observed but the V and B of the alloy are very near to that of pure Fe-Al alloy. The magnetic moment and hyperfine parameters observed at the lattice sites of studied alloys also show variations, they increase or decrease in relation to that in Fe50Al50 according to the Im that substitutes Al.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Cr doped cobalt ferrite nanoparticles were synthesized with the generic formula Co1-xCrxFe2O4 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.15, 0.25) through standard chemical co-precipitation method. XRD studies confirmed the pure spinel cubic structure belonging to Fd3¯m space group. From the Williamson-Hall plots, crystallite sizes were found to lie within the range (42 ± 1) nm for the different doped samples. The lattice parameter was found to decrease linearly with increase in the concentration of Cr3+ ion. The magnetic behavior of the samples was determined by M-H studies at 300 K, field cooled (5 T) at 5 K and temperature dependent studies. The M-H at 300 K show soft magnetic behavior whereas the M-H plots at 5 K predict the existence of in-homogeneity of the exchange interactions due to strong exchange coupling between the spins at the core and the surface of the nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Among the most important issues of Renormalization Group (RG) theory are crossover events and relevant (or non-relevant) interactions. These terms are unknown to atomistic theories but they will be decisive for future field theories of magnetism. In this experimental study the importance of these terms for the critical dynamics above and below magnetic ordering transition is demonstrated on account of new analyses of published data. When crossover events are overlooked and critical data are fitted by a single power function of temperature over a temperature range including a crossover event, imprecise critical exponents result. The rather unsystematic and floating critical exponents reported in literature seem largely to be due to this problem. It is shown that for appropriate data analyses critical exponents are obtained that are to a good approximation rational numbers. In fact, rational critical exponents can be expected when spin dynamics is controlled by the bosons of the continuous magnetic medium (Goldstone bosons). The bosons are essentially magnetic dipole radiation generated by the precessing spins. As a result of the here performed data analyses, critical exponents for the magnetic order parameter of β = 1/2, 1/3, 1/4 and 1/6 are obtained. For the critical paramagnetic susceptibility the exponents are γ = 1 and γ = 4/3.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the investigation of carrier tunneling asymmetry at ferromagnet-semiconductor junctions. By an analytical 2×2 spin model, we show that, when Dresselhaus interactions is included in the conduction band of III-V semiconductors (Td or D2d symmetry group), the electrons may undergo a difference of transmission vs. the sign of their incident parallel wavevector normal to the in-plane magnetization. The asymmetry of transmission also exists in the valence band of semiconductors owing to the inner atomic spin-orbit strength and free of asymmetric potentials in bulk or at interfaces. We present advanced multiband 14×14 and 30×30 k·p tunneling models together with tunneling transport perturbation calculations based on Green's function techniques corroborating these results. Those demonstrate that a tunneling spin-current normal to the interface can generate a transverse surface charge current, the so-called Anomalous Tunnel Hall Effect.© 2018This article describes the synthesis of two superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) covered with different ligands – hydrophobic (oleic acid (OA)) and hydrophilic (tetraethyl ammonium (TEA)) – and the investigation of the effects of thermal treatments on the crystal structure of TEA-SPIONs or OA-SPIONs using X-ray powder diffraction data and parametric Rietveld refinements; we stablished non-crystallographic models to describe how the oxidation processes take place with increasing temperatures for the different systems. The morphological and magnetic properties revealed the nanoparticles have a mean diameter of ∼10 nm in the solid state and are superparamagnetic at room temperature. Magnetization measurements confirmed the superparamagnetic state for both systems and revealed smaller particle sizes and narrower size distribution for OA-SPIONs than for TEA-SPIONs. The thermomagnetic analyses show only the ferrimagnetic phase transition of magnetite for OA-SPIONs while in the TEA-SPIONs, besides the ferrimagnetic phase transition there is the appearance of an antiferromagnetic one disclosing the evolution of hematite phase probably on the surface of magnetite due to thermal cycles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, Cobalt-Manganese-Zinc nanoferrites with the formula CoxMn0.5−xZn0.5Fe2O4 with x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.3, and 0.5 prepared by chemical Co-precipitation method. Then the structure and morphology of the synthesized nanoparticles were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmitting electron microscopy (TEM), respectively. The XRD patterns indicated the formation of single-phased cubic structure of spinel ferrite in nanometer size with no minor phase. The TEM image showed the formation of nanoparticles with average size of about 40 nm and normal size distribution. The magnetic measurements of the nanoparticles were done at room temperature using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Results exhibited a super-paramagnetic like behavior for some of the samples. DC electrical resistivity measurements were carried out by two-probe technique from 25 to 250 °C and showed decreasing of the resistivity with temperature meanwhile passing a transition to form of a peak. The peaks values observed near the Curie temperatures of samples suggest that anomaly behavior can attributed to spin canting associated with the phase transition from para to ferromagnetic state at TC.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and structural properties of Mn1−xCrxAlGe (0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) compounds were investigated. The spontaneous magnetization Ms and Curie temperature TC of Mn1−xCrxAlGe has a cusp at x = 0.2. The maximum values of Ms and TC are 1.74 μB/f.u. and 601 K, respectively. It was found that the tetragonal Cu2Sb-type structure was stable for 0 ≤ x ≤ 0.75, whereas orthorhombic TiSi2-type structure was observed for x ≥ 0.8. The reciprocal susceptibility as a function of temperature suggested that the magnetic moment of Cr is antiferromagnetically coupled with that of Mn in Cu2Sb-type structure.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we present a silicon tunnel FET based on line-tunneling to achieve better subthreshold performance. The fabricated device shows an on-current of Ion = 2.55 × 10−7 A/µm at Vds = Von = Vgs − Voff = −0.5 V for an Ioff = 1 nA/µm and an average SS of 55 mV/dec over two orders of magnitude of Id. Furthermore, the analog figures of merit have been calculated and show that the transconductance efficiency gm/Id beats the MOSFET performance at low currents.© 2018Owing to the great influence of surface passivation on DC and RF performance of InP-based HEMTs, the DC and RF performance of InAlAs/InGaAs InP HEMTs were studied before and after passivation, using an ultra-thin 15 nm atomic layer deposition Al2O3 layer. Increase in Cgs and Cgd was significantly limited by scaling the thickness of the Al2O3 layer. For verification, an analytical small-signal equivalent circuit model was developed. A significant increase in maximum transconductance (gm) up to 1150 mS/mm, drain current (IDS) up to 820 mA/mm and fmax up to 369.7 GHz was observed, after passivation. Good agreement was obtained between the measured and the simulated results. This shows that the RF performance of InP-based HEMTs can be improved by using an ultra-thin ALD-Al2O3 surface passivation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt carbides (Co2C and Co3C) nanocomposites exhibit interesting hard magnetic property, controlled synthesis of individual phase facilitates to clarify the magnetism of each, but it is difficult to obtain the single phase. We present a new approach to address this issue via a polyol refluxing process, using cobalt laurate as the precursor. The single phase Co2C magnetic nanochains self-assembled by nanoparticles are synthesized. The precursor is the key factor for controlling the growth kinetics of the Co2C nanochains. Cobalt, instead of cobalt carbides, is produced if cobalt chloride, acetate and acetylacetonate replace cobalt laurate as the precursor, respectively. The evolution of the growth process has been studied. In the formation of Co2C, first fcc-Co produces, then it transforms into Co2C by carbon diffusion process, and the produced carbon first exists in disordered state and then a small amount of them transforms into graphite. Saturation magnetization (Ms) of Co2C nanochains obtained at 300 °C for 20, 60, and 180 min are 27.1, 18.9, and 10.9 emu g−1, respectively. The decrease of Ms caused by increasing carbon content, and the carbon content are much larger than the stoichiometric ratio value of Co2C (9.2 wt%). The Co2C nanochains have mesoporous pore of 3.8 nm and the specific surface area of 48.6 m2 g−1.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.On the basis of first principles calculations, the electronic structures and magnetic properties of quaternary Heusler alloys RbCaNZ (Z = O, S, and Se) were studied. The negative formation energies indicated that all these compounds were thermodynamically stable and thus may be experimentally synthesized at appropriate conditions in the future. The results showed that YI structure was the most favorable configuration among the three possible structures. All compounds were found to be half-metallic ferromagnets. The characteristic of energy bands and origin of half-metallicity were also verified. The total magnetic moments of RbCaNZ (Z = O, S, and Se) compounds were obtained 2μB per formula unit, which were in an agreement with Slater-Pauling rule (Mtot = 12 − Ztot). Half-metallicity was preserved at ranges of 5.06–8.36 Å 5.96–8.81 Å and 6.13–8.73 Å for RbCaNO, RbCaNS, and RbCaNSe compounds, respectively, which show that these quaternary Heusler compounds may be potential candidates in spintronic applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of maghemite/magnetite functionalized with L-glycine, L-glutamic acid and L-arginine were synthesized by a novel method. The novel procedure consists in an alternative of that reported by Massart for the precipitation of magnetite in which the aminoacid is added in the carboxylate form. The amounts of aminoacid in the initial molar concentrations were 35%, 45% and 65% with respect to the ferrophase. The obtained nanoparticles were characterized by several techniques: X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform IR spectroscopy (FT-IR), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), Electron energy-loss spectroscopy (EELS) and magnetometry. The IR spectroscopy confirmed that the selected aminoacids were functionalized on the surface of iron oxide. XRD and EELS confirm that iron oxide consists of a maghemite-magnetite intermediate phase with an average particle size about 6 nm, which was measured by transmission electron microscopy. The superparamagnetic character of the nanoparticles was evaluated by magnetometry.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The complex permeability and permittivity of the easy-plane anisotropic Co/polyimide composite at high temperature (293–673 K) in X band were measured. The results show that both the complex permeability and permittivity increase with the increase of temperature in the measured temperature range. The calculated absorption properties display that the intensity of the reflection loss (RL) peak first increases and then decreases with the increase of temperature, and reaches the maximum (−52 dB) at 523 K. At each temperature, the composite can achieve the RL exceeding −10 dB in the whole X band. The composite can even work stably for more than 20 min with the excellent absorption performance under 673 K. In addition, the RL performance of the composite at high temperature is better than that at room temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect of EuTi1−xMnxO3 (x = 0–0.1) compounds are investigated. When the Ti4+ was substituted by Mn2+, the lattice constants were changed, the Eu3+ state and the oxygen vacancy generated. The exchange mechanisms were more complex among the Mn2+ 3d, the Eu 5d and Eu2+ 4f. The FM phase was dominant between AFM and FM as Mn substitute for Ti, which improve the MCE under low magnetic field. The values of −ΔSMmax are evaluated to 11.7 and 11.1 J/kg K for EuTi0.975Mn0.025O3 and EuTi0.95Mn0.05O3 compounds, under a magnetic field change of 1 T. And, the values of RC were obviously enhanced under the magnetic field changes of 1 and 2 T. Therefore, the giant reversible MCE makes these compounds promising candidates for magnetic refrigeration.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we extend our analytical compact model for nanoscale junctionless triple-gate (JL TG) MOSFETs, capturing carrier transport from drift-diffusion to quasi-ballistic regime. This is based on a simple formulation of the low-field mobility extracted from experimental data using the Y-function method, taking into account the ballistic carrier motion and an increased carrier scattering in process-induced defects near the source/drain regions. The case of a Schottky junction in non-ideal ohmic contact at the drain side was also taken into account by modifying the threshold voltage and ideality factor of the JL transistor. The model is validated with experimental data for n-channel JL TG MOSFETs with channel length varying from 95 down to 25 nm. It can be easily implemented as a compact model for use in Spice circuit simulators.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents the results of thermoradiation modification of nanostructure of potash-aluminum-boron glasses with iron oxide additives studied by optical spectroscopy. The differential spectra of the glass samples have jumps at 240, 320 and 370 nm. The physical mechanism of their formation is suggested. The obtained results show the way for the nanostructure modification useful for magneto-optical and dosimetric applications of the glasses. Valence-coordination transition of iron ions induced by irradiation at elevated temperatures can be used as switching effect in quantum computers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the superconducting spin-valve effect in a F1/F2/S heterostructure containing a Heusler alloy layer standing for an F2 layer. The Heusler alloy layer was grown at the substrate temperature Tsub=300K. According to our previous data in such preparation conditions this layer is a weak ferromagnet. For the samples with the Heusler layer thickness dHeusler=1 and 4 nm the full switching between the normal and superconducting states is realized with the dominant aid of the long-range triplet component of the superconducting pair condensate which occurs at the perpendicular mutual orientation of magnetizations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.(Sm0.7Zr0.3)x(Fe0.9Co0.1)100−x (x = 9.1,10.7,10.9,12.6,13.4) alloys almost consist of TbCu7 type phase were prepared by rapid quenching technique and annealing. A series of TbCu7 type Sm-Zr-Fe-Co-N magnetically hard powders were prepared through nitrogenization of the alloys. With (Sm0.7Zr0.3) content increases, the coercivity increased but magnetization decreases. TbCu7-type nitride powder with coercivity of 10.8 kOe can be obtained when x = 13.6. The initial magnetization curves of the powders indicate that the coercivity should be controlled by pinning mechanism.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper explores the optimization of an array of pick-up coils in a home-made vibrating sample magnetometer for the detection of magnetic moment in thin films. Sensitivity function of a 4-coils Mallinson configuration was numerically studied for the determination of the physical dimensions that enhance the sensitivity of the magnetometer. By performing numerical simulations using the Biot-Savart law combined with the principle of reciprocity we were able to determine the maximum values of sensitivity and the influence of the separation of the coils on the sensitivity function. After the optimization of the pick-up coils, the vibrating sample magnetometer was able to detect the magnetic moment of a 100 nm-thickness Fe19Ni81 magnetic thin film along and perpendicular to the in-plane anisotropy easy axis. The implemented vibrating sample magnetometer is able to detect changes in the magnetic moment of ∼2 × 10-4 emu.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A C14 Nb0.975Fe2.025 Laves phase compound was investigated aimed at determining the H-T magnetic phase diagram. Magnetization, M, and AC magnetic susceptibility measurement were performed. Concerning the former field-cooled and zero-field-cooled M-curves were recorded in the temperature range of 2–200 K and in applied magnetic field, H, up to 1000 Oe, isothermal M(H) curves at 2 K, 5 K, 50 K, 80 K and 110 K as well as hysteresis loops at several temperatures over the field range of ±10 kOe were measured. Regarding the AC susceptibility, χ, both real and imaginary components were registered as a function of increasing temperature in the interval of 2 K-150 K at the frequencies of the oscillating field, f, from 3 Hz up to 999 Hz. An influence of the external DC magnetic field on the temperature dependence of χ was investigated, too. The measurements clearly demonstrated that the magnetism of the studied sample is weak, itinerant and has a reentrant character. Based on the obtained results a magnetic phase diagram has been constructed in the H-T coordinates.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present a study of the physical properties of the La0.6Ca0.4MnO3 and La0.6Ca0.3 Ag0.1MnO3 powder samples. Our synthesized samples were prepared by sol–gel methods. They crystallize in the orthorhombic perovskite structure with Pnma space group. The substitution of calcium by silver induces an increase in cell volume. The magnetocaloric effect was estimated from the magnetic isotherms. With 10% of Ag doped in the La0.6Ca0.4MnO3, we can observe a significant maximum variation of the magnetic entropy −ΔSMax and a relative cooling power RCP near room temperature under an applied magnetic field of 5 T. The RCP varied from 221 to 264 J kg−1 under an applied magnetic field of 5 T for La0.6Ca0.4MnO3 and La0.6Ca0.3Ag0.1MnO3, respectively. The comparison of the values, reported in the reference Gd material, underlines that the proposed oxide material has significant advantages for magnetic refrigeration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The DyZn film on sintered NdFeB magnet surface was prepared through DC magnetron sputtering. The magnetic properties, thermal stability and microstructure of annealed and DyZn diffused magnets were compared. The coercivity enhances significantly from 1174.10 kA/m to 1711.40 kA/m by a striking increment of 45.7% with only a slight reduction in remanence from 1.20 T to 1.19 T after DyZn thermal diffusion treatment. The thermal stability of NdFeB magnets can be improved by grain boundary diffusion. The temperature coefficient of coercivity (β) and remanence (α) are improved from −0.506%/°C, −0.120%/°C to −0.481%/°C, −0.105%/°C in the range of 20 °C–180 °C, respectively. The irreversible magnetic flux losses of DyZn diffused magnet are reduced to 37.5% at 180 °C for 2 h and 29.8% in HAST for 288 h, respectively. Dy elements diffusing along the grain boundary phase mainly aggregate between the grain boundary phase and the main grain epitaxial layer via SEM and EPMA observations. The optimization of microstructure and composition of grain boundary phases and the formed (Nd,Dy)2Fe14B transition layer are the main reasons for the significant enhancement of intrinsic coercivity.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have fabricated the Al27Cu18Er55 amorphous ribbon with good glassy formation ability by melt-spinning technology. A broad paramagnetic (PM) to ferromagnetic (FM) transition (second ordered) together with a large reversible magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in Al27Cu18Er55 amorphous ribbon was observed around the Curie temperature TC ∼ 11 K. Under the magnetic field change (ΔH of 0–7 T, the values of MCE parameter of the maximum magnetic entropy change (−ΔSMmax) and refrigerant capacity (RC) for Al27Cu18Er55 amorphous ribbon reach 21.4 J/kg K and 599 J/kg, respectively. The outstanding glass forming ability as well as the excellent magneto-caloric properties indicate that Al27Cu18Er55 amorphous could be a good candidate for low temperature magnetic refrigeration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Epitaxial strain imposed in complex oxide ultrathin films is recognized as a powerful tool for controlling the ground state of correlated electron system. Here, we achieved simultaneous control of oxygen vacancies, orbital occupancy and magnetic ordering through the facile application of epitaxial strain, both tensile and compressive, in SrCoO3−δ oxygen “sponge” material rather than the ordinary manganites. The oxygen vacancies are enhanced greatly as the strain changes from smaller tensile 1.0% to larger tensile 2.0%, then to moderate compressive −1.0% in SrCoO3−δ films, associated with 3 − δ varying from ∼2.90 to ∼2.835, then to ∼2.72. Highest saturated magnetization is found in the thin films in small tension on La0.3Sr0.7Al0.65Ta0.35O3 substrate and lower values are found in larger tension on SrTiO3 and lowest values in moderate compression on LaAlO3. Meanwhile, electrons prefer to occupy the in-plan oriented orbitals for the tensile strain, in contrast to the preferential out-of-plane orbital occupancy for the compressive state associated with coupled intermediate spin-Co4+ (t2g4eg1)/high spin-Co3+ (t2g4eg2) in different proportions depending on strain states. Such controllable spin and orbital configurations lead to more robust magnetization in tensile strained SrCoO3−δ films than in its compressive counterpart. Our findings provide a nostrum for tailoring and controlling new magnetic, electronic and ionically active properties with strain engineering and further enrich orbital physics in cobaltites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Y3−xSrxZrxFe5O12 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 0.7) were synthesized by citrate precursor method at 1050 °C. The structural and magnetic properties of Y3−xSrxFe5−xZrxO12 were studied by using the X-ray diffraction technique, scanning electron microscopy, transmission electron microscopy, the Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer. XRD analysis using X'Pert package show a pure garnet phase with cubic structure (space group Ia-3d) and the impurity phase SrZrO3 is observed when the range of x value is exceeded from 0.6. Rietveld refinement using Fullprof program shows the lattice volume expansion with increasing the degree of Sr/Zr substitution. The crystallite sizes remain constant in the range of x = 0.0 − 0.5 and then increase. The different morphology observed in SEM micrographs of the samples can be related to different values of the microstrain in the samples. The hysteresis loops of the samples reveal a superparamagnetic behaviour. Also, the drop in coercivity with increasing of the substitution is mainly originated from a reduction in the magneto-elastic anisotropy energy. The values of the saturation magnetization (MS) indicate a non-monotonically variant with increasing the Sr/Zr substitution and reach a maximum 26.14 emu/g for the sample x = 0.1 and a minimum 17.64 emu/g for x = 0.0 and x = 0.2. The variation of MS, in these samples results from a superposition of three factors; reduction of Fe3+ in a-site, change in angle FeT-O-FeO, and magnetic core size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The presence of thick buffer layers in magnetic sensor devices decreases sensor sensitivity due to shunt currents. With this motivation, we produced IrMn-based spin-valve multilayers without using buffer layer. We also studied the effects of post-annealing and IrMn thickness on exchange bias field (HEB) and blocking temperature (TB) of the system. Magnetization measurements indicate that both HEB and TB values are significantly enhanced with post-annealing of IrMn layer. In addition, we report that IrMn thickness of the system strongly influences the magnetization and transport characteristics of the spin-valve structures. We found that the minimum thickness of IrMn layer is 6 nm in order to achieve the lowest shunt current and high blocking temperature (>300 K). We also investigated the training of exchange bias to check the long-term durability of IrMn-based spin-valve structures for device applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The features of the magnetoacoustic emission (MAE) signals during magnetization of structural steels with the different degree of hydrogenating were investigated by the wavelet transform. The dominant frequency ranges of MAE signals for the different magnetic field strength were determined using Discrete Wavelet Transform (DWT), and the energy and spectral parameters of MAE signals were determined using Continuous Wavelet Transform (CWT). The characteristic differences of the local maximums of signals according to energy, bandwidth, duration and frequency were found. The methodology of estimation of state of local degradation of materials by parameters of wavelet transform of MAE signals was proposed. This methodology was approbated for investigate of state of long-time exploitations structural steels of oil and gas pipelines.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on the synthesis, and structural – magnetic characterizations of Mn doped Bi2Se3 towards achieving a magnetically doped topological insulator. High quality single crystals of MnxBi2−xSe3 (x = 0, 0.03, 0.05, 0.1) are grown and analysed by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Low Energy Electron Diffraction (LEED), Scanning electron microscopy (SEM), and X-ray absorption near-edge structure spectroscopy (XANES). Magnetic properties of these samples under ZFC-FC protocol and isothermal magnetization confirm ferromagnetic correlation above x = 0.03 value. XANES measurements confirm that the dopant Mn is in Mn2+ state. This is further reconfirmed to be in high spin state by fitting magnetic data with Brillouin function for J = 5/2. Both Hall and Seebeck measurements indicate a sign change of charge carriers above x = 0.03 value of Mn doping. We propose Mn doped Bi2Se3 to be a potential candidate for electromagnetic and thermoelectric device applications involving topological surface states.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The formation of the localized magnetic moments is studied due to the presence of two-impurities in the two sublattices of a single-layer graphene sheet. The interaction between two similar magnetic impurities and also the hybridizations are decisive in determining the boundary between the magnetic and the non-magnetic states. A strong chemical potential dependence of the above phase boundary is evident. An anomalous scaling of the boundary separating the above regions is more pronounced in the two-impurity case when compared to that of the single impurity.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.High-temperature phase transition behavior and intrinsic brittleness of NaZn13-type τ1 phase in La–Fe–Si magnetocaloric materials are two key problems from the viewpoint of materials production and practical applications. In the present work, the Johnson-Mehl-Avrami-Kolmogorov (JMAK) equation was introduced to quantitatively characterize the formation kinetics of τ1 phase in sub-rapidly solidified LaFe11.6Si1.4 plates during the isothermal annealing process. Avrami index was estimated to be 0.43 (∼0.5), which suggests that the formation of τ1 phase is in a diffusion-controlled one-dimensional growth mode. Meanwhile, it is found that the Vickers hardness as a function of annealing time for sub-rapidly solidified plates also agrees well with the JMAK equation. The Vickers hardness of τ1 phase was estimated to be about 754. Under a magnetic field change of 30 kOe, the maximum magnetic entropy change was about 22.31 J/(kg·K) for plates annealed at 1323 K for 48 h, and the effective magnetic refrigeration capacity reached 191 J/kg.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, size controlled FeCo colloidal magnetic nanoalloys in the range of 11.5–37.2 nm were synthesized by surfactant assistant ball milling method. Magnetic separation technique was performed subsequent to synthesis process so as to obtain magnetic nanoalloy fluid with narrow size distribution. Particle distribution was determined by transmission electron microscope (TEM) while X-ray diffraction (XRD) measurements verified FeCo alloy formation as BCC structure. Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) method was used to investigate magnetic properties of nanoalloys. Maximum saturation magnetization and maximum coercivity were obtained as 172 Am2/kg for nanoparticles with the mean size of 37.2 nm and 19.4 mT for nanoparticles with the mean size of 13.3 nm, respectively. The heating ability of FeCo magnetic nanoalloys was determined through calorimetrical measurements for magnetic fluid hyperthermia (MFH) applications. Heat generation mechanisms were investigated by using linear response theory and Stoner-Wohlfarth (S-W) model. Specific absorption rate (SAR) values were obtained in the range of 2–15 W/g for magnetic field frequency of 171 kHz and magnetic field strength in between 6 and 14 mT.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by the growing interest in solving the obstacles of spintronics applications, we study the Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yosida (RKKY) effective pairwise interaction between magnetic impurities interacting through the π-electrons embedded in both electronically doped-semiconducting and metallic armchair graphene nanoribbons. In terms of the Green's function formalism, treated in a tight-binding approximation with hopping beyond Dirac cone approximation, the RKKY coupling is an attraction or a repulsion depending on the magnetic impurities distances. Our results show that the RKKY coupling in semiconducting nanoribbons is much more affected by doping than metallic ones. Furthermore, we found that the RKKY coupling increases with ribbon width, while there exist some critical electronic concentrations in RKKY interaction oscillations. On the other hand, we find an unusual incoming wave-vector direction for electrons which describes more clearly the ferro- and antiferromagnetic spin configurations in such system. Also, the RKKY coupling at low and high-temperature regions has been addressed for both ferro- and antiferromagnetic spin arrangements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the applied tensile stress during annealing on the structural anisotropy expressed by the shift in peak position is studied in situ using synchrotron XRD. The evolution of the diffraction spectra during in situ nanocrystallization for ribbons annealed with and without stress is also shown. There is a clear difference between the peaks in the parallel and perpendicular directions in the d-spacing between (2 0 0) planes for the stress-annealed sample while the difference is somewhat insignificant for the sample annealed without stress. The structural anisotropy for the sample annealed without stress decreases from 0.01° to 0.001° while the structural anisotropy first increased from 0.48° to 0.54° between 675 s and 828 s, decreased gradually to 0.5° after 2187 s, then decreased sharply to 0.43° as the sample is cooled to room temperature for the stress annealed sample. The (2 0 0) lattice spacing is elongated in the direction parallel to the applied stress for the stress-annealed sample. No observed elongation in the (2 0 0) lattice spacing for the sample annealed without stress. This shows that the origin of the stress-induced anisotropy is in agreement with the magnetoelastic theory.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we present the results of our study into current-induced spin-orbit torque (SOT) switching in perpendicularly magnetized CoGa/MnGa/Pt trilayers with different thicknesses of MnGa and Pt. The SOT switching was observed for all films that undergo Joule heating. We also investigate SOT switching in the bottom (CoGa)/MnGa/top(CoGa/Pt) films with different top layers. Although both the bottom and top layers contribute to the SOT, the relative magnitudes of the switching current densities JC in the top and bottom layers indicate that the SOT is dominant in the top layer. The JC as a function of thickness is discussed in terms of the magnetic properties and resistivity. Experimental data suggested that the MnGa thickness dependence of JC may originate from the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy thickness product Kuefft value. On the other hand, JC as a function of the Pt thickness shows weak dependence. This may be attributed to the slight change of spin-Hall angle θSH value with different thicknesses of Pt, when we assumed that the SOT switching is primarily due to the spin-Hall effect.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The evolution of frozen magnetic state of ZnδCo1−δFe2O4 (0 ≤ δ ≤ 1) ferrite nanoparticles was studied by applying vibrating sample magnetometer measurements in temperature range 5–350 K and magnetic fields up to 7 T. It was shown that gradual conversion from the inverse spinel (δ = 0) to the normal one (δ = 1.0) is correlated with a drop of freezing temperature Tf (corresponding to blocking of mean magnetic moment of the system) from 238 K (δ = 0) to 9 K (δ = 1.0) and with a decrease of magnetic anisotropy constant K1 from about 8 · 105 J/m3 to about 3 · 105 J/m3. The percolation threshold predicted for bulk ferrites at 1 − δ ≈ 0.33 was observed as a significant weakness of ferrimagnetic coupling. In this case magnetization curves, determined according to the zero field cooling protocol, reveal two distinct maxima indicating that the system splits into two assemblies with specific ions distribution between A and B sites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A fractional model is proposed to study the effect of heat transfer and magnetic field on the blood flowing inside oscillatory arteries. The flow is due to periodic pressure gradient and the fractional model equations include body acceleration. The proposed velocity and temperature distribution equations are solved using the Laplace and Hankel transforms. The effect of the fluid parameters such as the Reynolds number (Re), the magnetic parameter (M) and the radiation parameter (N) is studied graphically with changing the fractional-order parameter. It is found that the fractional derivative is a valuable tool to control both the temperature and velocity of blood when flow parameters change under treatment, for example. Besides, this work highlights the fact that in the presence of strong magnetic field, blood velocity and temperature reduce. A reversed effect is observed where the applied thermal radiation increase; the velocity and temperature of blood increase. However, the temperature remains high around the artery centerline, which is appropriate during treatment to avoid tissues damage.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate that polycrystalline Co2FeSi Heusler alloys films can be grown with perpendicular anisotropy without the use of an MgO interface. By heating the substrate to 400 °C prior to deposition and using a tungsten seed layer perpendicular anisotropy is induced in the Heusler layer. This is maintained as the thickness of the Co2FeSi is increased up to 12.5 nm. The layers with thickness dependent coercivity can be implemented into a giant magnetoresistance structure leading to spin-valve behaviour without the need for an exchange biased pinned layer.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Gold-coated gadolinium nanocrystals have been synthesized and their relaxivities, R1 and R2, found to be 19.7 and 21.7 s−1 mM−1 respectively at a 9.4 T applied field. R1 is more than 3 times higher than commercial Gd3+ chelate contrast agents on a per Gd atom basis and over 3000 times higher on a per nanocrystal (molecule) basis. Furthermore, the R2/R1 ratio, 1.1, is near ideal for a T1 contrast agent. Colloids of the PVP coated Gd@Au nanocrystals are stable in solution at physiological pH for more than a week. The Au shell protects the Gd from reaction over even in low pH solution. These results indicate that Gd@Au is an exceptionally promising candidate for development as an MRI T1 contrast agent for molecular imaging.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We undertake comprehensive simulations of 2d arrays (Lx×Ly) of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) with dipole-dipole interactions by solving LLG equations. Our primary interest is to understand the correspondence between equilibrium spin (ES) morphologies and tunnel magnetoresistance (TMR) as a function of Θ – the ratio of the dipolar to the anisotropy strength, sample size Lx, aspect ratio Ar=Ly/Lx and the direction of the applied field H→=HêH. The parameter Θ is varied by choosing three distinct particles: (i) α-Fe2O3 (Θ≃0), (ii) Co (Θ≃0.37) and (iii) Fe3O4 (Θ≃1.28). Our main observations are as follows: (a) For weakly interacting spins (Θ≃0), the morphology has randomly oriented magnetic moments for all sample sizes and aspect ratios. The TMR exhibits a peak value of 50% at the coercive field Hc. It is robust with respect to Lx and Ar, and isotropic with respect to êH. (b) For strong interactions (Θ>1), the moments order in the plane of the sample. The ES morphology comprises of magnetically aligned regions interspersed with flux closure loops. For fields along x or y, the maximum TMR amplitude decrease to ∼30%. For êH=ẑ it drops to ∼3%. The TMR is robust with respect to Lx and Ar and isotropic in the x and y directions only. (c) In strongly interacting samples (Θ>1) with Lx comparable to the size of a flux closure loop, increasing Ar creates ferromagnetic chains in the sample oriented along y or -y. Consequently, for êH=ŷ the TMR magnitude for Ar=1 is ∼33% while that for Ar=32 drops to ∼16%. For êH=x̂ on the other hand, it is ∼30% and independent of Ar. The TMR of long ribbons of MNPs has a strong dependence on Ar and is anisotropic in all three directions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The aim of the following paper was to study the structure and magnetocaloric effect of the La1−xDyxFe11.0Co0.7Si1.3 alloys (where x = 0, 0.1, 0.2). The X-ray diffraction showed a coexistence of two phases: the dominant La(Fe,Si)13 and minor α-Fe. The Rietveld analysis revealed a gradual decrease in the lattice constant of the La(Fe,Si)13 structure with increase in Dy addition. Moreover, the Curie temperature reached 267, 265.5 and 269 K for x = 0, 0.1 and 0.2, respectively. The values of magnetic entropy change equaled 14.6, 11.2 and 9.2 J(kg K)−1 for the LaFe11.0Co0.7Si1.3, La0.9Dy0.1Fe11.0Co0.7Si1.3 and La0.8Dy0.2Fe11.0Co0.7Si1.3 alloys, respectively. The values of exponent n (according to ΔSM = C·(BMAX)n) calculated at the Curie temperature were 0.67 for base sample and 0.70 for specimens modified by Dy. The determined values correspond well with theoretical predictions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of La1−yTbyFe11.5Si1.5 compounds have been investigated. The substituted 5 percent of Tb has remarkably increased the maximum entropy change (−ΔSM) to a value of 25.2 J/kg·K. However, a further increase of Tb leads to a monotonous decrease in the entropy change, mainly due to phase separation. The Tb substitution also can lower the thermal and magnetic hysteresis loss of the system. Another feature of this replacement is that, with Tb content higher than 10 percent, the Curie temperature (TC) starts to increase and reaches 197 K when 30 percent of La is substituted. These results indicate that La1−yTbyFe11.5Si1.5 may be a promising candidate for magnetic refrigeration material in certain temperature range.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.As is well known, the armature current will be ahead of the back electromotive force (back-EMF) under load condition of the interior permanent magnet (PM) machine. This kind of advanced armature current will produce a demagnetizing field, which may make irreversible demagnetization appeared in PMs easily. To estimate the working points of PMs more accurately and take demagnetization under consideration in the early design stage of a machine, an improved equivalent magnetic network model is established in this paper. Each PM under each magnetic pole is segmented, and the networks in the rotor pole shoe are refined, which makes a more precise model of the flux path in the rotor pole shoe possible. The working point of each PM under each magnetic pole can be calculated accurately by the established improved equivalent magnetic network model. Meanwhile, the calculated results are compared with those calculated by FEM. And the effects of d-axis component and q-axis component of armature current, air–gap length and flux barrier size on working points of PMs are analyzed by the improved equivalent magnetic network model.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A iron-based soft magnetic composite (SMC) has been prepared by powder metallurgy method with the Fe@Fe3O4 powder of in situ surface oxidation. Effects of the in situ surface oxidized temperature and the annealing temperature on the magnetic properties of the SMC have been investigated from 400 °C to 650 °C. The powder morphology and the phase were tested by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and the X-ray diffraction (XRD). It shows that the surface of the iron particle contains a thin insulating layer of Fe3O4 which dramatically decreases the core loss and holds the high permeability about 100 and Bs. The mechanical properties of the bulk samples were carried out using a nanoindentation. Higher annealing temperature destroys the Fe3O4 insulating layer, resulting in the decrease of the electrical resistivity from 78.3 to 4.61 mΩ·cm as well as the magnetic permeability and its frequency stability. The coated powder can be obtained by surface oxidation at 250 °C. The SMC annealed at the temperature of 450 °C exhibits excellent magnetic and mechanical properties which is suitable for the electric-magnetic switching device, such as inductance coils, transformer cores, synchronous electric motors and resonant inductors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Development of fast and energy-efficient spintronic devices requires novel nanoscaled materials with controllable magnetic properties. Here we show that the introduction of an ultrathin W interlayer between Co and Ru in Ru/Co/Ru films enables to preserve perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) and dramatically reduce the coercive force and size of magnetic domains. We find that the Ru/Co/W/Ru films with up to 0.35 nm of the nominal thickness of W have robust PMA. The observed formation of a dendritic domain structure with small domains having homochiral Néel domain walls is an indicator of the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction appearing in trilayers with asymmetrical interfaces. The inversion-symmetry-broken Ru/Co/W/Ru films are a potential host for nucleation and manipulation of non-trivial spin textures like chiral domain walls and skyrmions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In order to analyze the performance of magnetic device which operate at high temperature and high pressure, such as submersible motor, oil well transformer, the electrical resistivity of non-oriented silicon steel sheets is necessary for precise analysis. But the reports of the examination of the measuring method suitable for high temperature up to 180 °C and high pressure up to 140 MPa are few. In this paper, a measurement system based on four-probe method and Archimedes spiral shape measurement specimens is proposed. The measurement system is suitable for measuring the electrical resistivity of unconventional specimens under high temperature and high pressure and can simultaneously consider the influence of the magnetic field on the electrical resistivity. It can be seen that the electrical resistivity of the non-oriented silicon steel sheets will fluctuate instantaneously when the magnetic field perpendicular to the conductive path of the specimens is loaded or removed. The amplitude and direction of the fluctuation are not constant. Without considering the effects of fluctuations, the electrical resistivity of the non-oriented silicon steel sheets is the same when the magnetic field is loaded or removed. And the influence of temperature on the electrical resistivity of the non-oriented silicon steel sheet is still the greatest even though the temperature and the pressure are coupled together. The measurement results also show that the electrical resistivity varies linearly with temperature, so the temperature coefficient of resistivity is given in the paper.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated electronic structures and magnetic properties of double perovskite Iridate Ba2YIrO6 with 5d4 configuration, employing the exact diagonalization method for multi-site clusters. We have considered a many-body Hamiltonian for all d states (eg and t2g) including all relevant physical parameters such as the Coulomb correlation, spin-orbit coupling, crystal-field effect, and Hund coupling. We have found that the ground state of Ba2YIrO6 is nonmagnetic and that the Hund coupling plays an important role in the magnetic properties of the 5d4 systems, unlike the well-studied 5d5 systems.© 2018Hydrogen decrepitation process has been applied for the first time for the direct recycling of SmCo5 magnets. Industrially produced sintered SmCo5 magnets were decrepitated by hydrogen gas at a pressure of 1 bar to 9.5 bar at room temperature in a planetary rotating jar. After decrepitation, the starting sintered magnets were reduced to a powder with a particle size of less than 200 µm. The produced powder was used for the preparation of recycled SmCo5 magnets. Scanning electron microscopy, energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy, X-ray diffraction studies and magnetic measurements were used to follow the decrepitation and the sintering processes. The measured remanence and maximum energy product of the recycled magnet are 0.94 T and 171.1 kJ/m3, respectively, in comparison with 0.91 T and 156.8 kJ/m3, respectively for the original magnet before recycling. It was also observed that, there is refinement in the microstructure after recycling in comparison to the original magnet.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study the effect of the uniform Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (symmetric exchange anisotropy) and arbitrary oriented external magnetic fields on spin conductivity in the spin-1/2 one-dimensional Heisenberg antiferromagnet. The spin conductivity is calculated employing abelian bosonization and the Kubo formalism of transport. We investigate the influence of three competing phases at zero-temperature, (Néel phase, dimerized phase and gapless Luttinger liquid phase) on the AC spin conductivity.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ni42−xCoxCu8Mn37Ga13 (0 ≤ x ≤ 14) alloys are reported to exhibit a magnetostructural transition from weakly-magnetic martensite to ferromagnetic austenite over a rather wide temperature window ranging from 200 K to 380 K. Simultaneously a large magnetization change Δσ of up to 105 Am2 kg−1 is obtained at the martensitic transformation. A reversible magnetic-field-induced martensitic transformation is realized, resulting in a large magnetocaloric effect related to the high magnetic entropy change with a broad working temperature span. This work shows how it is possible to effectively tailor the magnetostructural transition in Ni-Mn-Ga alloys so as to achieve a reversible magnetic-field-induced martensitic transformation and associated functionalities.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Fe-6.5 wt% Si steel hot bands with different initial grain size and texture were obtained through different annealing treatment. These bands were then warm rolled and annealed. An analysis on the evolution of microstructure and texture, particularly the formation of recrystallization texture was studied. The results indicated that initial grain size and texture had a significant effect on texture evolution and magnetic properties. Large initial grains led to coarse deformed grains with dense and long shear bands after warm rolling. Such long shear bands resulted in growth advantage for {1 1 3} 〈3 6 1〉 oriented grains during recrystallization. On the other hand, sharp {11 h} 〈1, 2, 1/h〉 (α∗-fiber) texture in the coarse-grained sample led to dominant {1 1 2} 〈1 1 0〉 texture after warm rolling. Such {1 1 2} 〈1 1 0〉 deformed grains provided massive nucleation sites for {1 1 3} 〈3 6 1〉 oriented grains during subsequent recrystallization. These {1 1 3} 〈3 6 1〉 grains were confirmed to exhibit an advantage on grain growth compared to γ-fiber grains. As a result, significant {1 1 3} 〈3 6 1〉 texture was developed and unfavorable γ-fiber texture was inhibited in the final annealed sheet. Both these aspects led to superior magnetic properties in the sample with largest initial grain size. The magnetic induction B8 was 1.36 T and the high frequency core loss P10/400 was 17.07 W/kg.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Electron-spin resonance of high-density polyethylene treated by Ar plasma at 300 K was performed in X-band at temperatures from 2.1 K to 290 K. The observed spectra suggest presence of allyl radicals, whereas the central peak may be attributed to polyenyl radicals or dangled bonds. Pronounced narrowing of the resonance line observed above glassy temperature of polyethylene may be ascribed to thermally activated motional effect with the activation energy Ea/kB=160 K. The absence of strong exchange interactions is suggested by negligible exchange narrowing found at 2.1 K. The suggestion is supported by the analysis of the temperature dependence of the intensity at low temperatures, which is explicable assuming the coexistence of non-interacting radicals and S = 1/2 dimers with a distribution of antiferromagnetic couplings varying from 2 K to nominally 25 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Spin momentum densities of ferromagnetic ZrFe2 and Zr0.8Sc0.2Fe2 have been measured using magnetic Compton scattering with 182.65 keV circularly polarized synchrotron radiations. Site specific spin moments, which are responsible for the formation of total spin moment, have been deduced from Compton line shapes. At room temperature, the computed spin moment of ZrFe2 is found to be slightly higher than that of Sc doped ZrFe2 which is in consensus with the magnetization data. To compare the experimental data, we have also computed magnetic Compton profiles (MCPs), total and partial spin projected density of states (DOS) and the site specific spin moments using spin-polarized relativistic Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker method. It is observed that the spin moment at Fe site is aligned antiparallel to that of Zr site in both ZrFe2 and Zr0.8Sc0.2Fe2. The MCP results when compared with vibrating sample magnetometer based magnetization data, show a very small contribution of orbital moment in the formation of total magnetic moments in both the compounds. The DOS of ferromagnetic ground state of ZrFe2 and Zr0.8Sc0.2Fe2 are interpreted on the basis of a covalent magnetic model beyond the Stoner rigid band model. It appears that on alloying between a magnetic and a non-magnetic partner (with low valence), a polarization develops on the non-magnetic atom which is anti-parallel to that of the magnetic atom.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents an X-band transmit/receive switch using multi-gate NMOS transistors in a silicon-on-insulator CMOS process. For low loss and high power handling capability, floating body multi-gate NMOS transistors are adopted instead of conventional stacked NMOS transistors, resulting in 53% reduction of transistor area. Comparing to the stacked NMOS transistors, the multi gate transistor shares the source and drain region between stacked transistors, resulting in reduced chip area and parasitics. The impedance between bodies of gates in multi-gate NMOS transistors is assumed to be very large during design and confirmed after measurement. The measured input 1 dB compression point is 34 dBm. The measured insertion losses of TX and RX modes are respectively 1.7 dB and 2.0 dB at 11 GHz, and the measured isolations of TX and RX modes are >27 dB and >20 dB in X-band, respectively. The chip size is 0.086 mm2 without pads, which is 25% smaller than the T/R switch with stacked transistors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structure and magnetism of individual Dy atom adsorbed on the (1 1 1) surface of Ir is investigated using the combination of the density functional theory with the Hubbard-I approximation to the Anderson impurity model (DFT + HIA). The Dy3+ adatom is found magnetic with the magnetic moment of 9.35μB in the external magnetic field. The spin and orbital magnetic moments, and their ratio are evaluated, and compared with the X-ray magnetic circular dichroism data. The positive magnetic anisotropy energy of ≈1.3 meV determines the out-of-plane orientation of the Dy adatom magnetic moment. The role of 5d-4f interorbital exchange polarization in modification of the 4f shell energy spectrum is emphasized. We predict the Dy magnetization to drop by the factor of three with switching off the external magnetic field.© 2018Using the single-ion approximation, the weak ferromagnetic moment σZ(Fe2+) along the third-order axis of FeBO3 crystals, which is caused by the contribution of Fe2+ ions, has been investigated in the framework of the model Fe2+ impurity ion –BO3 vacancy. The extreme low-temperature behavior of the total magnetic moment due to the strong dependence of the Fe2+ion contribution is predicted.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A stability analysis is conducted for the non-isothermal Taylor-Couette flow of a non-conductive ferrofluid under the action of an azimuthal magnetic field. The transition from steady flow to Taylor vortex flow is investigated in terms of the critical Taylor number and with respect to the changes in the magnetic field strength, radial temperature gradient, gap ratio, ferroparticle concentration and size. For the linear stability analysis, infinitesimal perturbations to the velocity, temperature and magnetization fields are considered and the resulting linear system of stability equations is solved using Chebyshev collocation method. Also, the original nonlinear system of equations is solved numerically using a finite element analysis software, and the results are compared with the linear stability analysis results. A significant stabilization is observed under strong magnetic fields for all cases. It is also observed that radial temperature difference has a destabilizing effect on the flow and this effect is amplified when the magnetic field strength is increased. Higher ferroparticle volume fraction and size lead to a strong degree of magnetization of the fluid and amplifies the stabilizing effect of magnetic fields. The stabilization under azimuthal magnetic forces is observed to be smaller for the narrow gap case compared to the wide gap case.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work the magnetic oscillations (MO) in pristine silicene at T=0K are studied. Considering a constant electron density we obtain analytical expressions for the ground state internal energy and magnetization, under a perpendicular electric and magnetic field, taking in consideration the Zeeman effect. It is found that the MO are sawtooth-like, depending on the change in the last occupied energy level. This leads us to a classification of the MO peaks in terms of the Landau level (LL), valley or spin changes. Using this classification we analyze the MO for different values of the electric field Ez. When Ez=0, the energy levels have a valley degeneracy and the MO peaks occur only whenever the last energy level changes its LL and/or spin. When Ez≠0, the valley degeneracy is broken and new MO peaks appear, associated with the valley change in the last energy level. By analyzing the MO peaks amplitude it is possible to extract information about the Fermi velocity and the spin-orbit interaction strength. Finally we analyze the MO frequencies, which can also be associated with the change of LL, valley or spin in the last energy level.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.CoFe2-xHoxO4 (x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, 0.20) ferrites were prepared by the suitably modified Sol-Gel technique. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis revealed that the substituted samples show phase pure formation till 10% substitution, which is far higher phase pure than the earlier reports. Upon further substitution an inevitable secondary phase of HoFeO3 along with the spinel phase despite regulating synthesis parameters in the sol-gel reaction route. These results are further corroborated more convincingly by room temperature neutron diffraction. Morphological features of the ferrites were studied by Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM). The magnetic parameters viz. the saturation magnetization (Ms), coercivity (Hc) and remanence (Mr) were determined from room temperature isothermal magnetization. These parameters were found to decrease with increase in Ho substitution. The decrease in magnetization is analyzed in the light of exchange interactions between rare earth and transition metal ions. Magnetostriction measurements revealed interesting results and the presence of a secondary phase was found to be responsible for decreased measu-red magnetostriction values. The solubility limit of Ho in CoFe2O4 lattice is also reflected from the X-ray and neutron diffraction analysis and magnetostriction studies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic dead layers (MDLs) are always undesirable in practical applications due to their highly frustrated spin configurations and severe degradation of host magnetism. Here we provide new insights in MDLs and unravel their attractive prospect for ferrimagnetic hybrid of Fe3O4 and γ-Fe2O3 (denoted as Fe3O4@γ-Fe2O3 in the main text) to exhibit macroscopic quantum tunneling (MQT) phenomena in measureable kelvin range. The 3 nm-sized negatively-charged Fe3O4@γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles were immersed in various metal chloride solutions containing Mn2+, Co2+, Ni2+, Fe3+, and Fe2+ cations to form cationic MDLs via electrostatic attraction. These man-made MDLs, if being of positive enough zeta potentials, greatly disordered the magnetic dipole interactions among Fe3O4@γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles and induce extra energy barrier to yield pronounced MQT effect in Fe3O4@γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles even though they were dispersed neither in water nor in oil. Their crossover temperatures dividing MQT and purely thermal relaxation were found to be one order of magnitude higher than reported values in other MQT systems, and more strikingly, they could be tailored by altering the soak period in our facile and scalable route.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoactive elastomers (MAE) made from composites of five thermoplastic elastomers (TPE) of different stiffness with carbonyl iron powder (CIP) as magnetic component were investigated. The composites were produced by melt blending of the magnetic particles with the TPEs in a twin-screw extruder. The resulting materials were characterized by ac permeability testing, stress–strain measurements with and without external magnetic field and magnetically controlled bending of long cylindrical rods in a homogenous magnetic field. The magnetic field necessary for deflection of the rods decreases with decreasing modulus and increasing iron particle content. This effect can be used e.g. for magnetically controlled actuation. Some highly filled MAE show a magnetic field induced increase of Young's modulus. Filaments could be spun from some of the composites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We consider the diamond chain with S = 1/2 XYZ vertical dimers which interact with the intermediate sites via the interaction of the Ising type. We also suppose all four spins form the diamond-shaped plaquette to have different g-factors. The non-uniform g-factors within the quantum spin dimer as well as the XY-anisotropy of the exchange interaction lead to the non-conserving magnetization for the chain. We analyze the effects of non-conserving magnetization as well as the effects of the appearance of negative g-factors among the spins from the unit cell. A number of unusual frustrated states for ferromagnetic couplings and g-factors with non-uniform signs are found out. These frustrated states generalize the “half-fire-half-ice” state introduced in reference Yin et al. (2015). The corresponding zero-temperature ground state phase diagrams are presented.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis work presents the performance and transport characteristics of vertically stacked p-type MOSFET SOI nanowires (NWs) with inner spacers and epitaxial growth of SiGe raised source/drain. The conventional procedure to extract the effective oxide thickness (EOT) and Shift and Ratio Method (S&R) have been adapted and validated through tridimensional numerical simulations. Electrical characterization is performed for NWs with [1 1 0]- and [1 0 0]-oriented channels, as a function of both fin width (WFIN) and channel length (L). Results show a good electrostatic control and reduced short channel effects (SCE) down to 15 nm gate length, for both orientations. Effective mobility is found around two times higher for [1 1 0]- in comparison to [1 0 0]-oriented NWs due to higher holes mobility contribution in (1 1 0) plan. Improvements obtained on ION/IOFF by reducing WFIN are mainly due to subthreshold slope decrease, once small and none mobility increase is obtained for [1 1 0]- and [1 0 0]-oriented NWs, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier LtdOperation mode dependent series resistance (Rsd) behavior of junctionless transistors (JLTs) has been discussed in detail. Rsd was increased for decreasing gate bias in bulk conduction regime, while a constant value of Rsd was found in accumulation operation mode. Those results were compared to conventional inversion-mode (IM) transistors, verified by 2D numerical simulation and temperature dependence of extracted Rsd. This work provides key information for a better understanding of JLT operation affected by Rsd effects with different state of conduction channel.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The antiferromagnetic systems on the face-centered-cubic lattices are studied in detail by the Heisenberg J1-J2 model by the Green's function method. The studied configurations contain the well-known three ones, called type-I, II and III, respectively, and an intermediate one suggested from experiment of MnSe2. Our results show that the intermediate configuration cannot be described by the present model. For the well-known three configurations, at the parameter boundaries J2/J1 = 0 and 0.5, nonzero Néel temperatures can be calculated. At the boundary J2/J1 = 0, both the type-I and type-III can exist, and the former is more stable than the latter at T = 0+ K. At the boundary J2/J1 = 0.5, only the type-II is stable at T = 0+K, but above some very low temperature, the type-III will be more stable. When the J2 value is less and very close to 0.5, there may be other magnetically disordered configurations at T = 0+K. We find that under appropriate J2/J1 ratios, the sublattice magnetizations versus temperature of the type-I and II can be almost identical, which explains the neutron scattering experiment in NiS2 that showed the coexistence of the two states.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Z-type hexagonal ferrite ultrafine powders with chemical formulations of (BaxSr1-x)3Co2Fe24O41 (x varied from 0.0 to 1.0) have been synthesized by a sol-gel auto-combustion technique. The average particle sizes of the synthesized powders ranged from 2 to 5 μm. The partial substitution of Ba2+ by Sr2+ led to the shrinkage of the crystal lattices and resulted in changes in the magnetic sub-lattices, which tailored the static and dynamic magnetic properties of the as-synthesized powders. As the substitution ratio of Ba2+ by Sr2+, the saturation magnetization of the synthesized powders almost consistently increased from 43.3 to 56.1 emu/g, while the real part of permeability approached to a relatively high value about 2.2 owing to the balance of the saturation magnetization and magnetic anisotropy field.© 2018The present study investigates the influence of Cu2+ and La3+-Cu2+ doping on the magnetic properties of Sr1−xLaxFe12−xCuxO19 (x = 0.0–0.5) hexaferrite (SrM) compounds. The samples were prepared via facile autocombustion technique followed by sintering. X-ray powder diffraction patterns show the formation of the pure phase of M-type hexaferrite for all x. Invariance in lattice parameters was observed with only Cu2+ substitution while lattice contraction along c-axis was observed with co-doping La3+-Cu2+ in SrM. The magnetic property of these compounds is explained based on Cu2+ occupancy in the absence and presence of La3+ in SrM magnetoplumbite structure. The Cu2+ doped SrFe12−xCuxO19 sample showed a monotonic decrease in Ms value while La3+-Cu2+ showed a noticeable increase in Ms value with x. Furthermore, while coercivity of Cu2+ doped SrM reduced with x, the coercivity of La3+-Cu2+ doped SrM showed a marked 12% increase in coercivity at x = 0.1 (Hc = 4391 Oe) from that of x = 0.0 (3918 Oe). Interestingly, Cu2+ doped SrM displayed invariance in Tc ∼ 458.6 °C with x, while La3+-Cu2+ doping reduced Tc by 5% from its x = 0 (Tc = 451.9 °C) to 429.6 °C. The room temperature Mossbauer spectral analysis confirmed a Cu2+ preference for the 12k site and its occupancy is observed to be influenced by the presence of La3+ ion at the Sr2+ site.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present work a model for the correlation between magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy and Barkhausen noise is proposed. The link between the magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy and the magnetic Barkhausen noise is due to the influence of the crystallographic texture on the domain nucleation process which produces the Barkhausen signal in the branch from saturation to remanence. The statistical distributions of magnetic free poles and local fields of nucleation and subsequent growth of reversed domains were obtained for a large number of grain boundaries and used to estimate the number and size of Barkhausen events at each angular position from 0 to 360° in ten degree-steps. The good agreement observed between the modeled magnetocrystalline energy and the prediction of this energy made from X-ray texture and Barkhausen noise measurements corroborates the validity of the proposed model.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The observed magnetization switching by circularly polarized ultrafast laser pulses has been attributed to the inverse Faraday effect in which the induced non-equilibrium orbital momentum serves as an effective magnetic field via spin-orbit coupling for magnetization rotation and switching. We critically examine this scenario by explicitly calculating the magnitude of the induced orbital momentum for generic itinerant band. We show that the calculated induced angular momentum is not large enough for reversing the magnetization by one laser pulse with the order of 100 femtosecond duration. Instead, we propose that each laser pulse is capable to expand a reverse domain a few nano-meters and it takes multiple pulses to complete the magnetization reversal process via domain wall motion.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic structures and magnetic phase transitions in intermetallic layered La1-xTbxMn2Si2 compounds (the ThCr2Si2-type structure) are investigated using the first-principles method and XPS measurements. The experimentally observed transition from ferromagnetic (FM) to antiferromagnetic (AFM) ordering of Mn sublattice with increase of terbium concentration is successfully reproduced in calculations for collinear magnetic moments model. The FM→AFM change of interplane magnetic ordering at small x is irrelevant to the number of f-electrons of the rare-earth ion. In contrast it was shown to be related to the Mn-Mn in-plane distance. Calculated Tb critical concentration for this transition x≈0.14 corresponds to the Mn-Mn in-plane distance 0.289 nm, very close to the experimentally observed transition distance 0.287 nm. The crystal cell compression due to substitution increases an overlap between Mn dxz,yz and the rare-earth ion d orbitals. Resulting hybridized states manifest themselves as an additional peak in the density of states. We suggest that a corresponding interlayer Mn-R-Mn superexchange interaction stabilizes AFM magnetic ordering in these compounds with Tb doping level x>0.2. The results of DFT calculations are in agreement with X-ray photoemission spectra for La1-xTbxMn2Si2.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Low-temperature hydrogen-disproportionation-desorption-recombination (HDDR) treatment of Sm-Fe alloy powder was conducted to prepare a metastable TbCu7 type Sm-Fe alloy powder with a grain size of more than a few hundreds of nanometers. While a treatment temperature above 700 °C produced the familiar Th2Zn17 type alloy, one below 600 °C resulted in successful synthesis of the TbCu7 type Sm-Fe alloy with submicron-size grains. This TbCu7 type alloy powder, however, showed no significant improvement in magnetic properties compared to the Th2Zn17 type, as its composition was estimated to be near SmFe8.5 and thus did not achieve the expected Fe-rich composition. Therefore, cross-sectional transmission electron microscope observation of the unfinished TbCu7 type alloy powder was conducted in order to explore means of forming the Fe-rich phase.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Co2+ doped Mg–Zn spinel chromite compositions Mg0.5Zn0.5-xCoxCr2O4 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) have been synthesized by the high-temperature solid state method. Synchrotron and X-ray diffraction (XRD) studies show single-phase crystalline nature. The structural analysis is validated by Rietveld refinement confirms the cubic structure with space group Fd3m. Crystallite size is estimated from Synchrotron XRD which was found to be 30–34 nm. Energy dispersive analysis confirms stoichiometric Mg0.5Zn0.5-xCoxCr2O4 composition. Average crystallite size distribution is estimated from imaging software (Image – J) of SEM is in the range of 100–250 nm. Raman spectroscopy reveals four active phonon modes, and a pronounced red shift is due to enhanced Co2+ concentration. Increased Co2+ concentration in Mg–Zn chromites shows a prominent narrowing of band gap from 3.46 to 2.97 eV. The dielectric response is attributed to the interfacial polarization, and the electrical modulus study supports non-Debye type of dielectric relaxation. Ohmic junctions (minimum potential drop) at electrode interface are active at lower levels of doping (x < 0.2) give rise to a low-frequency semicircle as evidenced from the complex impedance analysis. The low dielectric loss and high ac conductivity of Co2+ doped Mg–Zn spinel chromites are suitable for power transformer applications at high frequencies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The microstructures, magnetic and electronic performance of NiZnCu ferrites have been investigated at temperature from 850 °C to 1000 °C. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns showed that only single phase with spinel structure existed. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) results showed that grain size increased with enhancement of sintering temperature and the most homogeneous, compact microstructure was obtained at 950 °C. Magnetic properties measurements revealed that both complex permeability and saturation magnetization increased with increasing of sintering temperature. The initial permeability was approximately linear within the scope of 850–1000 °C as well as the resonance frequency decreased from 70 MHz to 30 MHz. Power loss density tests demonstrated that the core sintered at 950 °C instead of the one sintered at 1000 °C had the lower power loss density at both 5 mT and 10 mT and the higher inductance under a certain exciting direct current at 1 MHz. Also the inductance of the sample sintered at the higher temperature dropped faster than that at the lower temperature. The results showed that the core sintered at 950 °C had better electrical performance and was suitable for wide usage.© 2018Metamagnetism, or metamagnetic transition (MT), is the sudden jump in magnetization of a material as it changes its magnetic phase in an external magnetic field. A careful manipulation of its magnetic phase facilitates better harnessing of its properties in many applications. Using first-principles collinear fixed-spin-moment calculations, we give the first report on metamagnetism in itinerant magnetic FeGe films, and predict that it mainly originates from its film surface. In contrast, bulk FeGe is not metamagnetic. Binding surface and field contour plots show that the magnetic polarization energy, magnetization, and critical fields of bulk FeGe and FeGe film remain fairly constant at small deviations to its lattice sizes, suggesting that the magnetic phases of FeGe are robust against small amounts of strain. Moreover, FeGe film becomes more bulk-like magnetically beyond approximately 11.0 μB.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Four types of Ni-Zn based ferrites materials having the general formula Ni0.5Zn0.5NdxFe2−xO4 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 0.12) have been successfully synthesized by calcining oxalates in air and the influence of Nd content on the structure and magnetic properties of Ni0.5Zn0.5NdxFe2−xO4 is studied. X-ray diffraction examination confirms that a high-crystallized Ni0.5Zn0.5NdxFe2−xO4 with cubic spinel structure is obtained when the precursor is calcined at 1000 °C in air for 2 h. The substitutions of Nd3+ ions for partial Fe3+ ions do not change the spinel crystalline structure of MFe2O4. The incorporation of Nd3+ ions in place of Fe3+ ions in Ni-Zn ferrites increases the average crystallite size. Specific saturation magnetization decreases with increase in Nd content. This is because Nd3+ ions with smaller magnetic moment preferentially fill the octahedral sites. In addition, antiferromagnetic FeNdO3 increases with increase in Nd content. In this study, Ni0.5Zn0.5Nd0.08Fe1.92O4, calcined at 1000 °C, exhibits the highest magnetic moment (4.2954 μB) and the lowest coercivity (28.82 Oe).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Planar anisotropy carbonyl iron (PACI) particles were prepared from commercial spherical carbonyl iron particles through a high performance ball-milling technique. The paraffin composites with orientation of shape anisotropy field for these PACI particles were obtained by applying an external magnetic field during the fabrication process. The frequency-dependent complex permeability values of these prepared paraffin composites have been investigated in the frequency range of 1–18 GHz. The results demonstrate that the orientation of shape anisotropy field for these PACI particles can effectively increase the complex permeability and decrease the complex permittivity values. Benefit from the enhancement in the complex permeability and reduction in the complex permittivity, the better impedance matching condition can be obtained and thus the good microwave absorption performance can be achieved for the samples with enough magnetic field orientation time.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the structural, electrical and magnetic properties of Cr substituted Mn48+xCr3-xNi38Sn11 (x = 0 and 1) Heusler ribbons synthesised by melt spinning of the arc-melted bulk alloy. Composition analysis employing EDAX reveals same Ni and Sn concentrations with difference in the Mn/Cr ratio in both the ribbons. Mn48Cr3Ni38Sn11 ribbons have pure cubic-austenite phase whereas Mn49Cr2Ni38Sn11 show a mixture of the dominant cubic-austenite with traces of the orthorhombic-martensitic phase as confirmed by X-ray analysis. Ribbons having higher Cr content show (i) pure cubic austenite structure (L21 type) at room temperature (ii) canonical paramagnetic-ferromagnetic transition in the austenite phase and (iii) metallic temperature dependence of resistivity. Small decrease in the Cr content produces dramatic changes in the structure-property profile. Hence ribbons having lower Cr content show (i) a mixture of cubic and orthorhombic phases, (ii) paramagnetic-ferromagnetic transition in the austenite phase above the room temperature which is followed by strongly hysteretic martensitic transition and (iii) metal-like temperature dependence of resistivity followed by typical martensitic resistivity and re-entrant metallic behaviour in the lowest temperature region. AC susceptibility measurements show absence of a spin glass like behaviour in Mn48Cr3Ni38Sn11 while the lower Cr variant demonstrates nearly ideal spin glass like characteristics. The high sensitivity of structure-property correlation towards small compositional variations is attributed to the twin effect of Cr substitution at Mn sites and the Mn/Ni ratio.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recent research has shown unconventional magnetic properties in nanosized gold systems. These effects have mostly been detected in functionalized gold nanoparticles as well as in gold nanocrystalline films. We demonstrate ferro- and superparamagnetic behaviour in assemblies of bare gold nanoclusters. This is demonstrated by the characteristic ferromagnetic hysteresis with the temperature dependent saturation magnetization, remanence and coercivity in aggregates of small clusters. The detected magnetization is caused by the interaction between the separate clusters exhibiting an core-shell structure, and dependent on the total amount of gold confined in the samples. The behaviour is analogous to that of transition metal clusters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The family of BaMF4 with M of magnetic 3d transition metal ions is the typical multiferroic material. Pure phase solid solution of BaCoF4 and BaNiF4 with molar ratio of 1:1 (BaCo0.5Ni0.5F4) is prepared by solid state reaction, which has been confirmed by X ray diffraction patterns. Field dependent magnetization measurements only show the linear curve with temperature down to 5 K, indicating the antiferromagnetic nature. Compared with BaCoF4 and BaNiF4, no significant enhancement of magnetization is observed, indicating the absence of ferrimagnetism and the random distribution of Co and Ni ions. The low temperature magnetic anomalies are studied by zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) temperature dependent magnetization (M-T) measurements. A bifurcation between FC and ZFC M-T curves happens at 118 K, indicating the onset of 2-dimensional antiferromagnetism. The magnetization maximum at 87 K is attributed to the 2-dimensional antiferromagnetic clusters, followed by the drastic decrease of magnetization, which is due to the onset of 3-dimensional antiferromagnetism. A dip is observed in FC M-T curve at 40 K, which is attributed to the 3-dimensional antiferromagnetic clusters. A drastic increase of magnetization is observed at 9 K, which is due to the uncompensated isolated spins. Exchange bias is clearly observed, with blocking temperature of 90 K. The contribution from surface spin glass has been excluded by the AC magnetization measurements, and the mechanism has been explained by the exchange coupling between the two antiferromagnetic phases.© 2018Molecular bridges covalently bonded to two ferromagnetic electrodes can transform ferromagnetic materials and produce intriguing spin transport characteristics. This paper discusses the impact of molecule induced strong coupling on the spin transport. To study molecular coupling effect the octametallic molecular cluster (OMC) was bridged between two ferromagnetic electrodes of a magnetic tunnel junction (Ta/Co/NiFe/AlOx/NiFe/Ta) along the exposed side edges. OMCs induced strong inter-ferromagnetic electrode coupling to yield drastic changes in transport properties of the magnetic tunnel junction testbed at the room temperature. These OMCs also transformed the magnetic properties of magnetic tunnel junctions. SQUID and ferromagnetic resonance studies provided insightful data to explain transport studies on the magnetic tunnel junction based molecular spintronics devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.To uncover the underlying mechanism of Mg effect on the improved anomalous Hall effect (AHE) of perpendicular [Pt/Co]3/Mg/HfO2 multilayers, the X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis has been carried out. It is found that Mg interlayer at the Co/HfO2 interface could prevent the Co oxidation to some extent via interfacial chemical reaction. As a result, A large anomalous Hall resistivity (ρAH) is obtained in perpendicular [Pt/Co]3/Mg/HfO2 multilayers, with a maximum ρAH of 3.02 μΩ cm, which is 59% larger than that in Co/Pt multilayers without Mg insertion. This effective modification of the AHE based on interfacial chemical reaction provides a promising pathway for spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report an interesting observation of unusual trajectories of vortex core oscillations in a spin valve pillar. Micromagnetic simulation in the composite free layer spin valve nano-pillar shows magnetic vortex excitation under critical current density. When current density is slightly increased and wave vector is properly tuned, for the first time we observe a star like and square gyration. Surprisingly this star like and square gyration also leads to steady, coherent and sustained oscillations. Moreover, the frequency of gyration is also very high for this unusual trajectories. The power spectral analysis reveals that there is a marked increase in output power and frequency with less distortions. Our investigation explores the possibility of these unusual trajectories to exhibit spin torque oscillations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure of the CrO2 particles prepared by high temperature and high pressure (HTHP) method was studied by HRTEM. It is found that the CrO2 particles synthesized at 500 and 550 °C are covered by Cr2O3 surface layers of about 6 nm thick. However, the CrO2 particles synthesized at 400 and 450 °C do not have Cr2O3 surface layers. The saturation magnetization of the CrO2 particles synthesized at different temperatures is all very close to the theoretical value. The magnetoresistance (MR) of the CrO2 particles synthesized at 500 and 550 °C is much larger than that of the CrO2 particles synthesized at 400 and 450 °C, which should be due to the enhancement of tunneling magnetoresistance by insulating Cr2O3 surface layers. The tunneling MR of the CrO2 particles can be fitted well by expression of C1(M/Ms)2 + C2(M/Ms)4 + C3(M/Ms)6. The proportion of the higher-order terms of (M/Ms)2 in the expression is tightly related to the existence of the Cr2O3 surface layer.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic field effect on the reactive sintering process of MnBi was investigated. Magnetic-field-induced enhancement of the reaction was found to be exhibited at the initial stages. The coercivity field decreased with an increase in the in-field annealing time. The kinetics of the reaction were in good agreement with the diffusion-controlled reaction model. It is suggested that the decrease in activation energy at the initial stages of reaction increased the amount of formed MnBi phases, resulting in enhancement of the reaction Mn + Bi to MnBi phase by in-field reactive sintering.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Complex permeability and permittivity spectra of Ni-Zn Ferrite/Cu hybrid granular composite materials have been studied in the RF to microwave frequency range. The electrical conductivity σ shows insulating properties in the volume fraction of Cu particles below φ = 0.14. A large jump in conductivity was observed between φ = 0.14 and 0.24 indicating that the Cu particles make metallic conduction between this interval. Hence, the percolation threshold φC, was estimated to be 0.14. A percolation-induced low frequency plasmonic state with negative permittivity spectrum was observed from φ = 0.14–0.24. Meanwhile the negative permeability was observed at φ = 0.16, 0.19 and 0.24. Hence the DNG characteristic was realized in these Cu volume content in the frequency range from 105 MHz to 2 GHz.© 2018Perpendicular Magnetic Anisotropy (PMA) was realized in as-deposited Mo(10)/Co2FeAl0.5Si0.5(CFAS)(3)/MgO(0.5)/Mo multilayer stacks with large perpendicular magnetic anisotropy energy (Keff). PMA of this multilayer is found to be strongly dependent on the thickness of the individual CFAS (tCFAS), Mo (tMo) and MgO (tMgO) layers and annealing temperatures. The interactions at the Mo/CFAS/MgO interfaces are critical to induce PMA and are tuned by the interfacial oxidation. The major contribution to PMA is due to iron oxide at the CFAS/MgO interface. X-ray diffraction (XRD) and infrared spectroscopic (FT-IR) studies further ascertain this. However, an adequate oxidation of MgO and the formation of (0 2 4) and (0 1 8) planes of α-Fe2O3 at the optimal Mo buffer layer thickness is mainly inducing PMA in Mo/CFAS/MgO/Mo stack. Microstructural changes in the films are observed by atomic force microscopy (AFM). X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) demonstrates the oxidation of CFAS/MgO interface and the formation of Fe–O bonds confirming that the real origin of PMA in Mo/CFAS/MgO is due to hybridization of Fe (3dz2) and O (2pz) orbitals and the resulted spin-orbit interaction at their interface. The half-metallic nature CFAS with Mo layer exhibiting PMA can be a potential candidate as p-MTJs electrodes for the new generation spintronic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The ever growing applications and ever evolving challenges of magnetic nano particles has been motivating the researchers from various disciplines towards this area of magnetic nano particles. Cation substitutional effect on the magnetic structure of the nanoparticles forms a crucial aspect in their applications. Here the environmentally benign auto combustion method was employed to synthesize chromium substituted nickel cobalt ferrite (Ni0.75Co0.25Fe2-xCrxO4; x = 0, 0.10, 0.15) nano particles, from aqueous metal nitrate solutions. Chromium substitution has shown its effect on the structural, magnetic and electrical properties of Ni0.75Co0.25Fe2O4. Structural and phase analysis of the prepared samples show increased phase purity of ferrite sample with increasing Cr substitution. The TEM (Transmission Electron Microscope) image confirms the nano size of the particles, EDS (Energy dispersive X-ray Spectroscopy) has supported the stoichiometry of the prepared samples and FTIR (Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopic) analysis confirms the spinel structure and also suggests cation redistributions with chromium substitution. VSM (Vibrational Sample Magnetometer) is used to study the magnetic properties through magnetic hysteresis (M−H) loop and magnetic Hopkinson effect. All samples show hysteresis and show reduction in magnetic properties with increase in chromium content. The thermo magnetic study shows Hopkinson peak(s) in the magnetization vs. temperature (M−T) graph and also shows variation in the nature of Hopkinson peak with chromium substitution. Possible reasons for the changes in the nature of the peak are discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The ability to precisely and reliably control the dynamics of ferromagnetic (FM) vortices could lead to novel nonvolatile memory devices and logic gates. Intrinsic and fabricated defects in the FM material can pin vortices and complicate the dynamics. Here, we simulated switching a vortex between bistable pinning sites using magnetic field pulses. The dynamic motion was modeled with the Thiele equation for a massless, rigid vortex subject to room-temperature thermal noise. The dynamics were explored both when the system was at zero temperature and at room-temperature. The probability of switching for different pulses was calculated, and the major features are explained using the basins of attraction map of the two pinning sites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The artifacts in the magnetic structures reconstructed from Lorentz transmission electron microscopy (LTEM) images with TIE method have been analyzed in detail. The processing for the simulated images of Bloch and Neel spirals indicated that the improper parameters in TIE may overestimate the high frequency information and induce some false features in the retrieved images. The specimen tilting will further complicate the analysis of the images because the LTEM image contrast is not the result of the magnetization distribution within the specimen but the integral projection pattern of the magnetic induction filling the entire space including the specimen.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effects (MCE) in polycrystalline Ni45Co5Mn35In14Gd1 alloy were investigated. The magnetic-field-induced phase transformation from martensite to austenite phase is confirmed. Both inverse and an conventional magnetocaloric effects are attained at a magnetic field up to 5 T. Above room temperature (328 K), high inverse magnetic entropy change of 26.8 J/kg K under a 5 T magnetic field is observed around first order magnetostructural transition. The large magnetic entropy change in Ni-Co-Mn-In-Gd alloy is promising for magnetic refrigeration.© 2018Neutron and X-ray diffraction, magnetic susceptibility, and specific heat measurements have been used to investigate the magneto-structural phase transitions in 20% Cu substituted multiferroic CoCr2O4 spinel. The Jahn-Teller active Cu2+ ion in the tetrahedral A-site of the spinel configuration induces the Jahn-Teller distortion slightly above the Néel temperature. In this compound, we observe a Jahn-Teller distortion of the crystal structure at 90 K. It was further observed that the high temperature cubic (Fd3‾m) structure coexists with the low temperature orthorhombic (Fddd) structure till the lowest temperature of measurement.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A hybrid Landau Lifshitz Gilbert/kinetic Monte Carlo algorithm is used to simulate experimental magnetic hysteresis loops for dual layer exchange coupled composite media. The calculation of the rate coefficients and difficulties arising from low energy barriers, a fundamental problem of the kinetic Monte Carlo method, are discussed and the methodology used to treat them in the present work is described. The results from simulations are compared with experimental vibrating sample magnetometer measurements on dual layer CoPtCrB/CoPtCrSiO media and a quantitative relationship between the thickness of the exchange control layer separating the layers and the effective exchange constant between the layers is obtained. Estimates of the energy barriers separating magnetically reversed states of the individual grains in zero applied field as well as the saturation field at sweep rates relevant to the bit write speeds in magnetic recording are also presented. The significance of this comparison between simulations and experiment and the estimates of the material parameters obtained from it are discussed in relation to optimizing the performance of magnetic storage media.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we investigate the resistive switching behavior of a bipolar resistive random-access memory (RRAM) in a Ni/WOx/p+-Si RRAM with CMOS compatibility. Highly unifrom and reliable bipolar resistive switching characteristics are observed by a DC voltage sweeping and its switching mechanism can be explained by SCLC model. As a result, the possibility of metal-insulator-silicon (MIS) structural WOx-based RRAM's application to Si-based 1D (diode)–1R (RRAM) or 1T (transistor)–1R (RRAM) structure is demonstrated.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe developed a hybrid organic-inorganic resistive random access memory (ReRAM) device that uses a solution-process to overcome the disadvantages of organic and inorganic materials for flexible memory applications. The drawbacks of organic and inorganic materials are a poor electrical characteristics and a lack of flexibility, respectively. We fabricated a hybrid organic-inorganic switching layer of ReRAM by blending HfOx or AlOx solution with PMMA solution and investigated the resistive switching behaviour in Ti/PMMA/Pt, Ti/PMMA-HfOx/Pt and Ti/PMMA-AlOx/Pt structures. It is found that PMMA-HfOx or PMMA-AlOx hybrid switching layer has a larger memory window, more stable durability and retention characteristics, and a better set/reset voltage distribution than PMMA layer. Further, it is confirmed that the flexibility of the PMMA-HfOx and PMMA-AlOx blended films was almost similar to that of the organic PMMA film. Thus, the solution-processed organic-inorganic blended films are considered a promising material for a non-volatile memory device on a flexible or wearable electronic system.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we developed a cost-effective ion-sensing field-effect transistor (FET) with an extended gate (EG) fabricated on a separative paper substrate. The pH sensing characteristics of the paper EG was compared with those of other EGs fabricated on silicon, glass, or polyimide substrates. The fabricated paper-based EGFET exhibited excellent sensitivity close to the Nernst response limit as well as to that of the other substrate-based EGFETs. In addition, we found that all EGFETs, regardless of the substrate, have similar non-ideal behavior, i.e., drift phenomenon and hysteresis width. To investigate the degradation and durability of the paper EG after prolonged use, aging-effect tests were carried out in terms of the hysteresis width and sensitivity over a course of 30 days. As a result, the paper EG maintained stable pH sensing characteristics after 30 days. Therefore, we expect that paper EGFETs can provide a cost-effective sensor platform.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis article reports negative shift in the threshold-voltage in AlGaN/GaN high electron mobility transistor (HEMT) with application of reverse gate bias stress. The device is biased in strong pinch-off and low drain to source voltage condition for a fixed time duration (reverse gate bias stress), followed by measurement of transfer characteristics. Negative threshold voltage shift after application of reverse gate bias stress indicates the presence of more carriers in channel as compared to the unstressed condition. We propose the presence of AlGaN/GaN interface states to be the reason of negative threshold voltage shift, and developed a process to electrically characterize AlGaN/GaN interface states. We verified the results with Technology Computer Aided Design (TCAD) ATLAS simulation and got a good match with experimental measurements.© 2017Enhancement-mode transistors with uniform turn-on threshold voltage (Vth) can be achieved using low damage and low rate gate recess etching techniques. In this work, dry etching conditions for a AlGaN/GaN heterostructure with an ultra-low etching rate of 1.5 nm/min were demonstrated and we succeeded the possibility to achieve a low etch rate of an AlGaN/GaN heterostructure in a Cl2/BCl3 plasma using inductively coupled plasma (ICP). The etching development was successfully implemented in the achievement of a normally-off GaN/AlGaN based transistor. The optimal recess depth was determined after fabrication of various devices with different recess depth values and with various dry etching conditions and after examining the performances of fabricated devices various conditions, and determining the dependence of recess time. The optimized etching condition resulted in low damage and smooth morphology of the etched AlGaN/GaN surfaces. Fine control of the depth of the gate region recess was achieved for the AlGaN/GaN heterostructure without any etch-stop layer, and validated for the fabrication of field effect transistors (FETs) using conventional processes. The fabricated normally-off Al2O3/AlGaN/GaN MOSFETs delivered a high positive Vth of +5.64 V with a low off-state leakage current of ∼10−7 A/mm and lower current collapse.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper investigates the effect of an oxygen (O2) plasma treatment on multi-layer tungsten diselenide (WSe2) field-effect transistor (FET) by forming tungsten trioxide (WO3) layers. Palladium (Pd), which is known to form an Ohmic contact with WSe2, is used for the source and drain (S/D) contact electrodes as a control group for metal variables. And then, Nickel (Ni), which is thought to form a Schottky contact with WSe2 experimentally, is used as an experimental group. For both cases of the control group and the experimental group, the electrical characteristics including drain current (ID), on/off ratio (ION/IOFF), subthreshold swing (SS) and field effect mobility (μeff) are analyzed according to the presence or absence of WO3. In case of adopting the WO3 contact layer between the WSe2 and the Ni for the S/D contact electrode, we observe a remarkable improvement in ID, ION/IOFF, μeff, and SS compared to the case without the WO3 contact layer. The analyzed electrical characteristics show that an efficient hole-injection contact was achieved for the multi-layer WSe2 FET by the O2 plasma treatment, which leads to the formation of an Ohmic-like contact at an electrode/WSe2 interface.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA novel inverted staggered metal-induced laterally crystallized (MILC) polycrystalline-silicon (poly-Si) thin-film transistors (TFTs) with a combination of a planarized gate and an overlap/off-set at the source-gate/drain-gate structure were fabricated and characterized. While the MILC process is advantageous for fabricating inverted staggered poly-Si TFTs, MILC TFTs reveal higher leakage current than TFTs crystallized by other processes due to their high trap density of Ni contamination. Due to this drawback, the planarized gate and overlap/off-set structure were applied to inverted staggered MILC TFTs. The proposed device shows drastic suppression of leakage current and pinning phenomenon by reducing the lateral electric field and the space-charge limited current from the gate to the drain.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the lifetime prediction models of amorphous InGaZnO thin film transistors (a-IGZO TFTs) were suggested for the application of display device and BEOL (Back End Of line) transistors with embedded a-IGZO TFTs. Four different types of test devices according to the active layer thickness, source/drain electrode materials and thermal treatments have been used to verify the suggested model. The device lifetimes under high gate bias stress and hot carrier stress were extracted through fittings of the stretched-exponential equation for threshold voltage shifts and the current estimation method for drain current degradations. Our suggested lifetime prediction models could be used in any kinds of structures of a-IGZO TFTs for the application of display device and BEOL transistors. The a-IGZO TFTs with embedded ITO local conducting layer under source/drain is better for BEOL transistor application and a-IGZO TFTs with InGaZnO thin film as source/drain electrodes may be better for the application of display devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using Zubarev's Nonequilibrium Statistical Operator Method (NSOM), we outline a microscopic approach to the problem of magnetic friction in Magnetic Force Microscopy where a magnetic nanotip scans a surface of a solid magnetic sample. For the Stokes regime (small tip velocity), we construct the statistical operator describing nonequilibrium states of the composite system (sample plus tip) and calculate the magnetic friction force acting on the tip. The magnetic friction coefficients are expressed in terms of time-dependent quantum correlation functions of fluctuating tip-sample forces. Some possible generalizations of the formalism to high tip velocities are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report on direct measurements of magnetocaloric effect in plastically deformed Gd-In solid solutions in the shape of foils with concentration of indium up to 3 at.%. When compared to the reference polycrystalline bulk samples, magnetocaloric effect in the cold-rolled foils of Gd100− xInx (x = 0, 1, 3) turned out to be systematically smaller. This was suggested to be due to a cold rolling-induced local magnetic anisotropy which can be diminished by an appropriate thermal treatment of the cold-rolled samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of hydrides of the intermetallic compound Nd2Fe14BHx are investigated in the temperature range covering the Curie temperatures (TC) of the compounds (up to 670 K). The temperature dependencies of magnetization are measured under continuous control of hydrogen content in the investigated samples. The dependencies of Curie and spin-reorientation transition (TSR) temperatures on the hydrogen concentration are studied in detail. The dependence of hydrogen concentration on pressure at a constant temperature (near TC) and on the temperature at various pressures are obtained. We attempted to estimate the contributions of the unit cell volume increase upon hydrogenation and the electronic structure change in the variation of TC of the hydrogenated Nd2Fe14B.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Thin films based on layers of Fe52Co28B20 (at%), Fe65Co35 (at%), and Ni80Fe20 (at%) were deposited by sputtering on 8″ bare Si and Si/200 nm-thermal-SiO2 wafers by simultaneous use of two or more cathodes. Due to the continuous rotation of the substrate cage, such that the substrates faced different targets alternately, the multilayers consisted of stacks of alternating, nanometer-thick regular layers. The composition of the films was determined by Rutherford Backscattering Spectrometry (RBS) and Nuclear Reactive Analysis (NRA), whereas Plasma Profiling Time of Flight Mass Spectrometry (PP-TOFMS) analysis gave depth profile information about the chemical elements. The structural and magnetic properties of the films were investigated by X-ray Diffraction and by TEM analysis, B-H loop tracer and high frequency single coil technique permeametry, respectively. The linear dependence of the coercivity of these thin films versus the grain size can be explained by the random anisotropy model. These novel, composite soft magnetic multilayers, with tunable in-plane anisotropy, allow operation at tunable frequencies, as shown by broadband (between 100 MHz and 10 GHz) RF measurements that exhibit a classical Landau-Lifschitz-Gilbert (LLG) behavior and, combine the magnetic properties of the individual materials in an advantageous way. This article presents a method to produce nanostructured soft magnetic multilayers, the properties of which can easily be tuned by choosing the ratio of the individual nanolayers. In this way it's possible to combine soft magnetic materials with complementary properties, e.g. high saturation magnetization, low coercivity, high specific resistivity and low magnetostriction© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Self-consistent ab initio calculations, based on Density Functional Theory (DFT) approach and using Full potential Linear Augmented Plane Wave (FLAPW) method, are performed to investigate the electronic and magnetic properties of the Fe4N compound. Polarized spin and spin-orbit coupling are included in calculations within the framework of the ferromagnetic state between Fe(I) and Fe(II) in Fe4N compound. We have used the obtained data from abinitio calculations as an input in Monte Carlo simulation to calculate the magnetic properties of this compounds such as the ground state phase diagrams, total and partial magnetization of Fe(I) and Fe(II) as well as the transition temperatures are computed. The variation of magnetization with the crystal field are also studied. The magnetic hysteresis cycle of the same Fe4N compound are determined for different values of temperatures and crystal field values. The two-step hysteresis loop are evidenced, which is typical for Fe4N structure. The ferromagnetic and superparamagnetic phase is observed as well.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.BiFeO3/L10 CoPt layered films are prepared by sputtering on MgO (0 0 1) substrates. Both X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscopy confirm the (0 0 1)-epitaxial growth. Magnetic field-mediated two magnetic states phenomenon has been observed in this layered films. Element mapping results indicate there exist Co-deficient CoPt layer (∼1.5 nm) and Co-containing BiFeO3 layer (∼2 nm) adjacent to the BiFeO3/CoPt interface. After applying in-plane or out-of-plane external magnetic field, moments in the above layers react differently, leading to two disparate magnetic states: coupling and decoupling states.© 2018Magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) signals were measured on a non-oriented electrical steel through all the thermomechanical processing stages, i.e. hot rolling, hot band annealing, cold rolling and final annealing. The temperature of the final annealing was varied from 600 °C to 750 °C so that the steel consisted of partially or completely recrystallized microstructures and different levels of residual stresses. The angular MBNrms (root mean square) values were compared to the texture factors in the same directions, the latter being calculated from the crystallographic texture measured by electron backscatter diffraction (EBSD). It was found that, in the cold-rolled, hot-rolled and completely recrystallized steels, the angular MBNrms followed a cosine function with respect to the angle of magnetization, while in partially recrystallized state such a relation does not exist. After cold rolling, the maximum MBNrms was observed in the rolling direction (RD) and the minimum MBNrms was in the transverse direction (TD), which was inconsistent with the magnetocrystalline anisotropy as indicated by the texture factor. After hot rolling, the maximum and minimum MBNrms values were observed in the TD and RD, respectively, exactly opposite to the cold-rolled state. If the steel was completely recrystallized, the maximum MBNrms was normally observed at a direction that was 15–30° from the minimum texture factor. If the steel was partially recrystallized, both the magnetocrystalline anisotropy of the material and the residual stress contributed to the angular MBNrms, which resulted in the deviation of the relationship from a cosine function. The relative strength of the two factors determined which factor would dominate the overall magnetic anisotropy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the broad research of the GMR bio-sensing technology, it is vital to explore appropriate magnetic labels and its influences on the detection signal. In this work, four kinds of ferrite particles of γ-Fe2O3, CoFe2O4, NiFe2O4 and NiZnFe2O4 were prepared through calcining the Dimethyl Formamide (DMF) solution of the transition metal nitrates [Fe(NO3)3 and X(NO3)2, X = Co, Ni, Zn] to study the effect of magnetic properties on detection signals using a DC in-plane measuring method. It was revealed that for four particles, the output voltage differences |ΔV| between with and without magnetic particles exhibit log-linear functions of the particles concentrations x in the range from 0.1 to 10 ng/mL. A very low limitation of detection (LOD) of 0.1 ng/mL for all the samples was obtained, which is two orders smaller than that in the previous work. Moreover, the change of output voltage difference at the LOD (|ΔVlim|) is proportional to the magnetization at bias field (bias magnetization, Mbias), which indicates that larger Mbias leads to a lower LOD. This work provides a useful guidance in selecting or preparing magnetic labels to enhance the sensitivity of GMR biosensors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal process in thin-film ferromagnetic elements with surface anisotropy of various shapes and sizes is investigated by means of numerical simulation. The dependencies of the perpendicular and in-plane hysteresis loops on the element thickness, and the value of the surface anisotropy constant are obtained. For sufficiently large values of the surface anisotropy constant the magnetization reversal of thin-film elements is shown to occur due to the nucleation of the buckling mode. For an elongated rectangular element the nucleation field of the buckling mode is proportional to the absolute value of the surface anisotropy constant, and inversely proportional to the element thickness.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological elastomers are a type of smart hybrid material which combines elastic properties of a soft elastomer matrix with magnetic properties of magnetic micro particles. This leads to a material with magnetically controllable mechanical properties of which the magnetorheological effect is the best known. The addition of electroconductive particles to the polymer mix adds electrical properties to the material behaviour. The resulting electrical resistance of the sample can be manipulated by external magnetic fields and mechanical loads. This results in a distinct interplay of mechanical, electrical and magnetic effects with a highly complex time behaviour. In this paper a mechanical characterisation on multiple time scales was conducted to get an insight on the short and long-term electrical and mechanical behaviour of this novel material. The results show a complex resistivity behaviour on several timescales, sensitive to magnetic fields and strain velocity. The observed material exhibits fatigue and relaxation behaviour, whereas the magnetorheological effect appears not to interfere with the piezoresistive properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of nanocomposite materials containing particles of rare earth titanates of R2Ti2O7 type, where R is a rare earth ion, including “spin ice” materials are investigated. The descending branches of hysteresis loop have been studied in detail in temperature range from 2 to 50 K. It has been shown that nanocomposites with Yb2Ti2O7, Dy2Ti2O7 and Er2Ti2O7 particles have one intersection point of the descending branches in some temperature range unlike many other nanocomposites. It is shown that magnetization has only weak temperature dependence near this point. It has been obtained that nanocomposites with Pr2Ti2O7 and Nd2Ti2O7 particles have no hysteresis loop. All above findings point out to unusual magnetic structures of the studied samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic domain state of carbon coated iron nanopowder (Fe@C) was studied by the internal field nuclear magnetic resonance (IFNMR) at 77 K using the spin echo technique. The structure and magnetic properties of the sample were further characterized by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD), Mössbauer spectroscopy, vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM), thermogravimetric analysis (TGA) and Raman Spectroscopy. The obtained IFNMR results of Fe@C powder were compared with that of micron sized carbonyl iron (CI) and electrolytic iron (EI) powders. The calculated critical size of the single domain iron particles in Fe@C is ∼ 16 nm. A higher enhancement in echo amplitude was observed due to better response of the domain walls of multidomain particles in comparison to the single domain particles. The echo signal of CI and EI particles exhibit a single narrow intense peak corresponding to the domain walls, whereas Fe@C exhibits two low amplitude peaks at two different frequencies: a low frequency (46.6 MHz) peak corresponds to the response of the domain walls of the multidomain particles and the other high frequency (47.2 MHz) signal (a shoulder) corresponding to the response of the magnetic nuclei inside the domain. Our results help in determining the domain state of iron-based magnetic particles using 57Fe-IFNMR.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Asymmetric giant magnetoimpedance (AGMI) effect has been investigated in as-prepared and current annealed amorphous (Co0.9Fe0.05Ni0.05)75Si15B10 ribbons. Asymmetry was created by micro magnets. Different numbers of magnets were used and it was found that increasing number of magnet, the shift in AGMI curves increases. When two micro magnets were placed 1 cm away from the ends of ribbon, a distortion in two peak shape of the GMI curve was observed. At high frequency range, a linear change in the AGMI was observed for the current annealed sample.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.An investigation of the dependence of magnetic properties on the thickness of ferromagnetic films was completed. The study dealt with magnetostatic and microwave measurements of single-layer films of ferromagnetic metals (Fe, Co) and was aimed at revealing reasons for the deterioration of microwave magnetic performance with an increase in film thickness. Two types of variation of microwave permeability with the film thickness were distinguished for the films under study. One exhibited a noticeable deviation from maximal values and was observed for Co. The other case involved a gradual worsening of performance, and was observed for Fe. In the first case, the resonance frequency shifted lower when the film was thicker than 0.2–0.4 μm, and Acher's coefficient fell by the factor of three. In the second case, the microwave performance worsened gradually, and a decrease of Acher's coefficient was not large, approximately by 20%. The data analysis showed that the reason for the deterioration is an increase of out-of-plane anisotropy in the first case and sufficient growth of damping factor in the second case.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The detailed first principle density functional theory calculations are carried out to investigate the electronic and magnetic properties of magnetoelectric compound Ca2CoSi2O7. The magnetic properties of this system are analyzed by calculating various hopping integrals as well as exchange interactions and deriving the relevant spin Hamiltonian. The dominant exchange path is visualized with Wannier functions plotting. Only intra planer nearest neighbor exchange interaction is strong in this system. The magnetocrystalline anisotropy is calculated for this system, and the results of the calculation reveal that the spin quantization axis lies in the ab plane.© 2018We report magnetic domain formation control within micro-scale polycrystalline Ni wires on a single-crystal Y-cut 128° LiNbO3 substrate. X-ray magnetic circular dichroism photoemission electron microscopy (XCDM-PEEM), micromagnetic simulations, and magnetoresistance (MR) measurements allowed us to estimate the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy induced by the magnetoelastic effect that originated at the interface between each Ni layer and the LiNbO3 substrate. Comparison of the XMCD-PEEM and MR measurement results shows that the competition between the shape magnetic anisotropy and the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy parallel to the orientation flat (OF) direction of the substrate leads to variations in both the magnetization order and the magnetization reversal process. The uniaxial magnetic anisotropy is estimated to be approximately 3.3 kJ/m3. This heterojunction structure composed of ferromagnetic and ferroelectric layers thus offers alternative ways to produce artificial functional multiferroic materials and devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present a theoretical calculation of magnetoelectric properties in a quasi-two dimensional spin chain externally controlled by a static electric field in y-direction and magnetic field in z-direction. Given the diversity of properties in functional materials and their applications in physics, the multiferroic model is investigated. By using the Fermi–Dirac statistics of quantum gases and the Landau theory, we assess the effects of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction and the electric polarization on the magnetoelectric coupling that induces at low temperature the “metamagnetoelectric” effet, and likewise affects the ferroelectricity induced through symmetry mechanisms and magnetic properties of the multiferroic system. In fact, the variation of the induced polarisation due to spin arrangement through the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction gives rise to a multistep interdependent metamagnetic and metaelectric transitions which are settled up by the corresponding Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya parameter and the system then exhibits a spin gap that results from an electric and a magnetic demagnetization field range. This metamagnetoelectric effect observed in these multiferroic materials model is seem to be highly tunable via the external electric and magnetic fields and thus can be crucial in the design of new mechanisms for the processing and storage of data and other spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdTwo dimensional layers of dichalcogenide materials have attracted a lot of interests due to their potential applications in optoelectronics and energy storage. Hence, there is a large interest in establishing cheap, scalable processes for the production of low dimensional semiconducting dichalcogenide based films. In this work, well exfoliated MoS2 dispersions were prepared through a two-step liquid phase exfoliation process with N-methyl-pyrrolidone (NMP) and Isopropanol (IPA). The quality of the obtained MoS2 flakes was characterized by transmission electron microscopy, scanning electron microscopy, UV–Vis spectroscopy and Raman spectroscopy. For charge transport analysis, bottom-gate thin film transistors (TFTs) based on exfoliated MoS2 films were fabricated via spray coating technique. Electrical characterization of the obtained TFTs showed that adding a PMMA layer on top of the semiconductor lead to considerable improvements in the electrical performance. The analysis of the electrical characteristics suggests that the additional PMMA layer improves the charge transfer between adjacent flakes. Electrical measurements on TFTs with different channel length were used to separate the impact of the contact resistance and the channel resistance on the charge transport. The TFTs output curves showed non-linear current–voltage (I-V) characteristic. The non-linear behavior was attributed to the formation of Schottky barriers at the inter-flakes connection. In this work, we show a low-cost and scalable solution-based fabrication process that could boost the application of dichalcogenides in modern nanoelectronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of metallic alloys used in biomedical industry are important for the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). If the alloys were to be used for long term implants or as guiding devices, safety of the patient as well as the medical staff has to be ensured. Strong response to the external magnetic field can cause mechanical damage to the patients body. In this paper we present magnetic susceptibility of nickel rich, ternary NiTiPt and NiTiEr to static magnetic field. We show that the magnetic susceptibility of these radiopaque alloys has values in low paramagnetic region comparable to the binary nickel-titanium. Furthermore, we studied the effect of the thermal and mechanical treatments on magnetic properties. Despite deviation from linear M(H) treated samples spanning small region around H=0, the linearity of the M(H) and χ=dM/dH values suggest that these ternary alloys are safe to use under MRI conditions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrite with the general formula Mn1−xCuxFe1.85Gd0.15O4 (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6 and 0.8) was synthesized using the standard sonochemical method. The structure, optical, morphology, dielectric and magnetic properties of the prepared Mn1−xCuxFe1.85Gd0.15O4 nanoferrites were exhaustively investigated using various characterization techniques. The phase purity, secondary phase and crystallite parameters were studied from X-ray diffraction patterns. Fourier transform infrared spectra showed two absorption bands of transition metal oxides in the frequency range from 400 to 650 cm−1, which are related to asymmetric stretching modes of the spinel ferrites (AB2O4). Raman spectra have five active modes illustrating the vibration of O2− ions at both tetrahedral (A) site and octahedral (B) site ions. The wide and narrow scan spectrum from X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy results confirmed the presence of Mn, Cu, Gd, Fe, C and O elements in the composition. The oxidation state and core level of the photo electron peaks of Mn 2p, Cu 2p, Gd 3d, Fe 2p and O 1s were analyzed. The influence of the Cu2+ concentration in Mn1−xCuxFe1.85Gd0.15O4 on the morphology, varying from nanorods, nanoflakes to spherical, was explored on the basis of scanning electron microscopy images. Ultraviolet diffuse reflectance spectroscopy studies indicated that the optical bandgap (5.12–5.32 eV) of the nanoferrites showed an insulating behavior. The dielectric constant, loss tangent and complex dielectric constant values decreased with an increase in frequency with the addition of Gd3+ content. A vibrating sample magnetometer showed that the prepared nanoferrites had a soft ferromagnetic nature. The magnetic parameter changed markedly with an increase in the Cu content in Mn1−xCuxFe1.85Gd0.15O4 nanoferrites. The optical, dielectric and magnetic properties were considerably enhanced with the addition of Gd3+ ions in the spinel nanoferrites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A new approach to quantum information generation, storage and transmission is proposed. It is shown that quantum information generation and storage using an ensemble of N electron spins encounter unresolvable implementation problems (at least at the present time). As an alternative implementation we discuss two promising radical systems, one with N equivalent nuclear spins and another with N nonequivalent nuclear spins. Detailed analysis shows that only the radical system containing N nonequivalent nuclei is perfectly matched for quantum information generation, storage and transmission. We develop a procedure based on pulsed electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) and we apply it to the radical system with the set of nonequivalent nuclei. The resulting EPR spectrum contains 2N transition lines, where N is the number of the atoms with the nuclear spin [Formula presented], and each of these lines may be encoded with a determined qudit sequence. For encoding the EPR lines we propose to submit the radical system to two magnetic pulses in the direction perpendicular to the z axis of the reference frame. As a result, the radical system impulse response may be measured, stored and transmitted through the communications channel. Confirming our development, the ab initio analysis of the system with three anion radicals was done showing matching between the simulations and the theoretical predictions. The developed method may be easily adapted for quantum information generation, storage, processing and transmission in quantum computing and quantum communications applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This study treats with the influence of a symmetry-breaking transversal magnetic field on the nonlinear dynamics of ferrofluidic Taylor-Couette flow – flow confined between two concentric independently rotating cylinders. We detected alternating ‘flip’ solutions which are flow states featuring typical characteristics of slow-fast-dynamics in dynamical systems. The flip corresponds to a temporal change in the axial wavenumber and we find them to appear either as pure 2-fold axisymmetric (due to the symmetry-breaking nature of the applied transversal magnetic field) or involving non-axisymmetric, helical modes in its interim solution. The latter ones show features of typical ribbon solutions. In any case the flip solutions have a preferential first axial wavenumber which corresponds to the more stable state (slow dynamics) and second axial wavenumber, corresponding to the short appearing more unstable state (fast dynamics). However, in both cases the flip time grows exponential with increasing the magnetic field strength before the flip solutions, living on 2-tori invariant manifolds, cease to exist, with lifetime going to infinity. Further we show that ferrofluidic flow turbulence differ from the classical, ordinary (usually at high Reynolds number) turbulence. The applied magnetic field hinders the free motion of ferrofluid partials and therefore smoothen typical turbulent quantities and features so that speaking of mildly chaotic dynamics seems to be a more appropriate expression for the observed motion.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thermodynamic description of a model system with magnetoelastic coupling is presented. The elastic, vibrational, electronic and magnetic energy contributions are taken into account. The long-range RKKY interaction is considered together with the nearest-neighbour direct exchange. The generalized Gibbs potential and the set of equations of state are derived, from which all thermodynamic functions are self-consistently obtained. Thermodynamic properties are calculated numerically for FCC structure for arbitrary external pressure, magnetic field and temperature, and widely discussed. In particular, for some parameters of interaction potential and electron concentration corresponding to antiferromagnetic phase, the existence of negative thermal expansion coefficient is predicted.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this research work, we have predicted the physical properties of CoFeZrGe and CoFeZrSb for the first time by utilizing first principle calculations based on density functional theory. The exchange-correlation potentials are treated within the generalized-gradient approximation of Perdew-Burke and Ernzerhof (GGA-PBE). The investigated equilibrium lattice parameters of CoFeCrSi are in agreement with available theoretical data and for CoFeZrZ(Z = Ge,Sb) are 6.0013 and 6.2546 Å respectively. The calculated magnetic moments are 1.01μB/fu, 2μB/fu and 1μB/fu for CoFeZrZ(Z = Ge, Sb and Si) respectively, and agree with the Slater-Pauling rule, Mt=Zt-24. The CoFeZrGe, CoFeZrSb and CoFeZrSi composites showed half-metallic behaviour with 100% spin polarization at equilibrium lattice parameters with band gap of 0.43, 0.70 and 0.59 eV for GGA and an improved band gap of 0.86, 1.01 and 1.08 for GGA + U respectively. Elastic properties are also discussed in this paper and it is found that all the materials are mechanically stable and ductile in nature. The CoFeZrSi alloy is found to be stiffer than CoFeZrZ(Z = Ge and Sb) alloys. The Debye temperatures are predicted by using calculated elastic constants. Moreover, the volume heat capacities (Cv) are investigated by utilizing the quasi-harmonic Debye model.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Due to the theoretical prediction of large tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR), graphene-based magnetic tunneling junction (MTJ) has become an important branch of high-performance spintronics device. In this paper, the non-collinear spin filtering and transport properties of MTJ with the Ni/tri-layer graphene/Ni structure were studied in detail by utilizing the non-equilibrium Green's formalism combined with spin polarized density functional theory. The band structure of Ni–C bonding interface shows that Ni–C atomic hybridization facilitates the electronic structure consistency of graphene and nickel, which results in a perfect spin filtering effect for tri-layer graphene-based MTJ. Furthermore, our theoretical results show that the value of tunneling resistance changes with the relative magnetization angle of two ferromagnetic layers, displaying the anisotropic tunneling behavior of graphene-based MTJ. This originates from the resonant conduction states which are strongly adjusted by the relative magnetization angles. In addition, the perfect spin filtering effect is demonstrated by fitting the anisotropic conductance with the Julliere's model. Our work may serve as guidance for researches and applications of graphene-based spintronics device.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetodielectric (MD) materials have attracted considerable attention due to their intriguing physics and potential future applications. In this work, polycrystalline (1 − x)(Ba0.88Ca0.12)(Ti0.88Zr0.12)O3 − xCoFe2O4 (x = 0.10, 0.20, 0.30, 0.40) ceramic have been prepared via sol-gel method. The room temperature magnetic and ferroelectric behaviors of the synthesized composites were investigated. For the composite with x = 0.40, a MD ratio of 5.37% was achieved under a magnetic field of 1.5 T at f = 1 kHz. The measured “butterfly hysteresis” MD curves exhibit an obvious dielectric anomaly. Theoretical analysis suggests that the observed magnetodielectric effect is attributed to the magnetoresistance effect and magnetoelectric coupling.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Large scale production of single crystalline phase of Heusler Co2FeSi alloy microwire is reported. The long microwire (∼1 km) with the metallic nucleus diameter of about 2 µm is characterized by well oriented monocrystalline structure (B2 phase, with the lattice parameter a = 5.615 Å). Moreover, the crystallographic direction [1 0 1] is parallel to the wire's axis along the entire length. Additionally, the wire is characterized by exhibiting a high Curie temperature (Tc > 800 K) and well-defined magnetic anisotropy mainly governed by shape. Electrical resistivity measurement reveals the exponential suppression of the electron-magnon scattering which provides strong evidence on the half-metallic behaviour of this material in the low temperature range.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.By employing soft X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) and soft X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS), we have investigated the temperature (T)-dependent valence and spin states of Cr ions in half-metallic ferromagnet CrO2 nanorod powder. The lineshape-analysis of both the Cr 2p XAS and XMCD spectra of CrO2 reveals that the Cr ions in bulk CrO2 have both Cr4+ t2g2↑ and Cr3+ t2g3↑ valence configurations. This work provides the direct experimental evidence for the Cr3+-Cr4+ mixed-valent states in bulk CrO2 (Cr3.8+), demonstrating that the half-metallic ferromagnetism in CrO2 originates from the double-exchange interaction. The T-dependent intensity variation of the Cr 2p XMCD spectrum agrees well with the bulk magnetization M(T) and the Curie temperature, indicating that the measured Cr 2p XMCD data represent the intrinsic bulk ferromagnetism in CrO2, and support the above finding of the XMCD lineshape analysis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electric-controlled magnetization precession introduces technologically relevant possibility for developing spin torque nano-oscillators (STNO) with potential applications in microwave emission. Using the perpendicularly magnetized magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ), we show that the magnetization oscillation frequency can be tuned by the co-action of electric field and spin polarized current. The dynamical phase diagram of MTJ-based STNO is analytically predicted through coordinate transformation from the laboratory frame to the rotation frame, by which the nonstationary out-of-plane magnetization precession process is therefore transformed into the stationary process in the rotation frame. Furthermore, using this STNO as a microwave source, we numerically demonstrate that the bit signal can be transmitted by a binary frequency shift keying (BFSK) modulation technique. The BFSK scheme shows good modulation features with no transient state.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This letter reports an extended effective medium theory (EMT) including particle-size distribution functions to maximize the magnetic properties of magneto-dielectric composites. It is experimentally verified by Co-Ti substituted barium ferrite (BaCoxTixFe12−2xO19)/wax composites with specifically designed particle-size distributions. In the form of an integral equation, the extended EMT formula essentially takes the size-dependent parameters of magnetic particle fillers into account. It predicts the effective permeability of magneto-dielectric composites with various particle-size distributions, indicating an optimal distribution for a population of magnetic particles. The improvement of the optimized effective permeability is significant concerning magnetic particles whose properties are strongly size dependent.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We perform a theoretical and experimental investigation of the magnetic properties and magnetization dynamics of a ferromagnetic magnetostrictive multilayer grown onto a flexible substrate and submitted to external stress. We calculate the magnetic behavior and magnetoimpedance effect for a trilayered system from an approach that considers a magnetic permeability model for planar geometry and a magnetic free energy density which takes into account induced uniaxial and magnetoelastic anisotropy contributions. We verify remarkable modifications of the magnetic anisotropy with external stress, as well as we show that the dynamic magnetic response is strongly affected by these changes. We discuss the magnetic features that lead to modifications of the frequency limits where distinct mechanisms are responsible by the magnetoimpedance variations, enabling us to manipulate the resonance fields. To test the robustness of the approach, we directly compare theoretical results with experimental data. Thus, we provide experimental evidence to confirm the validity of the theoretical approach, as well as to manipulate the resonance fields to tune the MI response according to real applications in devices.© 2017Structural, dielectric and magnetic properties were investigated in the YCr1−xAlxO3 with 0 < x < 0.5 compositions. XRD and XPS studies show that the partial substitution of the Al3+ ion decreases the cell volume of the orthorhombic structure without changes in the oxidation state of the Cr3+ ions. We discuss two mechanisms that could have a significant influence on the magnetic properties. The first is related to local deformation occurring for x < 0.1 of Al content and the second is related to change of the electronic structure. The local deformation is controlled by the inclination of the octahedrons and the octahedral distortion having a strong effect on the TN and the coercive field at low Al concentrations. On the other hand, the decreasing of the magnetization values (Mr and Hc) is ascribed to changes in the electronic structure, which is confirmed by a decreasing of the contribution of Cr 3d states at Fermi level due to increasing Al3+ content. Thus, we analyzed and discussed that both mechanisms influence the electronic properties of the YCr1−xAlxO3 solid solution.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we present first principles calculations based on the spin-polarized generalized gradient approximation with on-site Coulomb repulsion term (SGGA + U), to explore the electronic and magnetic properties of the novel planar metal-organic networks TM-Pc and TM-TCNB (where TM means a transition metal of the 3d series: Ti, V, Cr, … or Zn, Pc - Phthalocyanine, and TCNB - Tetracyanobenzene) as free-standing sheets. This work is an extension of two earlier research works dealing with the Mn (Mabrouk et al., 2015) and Fe (Mabrouk et al., 2017) cases. Our theoretical investigations demonstrate that TM-Pc are more stable than TM-TCNB. Our results unveil that all the TM-Pc frameworks have an insulating behavior with the exception of Mn-Pc which is half-metallic and favor antiferromagnetic order in the case of our magnetic systems except for V-Pc which is ferromagnetic. In contrast, the TM-TCNB networks are metallic at least in one spin direction and exhibit long-range ferromagnetic coupling in case for magnetic structures, which represent ideal candidates and an interesting prospect of unprecedented applications in spintronics. In addition, these results may shed light to achieve a new pathway on further experimental research in molecular spintronics.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Thin films of layered perovskites Sr1.5RE0.5CoO4 (RE = La, Gd) were grown on MgO (0 0 1) substrate using pulsed laser ablation method. Structural, electrical and magnetic properties of single phase oriented films were studied. Films reveal semiconducting behavior in the entire measured temperature range. The films show thermally activated behavior at high temperature regime, with a higher value of activation energy for SGCO than that for SLCO. The low temperature behavior is well fitted with 3D-variable range hopping mechanism. Both films showed negative magneto-resistance measured in temperature range of 10–200 K. The value of MR is large for SGCO film as compared to its bulk counterpart as well as SLCO film, suggesting its high potential in the spintronics applications. A pinch-shaped M−H behaviour as observed in both the films, suggests the presence of two-magnetic phases. Occurrence of pinch-shape behaviour is although in line with that of SLCO bulk counterpart, interestingly, it was absent in SGCO polycrystalline powder. It suggests major role of film growth kinetics in modifying the magnetic properties in cobaltites.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA systematic study to model and characterize the band-modulation Z2-FET device is developed bringing light to the relevance of the carrier lifetime influence. This work provides guidelines to optimize the Z2-FETs for sharp switching, ESD protection, and 1T-DRAM applications. Lower carrier lifetime in the Z2-FET helps in attaining the sharp switch. We provide new insights into the correlation between generation/recombination, diffusion, electrostatic barriers and carrier lifetime.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.FeSiBPNbCu nanocrystalline powder cores (NPCs) with excellent magnetic properties were fabricated by cold-compaction of the gas-atomized amorphous powder. Upon annealing at the optimum temperature, the NPCs showed excellent magnetic properties, including high initial permeability of 88, high frequency stability up to 1 MHz with a constant value of 85, low core loss of 265 mW/cm3 at 100 kHz for Bm = 0.05 T, and superior DC-bias permeability of 60% at a bias field of 100 Oe. The excellent magnetic properties of the present NPCs could be attributed to the ultrafine α-Fe(Si) phase precipitated in the amorphous matrix and the use of gas-atomized powder coated with a uniform insulation layer.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present the design of novel, lightweight, broadband microwave absorbers based on polyaniline/Mn0.1Ni0.45Zn0.45Fe2O4 (PANI/MnNiZn ferrite) nanocomposites. The ferrite is synthesized by sol-gel technique. Then, the polymer is deposited by in-situ chemical oxidative polymerization. The structural and morphological characterizations of the composites are investigated by SEM, XRD, FT-IR and UV–vis spectroscopy. The functional characterization is performed by measuring the dc-conductivity and microwave absorption characteristics in the X-band. The absorbers exhibit broad bandwidths under −10 dB ranging from 2.60 to 3.74 GHz and low surface density ranging from 2.5 to 3.1 kg/m2. The absorber of 3.74 GHz bandwidth has a minimum reflection loss of −31.32 dB at 11.13 GHz with a matching thickness of 3 mm and a low loading in paraffin of only 25% w/w.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We carried out magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) and magnetization measurements on a single crystal of Ni2.00Mn1.16Ga0.84, which is a magnetic shape memory material with application potential for actuator devices or for energy recuperation. Up to the time of our study, there had been reports of MOKE measurements in polar geometry. Against earlier predictions, we show that surface magnetic states of the martensite and the austenite can be also probed efficiently via longitudinal MOKE. A single-variant magnetic state prepared at room temperature is characterized by square-shaped ferromagnetic hysteresis loops yielding coercive fields, which are key material properties for future applications. Temperature dependencies of Kerr rotation were found to be linearly proportional to magnetization for martensitic phases. After passing through an inter-martensitic structural transition below room temperature in zero magnetic field, the coercive fields are more than doubled in comparison with the room temperature values. Above room temperature where an austenite structure is formed, MOKE signals are dominated by quadratic contributions and the magnitude of Kerr rotation drops due to changes in the electronic and magnetic domains structure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Recent calculations of properties of TbAl2 GdAl2 and SmAl2 single crystals, performed with our new computation system called ATOMIC MATTERS MFA are presented. We applied localized electron approach to describe the thermal evolution of Fine Electronic Structure of Tb3+, Gd3+ and Sm3+ ions over a wide temperature range and estimate Magnetocaloric Effect (MCE). Thermomagnetic properties of TbAl2, GdAl2 and SmAl2 were calculated based on the fine electronic structure of the 4f8, 4f7 and 4f5 electronic configuration of the Tb3+ and Gd3+ and Sm3+ ions, respectively. Our calculations yielded: magnetic moment value and direction; single-crystalline magnetization curves in zero field and in external magnetic field applied in various directions m(T,Bext); the 4f-electronic components of specific heat c4f(T,Bext); and temperature dependence of the magnetic entropy and isothermal entropy change with external magnetic field – ΔS(T,Bext). The cubic universal CEF parameters values used for all CEF calculations was taken from literature and recalculated for universal cubic parameters set for the RAl2 series: A4 = +7.164 Ka04 and A6 = −1.038 Ka06. Magnetic properties were found to be anisotropic due to cubic Laves phase C15 crystal structure symmetry. These studies reveal the importance of multipolar charge interactions when describing thermomagnetic properties of real 4f electronic systems and the effectiveness of an applied self-consistent molecular field in calculations for magnetic phase transition simulation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrites have come a long way in their versatile applications. The ever growing applications of these materials demand detailed study of material properties and environmental considerations in their synthesis. In this article, we report the effect of temperature and applied magnetic field strength on the magnetic behavior of the cobalt nickel ferrite nano powder samples. Basic structural properties of spinel ferrite nano particles, that are synthesized by an environmentally benign method of auto combustion, are characterized through XRD, TEM, RAMAN spectroscopy. Diffuse Reflectance Spectroscopy (DRS) is done to understand the nickel substitution effect on the optical properties of cobalt ferrite nano particles. Thermo magnetic studies using SQUID in the temperature range 5 K to 400 K and room temperature (300 K) VSM studies are performed on these samples. Fields of 0Oe (no applied field: ZF), 1 kOe (for ZFC and FC curves), 5 kOe (0.5 T), 50 kOe (5T) (for M-H loop study) are used to study the magnetic behavior of these nano particles. The XRD,TEM analysis suggest 40 nm crystallites that show changes in the cation distribution and phase changes in the spinel structure with nickel substitution. Raman micrographs support phase purity changes and cation redistributions with nickel substitution. Diffuse reflectance study on powder samples suggests two band gap values for nickel rich compounds. The Magnetic study of these sample nano particles show varied magnetic properties from that of hard magnetic, positive multi axial anisotropy and single-magnetic-domain structures at 5 K temperature to soft magnetic core shell like structures at 300 K temperature. Nickel substitution effect is non monotonous. Blocking temperature of all the samples is found to be higher than the values suggested in the literature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Spin-valley transport and magnetoresistance are investigated in silicene-based N/TB/N/TB/N junction where N and TB are normal silicene and topological barriers. The topological phase transitions in TB's are controlled by electric, exchange fields and circularly polarized light. As a result, we find that by applying electric and exchange fields, four groups of spin-valley currents are perfectly filtered, directly induced by topological phase transitions. Control of currents, carried by single, double and triple channels of spin-valley electrons in silicene junction, may be achievable by adjusting magnitudes of electric, exchange fields and circularly polarized light. We may identify that the key factor behind the spin-valley current filtered at the transition points may be due to zero and non-zero Chern numbers. Electrons that are allowed to transport at the transition points must obey zero-Chern number which is equivalent to zero mass and zero-Berry's curvature, while electrons with non-zero Chern number are perfectly suppressed. Very large magnetoresistance dips are found directly induced by topological phase transition points. Our study also discusses the effect of spin-valley dependent Hall conductivity at the transition points on ballistic transport and reveals the potential of silicene as a topological material for spin-valleytronics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Microwave irradiation method is employed to synthesis of Zn1−xCoxO (x = 0.001–0.004) nanoparticles and investigate their structural, optical and magnetic properties using various characterization techniques. Structural studies reveal single phase hexagonal structure with average crystallite size 18–28 nm. FTIR study identifies the functional group present in the samples. The incorporation of Co2+ ions into the ZnO lattice is confirmed through XRD and UV–Vis studies. PL spectra exhibit a strong emission peak in UV region and a defect related visible emission peak in orange red region. These peaks are attributed to near band edge emission and the presence of oxygen related defects in the samples respectively. The blue shift observed in the UV emission peak shows an increase in the carrier concentration caused by the interstitial incorporation of ions into the ZnO lattice. The oxygen related defect is also confirmed through a peak obtained around g factor 1.9933 in ESR studies. Further, the number of spin contributing the ESR signal demonstrates the dependence of the strength of ferromagnetism on the concentration of oxygen ion vacancies. The VSM, ESR and PL measurements confirm the origin of RTFM of Co doped ZnO nanoparticles from the exchange interaction between the localized spin moments resulting from oxygen vacancies. The reason for the obtained super paramagnetic nature for x = 0.002 and x = 0.003 may be either due to some of nanoparticles or due to the weakly coupled Co ions in the Zn2+ site in the ZnO lattice. Further, the ferromagnetic behavior arises again for x = 0.004 due to the incorporation of Co2+ ions in the interstitial positions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, spinel magnesium cobalt ferrite (CoxMg1−xFe2O4: x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 and 1.0) nanocomposites were synthesized successfully by modified sol-gel combustion method. Magnesium nitrate, cobalt nitrate and iron nitrate were used as the source of divalent (Mg2+ and Co2+) and trivalent (Fe3+) cations, respectively and urea were used as the reducing (fuel) agent. The effects of cobalt ions on morphology, structural, optical, magnetic and photo-catalytic properties of spinel CoxMg1−xFe2O4 nanocomposites were investigated. Various characterization methods, including X-ray powder diffraction (XRD), high resolution scanning electron microscope (HR-SEM), transmission electron microscopy (HR-TEM), energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX), Fourier transforms infrared (FT-IR) spectroscopy, vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and photo-catalytic degradation (PCD) activity were used to study the phase purity, microstructure, particle size, elemental composition, functional group determination, band gap calculation, magnetic properties and degradation efficiency of nanoparticles, respectively. The observed results showed that the final products consists cubic spinel phase with sphere-like nanoparticles morphologies. Furthermore, spinel Co0.6Mg0.4Fe2O4 nanocomposite showed highest PCD efficiency (98.55%) than other composition of ferrite nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report a successful preparation of Ba1−xLaxFe22+Fe163+O27 (x = 0.00–0.10) W-type hexagonal ferrites by standard ceramic method in a reduced oxygen atmosphere. In this work, the effect of the substitution La3+ rare-earth ions for Ba2+ ions on the structural and magnetic properties of the prepared samples have been studied. The phase identification of magnetic powders was performed by X-ray diffraction. The results of XRD show that the single phase was observed in the W-type ferrites with different La content. The SEM micrographs showed that the ferrites have formed the hexagonal structure. The magnetic properties of the samples were metric by a vibrating sample magnetometer. The coercivity (Hc) of the particles decreases with the increase of La content(x), while the saturation magnetization (Ms) of the particles first increases with x from 0 to 0.05, and then begins to decrease when x continues to increase. The monotonic dependence of the magnetic anisotropy field Ha and coercivity Hc on the La3+ doping amount is found to be mainly dominated by the competition between Ms and Keff.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work is devoted to the study of composite system of liquid crystal 4-(trans-4-n-hexylcyclohexyl)-isothiocyanato-benzene (6CHBT) doped with lath-like goethite magnetic nanoparticles with the concentration of 0.01 vol%. The structural transitions in ferronematic samples were observed by dielectric measurements in a capacitor made of ITO-coated glass electrodes as well as by polarizing optical microscopy. Due to the presence of magnetic particles a decrease of the magnetic Fréedericksz transition was observed. The response of ferronematics to very low magnetic fields is also presented which opens the door towards application possibilities such as low magnetic fields sensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We consider a two dimensional compass model with a next and a next near Heisenberg term. The interactions are of two types: frustrated near neighbor compass interactions of amplitudes Jx and Jy, and next and next near neighbor Heisenberg interactions with exchanges J1 and J2 respectively. The Heisenberg interactions are isotropic in spin space, but the compass interactions depend on the bond direction. The ground state of the pure compass model is degenerated with a complex phase diagram. This degeneracy is removed by the Heisenberg terms leading to the arising of a magnetically ordered phase with a preferred direction. We calculate the phase diagrams at zero temperature for the case where, for J2 = 0, we have an antiferromagnetic ground state. We show that varying the value of J2, a magnetically disordered phase can be reached for small values of the compass interactions. We also calculate the critical temperature for a specified value of parameters.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new colloidal composite formed by specially synthesized dimethylphenyl ferrite particles and a nematic liquid crystal (LC) is presented. By applying a small magnetic field during polarizing optical microscopy observations, it was found that the magnetic moment of the synthesized ferrite is perpendicular to the director of the LC. The optical transmission of laser light across the ferronematic was investigated under magnetic field. The critical magnetic field corresponding to the Freedericksz transition was obtained and discussed according to the Burylov and Raikher theory.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the influence of different sintering atmospheres and temperatures on physical properties of the Cu0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 nanoparticles including the redistribution of Zn2+ and Fe3+ ions, the oxidation of Fe atoms in the lattice, crystallite sizes, IR bands, saturation magnetization and magnetic core sizes have been investigated. The fitting of XRD patterns by using Fullprof program and also FT-IR measurement show the formation of a cubic structure with no presence of impurity phase for all the samples. The unit cell parameter of the samples sintered at the air- and inert-ambient atmospheres trend to decrease with sintering temperature, but for the samples sintered under carbon monoxide-ambient atmosphere increase. The magnetization curves versus the applied magnetic field, indicate different behaviour for the samples sintered at 700 °C with the respect to the samples sintered at 300 °C. Also, the saturation magnetization increases with the sintering temperature and reach a maximum 61.68 emu/g in the sample sintered under reducing atmosphere at 600 °C. The magnetic particle size distributions of samples have been calculated by fitting the M–H curves with the size distributed Langevin function. The results obtained from the XRD and FTIR measurements suggest that the magnetic core size has the dominant effect in variation of the saturation magnetization of the samples.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The results of reverse pulse electrodeposition of CoFeNi films with ultra-high magnetic saturation, i.e. Bs values between 2.4 and 2.59 T, are presented in this work. Based on valence-bond theory (Hund's rule) it was assumed that the electronic configuration of MOH obtained by one electron reduction of electroactive intermediate (MOH+ads + e → MOHads) or oxidation of metal (M − e + HOH → MOH + H+) would result with larger number of spins per atom for each of transition metals in MOH-precipitated in CoFeNi deposit- with one more spin than their respective neutral metal in the order: Fe > Co > Ni. The experimental results showed that the increase of Bs value above Slater-Pauling curve was not observed for CoFe alloys, thus FeOH and CoOH compounds were not present in deposit. However, the increase of the Bs values above the Slater-Pauling curve (Bs = 2.4–2.59 T) was observed, for CoFeNi films obtained by reverse pulse electrodeposition. Therefore, NiOH as a stable compound is probably formed in a one-electron oxidation step during anodic pulse oxidation reaction precipitated presumably at the grain boundaries, giving rise to the ultra-high magnetic saturation of CoFeNi films. The effects of experimental conditions on elemental composition, magnetic properties, crystal structure, and thermal stability of CoFeNi films were studied.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Co2O3 addition on the electromagnetic properties of NiCuZn ferrite were investigated, by considering the variation of complex permeability, complex permittivity and quasi-microwave absorption property in the 1–1000 MHz frequency range. Results show that the introduction of Co3+ ions in NiCuZn ferrite leads to the marked shifting of magnetic resonance towards high-frequency and a slight increase of the permittivity. These Co-related effects enhance the maximum reflection loss in NiCuZn ferrite to reach −55.1 dB with its absorption bandwidth being tunable in the frequency range 480–1000 MHz, which provides a potential absorber for the anti-electromagnetic interference applications in electronic industry.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The long-range dipole-dipole interaction in an array of Co57.3Fe7.6Cr1.7C33.4 amorphous microwires with axial bistability has been studied through magnetic hysteresis and longitudinally driven magneto-impedance (LDMI) measurements in this paper. Hysteresis loops performed for an array of microwires exhibit jumps and plateaux on the demagnetization curves. For LDMI curves, the multi-peak characteristic is presented as the number of microwires changes from 1 to 4. Each step in the hysteresis loops or each peak in the LDMI curves is correspondent to the magnetization reversal of an individual wire. To analysis the difference between the switching field of hysteresis loops and the peak field of LDMI curves, we further studied the dependence of the peak field on the driving current. The results showed that the ac magnetic field has a compensatory effect on the magnetization reversal of an individual wire.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the Rare-earth Iron Boron (RE-Fe-B) magnets were fabricated successfully by using the double main phase method through mixing the Neodymium Iron Boron (Nd-Fe-B) powders and Misch-metal Iron Boron (MM-Fe-B) powders with different ratio. Aiming at the nanocrystalline RE2Fe14B magnets prepared by using spark plasma sintering technology, phase structure and magnetic properties were investigated. It is found that the Misch-metal (MM) alloys promote the domain nucleation during the the process of magnetization reversal and then damage the coercivity (Hcj) of isotropic RE2Fe14B magnets, while the Hcj could still remain more than 1114.08 kA/m when the mass proportion of MM (simplified as: “a”) is 30%. Curie temperature and phase structure were also researched. Two kinds of mixed-solid-solution (MSS) main phases with different Lanthanum (La) and Cerium (Ce) content were believed to be responsible for the two curie temperature of the RE2Fe14B magnets with “a” ≥20%. This is resulted from the inhomogeneous elemental distribution of RE2Fe14B phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we use the SU(3) Schwinger boson representation, followed by a mean field decoupling, to study the disordered phases of the bilayer spin one quantum XY antiferromagnet on a square lattice with next near neighbor and a single ion anisotropy. The phase diagram at zero temperature is obtained. The ratio η=J⊥/J1 between the interlayer J⊥ to the intralayer near neighbor J1 exchange interactions exhibits a quantum phase transition at a critical ratio ηc=21.725 that separates the small- η Nèel phase from the large η quantum disordered paramagnet. The effect of next near neighbor interactions is discussed. The Neel phase is studied using a self consistent harmonic approximation that takes into account topological effects.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.0.05–0.15 mm-thick ultra-thin grain-oriented silicon steel sheets were successfully produced by a novel processing route including strip casting, hot rolling, normalizing, two-stage cold rolling with intermediate annealing, primary recrystallization annealing and secondary recrystallization annealing. The evolutions of microstructure, texture and inhibitor along the processing were briefly investigated. The results showed that the initial Goss orientation originated due to the heterogenous nucleation of δ-ferrite grains during solidification. Because of the lack of shear deformation, only a few Goss grains were observed in the hot rolled sheet. After the first cold rolling and intermediate annealing, Goss texture was enhanced and distributed in the whole thickness. A small number of Goss grains having a high fraction of high energy boundaries exhibited in the primary recrystallization annealed sheet. A large number of fine and dispersed MnS and AlN and a few co-precipitates MnS and AlN with the size range of 10–70 nm were also observed. Interestingly, a well-developed secondary recrystallization microstructure characterized by 10–60 mm grains and a sharp Goss texture were finally produced in the 0.05–0.15 mm-thick ultra-thin sheets. A magnetic induction B8 of 1.72–1.84 T was obtained. Another new finding was that a few {2 3 0}〈0 0 1〉 and {2 1 0}〈1 2 7〉 grains also can grow up abnormally because of the high fraction of high energy boundaries and the size and number advantage, respectively. These non-Goss grains finally deteriorated the magnetic properties of the ultra-thin sheets. In addition, low surface energies of {hk0} planes may also contribute to the abnormal growth of Goss, {2 3 0}〈0 0 1〉 and {2 1 0}〈1 2 7〉 grains.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic resonance characteristics of mixed chalcospinel nanocrystals CuCr2SxSe4−x (x = 0 and 2) and CoxCu1−xCr2S4 (x = 0.1 and 0.2) have been investigated. It has been established based on TEM, SEM and resonance data that all the samples contain both blocks with sizes from 1 to 50 m of compacted nanosized crystallites and individual nanoparticles with sizes from 10 to 30 nm. The studies provide evidence of strong interparticle interaction in all the samples leading to high values of the blocking temperature. Magnetic dipolar field arise in the boundary regions of interacting adjacent nanocrystals below the blocking temperature. This results in inhomogeneous broadening of the magnetic resonance spectrum along with appearance of additional absorption lines. With increase in magnetic anisotropy at low temperatures, a shift of the resonance field along with line broadening are observed for all the studied compounds due to freezing of the moments in the nanoparticles, both in the individual and compacted ones. A gapped characteristic of the resonance spectrum is established below the freezing temperature Tfr, with the energy gap defined by the averaged magnetic anisotropy <HA>. Anionic substitution of sulfur by selenium results in a decrease in the magnetic anisotropy. In contrast, cationic substitution of copper by cobalt increases the magnetic anisotropy due to a strong contribution from the latter ion.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.High maximum energy product ((BH)max) Sm(CobalFe0.18Cu0.07Zr0.03)7.7 magnet (type-A) and high temperature Sm(CobalFe0.1Cu0.09Zr0.03)7.2 magnet (type-B) were prepared by a traditional powder metallurgical technology. A record (BH)max of 98.7 kJ/m3 with a coercivity (Hcj) of 501.5 kA/m at 773 K was achieved for the type-B magnet, which is much higher than that of type-A magnet (63.7 kJ/m3). The microstructures of the magnets were revealed by high-resolution transmission electron microscope. The average cell size of the type-A and B magnet are 110 nm and 90 nm, respectively. Moreover, the type-B magnet shows a wider cell boundary than the type-A magnet. Additionally, the element distribution of the cell/cell boundary interfaces was measured by energy-dispersive spectroscopy. The cell phase of the type-A magnet contains a higher Fe content as about 17 at%, comparing with that of the type-B magnet (∼8.9 at%). On the other hand, the Cu content of the cell boundary phase is 18 at% almost twice higher than the type-B magnet (8.6 at%). Theoretical Hcj temperature dependence of these two kinds of magnets indicates that the lower Cu content in the cell boundary phase and the appropriate Fe content in the cell phase are the key factors for the high Hcj for the type-B magnet at elevated temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Ga liquid and Al powder were mechanically mixed and poured into a hollow iron plate, after alloying, the composite plate was rolled at room temperature for preparing an Fe/Ga-Al composite strip. The effect of annealing conditions on the diffusion, microstructures and magnetostrictive properties of the strip were studied. The composite plate had good cold rolling formability. After annealing at 750–850 °C for 5 h of the cold-rolled sample with a reduction of 97%, the diffusion distance of Ga and Al in the Fe matrix increased with an increase of the annealing temperature. However, some holes appeared in the center of the sample annealed at a temperature of more than 830 °C, which was detrimental to the subsequent rolling. The combination of the secondary cold rolling and annealing was beneficial to improve the composition homogeneity and magnetic properties of the sample. The magnetostriction coefficient (λ//) of the primary rolled sample was low, ∼4 × 10−6. After annealing and secondary cold rolling, the λ// of the sample increased to 9 × 10−6 and the λ// of the sample conducted by further annealing at 820 °C for 20 h reached 27.5 × 10−6.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic-based approaches are highly promising to provide innovative solutions for the design of medical devices for diagnostic and therapeutic procedures, such as in the endoluminal districts. Due to the intrinsic magnetic properties (no current needed) and the high strength-to-size ratio compared with electromagnetic solutions, permanent magnets are usually embedded in medical devices. In this paper, a set of analytical formulas have been derived to model the magnetic forces and torques which are exerted by an arbitrary external magnetic field on a permanent magnetic source embedded in a medical robot. In particular, the authors modelled cylindrical permanent magnets as general solution often used and embedded in magnetically-driven medical devices. The analytical model can be applied to axially and diametrically magnetized, solid and annular cylindrical permanent magnets in the absence of the severe calculation complexity. Using a cylindrical permanent magnet as a selected solution, the model has been applied to a robotic endoscopic capsule as a pilot study in the design of magnetically-driven robots.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.It is known that Dirac nodes can be present at high-symmetry points of Brillouin zone only for certain space groups. For these cases, the effect of strain is treated by symmetry considerations. The dependence of strain-induced potentials on the strain tensor is found. In all but two cases, the pseudomagnetic field potential is present. It can be used to control valley currents.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, the CZTSSe (Cu2ZnSn(S,Se)4) solar cells, with Al/ZnO:Al/ZnO (i)/CdS/CZTSSe/Mo structure, have been simulated. The simulation results have been compared and validated with real experimental results. Next, suggestions for improving the performance of CZTSSe solar cell have been provided. A SnS layer has been used as back surface field (BSF) layer. Different physical parameters of SnS layer are investigated, and the optimum values are selected. It has been found that by inserting a BSF layer with optimum parameters, the efficiency of CZTSSe solar cell increases from 12.3% to 17.25% due to enhancement of both short-circuit current density (Jsc) and open circuit voltage (Voc). For this optimized cell structure, the maximum Jsc = 37.37 mA/cm2, Voc = 0.605 V, and fill factor = 76.28% are obtained under 1.5 AM illumination.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic behavior of Zn substituted Cu-Zn spinel ferrites having chemical formula Cu1−xZnxFe2O4 (x = 0.7, 0.8, 0.9 and 1.0) has been studied by SQUID magnetometry, by means of magnetic hysteresis, field-cooled (FC) and zero-field-cooled (ZFC) magnetization, memory effect and low field ac susceptibility measurements. These measurements suggest that the ferrimagnetic phase of the x ≤ 0.8 samples is gradually turned into a spin glass (x ≥ 0.9). The compound with x = 0.9 exhibits the typical dynamical behavior of spin glasses, with indication of aging, rejuvenation and memory effects. The evolution of the magnetic properties of Cu-Zn spinel ferrites with substitution of Zn for Cu is discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Long magnetic relaxation (up to few hours) between stable magnetic states was analyzed in Pt/Co/Ir/Co/Pt/GaAs heterostructures of different Co layers thickness. The experimental data were compared to a large variety of theoretical models amongst which the Fatuzzo-Labrune one seems to be the more relevant. The contributions from domain nucleation and domain wall motion to magnetic relaxation of the spin valves were separated and evaluated. The increase of Co layer thickness suppresses the domain nucleation and enhances the domain wall propagation. The obtained data provide an understanding of the limitations of switching time in the spin valves of large area necessary for GMR biosensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the influence of crystalline structure on the magnetic properties of glass-coated microwires with CoFe-based metallic core realised as an amorphous matrix with nanocrystals. Using X-ray diffraction analysis and transmission electron microscopy, we have examined the structural features of the core, and demonstrated a possibility to tailor magnetic response of microwires by changing their crystalline structure. Finally, we present the first attempt to “visualise” stress distribution in the core of microwires, using crystal orientation imaging obtained by transmission electron microscopy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.To improve the coercivity of Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets, fine Zn particles with low oxygen content were fabricated by the hydrogen plasma-metal reaction (HPMR), and Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets were prepared using the Zn particles. The primary and secondary average Zn particle sizes were 0.23 and 0.93 μm, respectively, and the oxygen content was 0.068 wt%. The oxygen content in the Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets prepared using the Zn particles also decreased, and the coercivity and energy products of the 15 wt% Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets were 2.66 MA·m−1 and 53.1 kJ·m−3, respectively, at room temperature. The 10 wt% Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnet was also a high coercivity value of 2.41 MA·m−1, and the energy product was 56.1 kJ·m−3. The coercivity strongly depended on the oxygen content rather than the particle size of Zn, and decreasing the oxygen content in the starting material improved the magnetic properties of Zn-bonded Sm-Fe-N magnets. The coercivity of the 15 wt% Zn magnet measured at 180 and 200 °C was 1.23 and 1.10 MA·m−1, respectively, and the temperature coefficient of coercivity was −0.32%·°C−1.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents a computational study of the ground-state properties of a quantum nanomagnet possessing the shape of a finite two-legged ladder composed of 12 spins S=1/2. The system is described with isotropic quantum Heisenberg model with nearest-neighbour interleg and intraleg interactions supplemented with diagonal interleg coupling between next nearest neighbours. All the couplings can take arbitrary values. The description of the ground state is based on the exact numerical diagonalization of the Hamiltonian. The ground-state phase diagram is constructed and analysed as a function of the interactions and the external magnetic field. The ground-state energy and spin-spin correlations are extensively discussed. The cases of ferro- and antiferromagnetic couplings are compared and contrasted.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe charge cancellation due to the change of strain along single continuous piezoelectric layer can remarkably affect the performance of a cantilever based harvester. In this paper, analytical models using distributed parameters are developed with some extent of averting the charge cancellation in cantilever piezoelectric transducer where the piezoelectric layers are segmented at strain nodes of concerned vibration mode. The electrode of piezoelectric segments are parallelly connected with a single external resistive load in the 1st model (Model 1). While each bimorph piezoelectric layers are connected in parallel to a resistor to form an independent circuit in the 2nd model (Model 2). The analytical expressions of the closed-form electromechanical coupling responses in frequency domain under harmonic base excitation are derived based on the Euler–Bernoulli beam assumption for both models. The developed analytical models are validated by COMSOL and experimental results. The results demonstrate that the energy harvesting performance of the developed segmented piezoelectric layer models is better than the traditional model of continuous piezoelectric layer.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study the effect of the uniaxial anisotropy in a system of ideal, noninteracting ferromagnetic nanoparticles by means of a thermodynamical model. We show that the effect of the anisotropy can be easily assimilated in a temperature shift Ta∗, in analogy to what was proposed by Allia et al. (2001) in the case of interacting nanomagnets. The phenomenological anisotropic Ta∗ parameter can be negative, indicating an antiferromagnetic-like behavior, or positive, indicating a ferromagnetic-like character as seen in the inverse susceptibility behavior as a function of temperature. The study is done considering an easy axis distribution to take into account the anisotropy axis dispersion in real samples (texture). In the case of a volumetric uniform distribution of anisotropy axes, the net effect makes Ta∗ to vanish, and the magnetic susceptibility behaves like a conventional superparamagnetic system, whereas in the others a finite value is obtained for Ta∗. When magnetic moment distribution is considered, the effect is to enhance the Ta∗ parameter, when the dispersion of the magnetic moments becomes wider.© 2017 Elsevier LtdSystematic experiments demonstrate the presence of the kink effect even in FDSOI MOSFETs. The back-gate bias controls the kink effect via the formation of a back accumulation channel. The kink is more or less pronounced according to the film thickness and channel length. However, in ultrathin (<10 nm) and/or very short transistors (L < 50 nm), the kink is totally absent as a consequence of super-coupling effect. For the first time, thanks to the availability of body contacts, the body potential is probed to evidence the impact of majority carrier accumulation and drain pulse duration on the kink effect onset.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline Ni44.5Co5.1Mn37.1In13.3 alloy with coarse columnar-shaped grains and 〈0 0 1〉A preferred orientation was prepared by directional solidification. Due to the strong magnetostructural coupling, inverse martensitic transformation can be induced by the magnetic field, resulting in large negative magnetoresistance up to −58% under the field of 3 T. Such significant field controlled functional behaviors should be attributed to the coarse grains and strong preferred orientation in the directionally solidified alloy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work we study the magnetic states of ternary Ni2CrZ (Z = Al, As, Bi, Ga, Ge, In, P, Pb, Sb, Si, Sn, Tl) Heusler alloys in comparison with Ni2MnZ ones by ab initio methods. It is shown that the Ni-Mn based alloys are ferromagnetic. Contrary, the Ni-Cr based alloys with Z = Ga, In, Tl, Si, Ge, Sn, Pb are compensated aniferromagnets and with Z = Al, P, As, Sb, Bi are ferromagnets. The formation energy of alloys studied is calculated and stable compounds are predicted. The possible martensitic transitions in Ni-Mn and Ni-Cr based Heusler alloys are estimated. Within the Heisenberg model and Monte Carlo technique, the Curie temperatures are obtained. Theoretical results are compared with other theoretical end experimental results.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Stress-mediated magnetoelectric heterostructures represent a very promising approach for the realization of ultra-low energy Random Access Memories. The magnetoelectric writing of information has been extensively studied in the past, but it was demonstrated only recently that the magnetoelectric effect can also provide means for reading the stored information. We hereby theoretically study the dynamic behaviour of a magnetoelectric random access memory cell (MELRAM) typically composed of a magnetostrictive multilayer N×(TbCo2/FeCo) that is elastically coupled with a 〈0 1 1〉 PMN-PT ferroelectric crystal and placed in a Wheatstone bridge-like configuration. The numerical resolution of the LLG and electrodynamics equation system demonstrates high speed write and read operations with an associated extra-low energy consumption. In this model, the reading energy for a 50 nm cell size is estimated to be less than 5 aJ/bit.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.To model magnetization loops of magnetorheological elastomers (MREs) with magnetically hard filler, we consider an assembly of single-domain particles possessing inversion-symmetrical shape and embedded in a soft polymer matrix. To describe the intrinsic behavior of the particle magnetic moments under an applied field, the Stoner-Wohlfarth approach is employed. Unlike the case of solid matrix, the particle in a MRE is able to rotate relative to its elastic environment, so that its equilibrium orientation results from the balance between the magnetic torque (exerted by the applied field at any magnetic moment that does not point along the field) and the elastic torque generated by the matrix. We assume that elastic resistance to the field-induced particle rotation could be presented as comprising of two contributions. The first one is valid for any not perfectly spherical particle and is independent of the particle–matrix adhesion. It reflects the fact that, when trying to rotate, the particle has to “shoulder its way” by deforming the adjoining regions of the matrix. In that case, for angular deviations up to 90° from the initial position, the resistance torque increases. However, as soon as the rotation angle grows up to the value but infinitesimally exceeding 90°, the elastic torque changes its sign and from now on forces the particle to rotate to 180°, where it attains the geometrical position that coincides with the initial one. Evidently, this process is of the barrier type: both orientations of the particle are equal in elastic energy. The second mechanism stems from the “memory” that a given particle has of its initial state and may be caused, for example, by some macromolecules grafted to its surface while curing the matrix of the MRE. This restoring force always tends to drag the particle to its 0° (initial) position. Therefore, the observed magnetization of a MRE sample comes out as a result of joint interplay of the Stoner-Wohlfarth and the two elastic mechanisms. In our simulations, we show that the proposed model in a natural way accounts for the two essential features observed (solely or together) in experiment, namely: (i) weak net coercivity of the MREs, whose filler particles as themselves are highly coercive, and (ii) asymmetric positions of the magnetization loops with respect to H=0 point at the (M-H) plane.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A comprehensive analysis of the phase stability, electronic structure, magnetic and mechanical properties of the Laves phases Fe2Nb and Ni2Nb with C14, C15 and C36 structures has been presented using first-principles calculations. The effects of pressure on the formation energy and magnetic properties of Fe2Nb and Ni2Nb have been discussed. The effects of the composition on the mechanical properties of (Fe,Ni)2Nb have also been discussed. The results show that the electrons in Fe2Nb transfer from Fe to Nb, while the electrons shift from Nb to Ni in Ni2Nb. Fe2Nb and Ni2Nb with C14, C15 and C36 structure are of strong metallicity, and the metallicity of C15 phase is stronger than that of C14 and C36 types. The magnetic moments of Fe2Nb are similar to each other, and the value of C14-Fe2Nb is little bigger than that of the two others. The magnetic moments of Fe2Nb decrease with increasing pressure and the values decline evidently from 0 to 20 GPa. The hardness of C15 phase, with stronger metallicity, is lower than that of C14 phase and C36 phase. For (Fe,Ni)2Nb, the hardness decreases with increasing Ni and the ability to resist deformation increases with decreasing Ni.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Frank-Kasper cage compound EuV2Al20 crystallizes in the cubic structure with Fd3‾m space group and exhibits unusual magnetic and transport properties. The system undergoes an antiferromagnetic transition below 5.6 K wherein the Eu2+ moments are aligned anti-parallel along 〈1 1 1〉 direction and the system exhibits a weak metamagetic transition at the field of 1 T. Arrott plots (M2 vs H/M) show a “S” shaped variation in the low fields below TN and the plausible reason for the occurrence of negative slope is discussed. Isothermal magnetic entropy change is estimated from both magnetization and heat capacity measurements invoking the Maxwell's thermodynamic relations. Temperature variation of ΔSm showed a weak negative minimum and a sign reversal at the field value of 1 T due to field induced metamagnetic transition. Universal master curve is constructed by rescaling the ΔSm vs T curves in the context of analysing the nature of the magnetic transition.© 2017We present a comparative and detailed study of transition metal doping in CaFe2As2. Comparing with several experimental results and carefully analyzing how the states at the Fermi level are affected by doping we show that: i) simulation of real doping and considering induces structural relaxations are crucial to correctly address the physical mechanisms induced by transition metal substitutions; ii) different dopant concentration induces changes on the band structure that can not be described within a simple rigid-band picture; iii) careful comparison with the available ARPES results shows that the main effects on band filling and symmetry can be caught within DFT.© 2017Multilevel resistance switching (RS) effect has attracted more and more attention due to its promising potential for the increase of storage density in memory devices. In this work, the transport properties are investigated in an Au/La2/3Ba1/3MnO3 (LBMO)/Pt heterostructure. Taking advantage of the strong interplay among the spin, charge, orbital and lattice of LBMO, the Au/LBMO/Pt device can exhibit bipolar RS effect and magnetoresistance effect simultaneously. Under the coaction of electric field and magnetic field, four different resistance states are achieved in this device. These resistance states show excellent repeatability and retentivity and can be switched between any two states, which suggest the potential applications in the multilevel RS memory devices with enhanced storage density.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we investigate Second Harmonic Generation (SHG) as a non-destructive characterization method for Silicon-On-Insulator (SOI) materials. For thick SOI stacks, the SHG signal is related to the thickness variations of the different layers. However, in thin SOI films, the comparison between measurements and optical modeling suggests a supplementary SHG contribution attributed to the electric fields at the SiO2/Si interfaces. The impact of the electric field at each interface of the SOI on the SHG is assessed. The SHG technique can be used to evaluate interfacial electric fields and consequently interface charge density in SOI materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, natural convection combined with entropy generation of Fe3O4–water nanofluid within a square open cavity filled with two different porous blocks under the influence of uniform horizontal magnetic field is numerically studied. Porous blocks of different thermal properties, permeability and porosity are located on the bottom wall. The bottom wall of the cavity is kept at hot temperature Th, while upper open boundary is at constant cold temperature Tc and other walls of the cavity are supposed to be adiabatic. Governing equations with corresponding boundary conditions formulated in dimensionless stream function and vorticity using Brinkman-extended Darcy model for porous blocks have been solved numerically using finite difference method. Numerical analysis has been carried out for wide ranges of Hartmann number, nanoparticles volume fraction and length of the porous blocks. It has been found that an addition of spherical ferric oxide nanoparticles can order the flow structures inside the cavity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a steady auto-oscillation in a spin-torque oscillator using MgO-based magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) with a perpendicular polarizer and a perpendicular free layer. As the injected d.c. current varied from 1.5 to 3.0 mA under a weak magnetic field of 290 Oe, the oscillation frequency decreased from 1.85 to 1.3 GHz, and the integrated power increased from 0.1 to 74 pW. A narrow linewidth down to 7 MHz corresponding to a high Q factor of 220 was achieved at 2.7 mA, which was ascribed to the spatial coherent procession of the free layer magnetization. Moreover, the oscillation frequency was quite sensitive to the applied field, about 3.07 MHz/Oe, indicating the potential applications as a weak magnetic field detector. These results suggested that the MgO-based MTJ with perpendicular magnetic easy axis could be helpful for developing spin-torque oscillators with narrow-linewidth and high sensitive.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.FeSiCr/PA6 composites were prepared by injection molding using the FeSiCr powders modified by different phosphating agents and KH550 coupling agent. The resistivity, impact strength, magnetic permeability and magnetic loss of the FeSiCr/PA6 composites were measured. The morphologies of different FeSiCr powders and the FeSiCr/PA6 composites were also observed by scanning electron microscope (SEM). The results showed that 1-Hydroxyethylidene-1,1-diphosphonic acid, phytic acid and H3PO4 could improve the electrical resistivity of FeSiCr powders by forming the dense phosphating layer except diphenylphosphinic acid. However, the resistivity of FeSiCr/PA6 composites using the FeSiCr powders treated by all the four phosphating agents had no obvious increase though the phosphating layer on the surface of FeSiCr powder came into being. The nylon insulation layer had much stronger influence than the phosphating layer on electrical resistivity of the composites. After adding appropriate KH550 coupling agent, the impact strengths of FeSiCr/PA6 composites were significantly improved, which may be associated with the tiny gap between FeSiCr powder and PA6 matrix. The effects of the phosphating agents on the magnetic permeability and loss of the FeSiCr/PA6 were small and the mechanism were also discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we perform a comparison of magnetic and electrical properties between Mn-doped and (Mn, Zn) co-doped GaP dilute ferromagnetic semiconductors. Due to the shallow Zn impurity level (∼20–40 meV above the top of the III-V compounds valence band), the Zn co-doping leads to the increase of conductivity of (Ga,Mn)P, however both the Curie temperature and magnetization reduce, which is probably due to the suppression of active Mn substitution by Zn co-doping.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Gd-Co/Ti multilayers were prepared by magnetron sputtering deposition onto glass substrates. The temperature dependence of magnetization of the multilayered structures depends on the Gd-Co layer thickness. It was shown that the obtained experimental results can be satisfactorily described in the framework of the joint application of models of the “size factor” and the “molecular field”. In addition, the possible effect of the electronic structure of titanium on the average magnetic moment of Co atoms, the efficiency of which depends on the thickness of the magnetic layers was also taken into account.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Sn-Mg co-substituted M-type SrCaLa hexaferrites Sr0.5Ca0.2La0.3Fe12.0−2x(SnMg)xO19 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) have been synthesized by ball milling and calcining. The results of X-ray diffraction show that a single magnetoplumbite phase is exhibited in all the samples and no impurity phase is observed in the structure. Lattice constants (c and a) increase with increasing Sn-Mg content (x) from 0.0 to 0.5. Platelet like structure exhibited by FE-SEM micrographs confirms the hexagonal structure of the synthesized samples. The saturation magnetization (Ms) first increases with increasing SnMg content (x) from 0.0 to 0.1, and then decreases when Sn-Mg content (x) ≥ 0.1. The remanent magnetization (Mr), Mr/Ms ratio, coercivity (Hc), magnetic anisotropy field (Ha) and first anisotropy constant (K1) decrease with increasing Sn-Mg content (x) from 0.0 to 0.5.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The separation of magnetic materials in microsystems using magnetophoresis has increased in popularity. The wide variety and availability of magnetic beads has fuelled this drive. It is important to know the magnetic characteristics of the microspheres in order to accurately use them in separation processes integrated on a lab-on-a-chip device. To investigate the magnetic susceptibility of magnetic microspheres, the magnetic responsiveness of three types of Dynabeads microspheres were tested using two different approaches. The magnetophoretic mobility of individual microspheres is studied using a particle tracking system and the magnetization of each type of Dynabeads microsphere is measured using SQUID relaxometry. The magnetic beads’ susceptibility is obtained at four different applied magnetic fields in the range of 38–70 mT for both the mobility and SQUID measurements. The susceptibility values in both approaches show a consistent magnetic field dependence.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Spin current experiences minimal dephasing and scattering in Si due to small spin-orbit coupling and spin-lattice interactions is the primary source of spin relaxation. We hypothesize that if the specimen dimension is of the same order as the spin diffusion length then spin polarization will lead to non-equilibrium spin accumulation and emergent phase transition. In n-Si, spin diffusion length has been reported up to 6 μm. The spin accumulation in Si will modify the thermal transport behavior of Si, which can be detected with thermal characterization. In this study, we report observation of spin-Hall effect and emergent antiferromagnetic phase transition behavior using magneto-electro-thermal transport characterization. The freestanding Pd (1 nm)/Ni80Fe20 (75 nm)/MgO (1 nm)/n-Si (2 µm) thin film specimen exhibits a magnetic field dependent thermal transport and spin-Hall magnetoresistance behavior attributed to Rashba effect. An emergent phase transition is discovered using self-heating 3ω method, which shows a diverging behavior at 270 K as a function of temperature similar to a second order phase transition. We propose that spin-Hall effect leads to the spin accumulation and resulting emergent antiferromagnetic phase transition. We propose that the length scale for Rashba effect can be equal to the spin diffusion length and two-dimensional electron gas is not essential for it. The emergent antiferromagnetic phase transition is attributed to the site inversion asymmetry in diamond cubic Si lattice.© 2017 Elsevier LtdMulti-gate transistors, such as double-gate, tri-gate and gate-all-around transistors are the most advanced Si transistor structure today. Here, a genuine double-gate transistor with a graphene channel is experimentally demonstrated. The top and bottom gates of the double-gate graphene field-effect transistor (DG GFET) are electrically connected so that the conductivity of the graphene channel can be modulated simultaneously by both the top and bottom gate. A single-gate graphene field-effect transistor (SG GFET) with only the top gate is also fabricated as a control device. For systematical analysis, the transfer characteristics of both GFETs were measured and compared. Whereas the maximum transconductance of the SG GFET was 17.1 μS/μm, that of the DG GFET was 25.7 μS/μm, which is approximately a 50% enhancement. The enhancement of the transconductance was reproduced and comprehensively explained by a physics-based compact model for GFETs. The investigation of the enhanced transfer characteristics of the DG GFET in this work shows the possibility of a multi-gate architecture for high-performance graphene transistor technology.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Hydrolysis precipitation as a new method was used in the preparation of oxide insulation matrix for FeSiAl soft magnetic composites (SMCs). The growth and composition of the matrix can be tuned by the concentration of the Al(NO3)3 solution, reaction temperature and pH value during the hydrolysis. With optimized Al(NO3)3 concentration of 0.6 mol/L and hydrolysis temperature of 75 °C, two mechanisms have been revealed in the formation of the insulation coating depending on the pH of the Al(NO3)3 solution. When pH = 3, the coating layer contains a mixture of Al2O3 and Fe2O3, while Al2O3 and SiO2 form as the coating for pH = 8. Despite that the Al2O3 dominates for both conditions, it grows via different routes. The Al(OH)3 as the precursor forms through Al3+ hydrolysis and heterogeneous nucleation for pH = 3. With increased pH to 8, the Al3+ directly reacts with OH− to form Al(OH)3 colloidal particles which adsorb onto the surface of FeSiAl powders via electrostatic attraction. Both mechanisms give rise to satisfactory magnetic performance with high effective permeability (μe = 103.5 and 113.4) and low core loss (Pcv = 278.4 mW·cm−3 and 237.8 mW·cm−3) for pH = 3 and 8 measured at 100 mT, 50 kHz.© 2017Nanostructures of complex oxides [BiFexMn2−xO5 (x = 0, 1, 2)] have been designed to study their structural, optical and magnetic behaviour. X-ray diffraction data (XRD) revealed orthorhombic phase with Pbam space group. Noticeable expansion in unit cell parameters has been found from BiMn2O5 (x = 0) to BiFe2O4.5 (x = 2). The observed structural changes via tuning of B-site (x = 0–2) played an important role in overall magnetic properties. Transmission electron microscopic images confirm that the average particle size of all the materials are in nano domain range with different morphologies. From optical studies, it has been found that the observed energy band gap values are strongly related to 3d electron numbers. These values appear to be larger than that reported for bulk. Isothermal magnetization plots (at 5 K) show increase in coercivity (Hc) from x = 0 to x = 2. Temperature dependent magnetization studies implied anti-ferromagnetic interactions for BiMn2O5, frustrated magnet for BiFeMnO5 and ferromagnetic behaviour for BiFe2O4.5. Ferromagnetic state of nanostructured BiFe2O4.5 is in contrast with its bulk counterparts.© 2017Tailoring of magnetic domains of Tb-Fe-Co thin films with rapid thermal processing has been reported in this paper. While the as-deposited films show elongated, inter-connected domains with high out-of-plane magnetic phase contrast, the rapid thermal processed films at 550 °C with different time intervals display deterioration of magnetic contrast. A longitudinal extension of domains has been observed with the processing time of 5 min. With subsequent increase in processing time, the domain patterns exhibit considerable decrease in magnetic phase difference combined with strong intermixing between two oppositely magnetized areas. The out-of-plane magnetic contrast is seen to be very weak for the Tb-Fe-Co film processed for 30 min. The domain morphology and the contrast variation have been modeled with micromagnetic simulations, considering the in-plane (along xz plane) tilt of anisotropy axis. The ground state energy profile and the variation in magnetic properties indicate the threshold tilt angle to be around 30° wherein the in-plane and out-of-plane squareness ratio and coercivities are comparable and hence the system shows a spin re-orientation behavior at higher tilt angles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Exchange anisotropy provides a direction dependent mechanism for the stability of the skyrmion lattice phase in noncentrosymmetric bulk chiral magnets. Based on the Fourier representation of the skyrmion lattice, we explain the direction dependence of the temperature-magnetic field phase diagram for bulk MnSi through a phenomenological mean-field model incorporating exchange anisotropy. Through quantitative comparison with experimental results, we clarify that the stability of the skyrmion lattice phase in bulk MnSi is determined by a combined effect of negative exchange anisotropy and thermal fluctuation. The effect of exchange anisotropy and the order of Fourier representation on the equilibrium properties of the skyrmion lattice is discussed in detail.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Bilayers consisting of magnetically hard TbFeCo and soft GdFeCo alloy were fabricated. Exchange-spring and sharp switching in a step-by-step fashion were observed in the TbFeCo/GdFeCo hard/soft bilayers with increasing GdFeCo thickness. A perpendicular exchange bias field of several hundred Oersteds is observed from the shift of minor loops pinned by TbFeCo layer. The perpendicular exchange energy is derived to be in the range of 0.18–0.30 erg/cm2. The exchange energy is shown to increase with the thickness of GdFeCo layer in the bilayers, which can be attributed to the enhanced perpendicular anisotropy of GdFeCo layer in our experimental range.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The static and dynamic magnetizations of low concentrated multi-core iron oxide nanoparticles solutions were investigated by a specially developed high-Tc Superconducting Quantum Interference Device (SQUID) magnetometer. The size distribution of iron oxide cores was determined from static magnetization curves concerning different concentrations. The simulated harmonics distribution was compared to the experimental results. Effect of the diamagnetic background from carrier liquid to harmonics distribution was investigated with respect to different intensity and position of peaks in the magnetic moment distribution using a numerical simulation. It was found that the diamagnetic background from carrier liquid of iron oxide nanoparticles affected the harmonics distribution as their concentration decreased and depending on their magnetic moment distribution. The first harmonic component was susceptible to the diamagnetic contribution of carrier liquid when the concentration was lower than 24 μg/ml. The second and third harmonics were affected when the peak position of magnetic moment distribution was smaller than m = 10−19 Am2 and the concentration was 10 ng/ml. A highly sensitive detection up to sub-nanogram of iron oxide nanoparticles in solutions can be achieved by utilizing second and third harmonic components.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Based on theoretically tight-binding calculations considering nearest neighbors and Green's function technique, we show that the magnetic phase transition in both semiconducting and metallic armchair graphene nanoribbons with width ranging from 9.83 Å to 69.3 Å would be observed in the presence of injecting electrons by doping. This transition is explained by the temperature-dependent static charge susceptibility through calculation of the correlation function of charge density operators. This work showed that charge concentration of dopants in such system plays a crucial role in determining the magnetic phase. A variety of multicritical points such as transition temperatures and maximum susceptibility are compared in undoped and doped cases. Our findings show that there exist two different transition temperatures and maximum susceptibility depending on the ribbon width in doped structures. Another remarkable point refers to the invalidity (validity) of the Fermi liquid theory in nanoribbons-based systems at weak (strong) concentration of dopants. The obtained interesting results of magnetic phase transition in such system create a new potential for magnetic graphene nanoribbon-based devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe explore a prototype of an oscillatory neural network (ONN) based on vanadium dioxide switching devices. The model system under study represents two oscillators based on thermally coupled VO2 switches. Numerical simulation shows that the effective action radius RTC of coupling depends both on the total energy released during switching and on the average power. It is experimentally and numerically proved that the temperature change ΔT commences almost synchronously with the released power peak and T-coupling reveals itself up to a frequency of about 10 kHz. For the studied switching structure configuration, the RTC value varies over a wide range from 4 to 45 μm, depending on the external circuit capacitance C and resistance Ri, but the variation of Ri is more promising from the practical viewpoint. In the case of a “weak” coupling, synchronization is accompanied by attraction effect and decrease of the main spectra harmonics width. In the case of a “strong” coupling, the number of effects increases, synchronization can occur on subharmonics resulting in multilevel stable synchronization of two oscillators. An advanced algorithm for synchronization efficiency and subharmonic ratio calculation is proposed. It is shown that of the two oscillators the leading one is that with a higher main frequency, and, in addition, the frequency stabilization effect is observed. Also, in the case of a strong thermal coupling, the limit of the supply current parameters, for which the oscillations exist, expands by ∼10%. The obtained results have a universal character and open up a new kind of coupling in ONNs, namely, T-coupling, which allows for easy transition from 2D to 3D integration. The effect of subharmonic synchronization hold promise for application in classification and pattern recognition.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe substitution effect on the magnetic behavior of Mn2−xFexBO4 (x = 0.3, 0.5, 0.7) warwickites has been investigated combining Mössbauer spectroscopy, dc magnetization, ac magnetic susceptibility, and heat capacity measurements. The Fe3+ ions distribution over two crystallographic nonequivalent sites is studied. The Fe introduction breaks a long-range antiferromagnetic order and leads to onset of spin-glass ground state. The antiferromagnetic short-range-order spin correlations persist up to temperatures well above TSG reflecting in increasing deviations from the Curie-Weiss law, the reduced effective magnetic moment and “missing” entropy. The results are interpreted in the terms of the progressive increase of the frustration effect and the formation of spin-correlated regions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The well-known method of planar flow casting has been used for preparation single- and tri-layered ribbons of the same composition to attain ribbon thickness significantly different. The aim was to suppress potentially undesired surface effects of chemical or topological differences between ribbon surfaces/volume. The prepared ribbons’ composition was Co47Fe21Mo6.5B21Si4.5 and the samples were investigated for structural, chemical and magnetic properties in amorphous (as-cast) and crystalline state. The average thickness was ∼55 µm for the trilayer and ∼14.5 µm for the monolayer, thus the thickness ratio was somewhat more than 3:1. The composition chosen targeted low saturation magnetostriction and nanocrystallization improved soft magnetic properties more namely for trilayer. The reduction of large surface/volume ratio, that enables shrinking surfaces to squeeze efficiently the small volume of single ribbon, proved effective indeed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ba2−xCuxCo2CryFe28−yO46 (x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, y = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8) X-type hexagonal ferrites were synthesized via micro-emulsion route. The techniques which were applied to characterize the prepared samples are as follows: X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), Dielectric measurements and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The structural parameters i.e. lattice constant (a, c), cell volume (V), X-ray density, bulk density and crystallite size of all the prepared samples were obtained using XRD analysis. The lattice parameters ‘a’ and ‘c’ increase from 5.875 Å to 5.934 Å and 83.367 Å to 83.990 Å respectively. The crystallite size of investigated samples lies in the range of 28–32 nm. The magnetic properties of all samples have been calculated by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) analysis. The increase in coercivity (Hc) was observed with the increase of doping contents. It was observed that the coercivity (Hc) of all prepared samples is inversely related to the crystalline size which reflects that all materials are super-paramagnetic. The dielectric parameters i.e. dielectric constant, dielectric loss, tangent loss etc were obtained in the frequency range of 1 MHz–3 GHz and followed the Maxwell-Wagner's model. The significant variation the dielectric parameters are observed with increasing frequency. The maximum Q value is obtained at ∼2 GHz due to which these materials are used for high frequency multilayer chip inductors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe3O4 nanoparticles decorated MWCNTs @ C ferrite nanocomposites were synthesized using a co-precipitation method and a calcination process. As one kind absorbing material, we researched the electromagnetic absorption properties of the composites that were mixed with a filler loading of 80 wt% paraffin. In addition, we studied the influence of the magnetic nanoparticle content on the absorbing properties. The results showed that the frequency corresponding to the maximum absorptions shifted to lower frequency when the magnetic nanoparticles content increased. The Fe3O4 nanoparticles decorated MWCNTs @ C ferrite nanocomposites with approximately 60% Fe3O4 nanoparticles showed the best electromagnetic absorption properties. The maximum reflection loss was −52.47 dB with a thickness of 2.0 mm at 10.4 GHz.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we have investigated the structural, magnetic and thermoelectric properties of La0.4Bi0.4Ca0.2Mn1−xCoxO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3) manganites. The crystallographic parameters of samples were determined by the Rietveld refinement of powder X-ray diffraction data. It was observed that Co doping results in change of crystal structures from orthorhombic (space group: Pbnm) to rhombohedral (space group: R-3c) symmetry. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) images show smooth, clean and densified structures, depicting good crystallinity of samples. The zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) magnetization data were collected in the temperature range 5 to 300 K under an applied magnetic field of 0.1 Tesla. The analysis of temperature dependent magnetization data reveals all samples to be ferromagnetic with Curie temperatures around ∼77 K. The magnetic hysteresis loops, collected at 5 K, show that the saturation magnetization (MS) values decrease from 43 emu/g to 14 emu/g with increase in Co doping. The high temperature thermoelectric properties of all samples are characteristic of a semiconducting behavior, the small polaron hopping model fitting well with the temperature dependent electrical resistivity (ρ) and thermopower (S) data. The thermopower values change sign from positive to negative as temperature is increased from 313 K to 680 K. The maximum thermoelectric power factor (PF = S2/ρ) obtained for x = 0.3 sample at 313 K is 4.60 μW/mK2, is much higher than for the undoped sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Buffer-free, highly textured (0 0 1) oriented CeCo5 thin films showing perpendicular magnetic anisotropy were synthesized on (0 0 1) Al2O3 substrates by molecular beam epitaxy. Ce exists in a mixture of Ce3+ and Ce4+ valence states as shown by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. The first anisotropy constant, K1, as measured by torque magnetometry was 0.82 MJ/m3 (8.2×106erg/cm3). A maximum coercivity of 5.16 kOe with a negative temperature coefficient of −0.304%K−1 and a magnetization of 527.30 emu/cm3 was measured perpendicular to the film plane at 5 K. In addition, a large anisotropy of the magnetic moment of 15.5% was observed. These magnetic parameters make CeCo5 a potential candidate material for spintronic and magnetic recording applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Using micromagnetic simulation we present an analysis about the effects of the microstructure on the angular dependence of coercivity and quadrature. The results return curves profiles that resemble experimental data already reported in the literature. We show that, there is an ambiguity in case of adopting the curve profile of the angular dependence of coercivity as the starting point to assume the predominant reversion mode. We conclude in this study that, to infer any reversal mechanisms always have to take into account the nanowires microstructure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Co(II) and Fe(III) centres magnetically separable two new mesoporous nanocatalyst were synthesised via chemical synthesis method. The transmission electron microscopic studies (TEM) show that, the particles are spherical shape with mean size of 20 nm. The Raman spectroscopy and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) reveals that SiO2 is coating on the surface of the cobalt ferrate nanoparticle (CoFe2O4). The SiO2 coating is efficiently preventing the aggregated collision of nanoparticles. Magnetic measurements show that diamagnetic character of the SiO2 is unaffected to the coercivity of SiO2 coated CoFe2O4 particles. In addition, these nanoparticles are used as nanocatalyst for high yielding, facile and expeditious synthesis of various functionalized 2-arylbenzimidazoles via one-pot condensation. The cascade including imine formation, cyclization, condensation, and aromatization occurs, without addition of any reducing or oxidizing agents. In all situations, the desired product was synthesised with excellent yield. The shorter reaction time, mild reaction condition, simplicity, non-toxicity, safe reaction and easy workup are the impotent merits of this protocol. Statement of Significance In SiO2 coated CoFe2O4 particles SiO2 serves as an efficient capping agent and prevent the aggregation of nanoparticles hence reducing the particle size, this cascade open up with stoichiometric quantity of using SiO2 with unaffected ferromagnetism of CoFe2O4 particles along with reducing the particle size. In addition SiO2 coated CoFe2O4 particles act as a highly efficient nanocatalytic, this method can be extended to the development of other catalytic system used in the synthesis of important pharmacological drungs. Moreover this catalyst employed economic large scale synthesis of cyclization reaction with recoverable and reusable properties without loss of catalytic activity for several cycles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We consider the Bose-Einstein condensation (BEC) of quasi-equilibrium magnons which leads to spin superfluidity, the coherent quantum transfer of magnetization in magnetic material. The critical conditions for excited magnon density in ferro- and antiferromagnets, bulk and thin films, are estimated and discussed. It was demonstrated that only the highly populated region of the spectrum is responsible for the emergence of any BEC. This finding substantially simplifies the BEC theoretical analysis and is surely to be used for simulations. It is shown that the conditions of magnon BEC in the perpendicular magnetized YIG thin film is fulfillied at small angle, when signals are treated as excited spin waves. We also predict that the magnon BEC should occur in the antiferromagnetic hematite at room temperature at much lower excited magnon density compared to that of ferromagnetic YIG. Bogoliubov's theory of Bose-Einstein condensate is generalized to the case of multi-particle interactions. The six-magnon repulsive interaction may be responsible for the BEC stability in ferro- and antiferromagnets where the four-magnon interaction is attractive.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic and ferroelectric properties of nickel and lithium co-substituted barium titanate were investigated in this work. Ba(1−x)LixNix/2TiO3 (x = 0, 0.02, 0.04 and 0.08) ceramics were synthesized via solid-state reaction with the assistance of microwave heating of the starting materials. The tetragonal structure has been observed in all samples, and it is confirmed by the Rietveld refinement study. The morphological study has been carried out by FE-SEM. Electron spin resonance (ESR) has been used to study the electron interaction and to verify the magnetism behavior of present samples. No resonance signal was observed in pure BaTiO3 samples. However, the resonance signal has appeared in the co-substituted samples. The result shows that the electron interactions are strongly affected by Ni2+ and Li+ concentrations. M-H loop was traced using VSM at room temperature. The results confirm that the sample with x = 0 shows an anti-ferromagnetic response. However, a ferromagnetic hysteresis loop arises with co-substitution. The emergence of M-H loops confirms the appearance of magnetic properties in Ni2+ and Li+ co-substituted BaTiO3 ceramics. The origin of magnetic behavior could be due to the carrier-mediated exchange interactions. Room temperature P-E hysteresis loop has been investigated at an applied electric field of 35 kV/cm and 33 Hz frequency. Measurements of room temperature ferroelectric and magnetic hysteresis loops indicate that the Ni2+ and Li+ co-substituted BaTiO3 ceramics show ferroelectricity and ferromagnetism simultaneously.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The perpendicular anisotropy Spin-Transfer Torque Random Access Memory (P-STT-RAM) is considered to be a promising candidate for high-density memories. Many distinct advantages of Perpendicular Magnetic Tunnel Junction (P-MTJ) compared to the conventional in-plane MTJ (I-MTJ) such as lower switching current, circular cell shape that facilitates manufacturability in smaller technology nodes, large thermal stability, smaller cell size, and lower dipole field interaction between adjacent cells make it a promising candidate as a universal memory. However, for small MTJ cell sizes, the perpendicular technology requires new materials with high polarization and low damping factor as well as low resistance area product of a P-MTJ in order to avoid a high write voltage as technology is scaled down. A new graphene-based STT-RAM cell for 8 nm technology node that uses high perpendicular magnetic anisotropy cobalt/nickel (Co/Ni) multilayer as magnetic layers is proposed in this paper. The proposed junction benefits from enough Tunneling Magnetoresistance Ratio (TMR), low resistance area product, low write voltage, and low power consumption that make it suitable for 8 nm technology node.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Three inorganic-organic hybrids have been designed by incorporating epoxy-modified silicone resin (ESR) with SiO2, Fe3O4 and their mixture in the application as the coating of Fe soft magnetic composites (SMCs). The introduced SiO2 nanoparticles are well dispersed in the ESR, while the Fe3O4 tends to agglomerate or even separate from the ESR. Simultaneous addition of the SiO2 and Fe3O4 gives rise to satisfactory distribution of both nanoparticles and optimized magnetic performance of the SMCs with high permeability (124.6) and low loss (807.8 mW/cm3). On one hand, introduction of the ferromagnetic Fe3O4 reduces the magnetic dilution effect, which is beneficial for improved magnetization and permeability. On the other hand, SiO2 incorporation prevents the agglomeration of the Fe3O4 nanoparticles and gives rise to increased electrical resistivity for reduced core loss as well as enhanced mechanical strength of the SMCs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we report structural and magnetic properties of BaSnO3(BSO)(1−x)–CoFe2O4 (CFO)(x) composite (with x = 0%, 1% (C1), 2% (C2) and 5% (C3) in molar ratio) synthesized using nitrate precursor method. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) pattern of the composite powder confirmed presence of both BaSnO3 with the cubic perovskite structure and CoFe2O4 with the cubic spinel structure. No signature of any other phases in pure BaSnO3, CoFe2O4 and composites have been detected either in XRD or energy dispersive X-ray (EDS) analysis. The temperature dependent zero field cooled (ZFC) & field cooled (FC) magnetization and magnetic field dependence magnetization measurements have been carried at room temperature of the pure BaSnO3. We observe a weak ferromagnetic (FM) behavior at room temperature in pure BaSnO3 even though it is non-magnetic in nature. The room temperature Raman spectroscopy and electron spin resonance measurements of the sample confirm the presence of oxygen vacancy and formation of F-center, which is responsible for the FM behavior. The oxidation state and elemental analysis have been carried out using X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). The magnetic field dependence of magnetization of the composite samples reveal increase of saturation magnetization (Ms), remanence magnetization (Mr) and coercivity (Hc) with increase in ferrite content in the composite. Significant enhancement in FM components is observed with lowering of temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The role of intrinsic defects has been investigated to determine binding energies and the electronic structure of Gd complexes in ZnO. We use density-functional theory and the GW method to show that the presence of vacancies and interstitials affect the electronic structure of Gd doped ZnO. However, the strong localization of the Gd-f and d states suggest that carrier mediated ferromagnetism in this material may be difficult to achieve.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A novel approach, continuous needleless electrospinning from the tips of magnetization-induced self-assembling PVA/ferrofluid cone array, was proposed to prepare magnetic nanofibers. A PVA/ferrofluid was synthesized, the needleless electrospinning process was observed, and the morphology and magnetic properties of magnetic nanofibers were investigated. The results showed that the PVA/ferrofluid could remain stable and homogeneous for 21 days under the magnetic field gradient (2.2 mT/mm). “Taylor cone” array of PVA/ferrofluid was self-assembled under both the magnetic and electric fields. As the electric voltage reached 25 kV, the jets were emitted from the “Taylor cone” array, resulting in needleless electrospinning of magnetic nanofibers. Magnetic nanofibers were homogeneous and continuous with an average diameter of 73.6 nm. Magnetic nanofibers showed a good magnetic response property and relatively high saturated magnetization (1.71 emu/g), which is expected to be applied in the biomedical field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We fabricated Gd-doped Y3Fe5O12 (YIG) nanoparticles by a modified sol–gel method. We investigated the effects of isovalent Gd3+-ion substitution on the structural and magnetic properties of Y3−xGdxFe5O12 (0 ≤ x ≤ 3) nanoparticles. Isovalent Gd3+-ion substitution for Y3+ leads to lattice expansion and change in the Fe(a)–O–Fe(d) bond angle. The X-ray photoemission spectroscopy and Mössbauer measurements revealed a high-spin state of Fe3+. The Mössbauer analysis showed an increase in the Fe(d)3+/Fe(a)3+ ratio, indicating a relocation of Y3+ ions at the dodecahedral sites and Fe3+ ions at the octahedral sites. The magnetic properties could be explained in terms of magnetic-structural evolution with increasing Gd3+ content. The field dependence of magnetization indicated a clear decrease of the magnetization while the magnetic anisotropy first decreases and then increases with the increase of Gd3+ content. These Gd3+-ion-substituted nanocrystalline garnet ferrites are suitable for use in a variety of magneto-optical applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.An analytical formulation to compute a magnetic field generated from an uniformly magnetized cylinder ferromagnet is developed. Exact solutions of the magnetic field generated from the magnetization pointing in an arbitrary direction are derived, which are applicable both inside and outside the ferromagnet. The validities of the present formulas are confirmed by comparing them with demagnetization coefficients estimated in earlier works. The results will be useful for designing practical applications, such as high-density magnetic recording and microwave generators, where nanostructured ferromagnets are coupled to each other through the dipole interactions and show cooperative phenomena such as synchronization. As an example, the magnetic field generated from a spin torque oscillator for magnetic recording based on microwave assisted magnetization reversal is studied.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Biocompatible magnetite nanoparticles (MNPs) were prepared by post-coating the magnetic nanocores with a synthetic polymer designed specifically to shield the particles from non-specific interaction with cells. Poly(ethylene glycol) methyl ether methacrylate (PEGMA) macromonomers and acrylic acid (AA) small molecular monomers were chemically coupled by quasi-living atom transfer radical polymerization (ATRP) to a comb-like copolymer, P(PEGMA-co-AA) designated here as P(PEGMA-AA). The polymer contains pendant carboxylate moieties near the backbone and PEG side chains. It is able to bind spontaneously to MNPs; stabilize the particles electrostatically via the carboxylate moieties and sterically via the PEG moieties; provide high protein repellency via the structured PEG layer; and anchor bioactive proteins via peptide bond formation with the free carboxylate groups. The presence of the P(PEGMA-AA) coating was verified in XPS experiments. The electrosteric (i.e., combined electrostatic and steric) stabilization is efficient down to pH 4 (at 10 mM ionic strength). Static magnetization and AC susceptibility measurements showed that the P(PEGMA-AA)@MNPs are superparamagnetic with a saturation magnetization value of 55 emu/g and that both single core nanoparticles and multicore structures are present in the samples. The multicore components make our product well suited for magnetic hyperthermia applications (SAR values up to 17.44 W/g). In vitro biocompatibility, cell internalization, and magnetic hyperthermia studies demonstrate the excellent theranostic potential of our product.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronic, and magnetic behaviors of two-dimensional GeC (2D-GeC) with single vacancy, substitutional B, N, and 3d transition metal atoms (Sc, Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, and Ni) are investigated based on the density functional theory. These impurities are tightly bonded to the surrounding atoms and found energetically more favorable at Ge sub-lattice site. In addition, the electronic band structures and magnetic properties of the doped systems indicate that (i) tunable electronic structures and magnetic moments of 2D-GeC can be obtained depending on different dopant species and sub-lattice sites, (ii) systems such as VC@Sc, VC@Fe, VC@Co, VGe@Fe, and VGe@Co are found to be half-metals, while the other systems all show semiconductor behavior. Simple models of the impurity-vacancy interaction is put forwards to illustrate the origin of the electronic structures and magnetic moments.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report on X-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements carried out in the low-dimensional hexagonal cobaltites BaxA1-xCoO3-δ (A = Mg or Ca, 0⩽x⩽0.20 and δ = 0 or 0.4). Polycrystalline samples have been synthesized by solid-state reaction. The Rietveld refinements of the X-ray diffraction patterns show clearly a phase coexistence of both BaCoO2.6 and BaCoO3 hexagonal polytype structures (space group: P63/mmc), which is dependent on both the dopant ion and doping level. At low temperatures (T<50K), the ZFC-FC data recorded at H = 1 kOe for Ca-doped (x<0.15) and Ba0.80Mg0.20CoO3-δ samples present a broad peak and strong thermal hysteresis. Besides, a second anomaly around room temperature is also observed in susceptibility curves for all samples. Further increasing in the Ca-doping produces a continuous decreasing of magnetization and for the samples with x>0.10 the low temperature hysteresis is not observed anymore. The field-dependence of ZFC-FC curves taken for the sample grown with x = 0 show a displacement of the peak position into low temperature region. Except for the sample grown with x = 0.20, the MvsH loops taken at T = 2 K show multiple steps in the field region ranging -15⩽H⩽15kOe. Finally, the saturation magnetization values are consistent with a low-spin state for the Co2+ or Co4+ ions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic materials with significant permeability and high resonance frequency are a challenge due to the Snoek limit, but it is possible to achieve breakthroughs by inducing superparamagnetism in magnetic nanoparticles. Here, size-controlled monodisperse CoFe2O4 nanocubes (NCs) were successfully synthesized via a facile high-temperature organic-phase method. The superparamagnetic/ferrimagnetic relaxation induced high frequency properties of CoFe2O4 NCs controlled by particle size has been investigated. The resonance frequency of CoFe2O4 NCs increases from 6.0 GHz to 6.3 GHz with decreasing particle size from 40 to 19 nm. With further decreasing particle size to 13 nm, no resonance peak can be observed in the measured frequencies from 4 GHz to 10 GHz, which can be attributed to the superparamagnetic/ferromagnetic relaxation tuned by particle sizes. This finding opens up a straightforward avenue for optimizing high frequency properties of magnetic nanomaterials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Alloyed powders with combination of (Fe67 Ni33)70 Ti10 B20 at different milling times are obtained. Structural, magnetic and thermal characterizations are performed by using X- ray diffraction, scanning electron microscope, energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy, differential scanning calorimetry, transmission electron microscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer. It is indicated that the crystallite size is sharply decreases in the initial stage of milling process and the microstructure tends to nanocrystalline structure with increasing milling time. A rapid drop in saturation magnetization is observed after 48 h milling time, while coercivity value attains to a lowest value of about 33 Oe. Heat analysis of the milled sample at 120 h shows an endothermic peak. The coercivity of the 120 h annealed sample is increased as compared to the starting powders.© 2017This article reports the fabrication of Ni-Ti doped derivatives of Sr2Co2Fe12-2xO22 by economical Sol-gel method. At room temperature X-ray diffraction (XRD) pattern of powder was obtained after sintering at 1050 °C. The XRD analysis revealed the formation of pure Sr-Y hexaferrite phase. It was found that the observed values of dielectric parameters decreased with increasing Ni-Ti substitution. The higher values of dielectric constants and dielectric loss factor at lower frequency were owing to surface charge polarization. In all the samples the resonance peaks were also observed. The observed room temperature DC electrical resistivity found to increase from 1.8x106 to 4.9x109 ohm cm. The observed activation energies values of the fabricated materials are found in 0.52–0.82 eV range. The decrease in dielectric parameters and increase in resistivity of the fabricated samples with substituents suggest these materials have worth application in micro-wave devices as such devices required highly resistive materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ni50Mn35In14.25B0.75 is a typical representative of the family of metamagnetic In-based Heusler alloys which shows large magnetocaloric effects generated from first order magnetostructural and ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transitions. For this alloy, a study of the adiabatic temperature change ΔTad by a direct method and through thermomagnetic measurements in magnetic fields up to 14 T has been performed. It has been shown that the rate of heating/cooling can affect the magnitude and sign of ΔTad. The application of magnetic fields larger than 12 T (on cooling) results in the “kinetic arrest” of the ferromagnetic austenitic phase. The effects of the temperature and magnetic history, and kinetic effects, on ΔTad of these Ni-Mn-In-based Heusler alloys in high magnetic fields are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.An alternative model for a description of magnetization processes in coupled 2D spin-electron systems has been introduced and rigorously examined using the generalized decoration-iteration transformation and the corner transfer matrix renormalization group method. The model consists of localized Ising spins placed on nodal lattice sites and mobile electrons delocalized over the pairs of decorating sites. It takes into account a hopping term for mobile electrons, the Ising coupling between mobile electrons and localized spins as well as the Zeeman term acting on both types of particles. The ground-state and finite-temperature phase diagrams were established and comprehensively analyzed. It was found that the ground-state phase diagrams are very rich depending on the electron hopping and applied magnetic field. The diversity of magnetization curves can be related to intermediate magnetization plateaus, which may be continuously tuned through the density of mobile electrons. In addition, the existence of several types of reentrant phase transitions driven either by temperature or magnetic field was proven.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA complete static and low frequency noise characterization of ultra-thin body InAs MOSFETs is presented. Characterization techniques, such as the well-known Y-function method established for Si MOSFETs, are applied in order to extract the electrical parameters and study the behavior of these research grade devices. Additionally, the Lambert-W function parameter extraction methodology valid from weak to strong inversion is also used in order to verify its applicability in these experimental level devices. Moreover, a low-frequency noise characterization of the UTB InAs MOSFETs is presented, revealing carrier trapping/detrapping in slow oxide traps and remote Coulomb scattering as origin of 1/f noise, which allowed for the extraction of the oxide trap areal density. Finally, Lorentzian-like noise is also observed in the sub-micron area devices and attributed to both Random Telegraph Noise from oxide individual traps and g-r noise from the semiconductor interface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Z2 topological invariant is defined in the chiral d-wave superconductor having a triangular lattice in the presence of the 120-degree magnetic ordering. Analyzing the Z2 invariant, we determine the conditions of implementing topological phases in the model with regard to superconducting pairings between the nearest and next nearest neighbors. It is often supposed in such a system that the pairing parameter between the nearest neighbors should be equal to zero due to the intersite Coulomb interaction. We show that taking into account even weak pairings in the first coordination sphere leads to the disappearance of the gapless excitations of the bulk spectrum in the wide region of the parameter space. Thus, topological invariants can be defined in this region. In solving the problem of open edges it is shown that the zero energy modes are realized basically in the topologically nontrivial phases. Such zero modes are topologically protected Majorana modes. A connection between the Z2 invariant and the integer topological invariant of the ground state of the 2D lattice is established in the presence of the electron–hole symmetry and noncollinear magnetic ordering.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The ability to modulate the life process of stem cells conjugated with MNPs via a magnetic field is promising as multifunctional tool in biomedicine. Experiment on mice demonstrates the high accumulation of iron ions measured via stripping voltammetry in the bone marrow in respect to bone, liver or kidney. Therefore, the potential cytotoxic effects of iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) on bone marrow cells become more predictable in comparison with the other examined cells. This study examined in vitro responses of mouse bone marrow-derived granulocyte–macrophage committed stem cells (colony-forming units of granulocytes and macrophages, CFU-GM) to a controlled amount of MNPs prepared by the exploding wire method; and to a moderate static magnetic field (SMF) of about 160 Oe. The moderate SMF did not affect CFU-GM capacity. Two different regimes of bone marrow cells cultivation with MNPs were investigated. Remarkably, adding MNPs to cells either decreased (1st cultivation regime, 6 pg MNPs per 1 cell) or enhanced (2nd regime, 20 pg MNPs per 1 cell) the colony-forming activity of CFU-GM, depending on the regimes of cultivation. The action of a moderate SMF on cells cultivated with MNPs inverts their effects on stem cell colony formation. Possible mechanisms of these phenomena are discussed. The main pathway was explained by a change in the presence of iron, either inside or outside of the cell, following the formation of free radicals susceptible to SMFs. Nanoscale magnetite activity within the pool of bipotent hemopoietic stem cells supports its proposed usage as supplement in cell technologies, theranostics, bone marrow repair and regenerative medicine. Further study is necessary to examine the intra- and intercellular mechanisms of the SMF's modulating effect on stem cell activity caused by magnetite MNPs.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Low-dimensional (0D and 1D) molecular nanomagnets involving homoleptic cyanometallates as orbitally degenerate causing highly anisotropic magnetic exchange interactions are considered. Special attention payed to the origins of the magnetic anisotropy for two groups of metalloligands. The first includes hexacyanometallates of Fe, Ru and Os having octahedral geometry of coordination polyhedron, while the second integrates the heptacyano complexes of Mo and Re in pentagonal bipyramid coordination environment.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The site preference, electronic structure, magnetic properties and martensitic transformation of all-d-metal Heusler alloys Zn2YMn (Y = Fe, Co, Ni, Cu) have been investigated by first-principles calculations. In these alloys L21 structure is found to be more stable compared with XA, in which two Zn atoms prefer occupying the equilibrium A, C sites in the lattice. The total spin moments of Zn2YMn are all larger than 3μB and mainly come from the contribution of Mn. The contributions from Zn atoms are small for its low-lying d states, which do not hybridize with the d states of other atoms directly. Further calculation reveals that the tetragonal martensitic type Zn2YMn (Y = Fe, Co, Ni) can relax the total energy and are more stable than the cubic phase. The energy difference ΔEM between the cubic austenite and tetragonal martensite is as high as 0.31 eV in Zn2FeMn and decreases as Y atom varies from Fe to Ni. In martensitic type Zn2FeMn and Zn2CoMn, a quite large c/a ratio is observed, which is preferable for transformation strain effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Topological phase of Gd1−xYxAuPb (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) alloys have been studied utilizing density function theory by WIEN2k code. The generalized gradient approximation (GGA), generalized gradient approximation plus Hubbard parameter (GGA + U), Modified Becke and Johnson (MBJ) and GGA Engel-vosko in the presence of spin orbit coupling have been used to investigate the topological band structure of Gd1−xYxAuPb alloys at zero pressure. The topological phase and band order of these alloys within GGA and GGA + U approaches under hydrostatic pressure are also investigated. We find that under hydrostatic pressure in some percentages of Gd1−xYxAuPb (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) alloys in both GGA and GGA + U approaches, the trivial topological phase is converted into nontrivial topological phase. In addition, the band inversion strength versus lattice constant of these alloys is studied. Moreover, the schematic plan is represented in order to show the trivial and nontrivial topological phase of Gd1−xYxAuPb (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) alloys in both GGA and GGA + U approaches.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Arrays of magnetic nanowires in porous alumina can be used to store information inscribed on the system by orienting the magnetization of selected wires pointing in a desired direction, so symbols can be read as ferromagnetic sectors. However, this information is subject to aging and the stored information could be gradually lost. We investigate here two mechanisms proposed to improve the prevalence of the stored information: opposite ferromagnetic band at the center of the symbol and bi-segmented nanowires acting as two layers of nanowires storing the same information. Both mechanisms prove to increase resistance to the action of external magnetic fields for the case of Ni wires in a geometry compatible with actually grown nanowires. Advantages and disadvantages of these mechanisms are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline Ni0.25Cu0.30Zn0.45DyxFe2−xO4 (x = 0.0, 0.025, 0.05, 0.075, 0.1 and 0.125 mol) ferrimagnetic oxides have been synthesized by sol-gel autocombustion route. X-ray diffraction study reveals the formation of spinel cubic structure with an expansion of the unit cell by Dy addition. Bertaut method was employed to propose the site occupancy i.e. cation distribution for elements at A-tetrahedral and B-octahedral sites of spinel lattice. The intrinsic vibrational absorption bands i.e. υ1 (712–719 cm−1) and υ2 (496–506 cm−1) are observed for tetrahedral and octahedral sites respectively. The microstructural aspect confirms the formation of an average grain size (∼7–99 nm) with presence of expected elements. Magnetization studies reveal that the magnetic moments are no longer linear but exhibit canting effect due to spin frustration. The frequency dispersion spectrum of initial permeability has been explained based on grain size, saturation magnetization and anisotropy constant. Thermal hysteresis curve (initial permeability versus temperature) indicates magnetic disordering to paramagnetic state at Néel temperature (TN). High values of TN show that the present ferrite samples are cation-ordered with d-electrons contributing towards the magnetic interaction at the sublattice.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic, magneto-transport and magnetocaloric properties of antiferromagnetic intermetallic compound NdCo2Si2 (TN=32K) have been studied. The compound yields a positive magnetoresistance (MR) of about ∼123% at ∼5K in 8 T magnetic field. The MR value is significantly large vis – a – vis earlier reports of large MR in intermetallic compounds, and possibly associated with the changes in magnetic structure of the compound. The large MR value can be explained in terms of field induced pseudo-gaps on Fermi surface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Single and fixed size core, core–shell nanoparticles of iron oxides coated with a silica layer of tunable thickness were prepared by chemical routes, aiming to generate a frame of study of magnetic nanoparticles with controlled dipolar interactions. The batch of iron oxides nanoparticles of 4.5 nm radii, were employed as cores for all the coated samples. The latter was obtained via thermal decomposition of organic precursors, resulting on nanoparticles covered with an organic layer that was subsequently used to promote the ligand exchange in the inverse microemulsion process, employed to coat each nanoparticle with silica. The amount of precursor and times of reaction was varied to obtain different silica shell thicknesses, ranging from 0.5 nm to 19 nm. The formation of the desired structures was corroborated by TEM and SAXS measurements, the core single-phase spinel structure was confirmed by XRD, and superparamagnetic features with gradual change related to dipolar interaction effects were obtained by the study of the applied field and temperature dependence of the magnetization. To illustrate that dipolar interactions are consistently controlled, the main magnetic properties are presented and analyzed as a function of center to center minimum distance between the magnetic cores.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline-BiFeO3(BFO)/Co bilayers were grown by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) and magnetron sputtering, with fast laser annealing under magnetic field. The enhanced exchange bias (EB) had been found in the BFO/Co bilayers (Appl. Surf. Sci. 367 (2016) 418). In order to reveal the origin of the enhanced EB in the samples, X-ray absorption Spectroscopy (XAS) of Fe 2p, Co 2p and O 1s were performed. The Co 2p XAS indicated the increase of Co oxidation state and the Fe 2p XAS of sample A and B under laser annealing processes showed that crystal field splitting energy decreased and led to the weakening of spin-orbit coupling with the increasing of the laser fluence. It was considered that the appearance of the oxidation state of Co and Fe2+ ions and the existence of the unidirectional anisotropy due to the laser fluence was responsible for the results and also for the enhanced EB.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The formation of magnetic bubbles and the domain-evolution processes, induced by a perpendicular magnetic field in Fe/Gd multilayer films and nanodots, have been investigated. At room temperature, the stripe domains in a continuous film transform into magnetic bubbles in an external field, while bubbles form spontaneously in nanodots due to the existence of shape anisotropy. When the temperature decreases to 20 K, the enhancement of the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy of the samples results in an increase of the domain size in the continuous film and the magnetization-reversal behavior of each nanodot becomes independent, and most reversed dots do not depend on each other, indicating the magnetic characteristics of a single domain. The present research provides further understanding of the evolution of magnetic bubbles in the Fe/Gd system and suggests their promising applications in patterned recording materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Lattice distortions can stabilize magnetic ground states not observed in the bulk for thin films of undoped cobalt perovskites ACoO3. We have found that lattice distortions, in the form of tensile epitaxial strain, can stabilize a ferromagnetic ground state in PrCoO3 thin films below 65 K. However, in Pr0.7Y0.3CoO3, which has a smaller unit cell, similar levels of tensile strain are insufficient to induce ferromagnetism. These results indicate the importance of A-site cation choice for Co spin-state and Co-O-Co exchange interactions, offering another dimension to tune magnetic order in thin film cobalt perovskites.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A systematic investigation on the anisotropic grain boundary diffusion in sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets is carried out by micromagnetic simulation. The results indicate that the critical reason for the anisotropic diffusion effect is not the difference in the amount of Dy diffused along different directions but the macroscopic demagnetizing field. The diffusion parallel to the easy axis from both pole surfaces of the magnet can increase the nucleation fields in the two major regions with large macroscopic demagnetizing fields, where the reverse domains can nucleate easily. As a consequence, the grain boundary diffusion along the directions parallel to the easy axis from two pole surfaces is more effective to improve the coercivity of the magnets than that along other directions. It is also found that, to enhance the coercivity, only a limited diffusion depth is required. The present result is in good agreement with the recent experimental findings.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Due to advancements in nanomagnetism and latest nanomagnetic materials and devices, a new potential field has been opened up for research and applications which was not possible before. We herein propose a new research field and application for nanomagnetism for the visualization of dynamic magnetic fields in real-time. In short, Nano Magnetic Vision. A new methodology, technique and apparatus were invented and prototyped in order to demonstrate and test this new application. As an application example the visualization of the dynamic magnetic field on a transmitting antenna was chosen. Never seen before high-resolution, photos and real-time color video revealing the actual dynamic magnetic field inside a transmitting radio antenna rod has been captured for the first time. The antenna rod is fed with six hundred volts, orthogonal pulses. This unipolar signal is in the very low frequency (i.e. VLF) range. The signal combined with an extremely short electrical length of the rod, ensures the generation of a relatively strong fluctuating magnetic field, analogue to the signal transmitted, along and inside the antenna. This field is induced into a ferrolens and becomes visible in real-time within the normal human eyes frequency spectrum. The name we have given to the new observation apparatus is, SPIONs Superparamagnetic Ferrolens Microscope (SSFM), a powerful passive scientific observation tool with many other potential applications in the near future.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we design an ultra-thin absorption coating at the S band, and the total thickness is less than 2 mm. For incident angle less than 30 degree and the whole S band, the reflection is less than −5 dB. The coating is constructed with 4/3 layers of magnetic material with different thicknesses, which are optimized by using genetic algorithm. Analytic and simulation results confirm the correctness of the design.© 2017We have investigated the magnetic properties of the CexY1-xPt Kondo ferromagnetic alloy system in the temperature range from 1.8 K to 320 K. The results of these investigations can be summarized as follows: dc-susceptibility can be described by the Curie-Weiss law at higher temperatures down to about 100 K, but also at low temperatures above the ferromagnetic phase transition. At higher temperatures, the extracted Curie-Weiss parameter, θp, is negative and at low temperature θC is positive. The extracted effective magnetic moment above 100 K increases with the Ce content up to almost the theoretical value of the isolated Ce3+ ion, μ = 2.54 μB, for CePt. This suggests an increase of the hybridization with decreasing Ce content, or said equivalently, it means that the increase of the Kondo interaction diminishes effective magnetic moment. These observations confirm the main conclusions inferred from an earlier transport properties investigation of this alloy system. The corresponding θC differs within 1 K from the Curie temperature, TC, which is determined by the resistivity measurements. The most intriguing result of the investigation of CexY1-xPt is the linear concentration dependence of TC vs. x and, moreover, it is the same as in CexLa1-xPt although in the former system the hybridization diminishes considerably the effective magnetic moment per Ce ion, while in the latter system, hybridization is minor and independent of x. We offer the explanations of these intriguing experimental results.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Skyrmions are emerging topological spin structures that are potentially revolutionary for future data storage and spintronics applications. The existence and stability of skyrmions in magnetic materials is usually associated to the presence of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) in bulk magnets or in magnetic thin films lacking inversion symmetry. While some methods have already been proposed to generate isolated skyrmions in thin films with DMI, a thorough study of the conditions under which the skyrmions will remain stable in order to be manipulated in an integrated spintronic device are still an open problem. The stability of such structures is believed to be a result of ideal combinations of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA), DMI and the interplay between geometry and magnetostatics. In the present work we show some micromagnetic results supporting previous experimental observations of magnetic skyrmions in spin-valve stacks with a wide range of DMI values. Using micromagnetic simulations of cobalt-based disks, we obtain the magnetic ground state configuration for several values of PMA, DMI and geometric parameters. Skyrmion numbers, corresponding to the topological charge, are calculated in all cases and confirm the occurrence of isolated, stable, axially symmetric skyrmions for several combinations of DMI and anisotropy constant. The stability of the skyrmions in disks is then investigated under magnetic field and spin-polarized current, in finite temperature, highlighting the limits of applicability of these spin textures in spintronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.For W-doping amounts ranging from 0.0417 to 0.0833, experimental UV–visible absorption spectra blue shift and red shift results have been reported in the literatures. However, there is few literature reported research on magnetic mechanism. To solve this problem, this study investigates the disagreement about blue shift and red shift results and research on magnetic mechanism. The band structures, density of states, absorption spectra and magnetism have been investigated using first-principles planewave ultrasoft pseudopotential method based on the density functional theory. The calculated results showed that increased W-doping amounts first increase the volumes, and then reduce the volumes, decrease the formation energies, and stabilize the doped system. The band gaps become narrower and the absorption spectrum exhibits a significant red shift in UV and visible light emission. Moreover, the covalent bond vertical to c-axis strengthens, and the ionic bond parallel to c-axis weakens. Increased W-doping amounts decrease the magnetism of doped system. The magnetism of doped system originates from the electron exchange among W-5d, O-2p and Zn-3d orbitals of the W-doped ZnO. In W double-doped system, the ferromagnetic Curie temperature can be above room temperature when the doped system has a longer W-W distance.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The first-principles calculations are implemented to investigate the electronic structures, theoretic hardness and magnetic properties of iron borides and nitrides with four different crystal systems containing hexagonal (FeB2, ε-Fe3N), tetragonal (Fe2B, α″-Fe16N2), orthorhombic (α-FeB, θ-Fe3B, ζ-Fe2N), and cubic (zb-FeN, rs-FeN, γ′-Fe4N, γ-Fe23B6) phase. The calculated lattice parameters using RPBE meet well with the experimental results. The cohesive energy and formation enthalpy values indicate the Fe–X (X = B, N) binary compounds are thermodynamically stable. Meanwhile, the h-FeB2 is most difficult phase for experimental synthesis among these interstitial compounds. Moreover, magnetic properties are discussed and show that the mean magnetic moments of o-Fe3B and c-Fe23B6 with the values of 2.227 μB and 2.256 μB per iron atom are approaching to that of pure iron (2.32 μB) while the c-Fe4N and t-Fe16N2 with the values of 2.51 and 2.48 μB are beyond that of pure α-Fe. The c-FeN phase shows nonmagnetic in zb-style while rs-type shows antiferromagnetic with a value of 2.52 μB. Furthermore, the average bonding length and Mulliken population combined with electronic structures are also analysed in this paper which provide that strong Fe–X and X–X covalent bonds are responsible for high hardness. Finally, the theoretic hardness of X–X, Fe–X and Fe–Fe bonds is predicted by semi empirical hardness theory.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A comprehensive analysis of the critical phenomena for the nominal compositions La0.8Na0.2Mn1-xBixO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.06) was carried out. The critical exponents values were calculated by various techniques such as Modified Arrott plot (MAP), Kouvel Fisher (KF) method and critical isotherm (CI). Comparison of the experimental data with the above theoretical models showed that the critical exponents β, γ and δ for the undoped sample are quite well described by the tricritical mean-field model (TMF). Furthermore, the substitution of Mn by Bi ions led to the increase of γ which approached the 3D-Heisenberg model (γ = 1 325 and β took similar values to those predicted by the TMF model. The validity of the exponents values was confirmed with the scaling hypothesis; the M (T, ε) curves collapse onto two independent universal branches below and above Tc.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The strain-induced magnetism in monolayer MoS2 with vacancy defects has caught great attention, but the effects of charged vacancies have been neglected by current works. Based on first principle calculations, we report on the electronic and magnetic properties of monolayer MoS2 with charged S vacancy and its strain effects. It is predicted monolayer MoS2 with charged S vacancy would undergo ferromagnetic-nonmagnetic-ferromagnetic phase transitions as strain increases from 0% to 6% and to 10%. The magnetism of monolayer MoS2 is related to two vacancy-induced defect states around the Fermi level. The ferromagnetic phase transition occurring in monolayer MoS2 can be attributed to charge transfer between the two defect states. We demonstrate how the ferromagnetic phase transition be controlled by gate electrode and tensile strain.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The spin reorientation and magnetostriction of polycrystalline NdFe1.9 cubic Laves phase compound were investigated. A prominent transition from tetragonal symmetry to orthorhombic symmetry in NdFe1.9 compound was determined by X-ray crystallographic study. Meanwhile, a large spontaneous magnetostriction λ111 of ∼3100 ppm was detected at 15 K, which is larger than the theoretical value of 2000 ppm predicted by single-ion model. NdFe1.9 exhibits larger low-field magnetostriction than PrFe1.9 and TbFe1.9 at 5 K in the magnetic field range of H ≤ 13 kOe, which makes it a promising material for low-temperature applications. The present work might be helpful to discover inexpensive Nd-based high-performance magnetostrictive and even magnetoelectric materials for low-temperature applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe report on the fabrication and characterization of Resistive Random Access Memory (RRAM) devices based on nanoparticles in MIM structures. Our approach is based on the use of indium oxide (In2O3) nanoparticles embedded in a dielectric matrix using CMOS-full-compatible fabrication processes in view of back-end-off-line integration for non-volatile memory (NVM) applications. A bipolar switching behavior has been observed using current-voltage measurements (I-V) for all devices. Very high ION/IOFF ratios have been obtained up to 108. Our results provide insights for further integration of In2O3 nanoparticles-based devices for NVM applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe studied the current-voltage characteristics of percolating networks of silicon nanowires (nanonets), operated in back-gated transistor mode, for future use as gas or biosensors. These devices featured P-type field-effect characteristics. It was found that a Lambert W function-based compact model could be used for parameter extraction of electrical parameters such as apparent low field mobility, threshold voltage and subthreshold slope ideality factor. Their variation with channel length and nanowire density was related to the change of conduction regime from direct source/drain connection by parallel nanowires to percolating channels. Experimental results could be related in part to an influence of the threshold voltage dispersion of individual nanowires.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn order to optimize program disturbance characteristics effectively, a characterization approach that measures top select transistor (TSG) leakage from bit-line is proposed to quantify TSG leakage under program inhibit condition in 3D NAND flash memory. Based on this approach, the effect of Vth modulation of two-cell TSG on leakage is evaluated. By checking the dependence of leakage and corresponding program disturbance on upper and lower TSG Vth, this approach is validated. The optimal Vth pattern with high upper TSG Vth and low lower TSG Vth has been suggested for low leakage current and high boosted channel potential. It is found that upper TSG plays dominant role in preventing drain induced barrier lowering (DIBL) leakage from boosted channel to bit-line, while lower TSG assists to further suppress TSG leakage by providing smooth potential drop from dummy WL to edge of TSG, consequently suppressing trap assisted band-to-band tunneling current (BTBT) between dummy WL and TSG.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Synthesizing stable temperature sensitive magnetic fluids with tunable magnetic properties that can be used as coolant in transformers is of great interest, however not exploited commercially due to the lack of its stability at elevated temperatures in bulk quantities. The task is quite challenging as the performance parameters of magnetic fluids are strongly influenced by thermal aging. In this article, we report the effect of thermal aging on colloidal stability and magnetic properties of Mn1-xZnxFe2O4 magnetic fluids prepared in industrial grade transformer oil. As-synthesized magnetic fluids possess good dispersion stability and tunable magnetic properties. Effect of accelerated thermal aging on the dispersion stability and magnetic properties have been evaluated by photon correlation spectroscopy and vibration sample magnetometry, respectively. Magnetic fluids are stable under accelerated aging at elevated temperatures (from 50 °C to 125 °C), which is critical for their efficient performance in high power transformers.© 2017 Elsevier LtdSince the early 2000s, silicon nanowire field effect transistors are emerging as ultrasensitive biosensors while offering label-free, portable and rapid detection. Nevertheless, their large scale production remains an ongoing challenge due to time consuming, complex and costly technology. In order to bypass these issues, we report here on the first integration of silicon nanowire networks, called nanonet, into long channel field effect transistors using standard microelectronic process. A special attention is paid to the silicidation of the contacts which involved a large number of SiNWs. The electrical characteristics of these FETs constituted by randomly oriented silicon nanowires are also studied. Compatible integration on the back-end of CMOS readout and promising electrical performances open new opportunities for sensing applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdNormally-off AlGaN/GaN-based MOS-HEMT has been fabricated by utilizing damage-free self-terminating tetramethyl ammonium hydroxide (TMAH) recess etching. The device exhibited a threshold voltage of +2.0 V with good uniformity, extremely small hysteresis of ∼20 mV, and maximum drain current of 210 mA/mm. The device also exhibited excellent off-state performances, such as breakdown voltage of ∼800 V with off-state leakage current as low as ∼10−12 A and high on/off current ratio (Ion/Ioff) of 1010. These excellent device performances are believed to be due to the high quality recessed surface, provided by the simple self-terminating TMAH etching.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A nanocomposite of magnetic hydroxyapatite was synthesized and tested as an adsorbent for the removal of copper (Cu (II)) and nickel (Ni(II)) from aqueous solution. The adsorbent was investigated using Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM), Scanning Electron Microscopy equipped with an Energy Dispersive Spectrometer (SEM/EDS), X-ray powder diffraction (XRD) and the Brunauer–Elmet–Teller nitrogen adsorption technique (BET-N2 adsorption). Batch experiments were carried out to determine and compare the adsorption parameters of Fe3O4 and its composite with hydroxyapatite. It was found that the adsorbent is nanostructured and has a specific surface area of 101.2 m2 g−1. The Langmuir adsorption isotherm was found to be an appropriate model to describe the adsorption processes, showing the adsorption capacities of Cu(II) and Ni(II) of 48.78 mg g−1 and 29.07 mg g−1, respectively. In addition to the high adsorption capacity, the fully-adsorbed material could be easily separated from aqueous media using an external magnetic field. These results suggested that the utilization of new hydroxyapatite – Fe3O4 nanocomposite for the removal of Cu(II) and Ni(II) is a promising method in water technology.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.An increasing number of cryogenic devices may benefit from the use of Nd2Fe14B permanent magnets. However, it is necessary to precisely know their behavior because magnetization varies significantly due to Spin Reorientation Transition. In this work, magnetic and morphological characterization of Nd2Fe14B commercial polycrystalline magnets with different quality grades from 5 to 300 K is provided. A set of magnets ranging from N35 to N52 quality have been analyzed. Mean grain dimension as well as material composition elements are provided. Higher quality magnets show smaller mean grain dimensions. Regarding cryogenic temperatures, the well know spin transition effect appears in all the magnets as expected, however, the transition temperature occurs at different temperatures in a range from 112 to 120 K which is lower than those obtained for single crystal samples. Moreover, the relative variation of the remanence from 300 to 5 K is lower than 4% while the maximum expected variation is in average 11%. As extra information, the same analyzes are provided for additional quality grades N40M, N40S, N40SH and N40UH.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, 〈1 0 0〉 textured Co70Fe30 alloy was successfully prepared by directional solidification technique. The effect of heat treatment on magnetostriction and microstructure of Co70Fe30 alloy has been investigated. The Co70Fe30 alloy was annealed in argon atmosphere at 700 °C–900 °C for 9 days and then cooled to room temperature by slow cooling or quenching. The magnetostriction as large as 180 ppm has been achieved for the quenched samples when the annealing temperature is ranging from 820 °C to 860 °C. Structural analyses indicate that the large magnetostriction originates from precipitation of a nanoscale face-centered tetragonal (fct) phase embedded in a body-centered cubic (bcc) phase matrix.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present investigation describes the development of cobalt ferrite nanoparticles having size less than 10 nm, by a sol-gel method using polyvinyl alcohol as chelating agent. X-ray results show all the samples, annealed above 700 °C have spinel structure. The information about phase evolution with reaction temperatures was obtained by subjecting the as-prepared powder for DSC/TGA study. High saturation magnetization of 84.63 emu/g has been observed for a particle size of 8.1 nm, a rare event reported till date. The [Formula presented] versus H curves suggest that the transition from single domain state to multi-domain state occurs with increasing annealing temperature and the critical size for the single domain nature of CoFe2O4 is around 6.5 nm. The estimated critical diameter for single domain particle (6.7 nm) is in good agreement with that (6.5 nm) obtained from Transmission Electron Micrographs. The highest coercivity (1645 Oe) has been found for a particle of size 6.5 nm.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Co-Fe-B particles present a high potential for applications in microwave domain (electromagnetic shielding, toroidal transformer, etc.) due to their special soft magnetic properties like high saturation magnetization, low coercivity, large anisotropy and high magnetic permeability. However, their microwave applications are limited to about few gigahertzes due to the eddy current losses if the size of the particles is larger than few hundred of nanometers. Chemical synthesis method gives the possibility to obtain nanoparticles with diameters from few nanometers to tens of nanometers by varying the parameters of the chemical synthesis. One way to avoids the agglomeration of the particles in the utilization of the polyvinyl-pyrrolidone (PVP) which is acting as dispersant and dimensions controlling agent for nanoparticles. The aim of this paper is to study the influence of the synthesis conditions on the magnetic properties and microstructure of Co-Fe-B nanoparticles prepared by chemical reduction method in order to obtains nanoparticles with magnetic properties suitable for high frequency applications in the 0.1 ÷ 12 GHz frequency range. Co-Fe-B nanoparticles were prepared by chemical reduction of CoCl2·6H2O and FeSO4·7H2O salts in aqueous solution of sodium borohydride (NaBH4) in presence of the polyvinyl-pirrolydone (PVP). The experimental results indicate that the amount of PVP, Fe/Co ratio and the temperature of the chemical synthesis are important parameters which have to be controlled in order to obtain nanoparticles with desired dimensions, nanostructure and soft magnetic properties with suitable properties for high frequency applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic ceramics of Bi0.99Y0.01Fe1-xNixO3 with 0.01⩽x⩽0.05 were synthesized by using a modified solid state reaction method. The crystalline structure and the morphology of the samples were investigated by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and by scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The addition of Y and Ni to the bismuth ferrite (BiFeO3) was found to decrease the average grain size. Ac magnetic susceptibility and the zero-field-cooled (ZFC) and field-cooled (FC) magnetizations were measured for temperatures in the range 5⩽T⩽300 K. Hysteresis loops and an irreversible behavior in the temperature dependence of the magnetization not present in pure BiFeO3 were observed in the doped samples. However, the ferromagnetism was found more likely to be due to the presence of small amounts of magnetite. Nevertheless, the determination of the amount of Fe3O4 in these composite materials is important because it influences the magnetoelectric coupling which is important for some technological applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structure, magnetic and magnetoresistive properties of ferromagnetic phase in partially oxidized FeMn films was studied. The oxidation was performed by annealing of the samples under atmospheric pressure in a gas mixture (nitrogen with 0.5% oxygen) at the temperature of 300 °C. The resulting ferromagnetic phase was isotropic in the film plane. The value of the anisotropic magnetoresistance was similar to the value of the anisotropic magnetoresistance usually observed in films of pure iron. The oxidation of antiferromagnetic FeMn films resulted in the appearance of an exchange bias.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nano drug targeting, with an external magnetic field, can potentially improve the drug absorption in specific locations of the body. However, the effectiveness of the procedure can be reduced due to the limitations of the magnetic field intensity. This work investigates this technique with the Computational Fluid Dynamics (CFD) approach. A single rectangular coil generates the external magnetic field. A patient-specific geometry of the Trachea, with its primary and secondary bronchi, is reconstructed from Digital Imaging and Communications in Medicine (DICOM) formatted images, throughout the Vascular Modelling Tool Kit (VMTK) software. A solver, coupling the Lagrangian dynamics of the magnetic nanoparticles with the Eulerian dynamics of the air, is used to perform the simulations. The resistive pressure, the pulsatile inlet velocity and the rectangular coil magnetic field are the boundary conditions. The dynamics of the injected particles is investigated without and with the magnetic probe. The flow field promotes particles adhesion to the tracheal wall. The particles volumetric flow rate in both cases has been calculated. The magnetic probe is shown to increase the particles flow in the target region, but at a limited extent. This behavior has been attributed to the small particle size and the probe configuration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The temperature for phase transformation of ε → τ in Mn54Al46Cx (hereafter denoted by MnAlCx, x = 0–5) alloys was systematically studied by using the traditional thermal analysis method and a more precise magnetic measurement method developed in this work. The effect of carbon content and cold-rolling on the magnetic properties of the MnAlCx alloys was studied. The onset temperature of massive growth of τ- from ε-phase increases with increasing carbon content in MnAlCx. The carbon content has little effect on the onset temperature of displacive growth of ε → τ but has substantial effect on the displacive growth rate at certain temperature. Pure τ-MnAlCx with varied x was obtained by annealing the ε-phase at optimum temperatures determined by our method. The Curie temperature of the MnAlCx decreases significantly first and then increases slightly with increasing carbon content. The coercivity and the remanent magnetization of the as-prepared τ-MnAlCx increase with increasing x first and become stable at x > 3 and x > 4, respectively. A cold-rolling method was introduced in this work to enhance the magnetic properties of τ-MnAlCx. The coercivity and remanent magnetization of the τ-MnAl after cold-rolling were enhanced up to 4.3 times and 3.3 times, respectively. The coercivity of the cold-rolled τ-MnAlCx decreases with increasing x and becomes stable when x > 2. The remanent magnetization and saturation magnetization of the cold-rolled τ-MnAlCx vary little with x.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The topotactic transformation from magnetite to maghemite sub-microparticles was demonstrated by a variety of techniques that include X-ray diffraction, Raman spectroscopy, electron microscopy, Mössbauer spectroscopy, magnetic measurements, and vis-NIR diffuse reflectance. The physical, chemical, and morphological properties of the particles were correlated with their adsorptive properties in water with respect to arsenic (V). The adsorptive properties of the iron oxide are increased by changing the crystal phases involved, specifically, the transformation of magnetite to maghemite. Maghemite sub-microparticles are capable of efficiently decreasing the arsenic content in water from 100 ppb to below the World Health Organization (WHO) guideline of 10 ppb.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline CoZrxFe2−xO4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3 in a step of 0.05) powders were synthesized by Pechini sol–gel method. The dry gel was grinded and calcined at 700 °C in a static air atmosphere for 1 h. Some tests such as thermo gravimetric analysis (TGA) combined with differential analysis (DTA), fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), X-ray diffraction (XRD), field emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) were carried out to investigate the thermal behaviour, structural bonds identification, crystallographic properties, morphology and magnetic properties of the obtained powders. X-ray diffraction revealed a single-phase cubic spinel structure for all samples, where the crystallite size decreases; the lattice parameter simultaneously increases with substitution of Zr. The results of FE-SEM showed that the particle size is in the 20–70 nm range. The magnetic properties such as saturation magnetization (Ms), remanent magnetization (Mr) and coercivity (Hc) were measured from the hysteresis loops. The greatest amount of saturation magnetization for CoZr0.05Fe1.95O4 sample was 67.9 emu·g−1.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Understanding and controlling of domain wall motion in magnetic nanowires is extremely important for the development and production of many spintronic devices. It is well known that notches are able to pin domain walls, but their pinning potential strength are too strong and it demands high-intensity current pulses to achieve wall depinning in magnetic nanowires. However, traps of pinning can be also originated from magnetic impurities, consisting of located variations of the nanowire's magnetic properties, such as exchange stiffness constant, saturation magnetization, anisotropy constant, damping parameter, and so on. In this work, we have performed micromagnetic simulations to investigate the depinning mechanism of a transverse domain wall (TDW) trapped at an artificial magnetic defect using spin-polarized current pulses. In order to create pinning traps, a simplified magnetic impurity model, only based on a local reduction of the exchange stiffness constant, have been considered. In order to provide a background for experimental studies, we have varied the parameter related to the pinning potential strength of the magnetic impurity. By adjusting the pinning potential of magnetic impurities and choosing simultaneously a suitable current pulse, we have found that it is possible to obtain domain wall depinning by applying low-intensity and short-duration current pulses. Furthermore, it was considered a planar magnetic nanowire containing a linear distribution of equally-spaced magnetic impurities and we have demonstrated the position control of a single TDW by applying sequential current pulses; that means the wall movement from an impurity to another.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Li-doped In2O3 nanoparticles with room temperature d0 ferromagnetism were prepared by a sol-gel method. X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy and photoluminescence were carried out to investigate the effects of Li incorporation on the lattice defects. As the content of Li increases, non-monotonic changes in shifts of XRD peak (2 2 2) and the intensity ratios of indium vacancies related photoluminescence peak (PII) with respect to oxygen vacancies related peak (PI) are observed. Results show that at low doping level (≤2 at.%) Li prefers to occupy In sites, while with further doping the interstitial sites are more favorable for Li. Combined with the consistent non-monotonic change in saturation magnetization, we think that indium vacancies resulting from Li-doping play an important role in inducing d0 ferromagnetism in our Li-doped In2O3 nanoparticles, and the FM coupling is mainly mediated by the LiIn-ONN-VIn-ONN-LiIn chains.© 2017Chromium dioxide (CrO2) is a striking half metal material which may have important applications in the field of spintronics. However, pure CrO2 film is metastable at room temperature and the synthesis process can be only performed in a narrow temperature range of 390–410 °C with TiO2 used as substrate material. Here, we report the preparation and investigation of (1 0 0) oriented Ti-doped CrO2 films on TiO2 substrates. It is found that Ti-doped films can maintain pure rutile phase even after a 510 °C post-annealing, showing much better thermal stability than pure CrO2 films. Ti-doped films can be prepared in a wider temperature window (390–470 °C), which may be attributed to the improvement of thermal stability. The broadening of process window may be beneficial for further improvement of film quality by optimizing growth temperature in a larger range. In addition to the improvement of thermal stability, the magnetic properties of Ti-doped CrO2 are also found to be tuned by Ti doping: saturation magnetizations of Ti-doped films at room temperature are significantly lower, and magnetic anisotropy decreases as the Ti-concentration increases, which is beneficial for decreasing switching current density in STT-based spintronic devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.BaCo1.3Ti1.3Fe9.4O19 ferrite was synthesized by solid-state reaction route. Co and Ti ions were substituted for Fe cation to modify the anisotropy field of the ferrite. The effects of B2O3 and CuO sintering additives on the phase stability, sintering behavior at 900 °C, microstructure development, magnetic and dielectric properties of the ferrite were investigated. The densification of the ferrite at 900 °C was found to increase upon B2O3 and CuO addition. A permittivity of 19 and initial permeability of 11 was obtained in the ferrite containing 5 wt% B2O3 sintering additive. There was a nominal decrease in saturation magnetization of the ferrite with increasing sintering additive. An antenna based on the low temperature sintered ferrite substrate was designed. Antenna parameters such as resonance frequency, return loss, voltage standing wave ratio (VSWR), and bandwidth were simulated and reported. The antenna miniaturization factor (n) was calculated and found n = 11 for the sample with 5 wt% B2O3. The sample containing 3 wt% B2O3 plus 2 wt% CuO showed an impedance of about Zi = 1.© 2017 Elsevier LtdBased on the self-terminating gate recess technique, two different processes featuring gate-recess-first (GF) and ohmic-contact-first (OF) were proposed for E-mode Al2O3/GaN MOSFETs. Increased maximum drain current (Idmax) ∼30% (420 vs 325 mA/mm), field-effect mobility (μFEmax) ∼67% (150 vs 90 cm2/Vs) and reduced on-state resistance (Ron) ∼42% (9.7 vs 16.8 Ω·mm) were observed in the devices fabricated by GF process. Such significant performance difference of GF- and OF-devices resulted from the presence of border traps at Al2O3/GaN interface with a time constant ∼7 × 10−6 s. Experimental results indicated that: (1) the near interface border traps in Al2O3 dielectric significantly affect device channel mobility; (2) a high temperature post-deposition annealing process could effective suppress generation of border traps.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Calcium ferrite nanoparticles with average crystallite size of ∼11 nm have been synthesized by sol-gel method by mixing calcium and ferric nitrates in stoichiometric ratio in the presence of ethylene glycol. As-synthesized nanoparticles were annealed at different temperatures and their structural and magnetic properties have been evaluated. X-ray diffraction studies showed that unlike most ferrites, as-synthesized cubic calcium ferrite showed a slow transformation to orthorhombic structure when annealed above 400 °C. Single phase orthorhombic CaFe2O4 was obtained upon annealing at 1100 °C. Divergence of zero field cooled and field cooled magnetization curves at low temperatures indicated superparamagnetic behavior in cubic calcium ferrite particles. Superparamagnetism persisted in cubic samples annealed up to 500 °C. As-synthesized nanoparticles heat treated at 1100 °C exhibited mixed characteristics of antiferromagnetic and paramagnetic grains with saturation magnetization of 0.4 emu/g whereas nanoparticles calcined at 400 °C exhibited superparamagnetic characteristics with saturation magnetization of 22.92 emu/g. An antiferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition was observed between 170 and 190 K in the sample annealed at 1100 °C, which was further confirmed by Mössbauer studies carried out at different temperatures across the transition.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Spin-polarized transport through a rhombic graphene quantum dot (rGQD) attached to armchair graphene nanoribbon (AGNR) electrodes is investigated by means of the Green's function technique combined with single-band tight-binding (TB) approach including a Hubbard-like term. The Hubbard repulsion was included within the mean-field approximation. Compared to anti-ferromagnetic (AFM), we show that the ferromagnetic (FM) ordering of the rGQD corresponds to a smaller bandgap, thus resulting in an efficient spin injector. As a consequence, the electron transport spectrum reveals a spin valve effect, which is controlled by doping with B/N atoms creating a p-n-type junction. The calculations point out that such systems can be used as spin-filter devices with efficiency close to a 100%.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we propose and fabricate Integrate & Fire neuron circuit for implementing neuromorphic system. Overall operation of the circuit is verified by measuring discrete devices and the output characteristics of the circuit. Since the neuron circuit shows asymmetric output characteristic that can drive synaptic device with Spike-Timing-Dependent-Plasticity (STDP) characteristic, the autonomous weight update process is also verified by connecting the synaptic device and the neuron circuit. The timing difference of the pre-neuron and the post-neuron induce autonomous weight change of the synaptic device. Unlike 2-terminal devices, which is frequently used to implement neuromorphic system, proposed scheme of the system enables autonomous weight update and simple configuration by using 4-terminal synapse device and appropriate neuron circuit. Weight update process in the multi-layer neuron-synapse connection ensures implementation of the hardware-based artificial intelligence, based on Spiking-Neural- Network (SNN).© 2017 Elsevier LtdMOSFET gate length scaling has been a main source of progress in digital electronics for decades. Today, researchers still spend considerable efforts on reducing the gate length and on developing ultimately scaled MOSFETs, thereby exploring both new device architectures and alternative channel materials beyond Silicon such as two-dimensional TMDs (transition metal dichalcogenides). On the other hand, the envisaged scaling scenario for the next 15 years has undergone a significant change recently. While the 2013 ITRS edition required a continuation of aggressive gate length scaling for at least another 15 years, the 2015 edition of the ITRS suggests a deceleration and eventually a levelling off of gate length scaling and puts more emphasis on alternative options such as pitch scaling to keep Moore's Law alive. In the present paper, future CMOS scaling is discussed in the light of emerging two-dimensional MOSFET channel, in particular two-dimensional TMDs. To this end, the scaling scenarios of the 2013 and 2015 ITRS editions are considered and the scaling potential of TMD MOSFETs is investigated by means of quantum–mechanical device simulations. It is shown that for ultimately scaled MOSFETs as required in the 2013 ITRS, the heavy carrier effective masses of the Mo- and W-based TMDs are beneficial for the suppression of direct source-drain tunneling, while to meet the significantly relaxed scaling targets of the 2016 ITRS heavy-effective-mass channels are not needed.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe aim of this paper is to present the out-of-equilibrium body potential behaviour in the Ψ-MOSFET configuration. Consistent measurements in this experimental setup succeeded in providing a substantial understanding of its characteristics in the depletion region. The final objective of this work is to envision this new measurement technique for biochemical sensor applications. Among its advantages, the most important are its simplicity, the good sensitivity, the measurement of a potential instead of a current and the low bias needed for detection compared to the conventional drain current measurements.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe Tunnel-FET is one of the most promising devices to be the successor of the standard MOSFET due to its alternative current transport mechanism, which allows a smaller subthreshold slope than the physically limited 60 mV/dec of the MOSFET. Recently fabricated devices show smaller slopes already but mostly not over multiple decades of the current transfer characteristics. In this paper the performance limiting effects, occurring during the fabrication process of the device, such as doping profiles and midgap traps are analyzed by physics-based analytical models and their performance limiting abilities are determined. Additionally, performance enhancing possibilities, such as hetero-structures and ambipolarity improvements are introduced and discussed. An extensive double-gate n-Tunnel-FET model is presented, which meets the versatile device requirements and shows a good fit with TCAD simulations and measurement data.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.There is a possibility that small metallic contaminants could be mixed with industrial products made of ceramics or plastic resin. If this event occurs in a battery production line, it may result in a recall because of the possibility of fire, in the worst case. Consequently, a detection system for fine metallic contaminants is required. Presently, there are conventional methods such as using an eddy current, a CCD camera and an X-ray. However, these methods are not enough to detect a contaminant of stainless steel. We have proposed a fine stainless steel contaminant detection technique for industrial products. An AC drive magnetic field with a frequency of 1 kHz and a DC bias field were applied. In each of the AC and DC fields differentially connected detection coils were placed and the output signals of the detection coils were recorded and analyzed. A segment of stainless steel (SUS304) wire with dimensions of ∅0.2 mm × L5 mm was prepared as a specimen. Since the signal is highly affected by the M-H characteristics of the specimen, the AC drive field and the DC bias field were varied and optimized so that the largest harmonic signals can be obtained. In the case of without specimen, neither a 2nd nor a 3rd harmonic can be seen. When a specimen was placed in the detection coil, both the 2nd and 3rd peaks dramatically increased due to the non-linearity of the M-H characteristics of the specimen. The peak signal of the 3rd harmonic was three times larger than that of the 2nd harmonic at the optimal condition for each harmonic signal. The reason for this result was investigated and it was found that minor loops arose in the conditions of smaller amplitudes of the AC drive field and the DC bias field as compared to the saturation point of the magnetization of the specimen and that accordingly, the 2nd second harmonic signal was weak.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Dipole-dipole interaction in the arrays of closely packed magnetic nanostrips plays an important role in the magnetization reversal processes and significantly affects the critical fields, spin dynamics, and magnetotransport properties. Shape anisotropy in such arrays leads to the closure of the magnetic flux at the poles of adjacent nanostrips. If to induce the magnetic anisotropy oriented across the nanostrip long axis, this will change the micromagnetic configuration of each nanostrip in the array due to the appearance of the domain structure formed by domains with an antiparallel orientation of the magnetization. In this paper, we study the field-dependent behavior of vortex and Neel domain walls of the laminar domain structure of the dipolarly coupled epitaxial Co/Pd nanostrips with mutually perpendicular anisotropies induced by the atomic steps on the surface and by the long shape of nanostrips. We investigate the effect of dipole–dipole interaction between nanostrips on the magnetization reversal modes and switching fields depending on direction of the applied magnetic field. Our investigation reveals rather complex mechanisms of magnetization reversal of the nanostrip arrays, which can be described using a combination of processes including magnetization curling, transverse domain wall nucleation and motion as well as coherent rotation of spins within domains.© 2017Micron-sized zero-valent iron magnetic particles (MMPs) and iron magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) were used for the synthesis of polyacrylamide (PAAm) ferrogels by radical polymerization in water solution. The interfacial adhesion of PAAm subchains of the gel network to the surface of MMPs and MNPs was determined in model composites, which comprised linear PAAm and magnetic particles. The enthalpy of interaction was evaluated by isothermal calorimetry using thermochemical cycle. MMPs and MNPs differed in the enthalpy of interaction with PAAm. It was positive in the former case and negative in the latter case. It meant that MNPs interacted with PAAm much stronger than MMPs. The enhanced interaction of MNPs with subchains of ferrogel network resulted in lower swelling and higher mechanical strength. Meanwhile the deformation of both types of ferrogels in 420 mT uniform magnetic field was found less sensitive to the interfacial adhesion and to the characteristic dimensions of the embedded iron particles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic metamaterials made of non-magnetic resonators – metaatoms – are an essential part of metamaterial world reacting to the ac magnetic field and being able to demonstrate negative permeability. We describe local permeability distribution in the vicinity of the resonant frequency where effective medium theory is not applicable because of metasurfaces’ finite sizes and the excitation of magnetoinductive (MI) waves. We show that inter-element coupling significantly affects not only MI waves passband but the local permeability distribution.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The adiabatic temperature change, magnetization, heat capacity and thermal conductivity coefficient of a set of commercial purity heavy rare earth metals were measured. The temperature and magnetic field dependences of the adiabatic temperature change and magnetization were measured by direct and induction methods, respectively, in dynamic mode closely corresponding to the operational conditions of working magnetic refrigerators. The temperature dependences of the heat capacity and thermal conductivity coefficient in a constant magnetic field were measured by adiabatic calorimetry and steady-state methods. The obtained experimental results were compared with the literature data on high-purity heavy rare earths magnetothermal properties. The possible effect of the material purity on magnetic refrigerators parameters and ability to use the commercial purity materials in such devices are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present a comparative study of (CoFeB)x(Al2O3)100-x and (CoFeB)x(LiNbO3)100-x film nanocomposites (NCs) with various structure deposited onto a glass–ceramic substrate by the ion-beam sputtering (CoFeB = Co40Fe40B20). NCs consist of the CoFe nanogranules embedded into the nonstoichiometric oxide matrix. For (CoFeB)x(Al2O3)100-x the granules are rounded (2–4 nm in size), whereas for (CoFeB)x(LiNbO3)100-x the granules are strongly elongated along the NC growth axis up to15 nm with the same in-plane size 2–4 nm. In both cases, the anomalous Hall effect takes place and its behavior is similar to the one observed in films with easy-plane magnetic anisotropy. Moreover, the analysis of magnetization showed that for (CoFeB)x(LiNbO3)100-x film there is no any structurally induced magnetic anisotropy, i.e. the magnetic anisotropy of samples is practically entirely determined by their shape. For both NCs along with the ferromagnetic (FM) contribution, additional paramagnetic (PM) component in the total magnetization is observed at T < 20 K; in case of (CoFeB)x(LiNbO3)100-x PM component even exceeds the FM one in three times. We have shown that PM component is caused by Fe2+ and Co2+ ions dispersed between granules with the concentration reaching Ni ≈ 3·1022 cm−3 and explain our results by a crucial role of these ions in the FM exchange between granules forming percolation network as well as in the total magnetization of the system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Barium hexaferrite tablets were compacted at pressures of 50–149 kN/cm2 and subsequently calcined at different temperatures up to 1350 °C for various durations. The compaction pressure has a non-monotonic influence on the calcined sample density and coercivity. The apparent density shows a maximum concomitant to a minimum in coercivity near a compaction pressure of 120 kN/cm2. In contrast the Curie temperature of 459 °C are not influenced by the compaction pressure. The optimized compaction pressure and subsequent calcination temperature for obtaining high-density single phase material is inferred to 108 kN/cm2 and 1350 °C, respectively. The resulting pellets show surfaces of two different sized crystallites in the 3–10 µm and 50–150 µm ranges and grains with cheese-like pores of 5–7 µm in the interior. The interior grain size increases with compaction pressure to up to 150–250 µm, while the pore size stays unaffected.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of adding a low melting point Pr-Cu-Al alloy during spark plasma sintering of melt-spun Nd-Fe-B ribbons is investigated. Regions of coarse grains were reduced and overall grain refinement was observed after the addition of Pr68Cu25Al7, leading to an enhancement of coercivity from 12.7 kOe to 20.4 kOe. Hot deformation of the samples in the spark plasma sintering system resulted in the formation of platelet-like grains, producing crystallographic alignment and magnetic anisotropy. The hot deformation process improved the remanence and energy product but reduced the coercivity. The decrease of coercivity resulted from grain growth and aggregation of Pr and Nd elements at triple-junction phases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Ce2Ni7 type structural PrCo-based films were deposited on Si(1 0 0) substrate by ultra-high (UHV) vacuum evaporation process. The structural and magnetic properties of these films have been performed using X-ray diffraction (XRD), atomic force microscopy (AFM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and magnetic force microscopy (MFM) techniques. Two effects on structural and magnetic properties of PrCo films have been investigated: the effect of the annealing temperature (Ta) and the effect of the variation of the magnetic X-layer thickness. The as deposited PrCo films have a magnetic coercivity (Hc) of about 40–100 Oe. But after annealing at 600 °C, Hc has increased hight about 9.5 kOe for PrCo(X = 20 nm) and 10.2 kOe for PrCo(X = 50 nm) were observed. The magnetic properties were affected by the thickness due to the morphology, also the relationship between the intergrain exchange coupling (IEC), the size and quantity of the PrCo grains. The hight extrinsic properties of Hc = 10.2 kOe, maximum energy product (BH)max of 5.12 MGOe and remanence ratio Mr/Ms = 0.53 are reported for the PrCo(X = 50 nm) films. These properties are highly desirable for extremely high-density magnetic recording media applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the current study, the number density and size of non-metallic precipitates and the size of grains on the core loss of the 50W800 non-oriented electrical silicon steel sheets were investigated. The number density and size of precipitates and grains were statistically analyzed using an automatic scanning electron microscope (ASPEX) and an optical microscope. Hypothesis models were established to reveal the physical feature for the function of grain size and precipitates on the core loss of the steel. Most precipitates in the steel were AlN particles smaller than 1 μm so that were detrimental to the core loss of the steel. These finer AlN particles distributed on the surface of the steel sheet. The relationship between the number density of precipitates (x in number/mm2 steel area) and the core loss (P1.5/50 in W/kg) was regressed as P1.5/50 = 4.150 + 0.002 x. The average grain size was approximately 25–35 μm. The relationship between the core loss and grain size (d in μm) was P1.5/50 = 3.851 + 20.001 d−1 + 60.000 d−2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A study of the magnetotransport properties of a high-quality FeSe crystal in a wide temperature range and in magnetic fields up to 50 T shows that the main electron-like and hole-like bands have very similar values of carrier density and mobility, indicating good electron-hole symmetry in this compound. In addition to the main two bands, there is also a tiny, highly mobile, electron-like band which is responsible for the non-linear behavior of ρxy(B) at low temperatures and some other peculiarities of FeSe. We observe the inversion of the ρxx temperature coefficient at a magnetic field higher than about 20 T which is an implicit confirmation of the electron-hole symmetry in the main bands.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this contribution we present a molecular dynamics study of a microgel colloidal particle filled with magnetic nanobeads. The microgel is constructed of crosslinked polymer chains, some beads of which are magnetic. We vary the concentration of magnetic particles and the degree of crosslinking in the microgel to analyse the influence of both factors on the radius of gyration, microstructure and the initial magnetic susceptibility of our soft magnetic colloid. We show that even for a loosely crosslinked microgel, the concentration of magnetic filler must be rather high in order for the magnetic dipolar interactions to affect the shape and the internal structure of the soft colloid.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Mixed Co2Mn1−xBixO4 (x = 0, x = 0.05 and x = 0.1) samples were prepared by the sol–gel method using the citric acid route and characterized by various techniques. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Raman spectroscopic analyses confirmed the formation of inverse spinel cubic structure with Fd3‾m space group. The introduction of Bismuth (Bi) into Co2MnO4 did not modify the ferrimagnetic character of the parent compound Co2MnO4, whereas the field-cooled magnetizations MFC and the Curie temperature Tc decreased when increasing the Bi content. The electrical properties showed an activation energy (Ea) increase caused by the decrease of the double-exchange interaction following the substitution of Mn3+ by Bi3+. Eventually, the temperature coefficient of resistance (TCR) shows significant values for all samples can be investigated also as good candidates for bolometer applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe investigation of the Dual-k spacer through comparative analysis of single nanowire-FET(NWFET)/3-stack NWFET and underlap/overlap channel is conducted. It is known that the dug 3-stack NWFET has better delay characteristics than single NWFET with the use of high permittivity material of Cin in Dual-k spacer structure. In addition, there is no difference of delay between overlap and underlap channel when it used Dual-k spacer structure but underlap channel of Dual-k 3-stack NWFET shows better short channel immunity.© 2017In this study, nanocrystalline BaCryFe12−yO19 (0.0 ≤ y ≤ 1.0) hexaferrite powders were prepared by sol–gel auto combustion method and the effect of Cr3+ ion substitution on morphology, structure, optic and magnetic properties of Barium hexaferrite were investigated. X-ray powder diffraction (XRD) analyses confirmed the purity of all samples. The XRD data shows that the average crystallite size lies between 60.95 nm and 50.10 nm and same was confirmed by Transmission electron microscopy. Transmission electron and scanning electron microscopy analyses presented the hexagonal morphology of all products. The characteristic hysteresis (σ-H) curves proved the ferromagnetic feature of as grown nanoparticle samples. Specific saturation magnetization (σs) drops from 46.59 to 34.89 emu/g with increasing Cr content while the coercive field values lie between 770 and 1652 Oe. The large magnitude of the magnetocrystalline (intrinsic) anisotropy field, (Ha) between 11.0 and 12.6 kOe proves that all products are magnetically hard. The energy band gap values decrease from 2.0 eV to 1.84 eV with increasing Cr content. From 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy, the variation in line width, isomer shift, quadrupole splitting and hyperfine magnetic field values were determined and discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We prepared five Nd2Fe14B sintered magnets with similar saturation polarizations (Js) of 1.38–1.43 T and anisotropy fields (Ha) of 6.76–8.52 T, but different grain sizes (DAV) of 3.1–8.4 μm in diameter and obviously different coercivities (μ0Hc) of 0.8–1.6 T. The observed difference in coercivity could not be explained by the Kronmüller equation, because of the similar Ha values and similar chemical compositions and microstructures resulting from similar preparation method except DAV. The Hc values themselves, however, are inversely proportional to DAV. During demagnetization after magnetization in a 5 T pulse field, domain wall motion (DWM) was observed except in the sample with μ0Hc = 1.6 T by using our step method. The DWM was also confirmed by susceptibility measurements using a custom-built vibrating sample magnetometer, and DWM was generated in the reproduced multi-domain regions (RMDR) during demagnetization. The magnitude of DWM as a polarization change in the RMDR was inversely proportional to the coercivities of the samples. Therefore, it should be considered that the propagation of the nucleated region through the grain boundary, which corresponds to the expansion process in previous studies, was different caused by, first, the difference in DAV, and, second, in grain boundary state which was varied by difference in final annealing temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Owing to its high-sensitivity, reliability, fast, versatile and cost-effective operation, vibrating sample magnetometers (VSM) are massively popular characterization instruments at Magnetism laboratories worldwide. Nevertheless, the inherent appearance of synchronous noise represents a major drawback, which critically limits the fine probing of nanometer-sized media. I here report on an innovative approach to eliminate synchronous noise in VSM. This consists of fitting engineered mechanical devices that absorbs vibration energy, dissipating that into heat. Complementarily, a novel transversal pick-up coil system is also presented and analyzed; this detection system has been engineered to enhance the noise-to-signal ratio and optimized for measuring small size thin film samples. The implementation of a combined mechanical and electromagnetic approach enables to notably enhance the VSM performance, achieving a sensitivity better than 1×10-6 emu and a resolution below 5×10-8 emu, so that the magnetization vector in nanostructured media can be accurately mapped out down to cryogenic temperatures. I lastly show precision magnetometry measurements carried out in an epitaxial (0 0 1)-oriented 200 nm-thick Ni thin film. The analysis reveals the arising of an in-plane dominating strain-induced uniaxial magnetic anisotropy, K2ef=-6.455kJ m-3, and a stunning piezo-spin-polarization effect resulting in a remarkable 10% modulation of the magnetization vector, ∼27 emu/cm3, with respect to the cubic lattice axes. Both effects are attributed to the likely existence of an orthorhombic lattice distortion, i.e. εxx-εyy≈-2×10-3. This categorical link enables to assign the observed anisotropic spin-polarization in the Ni overlayer to a two-ion magnetoelastic coupling effect.© 2017Magnetic excitations and exchange interactions in multiferroic NdFe3(BO3)4 were studied by inelastic neutron scattering in the phase with commensurate antiferromagnetic structure. The observed spectra were analyzed in the frame of the linear spin-wave theory. It was shown that only the model, which includes the exchange interactions within eight coordination spheres, describes satisfactorily all observed dispersion curves. The calculation showed that the spin-wave dynamics is governed by the strongest antiferromagnetic intra-chain interaction and three almost the same inter-chain interactions. Other interactions, including ferromagnetic exchange, appeared to be insignificant. The overall energy balance of the antiferromagnetic inter-chain exchange interactions, which couple the moments from the adjacent ferromagnetic layers as well as within a layer, stabilizes ferromagnetic arrangement in the latter. It demonstrates that the pathway geometry plays a crucial role in forming of the magnetic structure.© 2017Exchange bias properties of NiFe/FeMn thin films have been investigated through X-ray diffraction, hysteresis loops, angular measurements of anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) and magnetic torque. As first predicted by Meiklejohn and Bean we found a decrease on the bias field as the NiFe layer thickness increases. However such reduction is not as strong as expected and it was attributed to the increase on the number of uncompensed antiferromagnetic spins resulting from the increase on the number of FeMn grains at the interface as the thickness of the NiFe layer is increased. The angular evolution of AMR and the magnetic torque were calculated and compared to the experimental ones using the minimization of the free magnetic energy and finding the magnetization equilibrium angle. The free energy, for each grain of the polycrystalline sample, is composed by the following terms: Zeeman, uniaxial, unidirectional and the rotatable energies. While from the AMR curves we obtain stable anisotropy fields independently on the measuring fields, from the torque curves we obtain increasing values of the uniaxial and rotatable fields, as the measuring field is increased. These results were attributed to the physical origin and sensitivity of the two different techniques. Magnetoresistance is mainly sensitive to the inner portion of the ferromagnetic layer, and the torque brings out information of the whole ferromagnetic layer including the interface of the layers. In this way, we believe that the increase in the uniaxial and rotatable values were due to an increase on the volume of the ferromagnetic layer, near the interfaces, which is made to rotate with the measuring field. Studying the rotational hysteresis by both techniques allows to separately obtain the contributions coming from the inner portion of ferromagnetic layer and from the interface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this contribution, we discuss the experimental results obtained for seven ferrofluid samples with the same particle size distribution that differ only in concentration of magnetic material. The dynamic response to a weak linearly-polarised probing AC field is measured for each sample at five different temperatures. We investigate Cole-Cole diagrams and phase shifts in order to describe the impact of ferroparticle concentration on the initial magnetic susceptibility. Our findings show that the main contribution comes from the increasing effective viscosity of the ferrofluid that results in the growth of the Brownian relaxation time. This mechanism is very important for the systems containing even a small portion of large magnetic colloids. The influence of dipolar correlations was separately analysed using computer simulations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of intermediate interfacial oxidation on the in-plane magnetization of multilayer stack Pt/Co/Gd2O3, on a p-type silicon substrate, has been investigated by magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) measurements, the anomalous Hall effect, and magnetoresistance measurements. While voltage controlled perpendicular magnetic anisotropy of a metal/oxide heterostructure is known, this heterostructure displays an inverse relationship between voltage and coercivity. The anomalous Hall effect demonstrates a significant change in hysteresis, with the applied bias sign. There is a higher perpendicular magnetic anisotropy with positive bias exposure.© 2017Cobalt ferrite nanoparticles CoFe2O4 were synthesized using the thermal decomposition method; subsequently the NPs were functionalized using poli vinyl pyrrolidone (PVP) cetyl trimethyl ammonium bromide (CTAB) and polyethylene glycol (PEG) as dispersing agent. Surface modification with silica SiO2 was made using the Stöber method and tetraethyl orthosilicate (TEOS) as precursor. The purpose of this study is to investigate the influence of the different dispersing agents on the structure and therefore on the magnetic properties of the CoFe2O4/SiO2 nanocomposites. Structural characterization was carried out using: X-ray diffraction (XRD), infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). Magnetic properties were evaluated using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) at room temperature. Our results revealed that the structural and magnetic properties of the CoFe2O4/SiO2 nanocomposites were significantly different depending of the type of dispersing agents used before the surface modification with silica SiO2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.As an important parameter for characterizing the magnetization dynamics, Gilbert damping constant α in a thin film or a multilayer is generally extracted from the linear fitting of the frequency-dependence of the ferromagnetic resonance linewidth, sometimes accompanied with a tiny deviation of the linewidth to a smaller value at the low-frequency or high-frequency region due to the two-magnon scattering with an in-plane-field configuration, in which an in-plane magnetic field H perpendicular to a microwave field h was applied in film plane during measurement. In contrast, here we report, in ultrathin Gd/Cr/Fe multilayers, an anomalously large linewidth in the film plane at the low-frequency region. For the first time, we have successfully extracted the Gilbert damping constant from perfect theoretical fitting to the experimental data, by considering the effective direction of the magnetization around in precession staying out of the film plane when the in-pane H at which the precession starts is below the saturation field. This magnetization deviation from the film plane is found to have an obvious contribution to the enhanced linewidth caused by two magnon scattering, while slightly reduce the intrinsic linewidth. Under the same resonance frequency, the deviation angle reaches the maximum values at tCr = 1.0 nm while decreases when tCr increases to 1.5 nm, which coincides with the trend of the surface perpendicular anisotropy constant K⊥. A reduced intrinsic damping constant α is obtained as the introduction of Gd layer and Cr layer as a result of the competition between the spin pumping effect and the interfacial effects at the Fe/Gd and Fe/Cr interfaces. While the decreasing α for film with Cr layer thickness increasing to 1.5 nm might means the contribution of the electron density of states at the Fermi energy n(EF). This study offers an effective way to accurately obtain the intrinsic damping constant of spintronic materials/devices, which is essential for broad applications in spintronics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We synthesized YMnO3 and ZnFe2O4 composites, (1-x)YMnO3/x(ZnFe2O4) with x = 0, 0.05, 0.10, and 0.15 by high temperature sintering. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns indicate the successful formation of composites. Weak ferromagnetism is manifested below Néel temperature (TN) for pristine YMnO3, according to (M-H) study performed at 10 K. For (1-x)YMnO3/xZnFe2O4 (x = 0.05, 0.10, 0.15) a thin coercivity is observed in all compositions, due to short range magnetic ordering at low temperature after the insertion of ZnFe2O4. For pristine YMnO3 explicit divarication between FC-ZFC curves is observed, with crimps observed in both FC and ZFC curves at 75 K, which is the TN of YMnO3. For 1-x(YMnO3)/x ZnFe2O4 composites (x = 0.05, 0.10, 0.15) crimps are perceived only in ZFC curves at slightly varying values of 39.8, 42.32 and 45.63 K respectively. Anomalous peaks are observed in high temperature dielectric curves above 400 K for 1-x(YMnO3)/xZnFe2O4 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15) composites due to Maxwell-Wagner relaxation effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper discusses two different mechanisms of temperature effects on magnetoimpedance (MI), namely, the internal stress relaxation upon heating and critical behavior of magnetic parameters near the Curie temperature Tc. When a microwire is heated, the residual stress is partially released changing the effective anisotropy, which inevitably leads to the temperature dependence of hysteresis and MI. A very large change in impedance up to 200% with moderate temperature increase (50–70 °C) occurs in microwires of Co66.94Fe3.83Ni1.44 B11.51Si14.59Mo1.69 compositions with high Tc≈340°C where the magnetostriction changes a sign from negative to positive due to stress relaxation. Proper annealing is demonstrated to stabilize such temperature variations in MI. Near the Curie temperature, the impedance undergoes large variations due to a corresponding drop in the magnetization saturation and magnetic anisotropy. The theoretical modelling reveals an increase in the dc initial permeability when approaching Tc, which results in different temperature behaviours of MI at low and high frequencies. This was confirmed experimentally for Co23.67Fe7.14Ni43.08B13.85Si12.26 amorphous microwires (Tc = 62 °C): at a frequency of 10 MHz the impedance increases with temperature until very close proximity of Tc, whilst at a frequency of 300 MHz it continuously decreases with increasing temperature. Controlling the value of Tc the impedance temperature dependence can be realized in the industrial temperature range of 20–100 °C. This has potential applications for developing embedded miniature temperature sensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the microstructure, phase formation behavior of the NaZn13-type 1:13 phase and related magnetocaloric effect have been investigated in La0.6Ce0.4Fe11.0Si2.0 as-cast bulk and melt-spun ribbons with different cooling rates. A multi-phase structure consisting of 1:13, α-Fe and La-rich phases is observed in the induction-melted sample with slow cooling. By fast cooling in the melt spinning processing, the La-rich phase can be almost eliminated and thus 1:13 phases with volume fraction as high as 74.4% directly form in the absence of further heat treatment. The resulting maximum magnetic entropy change of 3.1 J/kg K in 2 T field appears at its Curie temperature of 210 K for the La0.6Ce0.4Fe11.0Si2.0 ribbon prepared in 25 m/s.© 2017The study reports the tuning of magnetic and structural properties of nano-sized CoCrFeO4 via post-annealing treatment. CoCrFeO4 nano-powder has been prepared by solution self-combustion method. The structural and magnetic properties have been studied over a range of annealing temperatures (300–900 °C). The formation of the phase pure CoCrFeO4 spinel has been confirmed from powder XRD analysis. The crystallite size is observed to increase with an increase in annealing temperature. On annealing, the value of magnetic parameters-remanence, coercivity and saturation magnetization have enhanced. All the samples exhibit irreversibility at low-temperature measurements.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We analyze the applications of the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) achieved with advanced magnetic materials and technologies. New results such as the use of MCE-based composite material for 'smart’ coating of implants, which allows for a controlled release of drugs over time. The material is comprised of two layers: the one manifesting a large MCE and the other made of a temperature-responsive polymer containing the drug. The latter is released by the polymer if the temperature induced by magnetic field (due to MCE) is changed. The polymer undergoes sharp phase transition in response to the slight temperature drop of ∼1–3 °C (down to 34–36 °C in the body). Local cooling is achieved with FeRh alloy, one of the most perspective MCE materials with the first order phase transition. It is critically important to take into account several peculiarities of phase transition and MCE behavior in these series of alloys. Recent studies on high-purity samples showed an ‘irreversible’ effect of MCE indicating that the temperature of FeRh does not return to its initial value after the full cycle of the magnetic field during dynamic MCE measurements. A theoretical explanation based on ab initio calculations has been provided. Magnetic hyperthermia in oncology is rapidly developing therapeutic modality. Recent experiments have shown that Mn-Zn ferrite emerges as a cost-effective material for this method compared with currently used magnetite nanoparticles. We present our achievements on magnetically guided capsule endoscopy. The advances in magnetically guided capsule endoscopy are also discussed. We provide the experimental setup for the computer-controlled system of magnetic field sources that create necessary forces to control the position of the capsule in five degrees of freedom in a given area. The system has the feedback on the position and is designed to monitor the endoscopic capsule during gastrointestinal tract examination.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of spin-orbit interaction on the structures and magnetism of ConRh13−n (n = 0–13) clusters have been systematically investigated by using the spin-orbit coupling (SOC) implementation of the density functional theory (DFT). The results calculated without SOC (NSOC) show that Rh13 prefers the double simple-cubic configuration, and icosahedron is the favorable structure for n = 1–9, while n ≥ 10, clusters favor the hexagonal bilayer structure. The inclusion of SOC in calculation does not change the geometries of clusters. Compared with that in NSOC calculation, although the binding energy per atom in clusters with same composition decreases in SOC calculation, the relative stability of clusters with different compositions does not change. An interesting result is that the spin moments of clusters for n = 1–9 are almost constant (21 μB). Spin-orbit interaction recovers orbital moment and its anisotropy by removing crystal-field effect in calculation. The destruction of bonding symmetry and relaxation of bonding account for high anisotropies of orbital moments in Co11Rh2 and CoRh12 clusters. With atomic composition (Co/Rh) around 4/9–5/8 and 9/4, the Co-Rh clusters exhibit high magnetic anisotropy energies.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically studied the effect of interfacial scattering on the transport of charge and spin across the junction of a two-dimensional electron gas with Dresselhaus spin-orbit coupling and ferromagnetic material junction, via the conductance (G) and the spin-polarization of the conductance spectra (P) using the scattering method. At the interface, not only were the effects of spin-conserving (Z0) and spin-flip scattering (Zf) considered, but also the interfacial Rashba spin-orbit coupling scattering (ZRSOC), which was caused by the asymmetry of the interface, was taken into account, and all of them were modeled by the delta potential. It was found that G was suppressed with increasing Z0, as expected. Interestingly, a particular value of Zf can cause G and P to reach a maximum value. In particular, ZRSOC plays a crucial role to reduce G and P in the metallic limit, but its influence on the tunneling limit was quite weak. On the other hand, the effect of ZRSOC was diminished in the tunneling limit of the magnetic junction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work presents the structural study of La0.99−xSrx(Na, K, Ba)0.01MnO3 or LSAM nanoparticles synthesized using thermal-hydro decomposition method where A denotes Na, K, Sr and Ba, respectively. The effect of ionic radii size of A dopants or rA from the substitution of A for La and Sr on the MnO6 octrahedral structure, where the average size of the cations occupying in A-site or 〈rA〉 is fixed at ∼ 1.24 Å, is focused. The LSAM nanoparticles are carefully studied using X-ray diffraction (XRD) including Rietveld refinement and X-ray Absorption Spectroscopy (XAS) including X-ray Absorption Near edge Structure (XANES) and X-ray Absorption Fine Structure (EXAFS). The Rietveld refinement shows all nano-powder samples have rhombohedral structure. By XANES technique we found that the effect of A substitutions at A-site causes a slight change of mean oxidation state of Mn between 3.54 and 3.60. Furthermore, the structural distortion of MnO6 octrahedral in samples is analysed and obtained from EXAFS. The observed trend of ferromagnetism for all LSAM samples can be clearly explained by evidences of A-site doping, structural distortion around Mn atoms and mixing Mn3+/Mn4+ valence states.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Precisely controlling the different aspects of the morphology and magnetic properties of metal oxides are fundamental to materials design. A theoretical approach, based on the Wulff construction and magnetization density (M) index, is presented to clarify the relation between the morphology and surface magnetism. The M index allows us to evaluate the uncompensated spins at the (1 0 0), (1 1 0), (1 1 1) and (1 1 2) surfaces of Co3O4 with a spinel structure. The investigated morphologies show an excellent agreement with the experimental results, with the main contribution coming from the (1 0 0) and (1 1 1) magnetic planes. The present results are also helpful in clarifying the intriguing magnetic properties reported for Co3O4 nanoparticles, suggesting that the same technique may serve as a guide for the study of shape-oriented magnetic materials.© 2017TiC–10TiN–6Mo–xGr–yNi (mol%, Gr represents graphite, x = 0, 2, 4, 6, 8, and y = 15, 30) cermets were prepared by powder metallurgy method, in order to inverstigate the effect of Gr content on magnetic and mechanical properties of TiC–TiN–Mo–Ni cermets. Room-temperature (RT) saturation magnetization (Ms) and remanence (Mr) of cermets increased with increasing x. This was mainly attributed to that the total content of non-ferromagnetic carbonitride-forming elements Ti and Mo in Ni-based binder phase decreased with increasing x. At the same x, cermets for y = 15 had lower RT Ms and Mr than those for y = 30. Cermets containing more than 2 mol% Gr became ferromagnetic at RT. Bending strength of cermets first increased and then decreased with increasing x. It reached the maximum at x = 2, mainly due to high total content of solutes Ti and Mo in Ni-based binder phase, and moderate thickness of outer rim of Ti(C,N) ceramic grains. Hardness of cermets was not significantly affected by x, mainly due to the combined action of the decrease of the total content of Ti and Mo in binder phase and the increase of the volume fraction of ceramic grains. At the same x, cermets for y = 15 had lower bending strength and higher hardness than those for y = 30.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report magnetic and magnetothermal properties of iron boride (FeB) nanoparticles prepared by surfactant-assisted ball milling of arc-melted bulk ingots of this binary alloy. Size-dependent magnetic properties were used to identify the transition to the single domain limit and calculate the anisotropy and exchange stiffness constants for this system. Extended milling is seen to produce coercivity enhancement and exchange bias of up to 270 Ôe at room temperature. The magnetothermal properties were investigated by measuring the response of single domain FeB nanoparticles to externally applied ac magnetic fields. All investigated particle sizes show a significant heating response, demonstrating their potential as candidates for magnetically induced hyperthermia. FeB nanoparticles were encapsulated into lipophilic domains of liposomes as evidenced by TEM. Exposure of HeLa cells to these liposomes did not affect cell viability, suggesting the biocompatibility of these new magnetic nanomaterials.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe demonstrate that N2 and O2 plasma treatment followed by rapid thermal annealing leads to surface stoichiometry modification in a AlGaN/GaN high electron mobility transistor. Both the source/drain access and gate regions respond positively improving the transistor characteristics albeit to different extents. Characterizations indicate that the surface show the characteristics of that of a higher band-gap material like AlxOy and GaxOy along with N-vacancy in the sub-surface region. The N-vacancy leads to an increased two-dimensional electron gas density. The formation of oxides lead to a reduced gate leakage current and surface passivation. The DC characteristics show increased transconductance, saturation drain current, ON/OFF current ratio, sub-threshold swing and lower ON resistance by a factor of 2.9, 2.0, 103.3, 2.3, and 2.1, respectively. The RF characteristics show an increase in unity current gain frequency by a factor of 1.7 for a 500 nm channel length device.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Facing physical limits to further development, modern electronics explores alternative approaches. One of the most promising routes is offered by spintronics employing spin degree of freedom. Silicon spintronics is especially important due to the central technological role of Si. This technology requires non-equilibrium spin polarization in non-magnetic Si. The ferromagnetic semiconductor EuO has been justified as a promising candidate for electrical spin injection into Si. Here, we report the first fabrication of the EuO(1 1 1)/Si(1 1 1) structure – a magnetic material with a polar heterointerface – employing a special synthetic procedure. Structural characterization proves an atomically sharp interface and monocrystalline quality of the films while magnetic measurements match the bulk properties of EuO.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Realization of the effective Si penetration at a lower processing temperature is a challenge, but of significance in reducing the strict requirements for the equipment and realizing cost-cutting in production. In this work, we have modified the surface microstructure of Fe-3 wt%Si alloy by using surface mechanical attrition treatment. The modified surface microstructure is characteristic of nanocrystalline, which is found to significantly enhance the efficiency of subsequent Si penetration into the alloy, and successively leading to the decrease of penetration temperature up to 200 °C. As a consequence, the Si gradient distribution across thickness can be readily controlled by changing penetration time, and FeSi alloys with various gradients are prepared by chemical vapor deposition along with subsequent annealing process. The dependence of magnetic and mechanical properties on Si gradient for demonstrates that the increase of Si gradient reduces core losses, especially at higher frequencies, and meanwhile improves ductility of FeSi alloys as well. The mechanism underlying the effect of Si gradient is clarified by combining magnetostriction measurement and domain structure observations. This work provides a facile and effective way for achieving gradient FeSi alloys with good magnetic property and ductility.© 2017 Elsevier LtdTemperature dependent electrical characteristics of amorphous InGaZnO (a-IGZO) thin film transistors (TFTs) are investigated considering the percolation and multiple trapping and release (MTR) conduction mechanisms. Carrier-density and temperature dependent carrier mobility in a-IGZO is derived with the Boltzmann transport equation, which is affected by potential barriers above the conduction band edge with Gaussian-like distributions. The free and trapped charge densities in the channel are calculated with Fermi-Dirac statistics, and the field effective mobility of a-IGZO TFTs is then deduced based on the MTR theory. Temperature dependent drain current model for a-IGZO TFTs is finally derived with the obtained low field mobility and free charge density, which is applicable to both non-degenerate and degenerate conductions. This physical-based model is verified by available experiment results at various temperatures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline Mg0.25Mn0.25Zn0.5−xSrxFe2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.20) ferrites were synthesized using the solid state reaction sintering at 1373 K and 1473 K for 4 h. The XRD patterns revealed the formation of single phase cubic spinel with Sr2FeO4 and SrFe12O19 as impurity phases. The decrement in the lattice parameter for Sr2+ substituted samples is attributed to the difference in ionic radii of cations. The crystallite size decreases with increase in Sr2+ content. Low frequency dielectric dispersion is attributed due to the Maxwell-Wagner interfacial polarization. The appearance of the peak in dielectric loss spectrum for x = 0.15 and 0.20 at 1373 K and x = 0.20 at 1473 K suggests the presence of relaxing dipoles. The loss peak shifts towards lower frequency side with Sr2+ content at 1373 K which is due to the strengthening of dipole–dipole interactions. The complex impedance spectra clearly revealed that the both grain and grain boundary effects on the electrical properties. A complex electric modulus spectrum indicates that a non-Debye type of conductivity relaxation exists. The saturation magnetization and remanence gradually decreases with Sr2+ substitution which may be due to the existence of non-magnetic phase in the space between the magnetic particles and the substitution of Zn2+ cation in Mg0.25Mn0.25Zn0.5Fe2O4 ferrite lattice by Sr2+ content. The permeability decreases significantly while the cut-off frequency increases with the Sr2+ content at 1373 K and decreases at 1473 K, obeying the Snoek's law. The decrease in permeability with Sr2+ content is attributed due to the decrease in magnetization because non-magnetic ions weaken the inter-site exchange interaction.© 2017Collagen matrices are one form of artificial tissue that has applications in biomimetic organs or tumors, and in fundamental biology. Anatomical organs and tissues are often composed of aligned collagen, and in this study cross-linking nickel magnetic nanowires (MNWs) to collagen allowed a one-step bi-directional alignment of the collagen matrices when processed in a uniform magnetic field. These matrices were analyzed by differential interference contrast (DIC) microscopy, scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and polarized transmittance. The bi-directional alignment was also confirmed by plated, stained arachnoid cells from the blood-brain-barrier (BBB). Arachnoid cells are morphologically sensitive to their extracellular matrix (ECM) environment, and in this study, they were observed to spider out in two distinct directions as predicted by microscopy and transmittance. In fact, MNW-collagen matrices plated with arachnoid-cells are promising for future studies of artificial BBBs. Other cells (here osteosarcoma) have been observed to internalize MNWs, which leads to the possibility of barcoding matrices and cells with distinct signatures, pending a magnetic readout technique. To this aim, mixtures of two different MNW populations were analyzed using first order reversal curves (FORC), and the relative concentrations of the two populations were correctly estimated with negligible error for ratios of 1: 23 and only 7% error for ratios of 1: 115. Together, these studies open a path for magnetic identification of artificial tissues where distinct magnetic labels on matrices and in cells combine for a unique fingerprint.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetic vortex states in rectangular nanomagnet with aspect ratio close to two by micro-magnetic simulations and experiments comparatively, and propose a simple way to manipulate both the chirality and polarity independently by tuning the direction of the in-plane magnetic field. There are always two vortices which have opposite chirality with Neel type wall and identical polarity for the rectangular nanomagnet with aspect ratio close to two. Four stable vortex states can be genetated from the uniformly magnetized state by in-plane magnetic field, and specific vortex states depend on the direction of the initial magnetization. The phenomenont of the formation of vortex states was explained based on the vortex dynamics. Also the reliability of proposed method was confirmed by domain structure using magnetic force microscopy (MFM) in experiment.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic dipolar interactions among multiple FINEMET ribbons have been studied by longitudinally driven magneto-impedance effect (LDMI) and hysteresis loops in this paper. The effect of dipolar fields on LDMI apparently expands the “bell” magneto-impedance profiles and raises its characteristic frequency. This is essentially correlated with the domain nucleation process under the combined effect of ac driving field and dc external field. A theoretical model was utilized to explicate the LDMI variation with the number of ribbons N. Basically, the nucleation field varied linearly with N. The influence of the frequency of ac current causes the increase of the nucleation field by adding a term He∼f0.38 before 4 MHz, but the dipolar field barely decreases with ac current. At frequency of 10 kHz, the dipolar field is fitted to be about 0.69 Oe, and the geometric factor can be estimated to be 5.60 × 10−5. Additionally the nucleation field reduces slightly due to the compensation of the alternating field, while the LDMI ratio changes obviously. The results indicate that LDMI can be employed as a sensitive tool to reveal the dipolar interaction in FINEMET ribbons and facilitate the design of the materials for magnetic devices.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThree-dimensional (3D) Si surface nanostructuring is interesting towards increasing the capacitance density of a metal-oxidesemiconductor (MOS) capacitor, while keeping reduced footprint for miniaturization. Si nanowires (SiNWs) can be used in this respect. With the aim of understanding the electrical versus geometrical characteristics of such capacitors, we fabricated and studied a MOS capacitor with highly ordered arrays of vertical Si nanowires of different lengths and thermal silicon oxide dielectric, in comparison to similar flat MOS capacitors. The high homogeneity and ordering of the SiNWs allowed the determination of the single SiNW capacitance and intrinsic series resistance, as well as other electrical characteristics (density of interface states, flat-band voltage and leakage current) in relation to the geometrical characteristics of the SiNWs. The SiNW capacitors demonstrated increased capacitance density compared to the flat case, while maintaining a cutoff frequency above 1 MHz, much higher than in other reports in the literature. Finally, our model system has been shown to constitute an excellent platform for the study of SiNW capacitors with either grown or deposited dielectrics, as for example high-k dielectrics for further increasing the capacitance density. This will be the subject of future work.© 2017The effects of Co substitution on the structure, magnetic properties, and magnetocaloric effect of Gd3Ru1−xCox (0.05 ≤ x ≤ 0.20) alloys have been investigated by X-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements. The Curie temperatures varied between 60 K and 92 K with Co substitution for Ru. With an applied magnetic field change (ΔH) of 50 kOe, the maximum values of magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM) were determined to be 25.8, 23.1, 19.4, and 10.8 J/kg K for compositions with x = 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, and 0.20, respectively. The corresponding refrigeration capacities (RCs) for the alloys were reasonably large and calculated to be 495, 475, 467, and 517 J/kg. The magnetic phase transitions in the Gd3Ru1−xCox (0.05 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) alloys are of first-order. In the Gd3Ru0.80Co0.20, the first-order magnetic phase transition disappears and the transition is broadened hence it increases in RC. The high −ΔSM values and accompanying large RCs for the Gd3Ru1−xCox (0.05 ≤ x ≤ 0.20) alloys qualify them as potential candidates for magnetic refrigeration applications near liquid nitrogen temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.An experiment was carried out to investigate the influence of CaCO3 and SiO2 additives on the magnetic and physical properties of M-type Sr ferrites by changing experimental parameters such as the additive composition and Ca/Si ratio. Specimens were prepared by conventional ceramic techniques. It was found that the magnetic properties (Br = 4.42 kG, iHc = 3.32 kOe and (BH)max = 4.863 MGOe) were considerably improved upon adding CaCO3 = 1.1% and SiO2 = 0.4 wt% together with Co3O4, and the mechanical properties thereof were acceptable for motor applications. It was revealed that CaCO3 and SiO2 additives led to an upswing in the magnetic properties via the enhancement of uniform grain growth, particle alignment, and the densification of Sr ferrite.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present study magnetic and electrical transport properties of transition metal substituted Co-Ga alloys (near critical cobalt concentration) have been investigated. Analysis of temperature and field dependence of dc magnetization and ac susceptibility (ACS) data suggests an evidence of reentrant spin glass (RSG) phase in Co55.5TM3Ga41.5 (TM = Co, Cr, Fe, Cu). The magnetic transition temperatures (TC and Tf) are found to depend on the nature of TM element substitution with the exchange coupling strength Co-Fe > Co-Co > Co-Cu > Co-Cr. From magnetization dynamics precise transition temperatures for the glassy phases are estimated. It is found that characteristic relaxation times are higher than that of spin glasses with minimal spin-cluster formation. The RSG behavior has been further supported by the temperature dependence of magnetotransport studies. From the magnetic field and substitution effects it has been established that the magnetic and electrical transport properties are correlated in this system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A set of single-crystalline nanoparticles (NPs) of nickel-chromium ferrite NiFe0.75Cr1.25O4 with a cubic spinel structure were synthesized and investigated. The NPs size can be varied from about 5 to 50 nm by the final annealing of the precursor at different temperatures. The distribution of cations over the tetrahedral (A) and the octahedral [B] sites (Fe0.75 Ni0.25) [Ni0.75 Cr1.25] O4 was established from the magnetic and Mössbauer measurements. In large NPs, the magnetic structure at low temperatures is close to the collinear antiferromagnetic (AFM) structure of the Neel type; and the total magnetic moment Mtot of the ferrite coincides with the direction of the B-sublattice moment. Several size-dependent magnetic anomalies were revealed. Three types of magnetic ions present in the A- and B- sublattices cause the competition of AFM and FM exchange interactions resulting in the highly frustrated magnetic ordering and the occurrence of canted magnetic structure in the octahedral B-sublattice. The frustrated structure is very flexible and significantly subjected to temperature and applied field. It results in several magnetic anomalies observed, including the occurrence of magnetic compensation, abnormal behavior of ZFC and FC magnetization curves and hysteresis loops. It was shown that magnetic anomalies can be explained in terms of exchange coupling of “soft” and “hard” magnetic B- and A-sublattices. This effect in the (Fe0.75 Ni0.25) [Ni0.75Cr1.25] O4 NPs can be considered as an atomic-scale analog of a similar effect observed in two-phase exchange-coupled alloys developed for permanent magnets and for the perpendicular recoding media.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Superconductor-Ferromagnet (SF) heterostructures are of interest due to numerous phenomena related to the spin-dependent interaction of Cooper pairs with the magnetization. Here we address the effects of a magnetic insulator on the density of states of a superconductor based on a recently developed boundary condition for strongly spin-dependent interfaces. We show that the boundary to a magnetic insulator has a similar effect like the presence of magnetic impurities. In particular we find that the impurity effects of strongly scattering localized spins leading to the formation of Shiba bands can be mapped onto the boundary problem.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of geometrically frustrated antiferromagnetic Ising (IA) and ferromagnetic spin ice (SI) models on a nanocluster with a ‘Star of David’ topology, including next-nearest-neighbor (NNN) interactions, are studied by an exact enumeration. In an external field applied in characteristic directions of the respective models, depending on the NNN interaction sign and magnitude, the ground state magnetization of the IA model is found to display up to three intermediate plateaus at fractional values of the saturation magnetization, while the SI model shows only one zero-magnetization plateau and only for the antiferromagnetic NNN coupling. A giant magnetocaloric effect is revealed in the IA model with the NNN interaction either absent or equal to the nearest-neighbor coupling. The latter is characterized by abrupt isothermal entropy changes at low temperatures and infinitely fast adiabatic temperature variations for specific entropy values in the processes when the magnetic field either vanishes or tends to the critical values related to the magnetization jumps.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the measurements of the spin-wave stiffness A and its temperature dependence close to TC for two compounds: FeGe and the solid solution Fe0.8Mn0.2Ge. The small-angle neutron scattering was used to detect the inelastic scattering in the magnetic field above the transition from the conical to the field-polarized state. This inelastic contribution is shaped as two circles on a neutron scattering map. Their radius is directly related to the spin wave stiffness A that decreases with a temperature but has a finite value at Tc for both compounds. Since the softening of spin waves near Tc, which is expected for a second-order phase transition, is not observed, we make a conclusion about the transition as having a first-order nature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.First-principles calculations within the framework of density functional theory were used to investigate the electronic and magnetic properties of the Ga0.9375Ti0.0625N, Ga0.9375V0.0625N, and Ga0.9375Cr0.0625N compounds in the zincblende structure, employing the pseudopotential method. The calculated band structures and density of states reveal that the three compounds exhibit a half-metallic behavior and suggest a 100% polarization of the conduction carriers. We found a net magnetic moment of 1.0, 2.0, and 3.0 µβ per supercell, respectively. The results suggest that the compounds may be good diluted magnetic semiconductors for potential applications in spintronics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present study investigates the role of substrate temperatures on the structural, morphological, magnetic and magnetostrictive properties of DC sputtered FeGa thin films grown on Si substrates. These films were deposited at various substrate temperatures between 50 and 350 °C. The structural characterization of the films revealed columnar growth and the transformation of surface morphology from prismatic to spherical at high substrate temperatures. Both L12 and B2 phases of FeGa existed in the films, with the L12 phase dominating. The in-plane and out-of-plane vibration sample magnetometry measurements showed the evolution of magnetic anisotropy in these films. It was revealed from the magnetostriction measurements that the films deposited at 250 °C exhibited the maximum value of 59 ppm.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electrical, magnetic and galvanomagnetic properties of half-metallic Heusler alloys of Co2YZ (Y = Ti, V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Ni, and Z = Al, Si, Ga, Ge, In, Sn, Sb) were studied in the temperature range 4.2–900 K and in magnetic fields of up to 100 kOe. It was found that varying Y in Co2YZ alloys affects strongly the electric resistivity and its temperature dependence ρ(T), while this effect is not observed upon changing Z. When Y is varied, extrema (maximum or minimum) are observed in ρ(T) near the Curie temperature TC. At T ≤ TC, the ρ(T) behavior can be ascribed to a change in electronic energy spectrum near the Fermi level. The coefficients of normal and anomalous Hall effect were determined. It was shown that the latter coefficient, RS, is related to the residual resistivity ρ0 by a power law RS ∼ ρ0 k/MS with MS the spontaneous magnetization. The exponent k was found to be 1.8 for Co2FeZ alloys, which is typical for asymmetric scattering mechanisms, and 2.9 for Co2YAl alloys, which indicates an additional contribution to the anomalous Hall effect. The temperature dependence of resistivity at low temperatures is analyzed and discussed in the frame of the two-magnon scattering theory.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present paper, we have studied the magnetic order and electrical transport properties of frustrated magnet Bi2-xCoxIr2O7 (x = 0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6) polycrystalline. The behavior of the electrical resistivity above 50 K in the composites emanate from the electron–electron scattering processes. Grain boundary effects play a dominant role in the conduction process. It is also found from M-T data that the antiferromagnetic interaction and frustration enhances with increasing content of Co. Effective magnetic moments show a possibility of mixed valence state of Co (Co3+ and Co4+). The M-H data of doped samples taken at 2 K show hysteresis loops, which suggests the existence of ferromagnetic interaction originated from canted antiferromagnetic state. The magnetic behavior results from the competition between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interaction at each magnetic site.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and magneto-caloric properties in the ternary elementals doped La0.8Ce0.2Fe11.5−xCoxSi1.5C0.2 (x = 0.3, 0.5, and 0.7) compounds were studied. With the increases of Co content x, the Curie temperature TC increases and the thermal hysteresis decreases. All the compounds undergo a second-order magnetic phase transition and exhibit a considerable reversible tunable magneto-caloric effect. The values of maximum magnetic entropy change (−ΔSMmax) and the Relative Cooling Power (RCP) are kept at same high level with different Co content. Under a magnetic field change of 0–5 T, the values of −ΔSMmax for La0.8Ce0.2Fe11.5−xCoxSi1.5C0.2 are 10.5, 10.7, and 9.8 J/kg K for x = 0.3, 0.5, and 0.7, respectively. The corresponding values of RCP are 267.1, 289.9, and 290.2 J/kg.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Enhanced Faraday rotation in a new type of magneto-plasmonic structure with the capability of Fano resonance, has been reported theoretically. A magneto-plasmonic structure composed of a gold corrugated layer deposited on a magneto-optically active layer was studied by means of Lumerical software based on finite-difference time-domain. In our proposed structure, plasmonic Fano resonance and localized surface plasmon have induced enhancement in magneto-optical Faraday rotation. It is shown that the influence of geometrical parameters in gold layer offers a desirable platform for engineering spectral position of Fano resonance and enhancement of Faraday rotation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigated a simple but non trivial model, consisting of a chain of N classical XY spins with nearest neighbor ferromagnetic interaction, where each of the two end-point spins is assumed to be exchange-coupled to a fully-pinned fictitious spin. In the mean field approximation, the system might be representative of a soft ferromagnetic film sandwiched between two magnetically hard layers. We show that, while the ground state is ferromagnetic and collinear, the system can attain non-collinear metastable states in the form of magnetic helices. The helical solutions and their stability were studied analytically in the absence of an external magnetic field. There are four possible classes of solutions. Only one class is metastable, and its helical states contain an integer number of turns. Among the remaining unstable classes, there is a class of helices which contain an integer number of turns. Therefore, an integer number of turns in a helical configuration is a necessary, but not a sufficient, condition for metastability. These results may be useful to devise future applications of metastable magnetic helices as energy-storing elements.© 2017Ga1− xMnxAs layers prepared by ion implantation and subsequent pulsed laser annealing with the planned Mn concentrations of x = 0.01–0.08 have been studied using the magneto-optical transversal Kerr effect (TKE) and spectral ellipsometry. The spectral dependences of the diagonal and nondiagonal components of the permittivity tensor (PT), as well as the spectrum of magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) have been calculated for the layers. The obtained spectra of the diagonal PT components show that the layers under study maintain the zinc-blende crystal structure of the parent GaAs semiconductor. All studied samples reveal a strong TKE response at low temperatures with a dependence of an effective Curie temperature (at which TKE appears) on the Mn concentration. A number of extrema in the low-temperature TKE and MCD spectra are close to the energies of transitions in the Γ and L critical points of the parent semiconductor band structure that confirms the intrinsic ferromagnetism of the Ga1− xMnxAs layers. The MCD spectra shape and its change with Mn concentration increasing are discussed on a base of the valence-band model of ferromagnetism in DMS.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The solvo-thermal syntheses of [(CoSalphen)2Co (SCN)2]n (1), CoSalphen(NH3)(N3)(2), Na[CoIIIsalphen(N3)2](3), Na[CoIIIsalen(N3)2](4) and CoIIIsalen(NH3)(N3) (5) {salphen = N,N’-o-phenylene-bis(salicylideneimine)} are reported. The structural studies using X-ray diffraction measurements revealed that 1 crystalizes in a monoclinic C2/c space group. Two cobalt (II) metal centers in penta-coordinated and octahedral local coordination environments are bridged via alternating O and μ1,3 SCN bridges resulting in a novel 2D layered coordination polymer. Compound 2 is a trivalent mononuclear cobalt azido complex with an octahedral coordination environment. The magnetic investigations of 1 revealed ferromagnetic coupling (J = +49.1 cm−1) and meta-magnetic ordering. Time resolved photoluminescence studies of the complexes showed excited state lifetimes of (τ1 = 0.4675 ns, τ2 = 5.23 ns) for 1 and (τ1 = 0.5078 ns, τ2 = 6.79 ns) for 2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This study has been done by separately measuring Magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) under different structure characteristics, namely the carbon content, hardness, roughness, and elastic modulus in commercial steels. The result of the experiments shows a strong dependence of MBN parameters (peak height, Root mean square (RMS), and average value) on structure characteristics. These effects, according to this study, can be explained by two kinds of source mechanisms of the MBN, domain wall nucleation and wall propagation. The discovery obtained in this paper can provide basic knowledge to understand the existing surface condition problem of Magnetic Barkhausen noise as a non-destructive evaluation technique and bring MBN into wider application.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Alnico alloys are prepared with nominal composition of 31.4-xFe-7.0Al-36.0Co-4.0Cu-1.0Nb-14.0Ni-6.0Ti-0.6Zr-xB (x = 0.02, 0.04, 0.06, 0.08, in wt%) by arc melting and casting techniques and subsequent heat treatment. The alloys are characterized by X-ray diffraction method, optical microscope, scanning electron microscope and pulse field magnetometer by plotting magnetic hysteresis demagnetization curve. The results of HRSEM show at least two new phases at α-grain boundaries and triple junctions. These phases, when retained at low concentration, help in enhancing magnetic properties of alnico alloys by purifying spinodal phases and reducing the adverse effects of impurity elements. Two different heat treatment cycles are employed. In the first phase, the alloys are processed by using heat treatment cycles without magnetic field; and Hc of 1.35 kOe, Br of 4.87 kGs and (BH)max of 1.96 MGOe are obtained by furnace cooling below TC and subsequent tempering at 680 °C and 550 °C. In the second phase, the alloy with best magnetic properties is treated thermo-magnetically; and Hc of 1.68 kOe, Br of 7.1 kG and (BH)max of 4.45 MGOe are obtained.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Doping at the post-transition metal site by trivalent rare-earth ions and 3d transition metal site by transition metal ions in perovskite lattice has observed a variety of magnetic and electronic orders with spatially correlated charge, spin and orbital degrees of freedom. Here, we report large ferromagnetism and enhanced dielectric constant (at ∼100 Hz) in chemically synthesized single phase multiferroic Bi1−xNdxFe1−yCoyO3 (x = 0, 0.10; y = 0, 0.10) nanoparticles (average particles size ∼45 nm). We have also examined the ferroelectric nature of our chemically synthesized samples. The Rietveld refinement of the XRD data reveals the structural symmetry breaking from distorted rhombohedral R3c structure of BiFeO3 to the triclinic P1 structure in Bi0.9Nd0.1Fe0.9Co0.1O3 (BNFCO) without having any iron rich impurity phase. The magnetization in these nanoceramics most likely originates from the coexistence of mixed valence states of Fe ion (Fe2+ and Fe3+). A high room temperature dielectric constant (∼1050) has been observed at 100 Hz of BNFCO sample. The frequency dependent anomalies near Neel temperature of antiferromagnet in temperature variation of dielectric study have been observed for all the doped and co-doped samples exhibiting typical characteristic of relaxor ferroelectrics. A spectacular enhancement of remanent magnetization MR (∼7.2 emu/gm) and noticeably large coercivity HC (∼17.4 kOe) at 5 K have been observed in this BNFCO sample. Such emergence of ferromagnetic ordering indicates the canting of the surface spins at the surface boundaries because of the reduction of particle size in nanodimension. We have also observed P-E hysteresis loops with a remanent polarization of 26 μC/cm2 and coercive field of 5.6 kV/cm of this sample at room temperature. From impedance spectroscopy study the estimated activation energy of 0.41 eV suggests the semiconducting nature of our nanoceramic BNCFO sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A method to retrieve permeability of a metal inclusion from the measured constitutive parameters of a single composite sample of known structure and filling is developed. Treating constitutive parameters for a set of fillings increases accuracy of inclusion permeability determination and makes it possible to select the appropriate mixing model for the composite. The method is applied to determine microwave permeability of sendust inclusions from the measured permeability and permittivity spectra for a set of composites filled with sendust flakes and spheres. The calculations are performed for symmetric (Bruggeman type) and for matrix (Maxwell Garnett type) structures. The composites are shown to have the matrix structure. The retrieved permeability of inclusions is in good agreement with the data calculated with the parameters of generalized matrix mixing model that accounts for percolation threshold.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) are widely used in biomedical applications. Characterizing dilute suspensions of superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) in bio-relevant media is particularly valuable for magnetic particle imaging, hyperthermia, drug delivery, etc. Here, we study dilute aqueous suspensions of single-domain magnetite nanoparticles using an AC Faraday rotation (FR) setup. The setup uses an oscillating magnetic field (800 Hz) which generates a multi-harmonic response. Each harmonic is collected and analyzed using the Fourier components of the theoretical signal determined by a Langevin-like magnetization. With this procedure, we determine the average magnetic moment per particle μ, particle number density n, and Verdet constant of the sample. The fitted values of μ and n are shown to be consistent across each harmonic. Additionally, we present the results of these parameters as n is varied. The large values of μ reveal the possibility of clustering as reported in other literature. This suggests that μ is representative of the average magnetic moment per cluster of nanoparticles. Multiple factors, including the external magnetic field, surfactant degradation, and laser absorption, can contribute to dynamic and long-term aggregation leading to FR signals that represent space- and time-averaged sample parameters. Using this powerful analysis procedure, future studies are aimed at determining the clustering mechanisms in this AC system and characterizing SPION suspensions at different frequencies and viscosities.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic moments at the interface between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic layers play a central role in exchange biased systems, but their behavior is still not completely understood. In this work, the FeMn/Fe interface in polycrystalline thin films has been studied using conversion electron Mössbauer spectroscopy (CEMS), magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE) and micromagnetic simulations. Samples were prepared with 57Fe layers at two distinct depths in order to probe the interface and bulk behaviors. At the equilibrium, the interface moments are randomly oriented while the bulk of the Fe layer has an in-plane magnetic anisotropy. Several models for the interface and anisotropies of the layers were used in the simulations of spin configurations and hysteresis loops. From the whole set of simulations, one can conclude the direct analysis of hysteresis curves is not enough to infer whether the interface has a configuration with spins tilted out of the film plane at equilibrium since different choices of parameters provide similar curves. The simulations have also shown the occurrence of spin clusters at the interface is compatible with CEMS and MOKE measurements.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thin films with properties comparable to bulk single crystals were grown by pulsed laser deposition using a substrate temperature of only 500 °C. This was achieved by a careful choice of both the oxygen pressure in the deposition chamber and the temperature of the air anneal. The best films were grown on gadolinium gallium garnet substrates but we also report data for films grown on the diamagnetic substrate yttrium aluminium garnet. The films were analysed using X-ray diffraction, near edge X-ray absorption and magnetometry. Our best films had a magnetisation of 143 emu/cm3 and a coercive field of ∼1 Oe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We generate a crystal of skyrmions in two dimensions using a Heisenberg Hamiltonian including the ferromagnetic interaction J, the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction D, and an applied magnetic field H. The ground state (GS) is determined by minimizing the interaction energy. We show that the GS is a skyrmion crystal in a region of (D,H). The stability of this skyrmion crystalline phase at finite temperatures is shown by a study of the time-dependence of the order parameter using Monte Carlo simulations. We observe that the relaxation is very slow and follows a stretched exponential law. The skyrmion crystal phase is shown to undergo a transition to the paramagnetic state at a finite temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoemulsions of droplet size ∼200 nm, loaded with single domain superparamagnetic nanoparticles (MNP), are potential candidates for multimodal hyperthermia due to availability of large loading volume and enhanced permeation and retention (EPR) in the cancerous tissues. In such nanoemulsions, radio frequency alternating magnetic field induced heating occur at two entirely different length scales, viz. Neel-Brown relaxation of the dispersed MNP and Brownian relaxation of emulsion droplets. Here we study the effects of orientation ordering or texturing of droplets, immobilized in a tissue mimicking agar matrix, on the field induced heating efficiency. A higher specific absorption rate (maximum ∼73 ± 2 W/gFe) is observed for droplets orientated parallel to the direction of the alternating magnetic field because of the enhancement of effective uniaxial anisotropy energy density and increased effective relaxation time. For identical and non-interacting MNP oriented parallel to the external DC magnetic field, a threefold increase in the effective uniaxial anisotropy energy density and ∼20–30% increased specific absorption rate are observed as compared to those oriented perpendicular to the magnetic field. Magnetic force microscopy images showed that the spherical morphology of the droplets remains intact even after orientational ordering and average topographic height of the droplets are found to be ∼220 (±17) nm, which is in good agreement with the most probable size obtained from dynamic light scattering. The residual volume magnetization of the emulsion droplets is found to be 1.1 × 10−6 emu/cc, indicating the superparamagnetic nature of the droplets in tissue equivalent environment. The observed increase in heating efficiency of the immobilized and oriented emulsion droplets shows promising applications in multimodal hyperthermia therapy because of the requirement of lower dose of MNP and shorter treatment time.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The compensation behaviors of FeIIFeIII bimetallic oxalates with defects were explored by constructing a diluted spin-2 and spin-5/2 ferrimagnetic Ising model. Within the effective-field theory based on Glauber-type stochastic dynamic, the effects of the concentration of FeII and FeIII ions on the compensation temperatures have been studied and the two-compensation points were found in FeIIFeIII bimetallic oxalates. The results showed that the compensation behaviors of the compounds were strongly affected by the presence of defects. In addition, the dilution enhanced the magnetization jumps of the compounds which have been found in earlier experimental and theoretical studies. In particular, the dynamic phase transition is absent in the nonequilibrium system with impurities in contrast to the corresponding equilibrium system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.2D small-angle X-ray scattering (SAXS) patterns for dilute ferrofluids with different degree of particle interaction under external magnetic field are analyzed to obtain structural characteristics of aggregates formed by polydisperse particles. Classical ferrofluids based on organic low-polarity solvents (toluene, decalin) with dispersed nanoparticles of magnetite and cobalt coated with oleic acid and water-based ferrofluid with dispersed magnetite nanoparticles coated with double layer of sodium oleate, are studied. All systems show the Langevin type behavior regarding the orientation of the anisotropic aggregates in them with the saturation at a relatively weak magnetic field strength. The field-induced anisotropy in the SAXS patterns is considered in the frame of a simple approximation.© 2017 The AuthorsThis paper reports the development of a measurement probe which couples local flux density measurements obtained using the needle probe method with the local magnetising field attained via a Hall effect sensor. This determines the variation in magnetic properties including power loss and permeability at increasing distances from the punched edge of 2.4% and 3.2% Si non-oriented electrical steel sample. Improvements in the characterisation of the magnetic properties of electrical steels would aid in optimising the efficiency in the design of electric machines.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we propose a new method of controlling microwave transmission from Electromagnetically Induced Absorption (EIA) to Electromagnetically Induced Transparency (EIT). EIA describes the state where the system strongly absorbs microwaves, whereas EIT describes the state in which the system is transparent to microwaves. Control is achieved via coupling of the 3 GHz photon mode of a metamaterial Split Ring Resonator (SRR) to the spin wave magnon modes of a Yttrium Iron Garnet (YIG) bulk. The system is described by a 2-body interaction matrix with an additional fitting parameter τ which takes into account the fact that the microstrip feed line could excite the SRR as well as the YIG. The parameter τ reveals the effect of geometry and shielding on the coupling behaviour and gives rise to unique physics. In low τ (τ⩽2) configurations, only EIT is reported. However, in high τ (τ≈10) configurations, EIA is reported. Furthermore, we report that the system can be easily changed from a low τ to high τ configuration by shielding the SRR from the microstrip with a thin metal piece. Varying the τ parameter through shielding is thus proposed as a new method of controlling the microwave transmission at the coupling region.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we report on the experimental study of the direct current electrical conduction in a magnetic nanofluid based on transformer oil and iron oxide nanoparticles stabilized with oleic acid. We present the current–voltage characteristics of the pure transformer oil and the magnetic nanofluid with various particle volume fractions. From the Ohmic region, we calculate the electrical conductivity values and confirm the effect of increasing conductivity with increasing particle volume fraction. A few sources of space charge have been taken into account, among which the ion impurities play the key role. It was found that the current–voltage characteristics exhibit the inverse hysteresis-like behavior. Then, we focus on the magnetic field influence on the hysteresis behavior of a selected sample. The external magnetic field was applied in both, parallel and perpendicular configuration in regard to the electric field direction. It is shown that the magnetic field acting on the magnetic nanofluid in the perpendicular configuration results in the remarkable thinning of the current–voltage inverse hysteresis loop.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thin films of Si1−xMnx were deposited on Al2O3 substrate using pulsed laser deposition(PLD)technique employing time-of-flight separation of the ejected particles with different laser fluence (E = 3.8–7.6 J/cm2). Magnetic properties of these films reveal that the variation in the laser fluence has engineered several magnetic phases in Si1−xMnx films: high temperature (HT) ferromagnetic (FM) phase Si1−xMnx(x = 0.51–0.52) with uniformly distributed Si vacancies, and the low-temperature (LT) FM phases MnSi and Mn4Si7 with Curie temperature ≤40 K. At small fluence, the mesoscopic size MnSi and Mn4Si7 crystallites are formed in the upper layer of Si1−xMnx films with Si excess (x ≈ 0.4–0.5), yielding to inhomogeneous magnetic phase distribution along the film growth direction, while the high and optimal fluence has resulted in uniform distribution of the HT FM phase during the film growth. The XPS, magnetotransport and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) measurements confirm the presence of several FM phases in the samples and the amplifying role of LT FM for films grown at E ≤ 4.4 J/cm2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Planar arrangements of cobalt hollow-spheres were studied by means of micromagnetic simulation. The calculated coercivity values are in correspondence with the reported experimental data. Dipole energy effects are determinant and more significant if thickness decreases. We observed the formation of some vortex and onion configurations, solutions for individual hollow-sphere, even so there is predominance of non-homogeneous reversal. This confirms that solutions for individual spheres are not efficient in the analysis of arrays.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Present work demonstrates the formation of spin-orbital polarons in electron doped copper oxides, that arise due to doping-induced polarisation of the oxygen orbitals in the CuO2 planes. The concept of such polarons is fundamentally different from previous interpretations. The novel aspect of spin–orbit polarons is best described by electrons becoming self-trapped in one-dimensional channels created by polarisation of the oxygen orbitals. The one-dimensional channels form elongated filaments with two possible orientations, along the diagonals of the elementary CuO2 square plaquette. As the density of doped electrons increases multiple filaments are formed. These may condense into a single percolating filamentary phase. Alternatively, the filaments may cross perpendicularly to create an interconnected conducting quasi-one-dimensional web. At low electron doping the antiferromagnetic (AFM) state and the polaron web coexist. As the doping is increased the web of filaments modifies and transforms the AFM correlations leading to a series of quantum phase transitions - which affect the normal and superconducting state properties.© 2017An efficient and inexpensive process is presented that produces highly oriented bulk compacts made of BaM particles. Barium hexaferrite particles (BaM, nominal composition BaFe11O19) were prepared by a chemical coprecipitation method, using different rates and types of precipitating agents (NaOH and Na2CO3). It was demonstrated that when a large excess of Na2CO3 is used, a noteworthy packing of hexagonal BaM platelets is obtained, after mechanical compaction and firing at moderate temperature (1140 °C), without including any more steps than those required for a conventional sintering process. The hysteresis loop displays a very competitive squareness of 0.88 (normalized remanent magnetization) and a coercivity of 215 kA/m, which make this BaM bulk ferrite suitable for self-biased applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Present review touches upon a subject of magnetotransport phenomena in hybrid structures which consist of ferromagnetic or nonmagnetic metal layer, layer of silicon oxide and silicon substrate with n- or p-type conductivity. Main attention will be paid to a number gigantic magnetotransport effects discovered in the devices fabricated on the base of the M/SiO2/n(p)-Si (M is ferromagnetic or paramagnetic metal) hybrid structures. These effects include bias induced dc magnetoresistance, gigantic magnetoimpedance, dc magnetoresistance induced by an optical irradiation and lateral magneto-photo-voltaic effect. The magnetoresistance ratio in ac and dc modes for some of our devices can exceed 106% in a magnetic field below 1 T. For lateral magneto-photo-voltaic effect, the relative change of photo-voltage in magnetic field can reach 103% at low temperature. Two types of mechanisms are responsible for sensitivity of the transport properties of the silicon based hybrid structures to magnetic field. One is related to transformation of the energy structure of the (donor) acceptor states including states near SiO2/n(p)-Si interface in magnetic field. Other mechanism is caused by the Lorentz force action. The features in behaviour of magnetotransport effects in concrete device depend on composition of the used structure, device topology and experimental conditions (bias voltage, optical radiation and others). Obtained results can be base for design of some electronic devices driven by a magnetic field. They can also provide an enhancement of the functionality for existing sensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study numerically the possibility of controlling light properties by means of an external magnetic field. Considerable changes in the shape, value, and spectral position of the magneto-optical response are demonstrated in Voigt geometry for the transmitted light depending on the parameters of the magnetophotonic metasurface made up of nickel/silicon nanoparticles. The spectral overlapping of the fundamental magnetic and electric dipole Mie resonances leads to interference with a strong modification of phase relations, which manifests itself through an enhanced magneto-optical signal.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effects of annealing on grain-boundary character distribution and texture evolution were investigated in hot-rolled Fe-6.5 wt% Si steel. An annealing treatment performed at different temperatures affected the recrystallization behavior and changed the volume fraction of low-angle and coincidence site lattice (CSL) boundaries. High frequencies of coincidence boundaries Σ3, Σ9, Σ13, and Σ27 were observed in all annealed samples, while the annealing temperature can lead to a large difference in frequencies for Σ13. The effect of crystallographic texture on the directional dependence of the specific magnetic energy in the rolling plane of investigated sheets was calculated and discussed. These results demonstrate the possibility of optimizing grain-boundary character distribution (GBCD) and texture to improve the magnetic and mechanical properties of Fe-6.5 wt% Si steel by controlling annealing temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Diluted magnetic semiconductors are suitable for building spintronic devices owing to their ease of integration in magnetic/electronic/photonic devices. Moreover, the ability to control their behaviors playing on layers composition, crystallographic growth process and post growth treatment, makes them attractive for research and industrial applications. Using Hall measurements, we investigate here, the temperature and epitaxial strain effects on magnetic anisotropy of a diluted GaMnAs/InGaAs semiconductor. We evidenced that raising temperature biases magnetic exchange from planar cubic anisotropy to out-plane uniaxial anisotropy. Furthermore, we develop a free energy analysis and extract anisotropy fields to point out the dominance of uniaxial anisotropy for layers under high epitaxial tensile strain.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have propose the Meissner mechanism for the spin supercurrent in quantum spin systems. Besides, we study the behavior of the AC spin conductivity in neighborhood of quantum phase transition in a frustrated spin model such as the antiferromagnet in the union jack lattice with single ion anisotropy at T=0. We investigate the spin conductivity for this model that presents exchange interactions J1 and J2. Our results show a single peak for the conductivity with the height varying with the behavior of critical anisotropy Dc with J2. We obtain the conductivity tending to zero in the limit ω→0.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The increase in the number of materials for research and extending the list of their applications requires a parallel optimization of the methods of characterization. Microwave magnetoimpedance (MI) in low magnetic fields was proposed for the characterization of the axial magnetization process in different materials. Characterization of the same parameter using different techniques becomes increasingly required. Here we describe our experience in the comparative analysis of magnetic properties, giant magnetoimpedance, ferromagnetic resonance (FMR), and low field MI of CuBe/Fe19Co17Ni64 electroplated and (Co0.94Fe0.06)72.5Si12.5B15 in-water solidified amorphous wires. Microwave studies were conducted using specially designed installation on the basis of Rohde & Schwarz ZVA-67 Vector Network Analyzer for two lengths of the wire of 3 and 6 mm. FMR was also measured using classic cavity perturbation technique. The analysis of the results allows us to observe evolution of the intensity of two absorption peaks and conclude the corresponding to MI and FMR features.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The thermodynamic behavior of an Ising-Heisenberg triangular tube with Heisenberg intra-rung and Ising inter-rung interactions is exactly obtained in an external magnetic field within the framework of the transfer-matrix method. We report rigorous results for the temperature dependence of the magnetization, entropy, pair correlations and specific heat, as well as typical iso-entropic curves. The discontinuous field-driven ground-state phase transitions are reflected in some anomalous thermodynamic behavior as for instance a striking low-temperature peak of the specific heat and an enhanced magnetocaloric effect. It is demonstrated that the intermediate magnetization plateaus shrink in and the relevant sharp edges associated with the magnetization jump round off upon increasing temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Al-Ni-Co alloy has been widely applied in various industrial fields due to its excellent thermal and magnetic stability. In this paper, new Al-Ni-Co ribbons are prepared by simple processes combining melt-spinning with annealing, and their phase transition, microstructure and magnetic properties are studied. The results show that after as-spun ribbons are annealed, the grain size of ribbons increases from 1.1 ± 0.3 μm to 4.8 ± 0.8 μm, but still much smaller than that of the bulk Al-Ni-Co alloy manufactured by traditional technologies. In addition, some rod-like Al70Co20Ni10-type, Al9Co2-type and Fe2Nb-type phases are precipitated at grain boundaries; simultaneously, the distinct spinodal decomposition microstructure with periodic ingredient variation is thoroughly formed in all grains by the reaction of α → α1 + α2. Furthermore, the α1 and α2 distribute alternately like a maze, the Fe-Co-rich α1 phase holds 35.9–47.3 vol%, while the Al-Ni-rich α2 phase occupies the rest. Finally, the coercivity of annealed ribbons can reach to 485.3 ± 76.6 Oe. If the annealed ribbons are further aged at 560 °C, their Hc even increases to 738.1 ± 81.0 Oe. The coercivity mechanism is discussed by the combination of microstructure and domain structure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A systematic investigation of magnetic nanoparticles and the formation of a core-shell structure, consisting of multiple maghemite (γ-Fe2O3) nanoparticles as the core and silica as the shell, has been performed using various techniques. High-resolution transmission electron microscopy clearly shows isolated maghemite nanoparticles with an average diameter of 13 nm and the formation of a core-shell structure. Low temperature Mössbauer spectroscopy reveals the presence of pure maghemite nanoparticles with all vacancies at the B-sites. Isothermal magnetization and zero-field-cooled and field-cooled measurements are used for investigating the magnetic properties of the nanoparticles. The magnetization results are in good accordance with the contents of the magnetic core and the non-magnetic shell. The multiple-core γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles show similar behavior to isolated particles of the same size.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A variety of copper tellurium oxide minerals are known, and many of them exhibit either unusual forms of magnetism, or potentially novel spin liquid behavior. Here, I review a number of the more interesting materials with a focus on their crystalline symmetry and, if known, the nature of their magnetism. Many of these exist (so far) in mineral form only, and most have yet to have their magnetic properties studied. This means a largely unexplored space of materials awaits our exploration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the effect of the lateral confinement and a perpendicular magnetic field on isolated room-temperature magnetic skyrmions in sputtered Pt/Co/MgO nanotracks and nanodots. We show that the skyrmions size can be easily tuned by playing on the lateral dimensions of the nanostructures and by using external magnetic field amplitudes of a few mT, which allow to reach sub-100 nm diameters. Our XMCD-PEEM observations also highlight the important role of the pinning on the skyrmions size and stability under an out-of-plane magnetic field. Micromagnetic simulations reveal that the effect of local pinning can be well accounted for by considering the thin film grain structure with local anisotropy variations and reproduce well the dependence of the skyrmion diameter on the magnetic field and the geometry.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report analytic investigation of the electronic properties of heterostructures comprised by films of three-dimensional topological insulator (TI) and normal insulator (NI) revealing strong interface and size effects on their spin transport characteristics. Imposing at the TI/NI interfaces the natural boundary conditions within a continual scheme, we show that the intrinsic spin Hall response of the NI/TI/NI trilayer can be controlled by tuning the interface potential (IP) together with the TI film thickness. We predict a series of interface induced quantum transitions between topological insulating phase and trivial band insulator phase. We calculate the phase diagram of the NI/TI/NI trilayer and establish an appropriate range of the IP strength and the TI film thickness to realize the regime of quantum spin Hall effect. Our results can provide a useful guide in choosing the relevant material parameters to facilitate the detection of quantum spin Hall conductivity in the TI/NI heterostructures.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, electrical characteristics of gate-all-around (GAA) nanoplate (NP) vertical FET (VFET) were analyzed for single transistor and 6T-SRAM cell through 3D technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulation. In VFET, gate and extension lengths are not limited by the area of device because theses lengths are vertically located. The height of NP is assumed in 40 nm considering device fabrication method (top-down approach). According to the sizes of devices, we analyzed the performances of device such as total resistance, capacitance, intrinsic gate delay, sub-threshold swing (S.S), drain-induced barrier lowering (DIBL) and static noise margin (SNM). As the gate length becomes larger, the resistance should be smaller because the total height of NP is fixed in 40 nm. Also, when the channel thickness becomes thicker, the total resistance becomes smaller since the sheet resistances of channel and extension become smaller and the contact resistance becomes smaller due to the increasing contact area. In addition, as the length of channel pitch increases, the parasitic capacitance comes to be larger due to the increasing area of gate-drain and gate-source. The performance of RC delay is best in the shortest gate length (12 nm), the thickest channel (6 nm) and the shortest channel pitch (17 nm) owing to the reduced resistance and parasitic capacitance. However, the other performances such as DIBL, S.S, on/off ratio and SNM are worst because the short channel effect is highest in this situation. Also, we investigated the performance of the multi-channel device. As the number of channels increases, the performance of device and the reliability of SRAM improve because of reduced contact resistance, increased gate dimension and multi-channel compensation effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Anomalies of the specific heat capacity are investigated in the framework of the exactly solvable antiferromagnetic spin-1/2 Ising model in the external magnetic field on the geometrically frustrated tetrahedron recursive lattice. It is shown that the Schottky-type anomaly in the behavior of the specific heat capacity is related to the existence of unique highly macroscopically degenerated single-point ground states which are formed on the borders between neighboring plateau-like ground states. It is also shown that the very existence of these single-point ground states with large residual entropies predicts the appearance of another anomaly in the behavior of the specific heat capacity for low temperatures, namely, the field-induced double-peak structure, which exists, and should be observed experimentally, along with the Schottky-type anomaly in various frustrated magnetic system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effect of a variable magnetic field (VMF) on the natural convection heat transfer of Fe3O4-water nanofluid in a half-annulus cavity is studied by finite element method using FlexPDE commercial code. After deriving the governing equations and solving the problem by defined boundary conditions, the effects of three main parameters (Hartmann Number (Ha), nanoparticles volume fraction (φ) and Rayleigh number (Ra)) on the local and average Nusselt numbers of inner wall are investigated. As a main outcome, results confirm that in low Eckert numbers, increasing the Hartmann number make a decrease on the Nusselt number due to Lorentz force resulting from the presence of stronger magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Neodymium iron boron (NdFeB) permanent magnets have high energy product with suitable magnetic and physical properties for an array of applications including power generation and motors. However, synthetic routes of NdFeB permanent magnets involve critical procedures with high energy and needs scientific skills. Herein, we report on soapnut extract mediated synthesis of nanoscale cobalt substituted NdFeB (Co-NdFeB) permanent magnetic powders (Nd: 15%, Fe: 77.5%, B: 7.5% and Co with molar ratios: 0.5, 1, 1.5 and 2). A 10 ml of 10% soapnut extract was added to 90 ml of respective chemical composition and heated to 60 °C for 30 min and aged for 24 h. The dried powder was sintered at 500 °C for 1 h. The characterization of the prepared nanoscale Co-NdFeB magnetic powders was done using the techniques such as Dynamic Light Scattering (DLS for size and zeta potential measurements), X-ray diffraction (XRD) for structural determination, Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) with energy dispersion spectroscopy (EDS) for surface morphological and elemental analysis, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR) for the identification of functional groups associated and hysteresis loop studies to quantify the magnetization. The results revealed that particles were in irregular and tubular shaped and highly stable (Zeta potential: −44.4 mV) with measured size <100 nm. XRD micrographs revealed a tetragonal crystal structure and FTIR showed predominant N–H and O–H stretching indicates the involvement of these functional groups in the reduction and stabilization process of Co-NdFeB magnetic powders. Hysteresis studies signify the effect of an increase in Co concentration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The integration of ferromagnetism in lead-free ferroelectric materials is important to fabricate smart materials for electronic devices. In this work, (1 − x)Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 + xMgFeO3-δ materials (x = 0–9 mol%) were prepared through sol–gel method. X-ray diffraction characterization indicated that MgFeO3-δ materials existed as a well solid solution in lead-free ferroelectric Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials. The rhombohedral structure of Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials was distorted due to the random distribution of Mg and Fe cations into the host lattice. The reduced optical band gap and the induced room-temperature ferromagnetism were due to the spin splitting of transition metal substitution at the B-site of perovskite Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 and the modification by A-site co-substitution. This work elucidates the role of secondary phase as solid solution in Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 material for development of lead-free multiferroelectric materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Polytetrafluoroethylene (PTFE) micropowders were employed in this work to fabricate PTFE-oil organogel, then carbonyl iron particles were dispersed in this thixotropic organogel to prepare magnetorheological fluids without any other additives. By performing a comparative investigation of MRFs’ performances, enhanced magnetorheological response, suspension stability and tribological performance were obtained contrast to pure silicon oil based MRFs. The experimental results revealed a changeable viscosity of organogel, considerable increases in thixotropy also can be observed with the increase of PTFE content. Sedimentation tests demonstrated a much better suspension stability of MRFs based on organogel, suggesting that the internal network microstructures formed by hydrogen bonds between PTFE microparticles and oil molecular chains are likely to impose the gaps among magnetic particles thus hinder the particle aggregation and sedimentation. Moreover, a critical PTFE volume fraction about 4.7 vol% was recognized in this study, lower content organogels tended to display enhanced yield stresses contrast to pure silicon oil based MRFs while high content organogels showed slightly lower ones. It may suggest a compromise between nonmagnetic particle adsorption and the reinforcement effect of network microstructures. The adsorption is likely to decrease the saturation magnetization of carbonyl iron particles and to hinder the formation of field-induced chains, however, the reinforcement effect tends to strengthen these magnetic chains. Besides, the tribological tests confirmed the lubricant effects of PTFE-oil organogel by acquiring rather sharp decreases in friction coefficients of organogel based MRFs especially in the presence of magnetic field.© 2017Magnetic switching in sub-micrometer permalloy-like thin film elements with shape anisotropy but no crystalline anisotropy is demonstrated by simulation using a tailored magnetic field pulse perpendicular to the sample. This switching mode is novel because no magnetic field is applied in the direction where the magnetic switch occurs. This switching mode is precessional and is significantly faster than switching modes dependent upon domain wall motion.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe properties of phosphorus doped hydrogenated amorphous silicon carbide (a-SiCx:H) thin films, that were deposited by plasma enhanced chemical vapor deposition technique with four different carbon contents (x), were analyzed and compared with those of the intrinsic a-SiCx:H thin films. The carbon contents of the films were determined by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. The thickness and optical energies, such as Tauc, E04 and Urbach energies, of the thin films were determined by UV–Visible transmittance spectroscopy. The electrical properties of the films, such as conductivities and activation energies were analyzed by temperature dependent current–voltage measurements. Finally, the conduction mechanisms of the films were investigated by numerical analysis, in which the standard transport mechanism in the extended states and the nearest neighbor hopping mechanism in the band tail states were taken into consideration. It was determined that, by the effect of phosphorus doping the dominant conduction mechanism was the standard transport mechanism for all carbon contents.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization damping is a key parameter to control the critical current and the switching speed in magnetic random access memory, and here we report the effect of the growth sequence on the magnetic dynamics properties of perpendicularly magnetized Ta/CoFeB/MgO structures. Ultrathin CoFeB films have been grown between Ta and MgO but with different stack sequences, i.e. substrate/Ta/CoFeB/MgO/Ta and substrate/Ta/MgO/CoFeB/Ta. The magnetization dynamics induced by femtosecond laser was investigated by using all-optical pump-probe measurements. We found that the Gilbert damping constant was modulated by reversing stack structures, which offers the potential to tune the damping parameter by the growth sequence. The Gilbert damping constant was enhanced from 0.017 for substrate/Ta/CoFeB/MgO/Ta to 0.027 for substrate/Ta/MgO/CoFeB/Ta. We believe that this enhancement originates from the increase of intermixing at the CoFeB/Ta when the Ta atom layer was grown after the CoFeB layer.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Mn doped (ZnO:Mn) and (Mn,Cr) co-doped zinc oxide (ZnO:(Mn,Cr)) have been calculated with the FP-LAPW method by using the LSDA and LSDA+U approximations. Going through three configurations of Mn,Cr co-doped ZnO corresponding to three different distances between manganese and chromium, we have analyzed that ZnO:(Mn,Cr) system is more stable in its preferred configuration2. The lattice constant of undoped ZnO that has been calculated in this study is in a good agreement with the experimental and theoretical values. It was found to be increased by doping with Mn or (Mn,Cr) impurities. The band structure calculations showed the metallic character of Mn doped and Mn,Cr co-doped ZnO. As results, by using LSDA+U (U = 6eV), we show the half-metallic character of ZnO:Mn and ZnO:Mn,Cr. We present the calculated exchange couplings d-d of Mn doped ZnO which is in a good agreement with the former FPLO calculation data and the magnetization step measurement of the experimental work. The magnetic coupling between neighboring Mn impurities in ZnO is found to be antiferromagnetic. In the case of (Mn,Cr) co-doped ZnO, the magnetic coupling between Mn and Cr impurities is found to be antiferromagnetic for configuration1 and 3, and ferromagnetic for configuration2. Thus, the ferromagnetic coupling is weak in ZnO:Mn. Chromium co-doping greatly enhance the ferromagnetism, especially when using configuration2. At last, we present the 2D and 3D spin-density distribution of ZnO:Mn and ZnO:(Mn,Cr) where the ferromagnetic state in ZnO:(Mn,Cr) comes from the strong p-d and d-d interactions between 2p-O, 3d-Mn and 3d-Cr electrons. The results of our calculations suggest that the co-doping ZnO(Mn, Cr) can be among DMS behavior for spintronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.It is of interest to study the magneto-structural coupling in geometrically frustrated antiferromagnets, where structural distortion elevates the ground state degeneracy, leading to a long-range magnetic order. In this regard a cubic spinel compound of the form AB2O4 is currently drawing much attention, where A refers to tetrahedral and B to octahedral sites. In the particular case of NiCr2O4 the material undergoes several structural phase transitions associated with the magnetic ordering. It is therefore necessary to study the magnetic behaviour of NiCr2O4 by substituting either A or B sites, or both systematically with suitable cations. The current work therefore aims at the modification of magnetic properties of NiCr2O4 by doping with Co2+ at A sites. In order to achieve the afore mentioned, (Ni1−xCox)Cr2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) were prepared using chemical co-precipitation techniques. X–ray diffraction (XRD) results indicate that the samples are in the expected phase without any trace of Cr2O3 impurities after calcination. Transmission electron microcopy (TEM) analyses of these samples show that the particles are mostly bi-pyramidal in shape, with sizes ranging from 50 nm to 100 nm. In the present study the ferrimagnetic transition temperatures (TC) of the various samples were determined utilizing magnetization as function of temperature measurements. TC for NiCr2O4 and CoCr2O4 was determined to be 82.4 ± 0.8 K and 99.5 ± 0.5 K, respectively. These values are higher than those previously reported in the literature for both these compounds. Substitution of Ni by Co, results in an increase in the TC, giving values of 89.2 ± 0.7 K and 90.6 ± 0.9 K for (Ni0.5Co0.5)Cr2O4 and (Ni0.25Co0.75)Cr2O4, respectively. The (Ni0.5Co0.5)Cr2O4 sample demonstrated a high coercivity of 3.6 ± 0.1 T and a shift in the hysteresis loop observed under field cooled measurement, not previously reported in literature. X–ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) of (Ni0.5Co0.5)Cr2O4 suggests that the oxidation states of Ni and Co are 2+, while that of Cr is 3+. In order to investigate the local structure around the cations, low temperature extended x–ray absorption fine structure (EXAFS) measurements were performed. From EXAFS it is confirmed that no redistribution of A and B site cations occur at low temperatures. Present findings demonstrate that the magnetic properties of NiCr2O4 can easily and dramatically be modified by doping Co2+ at A sites.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present communication, we present results on the effect of rare-earth (RE) substitution at La-site on the structural, electrical and thermoelectric properties of La0.7−xRExSr0.3MnO3 compounds. The lattice parameters are observed to decrease with RE-doping which is attributed to the fact that the substituted RE ions (RE = Eu, Gd and Y) are smaller than that of La ion. In high temperature semiconducting regime, small polaron hopping (SPH) model is valid, whereas, variable hopping model is valid in low temperature metallic region. The resistivity in the entire temperature range follows percolation model. All the samples exhibit sign reversal in thermopower, S. From temperature dependent S data, it is seen that SPH model is applicable in high temperature regime.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Diamagnetism is a universal phenomenon of materials arising from the orbital motion of electrons bound to atoms, which is commonly known as Langevin diamagnetism. The orbital motion also occurs according to the Faraday's law of induction when the applied magnetic field is oscillating. However, the influence of this dynamic effect on the magnetism of materials has seldom been studied. Here, we propose a new type diamagnetism coined Faraday diamagnetism. The magnitude of this diamagnetism evaluated by an atomic electric circuit model was as large as that of Langevin diamagnetism. The predicted scale of Faraday diamagnetism was supported by experiments.© 2017Active magnetic regenerators (AMR) have the potential for high efficiency cryogen liquefaction. One active magnetic regenerative liquefier (AMRL) configuration consists of dual magnetocaloric regenerators that reciprocate in a persistent-mode superconducting solenoid. Issues with this configuration are the spatial and temporal magnetization gradients that induce large magnetic forces and winding currents. To solve the coupled problem, we present a force minimization approach using passive magnetic material to balance a dual-regenerator AMR. A magnetostatic model is developed and simulated force waveforms are compared with experimental measurements. A genetic algorithm identifies force-minimizing passive structures with virtually ideal balancing characteristics. Implementation details are investigated which affirm the potential of the proposed methodology.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The importance of type-II superconductors with strong pinning comes from their ability to carry large transport currents in the presence of a magnetic field. We report on the results of the bulk magnetization measurements in the superconducting state in clean single crystals of NdFeAsO0.9F0.1 at various temperatures. The zero-temperature superconducting critical current density, Jc, where the superconducting transition temperature Tc reaches a maximum of 45(1) kelvin, displays a remarkable high value. The field dependence of the critical current density was analyzed within the collective pinning model. A remarkably good agreement between the experimental results and theoretical δ1 pinning curve is obtained. This indicates that pinning in NdFeAsO0.9F0.1 crystal originates from spatial variation of the mean free path. Additionally, the normalized pinning force density, Fp, curves verses H/Hirr (Hirr is the irreversibility field) were scaled using the Dew-Hughes model. Our analysis suggests that point pinning alone cannot explain the observed field variation of Fp.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a technique has been developed to estimate intrinsic small signal parameters of submicron SiC MESFETs, designed for high power microwave applications. In the developed technique, small signal parameters are extracted by involving drain-to-source current, Ids instead of Schottky barrier depletion layer expression. It has been demonstrated that in SiC MESFETs, the depletion layer gets modified due to intense transverse electric field and/or self-heating effects, which are conventionally not taken into account. Thus, assessment of AC small signal parameters by employing depletion layer expression loses its accuracy for devices meant for high power applications. A set of expressions for AC small signal elements has been developed using Ids and its dependence on device biasing has been discussed. The validity of the proposed technique has been demonstrated using experimental data.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Transport properties of the kesterite-like single crystals of Cu2ZnSnS4, Cu2ZnSnxGe1−xSe4 and Cu2ZnGeS4 are investigated in pulsed magnetic fields up to B = 20 T. The Mott variable-range hopping (VRH) conduction is established by investigations of the resistivity, ρ (T), in all the materials mentioned above within broad temperature intervals of ΔTv4 ∼ 50–150 K, 50–250 K and 100–200 K, respectively. In addition, the Shklovskii-Efros VRH conductivity below Tv2 ∼ 3–4 K, the nearest-neighbour hopping (NNH) charge transfer between T ∼ 250–320 K and the conductivity by activation of holes on the mobility threshold at temperatures outside ΔTv4, respectively, are observed in these materials. In Cu2ZnSnS4, magnetoresistance (MR) contains only a positive contribution, connected mainly to a shrinkage of impurity wave functions by the magnetic field. At the same time, a negative contribution to MR, attributable to interference effects in VRH, is observed in Cu2ZnSnxGe1−xSe4 and, especially, in Cu2ZnGeS4. The joint analysis of the MR and ρ (T) data has yielded important electronic parameters of the materials. This includes widths of the acceptor band W and of the Coulomb gap Δ the NNH activation energy En, the localization radius a, the acceptor concentration NA and the density of the localized states at the Fermi level, g (μ). A dramatic increase of a in Cu2ZnSnS4 with decreasing T is observed, whereas in Cu2ZnSnxGe1−xSe4 all the parameter W, En, g (μ), a and NA are non-monotonic functions of x. Finally, in Cu2ZnGeS4 the Hall coefficient RH (T) is negative (despite of the p-type conduction), exhibiting the dependence close to that of ρ (T) in the Mott VRH interval.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The stability of lattice dynamics and the magnetism of the ordered γ′-Fe4N crystalline alloy at high pressures were studied by first-principle calculations based on density-functional theory. The dynamical stable new phase P2/m-Fe4N at high pressures was found by conducting the softening phenomenon at the point M (0.5 0.5 0) of the acoustic phonon at 10 GPa in the γ′-Fe4N via soft-mode phase transition theory. Compared to the phonon spectrum of γ′-Fe4N without considering electronic spin polarization, the ground-state lattice dynamical stability of the ferromagnetic phase γ′-Fe4N is induced by the spontaneous magnetization at pressures below 1 GPa. However, P2/m-Fe4N is more thermodynamically stable than γ′-phase at pressures below 1 GPa, and the magnetic moments of the two phases are almost the same. The ground-state structure of P2/m phase is more stable than that of γ′-phase in the pressure range from 2.9 to 19 GPa. The magnetic moments of the two phases are almost the same in the pressure range from 20 to 214 GPa, but the ground-state structure of γ′-phase is more stable than that of P2/m phase in the pressure range from 143.8 to 214 GPa. On the contrary, the ground-state structure of P2/m phase is more stable when the pressure is above 214 GPa. In the pressure range from 214 to 300 GPa, the magnetic moment of P2/m phase is lower than that of γ′-phase, and the magnetic moments of the two phase tend to be consistent when the pressure exceeds 300 GPa.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.First principle studies on the magnetic ground state structure, noncollinearity, binding energy and various electronic properties of a series of Crx (x = 2–8) clusters are performed. In order to investigate the effect of ionization and oxidation on the clusters, the anionic (Crx−) and oxidized (CrxO2) analogues of those clusters are also studied in detail. To calculate adiabatic electron affinity of CrxO2 clusters, additionally CrxO2− analogues are also included in the present work. An interesting even (non-magnetic) – odd (magnetic) feature in the considered cluster series has been noticed. The similar behavior is also reflected from their electronic properties as even (less reactive) – odd (more reactive). The most of the neutral and ionized chromium clusters, viz., Crx and Crx− are found to be noncollinear in their ground states, whereas oxidation stabilized those clusters into the collinear spin alignments. The bond distances of Cr clusters are found to be close with available experimental studies.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.High-temperature heat treatment has valuable impact on the structure and physical properties of artificial crystals with 3d metal and palladium particles. Artificial crystals are obtained by means of introduction of particles into the interspherical voids of opal matrices. The magnetic properties are studied at the temperatures ranging from 2 to 300 K and in fields up to 350 kOe. Microwave properties are investigated in the millimeter frequency range. The complex dielectric permittivity of several nanocomposites is measured. The influence of heat treatment up to 960 °C on the structure of artificial crystals is clarified.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The state of iron atoms and their interatomic interactions were investigated by the method of magnetic dilution in Bi2SrNb2−2xFe2xO9−δ with a layered perovskite-like structure. It was found that the solid solutions are characterized by increased values of the magnetic moment of iron atoms, compared with purely spin values of Fe(III). This was explained by the presence of exchange-bound aggregates of Fe(III) atoms with antiferro- and ferromagnetic types of exchange. The dependencies of the exchange parameters and cluster distribution on the iron content of Bi2SrNb2−2xFe2xO9−δ solid solutions were calculated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have fabricated a pseudo single crystal of cementite under a rotating magnetic field and investigated its easy and hard axes of magnetization, and determined its magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy. The obtained results are as follows: the hard and easy axes of cementite are the a- and c-axes of the orthorhombic structure with the space group Pnma, respectively. The hard axis observed experimentally was in good agreement with that obtained by an ab initio calculation; however, such consistency was not observed for the easy axis. The magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy was determined as 334 ± 20 kJ/m3 at 5 K.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The spin-dependent electrical conductivity of counterparts of graphene, transition-metal dichalcogenides (TMDs) and group-IV nanosheets, have investigated by a magnetic exchange field (MEF)-induction to gain the electronic transport properties of charge carriers. We have implemented a k.p Hamiltonian model through the Kubo-Greenwood formalism in order to address the dynamical behavior of correlated Dirac fermions. Tuning the MEF enables one to control the effective mass of carriers in group-IV and TMDs, differently. We have found the Dirac-like points in a new quantum anomalous Hall (QAH) state at strong MEFs for both structures. For both cases, a broad peak in electrical conductivity originated from the scattering rate and entropy is observed. Spin degeneracy at some critical MEFs is another remarkable point. We have found that in the limit of zero or uniform MEFs with respect to the spin-orbit interaction, the large resulting electrical conductivity depends on the spin sub-bands in group-IV and MLDs. Featuring spin-dependent electronic transport properties, one can provide a new scenario for future possible applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In order to widen the absorbing band, an equivalent gradient structure absorber was designed based on the particle distribution. Firstly, the electromagnetic parameter of the absorbent with uniform dispersion was tested using the vector network analyzer in 8–18 GHz. Three different equivalent materials of the spherical, square and hexagon empty shape were designed. The scattering parameters and the monostatic reflection loss (RL) of the periodic structural materials were simulated in the commercial software. Then the effective permittivity and the permeability was derived by the Nicolson-Ross-Weir algorithm and fitted by Maxwell-Garnett mixing rule. The results showed that the simulated reflectance and transmission parameters of equivalent composites with the different shapes were very close. The derived effective permittivity and permeability of the composite with different absorbent content was also close, and the average deviation was about 0.52 + j0.15 and 0.15 + j0.01 respectively. Finally, the wide band absorbing material was designed using the genetic algorithm. The optimized RL result showed that the absorbing composites with thickness 3 mm had an excellent absorbing property (RL <−10 dB) in 8–18 GHz, the equivalent absorber density could be decreased 30.7% compared with the uniform structure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we report the structural, optical and magnetic studies of three spinel ferrites namely CuFe2O4, MgFe2O4 and ZnFe2O4 prepared in an autoclave under the same physical conditions but with two different liquid medium and different surfactant. We use water as the medium and trisodium citrate as the surfactant for one method (Hydrothermal method) and ethylene glycol as the medium and poly ethylene glycol as the surfactant for the second method (solvothermal method). The phase identification and structural characterization are done using XRD and morphological studies are carried out by TEM. Cubical and porous spherical morphologies are obtained for hydrothermal and solvothermal process respectively without any impurity phase. The optical studies are carried out using FTIR and UV–Vis reflectance spectra. In order to elucidate the nonlinear optical behaviour of the prepared nanomaterial, open aperture z-scan technique is used. From the fitted z-scan curves nonlinear absorption coefficient and the saturation intensity are determined. The magnetic characterization of the samples is performed at room temperature using vibrating sample magnetometer measurements. The M−H curves obtained are fitted using theoretical equation and the different components of magnetization are determined. Nanoparticles with high saturation magnetization are obtained for MgFe2O4 and ZnFe2O4 prepared under solvothermal reaction. The magnetic hyperfine parameters and the cation distribution of the prepared materials are determined using room temperature Mössbauer spectroscopy. The fitted spectra reveal the difference in the magnetic hyperfine parameters owing to the change in size and morphology.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we propose a way to simultaneously realize the plate forming and hydriding of La(Fe, Si)13 powders by mixing hydride MgNiYHx and solder powders Sn3.0Ag0.5Cu. Under the annealing of the green compact, the hydriding of La(Fe, Si)13 was realized through absorbing the released hydrogen from the metallic hydride MgNiYHx. The Curie temperature of La(Fe, Si)13 alloy increased from 213 K to 333 K and hysteresis reduced from 3.3 J/kg·K to 1.33 J/kg·K. Due to the bonding of Sn3.0Ag0.5Cu powders, the mechanical strength of the composite compact was highly improved in comparison to the compact of La(Fe, Si)13 powders alone.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn order to enhance specific on-resistance (Ron,sp), the trench gate structure was also introduced into 4H-SiC MOSFET as Si MOSFET. But the 4H-SiC trench gate has worse off-state characteristics than the Si trench gate due to the incomplete gate oxidation process (Šimonka et al., 2017). In order to overcome this problem, P-shielding trench gate MOSFET (TMOS) was proposed and researched in previous studies. But P-shielding has to be designed with minimum design rule in order to protect gate oxide effectively. P-shielding TMOS also has the drawback of on-state characteristics degradation corresponding to off state improvement for minimum design rule. Therefore optimized design is needed to satisfy both on and off characteristics. In this paper, the design parameters were analyzed and optimized so that the 4H-SiC P-shielding TMOS satisfies both on and off characteristics. Design limitations were proposed such that P-shielding is able to defend the gate oxide. The P-shielding layer should have the proper junction depth and concentration to defend the electric field to gate oxide during the off-state. However, overmuch P-shielding junction depth disturbs the on-state current flow, a problem which can be solved by increasing the trench depth. As trench depth increases, however, the breakdown voltage decreases. Therefore, trench depth should be designed with due consideration for on-off characteristics. For this, design conditions and modeling were proposed which allow P-shielding to operate without degradation of on-state characteristics. Based on this proposed model, the 1200 V 4H-SiC P-shielding trench gate MOSFET was designed and optimized.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe-Cu-Nb-Si-B flakes with multiphase nanostructures have been obtained by annealing the amorphous ribbon and subsequently ball milled for 30 h. The crystal structures have been examined by X-ray diffraction pattern and Mössbauer spectrum. The results show that the particles annealed at 900 °C are made up of amorphous ferromagnetic phase, α-Fe3Si ferromagnetic phase and Fe2B phase, and the average hyperfine magnetic field (HBhf) of particles is 24.02 T. Meanwhile, the relationships between the structure and the high frequency permeability have been studied. Compared with particles annealed at 600 °C, particles annealed at 900 °C exhibit higher saturation magnetization, which is evidenced by the larger HBhf. Also, three magnetic loss peaks in a permeability spectrum have been observed for the particles annealed at 900 °C. The natural resonance frequencies are calculated, which are in good agreement with the experimental resonance peaks. The origin of the multiple magnetic loss peaks can be explained from the perspective of the distribution of shape anisotropy fields which is caused by multiple phase structure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal process of hexagonal ordered CoFe nanodot arrays was investigated as a function of nanodot thickness (td) varying from 10 to 30 nm with fixed diameter. For this purpose, ordered CoFe nanodots with a diameter of 80 ± 4 nm were grown by sputtering using ultra-thin alumina mask. The vortex annihilation and the dynamic spin configuration in the ordered CoFe nanodots were analyzed by means of magnetic hysteresis loops in complement with the micromagnetic simulation studies. A highly pinched hysteresis loop observed at 20 nm thickness suggests the occurrence of vortex state in these nanodots. With increase in dot thickness from 10 to 30 nm, the estimated coercivity values tend to increase from 80 to 175 Oe, indicating irreversible change in the nucleation/annihilation field of vortex state. The measured magnetic properties were then corroborated with the change in the shape of the nanodots from disk to hemisphere through micromagnetic simulation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the field of magnonics it is of great interest to excite spin waves with high k-vectors. However, to do this using conventional methods, such as the electrical excitation with coplanar wave guides, can be quite difficult, due to challenges in the fabrication of the necessary structures and impedance mismatching. In this paper we present simulation of a novel technique to generate spin waves via the excitation of the magnetization in an array of magnetic strips and show that we acquire high k-vectors depending on the dimensions of the strip array.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.With the UCo1- xOsxAl single crystals, we studied interplay between alloying and pressure effects on magnetism of the itinerant electron metamagnet UCoAl. The Os alloying for x ≥ 0.005 switches the UCoAl to ferromagnetism. For the UCo0.995Os0.005Al single crystal, even lowest applied pressure 0.11 GPa is sufficient to suppress ferromagnetism. A sharp metamagnetic transition for various pressures is observed in magnetic fields along the c axis of the crystal. Concentration magnetic phase diagram of the UCo1- xOsxAl, which includes the quantum phase transition from ferromagnetic to metamagnetic state, and P–T–H phase diagram of the UCo0.995Os0.005Al are determined using the data of magnetization measurements at various pressures and temperatures.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the gate-induced drain leakage (GIDL) is analyzed on gate-all-around (GAA) Nanowire FET (NW FET) with ellipse-shaped channel induced by process variation effect (PVE). The fabrication process of nanowire can lead to change the shape of channel cross section from circle to ellipse. The effect of distorted channel shape is investigated and verified by technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulation in terms of the GIDL current. The simulation results demonstrate that the components of GIDL current are two mechanisms of longitudinal band-to-band tunneling (L-BTBT) at body/drain junction and transverse band-to-band tunneling (T-BTBT) at gate/drain junction. These two mechanisms are investigated on channel radius (rnw) and aspect ratio of ellipse-shape respectively and together.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The stability of skyrmions in various environments is estimated by analyzing the multidimensional surface describing the energy of the system as a function of the directions of the magnetic moments in the system. The energy is given by a Heisenberg-like Hamiltonian including terms representing Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, anisotropy energy and interaction with an external magnetic field. Local minima on this surface correspond to the ferromagnetic and skyrmion states. Minimum energy paths (MEP) between the minima are calculated using the geodesic nudged elastic band method. The maximum energy along an MEP corresponds to a first order saddle point on the energy surface and gives an estimate of the activation energy for the magnetic transition, such as creation and annihilation of a skyrmion. The pre-exponential factor in the Arrhenius law for the rate, the so-called attempt frequency, is estimated within harmonic transition state theory where the eigenvalues of the Hessian at the saddle point and the local minima are used to characterize the shape of the energy surface. For some degrees of freedom, so-called “zero modes”, the energy of the system remains invariant. They need to be treated separately and give rise to temperature dependence of the attempt frequency. As an example application of this general theory, the lifetime of a skyrmion in a track of finite width for a PdFe overlayer on a Ir(1 1 1) substrate is calculated as a function of track width and external magnetic field. Also, the effect of non-magnetic impurities is studied. Various MEPs for annihilation inside a track, via the boundary of a track and at an impurity are presented. The attempt frequency as well as the activation energy has been calculated for each mechanism to estimate the transition rate as a function of temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thin film multilayer heterostructures consisting of two magnetically coupled stacks, one with in-plane and the second one with out-of-plane magnetic anisotropies, are very promising hybrid magnetic anisotropy materials for spintronics. Here we present results on magnetic and magnetoresistance properties of [Co/Ni]15 (in-plane)/Cu/[Co/Pt]4 (out-of-plane) spin-valves with hybrid magnetic anisotropy. We demonstrate that the saturation field and magnetoresistance depend on the thickness of the copper interlayer (tCu) and they have peak values at tCu = 2.5 nm, where the antiferromagnetic coupling is maximum. We reveal that an indirect exchange coupling between [Co/Ni]n and [Co/Pt]m stacks decreases the magnetization switching fields making these systems suitable for low-field sensor, spin torque oscillator and bit patterned media applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Asymmetric transmission of linearly or circularly polarized waves is a well-established property not only for three-layered chiral structures but for multi-layered ones. Here we show a method which can simultaneously implement asymmetric transmission for arbitrary base vector polarized wave in multi-layered chiral meta-surface. We systematically study the implemented method based on a multi-layered chiral structure consisting of a y-shape, a half gammadion and an S-shape in the terahertz gap. A numerical simulation was carried out, followed by an explanation of the asymmetric transmission mechanism in these structures proposed in this work. The simulated results indicate that the multi-layered chiral structure can realize a maximum asymmetric transmission of 0.89 and 0.28 for circularly and linearly polarized waves, respectively, which exhibit magnitude improvement over previous chiral metamaterials. Specifically, the maximum asymmetric transmitted coefficient of the multi-layered chiral structure is insensitivity to the incident angles from 0° to 45° for circularly polarized components. Additionally, we also study the influence of structural parameters on the asymmetric transmission effect for both linearly and circularly polarized waves in detail.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Orientation dependence of magnetoelectric coefficient αE33 in 1-3–type BaTiO3/CoFe2O4 composites was calculated in arbitrary directions by three-dimensional coordinate transformation method. The space distributions of pc11′, pc12′, e31′ for piezoelectric phase and mc11′, mc12′, q31′ for magnetic phase were obtained independently using relative experimental data and original matrices for 4mm BaTiO3 and m3m CoFe2O4. Elastic stiffness coefficients show little orientation differences, while e31′ and q31′ exhibit high dependence on crystal orientation, with the MAX absolute e31′ = 2.96 C/m2 and the MAX q31′ = 556 × 10−12 m/A are found at θ = 0° and θ = 0°, ϕ = 45°, respectively. For space distribution of αE33′, BaTiO3||[0 0 1]/CoFe2O4||[0 0 1] combination has the maximum value which applies to both 1-3 p/m (1.485 V/A) and 1-3 m/p composites (1.529 V/A). Volume fraction is quite independent of orientations of both piezoelectric and magnetic phases and the volume fraction for magnetic phase f around 0.5 obtains the largest αE33. The results suggest an approach to significantly enhancing magnetoelectric coefficient of composite multiferroic materials through crystal orientation controls of single crystals and textured ceramics.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, investigations of surface PiN diodes developed for a reconfigurable plasma antenna have been described. To increase carrier concentration within the surface PiN diodes as much as possible, parameters of the plasma region have been extensively discussed. According to these studies, it has been found that the average carrier concentration within the ‘i’ region has been achieved the level of 1018 cm−3 at forward bias of 2 V. The carrier concentration becomes larger when the length and width of the ‘i’ region are reduced. Furthermore, a novel frequency reconfigurable antenna based on SPiN diodes is presented at Ku-band. The resonance frequencies at 13.71 GHz, 15.17 GHz, and 17.81 GHz have been easily achieved by turning on or off different sections of the antenna. The radiation efficiencies of the antenna are 79.70%, 80.70%, and 81.70%, respectively. Experimental results shown in this paper confirm the usefulness of the PiN diode's application within a plasma antenna and other semiconductor fields.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report measuring the longitudinal magnetothermopower (LMTP) and giant magnetoresistance (GMR) of Py/Cu/Py/FeMn spin valves grown on top of a thermally oxidized silicon substrate. These measurements showed that the LMTP behaves similarly to GMR, indicating a similar behavior of charge current and thermal current inside a spin valve. Since spin dependent interface scattering is the mechanism that governs GMR, these observations suggests that LMTP also originates from the spin dependent interface scattering of thermally induced current. However, there are differences between the LMTP and GMR signals, including a factor of two larger signal for the LMTP, that may indicate the LMTP is additionally sensitive to another scattering phenomenon in these heterostructures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Compact arrays of permanent magnets have shown promise as replacements for electromagnets in applications requiring magnetic cusps and mirrors. An adjustable system capable of suspending and translating a pair of light, nonmagnetic chassis carrying such sources of magnetic field has been designed and constructed. Using this device to align two cylindrical chassis, strong solenoid-like domains of field, as well as classic biconic cusp and magnetic mirror topologies, are generated. Employing a pair of ring-shaped chassis instead, the superposition of their naturally-emitted cusps is demonstrated to produce sextupolar and octupolar magnetic fields.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we report single step large scale synthesis of highly crystalline iron oxide nanoparticles viz. magnetite (Fe3O4) and maghemite (γ-Fe2O3) via gas phase condensation process, where micron sized iron metal powder was used as a precursor. Selective phases of iron oxide were obtained by variation of gas flow rate of oxygen and hence partial pressure of oxygen inside the plasma reactor. Most of the particles were found to possesses average crystallite size of about 20–30 nm. The DC magnetization curves recorded indicate almost super-paramagnetic nature of the iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles. Further, iron oxide nanoparticles were analyzed using Raman spectroscopy, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy and Mossbauer spectroscopy. In order to explore the feasibility of these nanoparticles for magnetic damper application, rheological studies have been carried out and compared with commercially available Carbonyl Iron (CI) particles. The nanoparticles obtained by thermal plasma route show improved dispersion which is useful for rheological applications.© 2017 Elsevier LtdUltra-low voltage SRAMs are highly sought-after in energy-limited systems such as battery-powered and self-harvested SoCs. However, ultra-low voltage operation diminishes SRAM read bitline (RBL) sensing margin significantly. This paper tackles this issue by presenting a novel 9T cell with data-independent RBL leakage in combination with an RBL boosting technique for enhancing the sensing margin. The proposed technique automatically tracks process, temperature and voltage (PVT) variations for robust sensing margin enhancement. A test chip fabricated in 65 nm CMOS technology shows that the proposed scheme significantly enlarges the sensing margin compared to the conventional bitline sensing scheme. It also achieves the minimum operating voltage of 0.18 V and the minimum energy consumption of 0.92 J/access at 0.4 V.© 2017Low-cost and scalable manufacturing boosts organic electronic devices with all solution process. La2O3 powders and corresponding aqueous solutions are facilely synthesized. Atomic force microscopy and scanning electron microscopy measurements show that solution-processed La2O3 behaves superior film morphology. X-ray diffraction and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy measurements verify crystal phase and typical La signals. In comparison with the most widely-used hole injection layers (HILs) of MoOx and poly(ethylene dioxythiophene):poly(styrene sulfonate) (PEDOT:PSS), enhanced luminous efficiency is observed in organic light-emitting diode (OLED) using solution-processed La2O3 HIL. Current-voltage, impedance-voltage and phase angle-voltage transition curves clarify that solution-processed La2O3 behaves nearly comparable hole injection capacity to MoOx and PEDOT:PSS, and favorably tailors carrier balance. Moreover, the hole injection mechanism of solution-processed La2O3 is proven to be predominantly controlled by Fowler-Nordheim tunneling process and the hole injection barrier height between ITO and NPB via La2O3 interlayer is estimated to be 0.098 eV. Our experiments provide a feasible application of La2O3 in organic electronic devices with solution process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The specific heat, thermal expansion and magnetic properties of polycrystalline sample of nonstoichiometric dysprosium boride DyB50, that was synthesized by boron-thermal reduction of the metal from its oxide in vacuum, were studied at 2–300 K. The measurements revealed a heat capacity and magnetic susceptibility anomalies at about TN ≈ 6.3 K, caused by the transition to an antiferromagnetic state. The anomalies of studied properties of DyB50 at higher temperatures have been ascribed to the influence of crystal electric field (CEF). The scheme of CEF-splitting of Dy3+ ion ground level in boride has been proposed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.An electromagnetic method for determining axial stress in ferromagnetic bars is proposed. In this method, the tested bar is under the static magnetization provided by permanent magnets. The tested bar do not have to be magnetized up to the technical saturation because reciprocal amplitude of initial differential susceptibility (RAIDS) is adopted as the feature parameter. RAIDS is calculated from the radial magnetic flux density Br Lo = 0.5 at the Lift-off Lo = 0.5 mm, radial magnetic flux density Br Lo = 1 at the Lift-off Lo = 1 mm and axial magnetic flux density Bz Lo = 1 at the Lift-off Lo = 1 mm from the surface of the tested bar. Firstly, the theoretical derivation of RAIDS is carried out according to Gauss’ law for magnetism, Ampere's Law and the Rayleigh relation in Rayleigh region. Secondly, the experimental system is set up for a 2-meter length and 20 mm diameter steel bar. Thirdly, an experiment is carried out on the steel bar to analyze the relationship between the obtained RAIDS and the axial stress. Experimental results show that the obtained RAIDS decreases almost linearly with the increment of the axial stress inside the steel bar in the initial elastic region. The proposed method has the potential to determine tensile axial stress in the slender cylindrical ferromagnetic bar.© 2017 Elsevier LtdGate-all-around silicon nanowire transistors (SNWTs) are recognized as promising candidates to reduce problems due to quantum effects in conventional nano-transistors. In this study we investigate whether structural modification of SNWTs leads to improved performance. A model calculation for a transistor with a channel length of several nanometers requires a quantum transport simulator, and we use a Wigner transport equation (WTE) discretized by a third-order upwind differential scheme (TDS) suggested by Yamada et al. (2009) for quantum transport simulations of gate-all-around silicon-shell nanowire transistors (SSNWTs), core gate SSNWTs (CG-SSNWTs), and independent CG-SSNWTs (ICG-SSNWTs). A WTE discretized by the TDS is known to produce highly accurate results. The SSNWT has a structure in which an insulator cylinder is inserted into the center axis of the SNWT, and the CG-SSNWT has a structure in which a core gate is inserted into the center axis of the SSNWT. The calculations show that the performances of the SSNWTs are improved by introducing the Si-shell structure and the core gate. The ICG-SSNWTs are identical in structure to the CG-SSNWTs, but the outer and core gates are independently biased. The calculations for the ICG-SSNWTs show that the threshold voltage can be controlled using the difference between the core and outer gate voltages.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe report on thin-film transistors (TFTs) based on titanium oxide (TiOx) prepared using femtosecond laser pre-annealing for electrical application of n-type channel oxide transparent TFTs. Amorphous TFTs using TiOx semiconductors as an active layer have a low-temperature process and show remarkable electrical performance. And the femtosecond laser pre-annealing process has greater flexibility and development space for semiconductor production activity, with a fast preparation method. TFTs with a TiOx semiconductor pre-annealed via femtosecond laser at 3 W have a pinhole-free and smooth surface without crystal grains.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.It is shown that the Imry-Ma theorem stating that in space dimensions d < 4 the introduction of an arbitrarily small concentration of defects of the “random local anisotropy” type in a system with continuous symmetry of the n-component vector order parameter (O(n) model) leads to the long-range order collapse and to occurrence of a disordered state, is not true if an anisotropic distribution of the defect-induced random easy axes directions in the order parameter space creates a global anisotropy of the “easy axis” type. For a weakly anisotropic distribution of the easy axes, in space dimensions 2 ≤ d < 4 there exists some critical defect concentration, when exceeded, the inhomogeneous Imry-Ma state can exist as an equilibrium one. At lower defect concentration the long-range order takes place in the system. For a strongly anisotropic distribution of the easy axes, the Imry-Ma state is suppressed completely and the long-range order state takes place at any defect concentration.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we investigate the effect of rising time (TR) of liquid gate bias (VLG) on transient responses in pH sensors based on Si nanowire ion-sensitive field-effect transistors (ISFETs). As TR becomes shorter and pH values decrease, the ISFET current takes a longer time to saturate to the pH-dependent steady-state value. By correlating VLG with the internal gate-to-source voltage of the ISFET, we found that this effect occurs when the drift/diffusion of mobile ions in analytes in response to VLG is delayed. This gives us useful insight on the design of ISFET-based point-of-care circuits and systems, particularly with respect to determining an appropriate rising time for the liquid gate bias.© 2017 Elsevier LtdFor advanced gate stacks, effective work function (WFeff) and equivalent oxide thickness (EOT) are fundamental parameters for technology optimization. On FDSOI transistors, and contrary to the bulk technologies, while EOT can still be extracted at strong inversion from the typical gate-to-channel capacitance (Cgc), it is no longer the case for WFeff due to the disappearance of an observable flat band condition on capacitance characteristics. In this work, a new experimental method, the Cbg(VBG) characteristic, is proposed in order to extract the well flat band condition (VFB, W). This characteristic enables an accurate and direct evaluation of WFeff. Moreover, using the previous extraction of the gate oxide (tfox), and buried oxide (tbox) from typical capacitance characteristics (Cgc and Cbc), it allows the extraction of the channel thickness (tch). Furthermore, the measurement of the well flat band condition on Cbg(VBG) characteristics for two different Si and SiGe channel also proves the existence of a dipole at the SiGe/SiO2 interface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic states of iron and their dependence on crystal structure represent an important case study for the physics of magnetism and its role in fundamental and applied science, including geophysical sciences. hcp iron is the most elusive structure as it exists only at high pressure but, at the same time, it is expected to be stable up to very high temperature. Exploring the magnetic state of pure Fe at high pressure is difficult and no conclusive results have been obtained. Simple binary alloys where the hexagonal phase of Fe is stabilized, offer a more controllable alternative to investigate iron magnetism. We carried out a neutron diffraction experiment on hcp Fe71Ru29 disordered alloy as a function of temperature. Fe in the hexagonal lattice of this specific alloy results to be antiferromagnetically aligned with a rather complex structure and a small magnetic moment. The temperature dependence suggests a Néel temperature TN=124±10 K, a value consistent with the low magnetic moment of 1.04 ± 0.10 μB obtained from the diffraction data that also suggest a non-commensurate magnetic structure with magnetic moments probably aligned along the c axis. The present data provide evidence for magnetic ordering in hcp Fe and support the theoretical description of magnetism of pure Fe at high pressure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A detailed lineshape analysis of the ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectra taken on pulse electrodeposited nanocrystalline (nc-) Ni sheets (with the average crystallite size, d, varying from 10 nm to 40 nm) at temperatures ranging from 113 K to 325 K yield accurate values for saturation magnetization, Ms(T), Landé splitting factor, g, anisotropy field, Hk(T), resonance field, Hres, and FMR linewidth, ΔHpp(T). Thermally-excited spin-wave (SW) excitations completely account for Ms(T) and the SW description of Ms(T) gives the values for the saturation magnetization and spin-wave stiffness at absolute zero of temperature, i.e., Ms(0) and D0, for nc-Ni samples of different d that are in excellent agreement with the corresponding values deduced previously from an elaborate SW analysis of the bulk magnetization data. While Ms(0) varies with d as Ms(0)~d-3/2,D0 follows the power law D0∼d4/3. The angular variations of Hres in the ‘in-plane’ as well as ‘out-of-plane’ sample configurations, demonstrate that the main contribution to Hk(T) comes from the cubic magnetocrystalline anisotropy. The exchange-conductivity mechanism describes the observed thermal decline of ΔHpp reasonably well but fails to explain the very large magnitude of ΔHpp at any given temperature. By comparison, the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) damping gives a much greater contribution to ΔHpp but the LLG contribution is relatively insensitive to temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.CuxNi1−xFe2O4 powders were prepared by the sol-gel method and the corresponding temperature dependence of microstructure, magnetic and dielectric properties of different CuxNi1−xFe2O4 samples have been investigated. Results of XRD and SEM indicate that the Cu2+ concentration played an important role in both crystal phase and particle distribution of CuxNi1−xFe2O4. The measurement of magnetic properties shows that both Cu2+ doping and sintering temperature could change the saturation magnetization and remanent magnetization in a noticeable manner, and even the magnetic material type. The Cu0.2Ni0.8Fe2O4 sample sintered at 900 °C had the largest saturation magnetization (34.61 emu/g), remanent magnetization (17.85 emu/g) and the lowest coercivity (0.17 kOe). The dielectric measurements show strong frequency dependence for all the samples. The peak observed in frequency dependence of dielectric loss measurements shifts to higher frequency with the increasing Cu2+ concentration and sintering temperature, indicating a Debye-like dielectric relaxation. All the results indicate that the Cu2+ doping has a significant influence on NiFe2O4 ferrites.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe report a MEMS fabrication and frequency sweep for a high-order mode suspending beam and plate layer in electrostatic micro-gap semiconductor capacitor. This suspended beam and plate was designed with silicon oxide (SiO2) film which was fabricated using bulk silicon micromachining technology on both side of a silicon substrate. The designed semiconductor capacitors were driven by a bias direct current (DC) and a sweep frequency alternative current (AC) in a room temperature for an electrical response test. Finite element calculating software was used to evaluate the deformation mode around its high-order response frequency. Compared a single capacitor with a high-order response frequency (0.42 MHz) and a 1 × 2 array parallel capacitor, we found that the 1 × 2 array parallel capacitor had a broader high-order response range. And it concluded that a DC bias voltage can be used to modulate a high-order response frequency for both a single and 1 × 2 array parallel capacitors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multifunctional hybrid nanocomposites remain to be of great interest in biomedicine as a universal tool in a number of applications. As a promising example, the nanoparticles with magnetic core and porous shell have a potential as theranostic agents combining both the diagnostics probe and drug delivery vehicle properties. However, reported methods of the nanostructure preparation are complex and include tedious time-consuming growth of porous shell by means of layer by layer assembly technique. In this study, we develop new way of fabrication of the superparamagnetic magnetite core @ porous metal organic framework shell nanoparticles and demonstrate their application both as a multimodal (MRI contrasting, magnetometric and optical labeling) and multifunctional (in vivo bioimaging, biotargeting by coupled receptors, lateral flow assay) agents. The easiness of fabrication, controllable bioconjugation properties and low level of non-specific binding indicate high potential of the nanoparticles to be employed as multifunctional agents in theranostics, advanced biosensing and bioimaging.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report an experimental study of single-phase Bi0.85−xLa0.15HoxFeO3 nanoparticles (BLHxFO-NPs) that synthesized by a sol–gel method. The Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction pattern of BLHxFO samples indicate a phase transition from rhombohedral (space group R3c) to orthorhombic (space group Pbnm) structure with increasing Ho content. The bond lengths and angles for all samples were determined which supports the magnetic and electrical results. The average particles size of BLHxFO-NPs has been estimated from field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM) images and using a standard log-normal distribution equation. The remnant magnetisation in BLHxFO-NPs increase from 0.09 emu/g for x = 0–0.35 emu/g for x = 0.25 sample at 5 K. In order to clarify origin of magnetisation behaviour in BLHxFO-NPs, a systematic investigation has been performed on the magnetisation of all samples. The frequency (f) and composition (x) dependence of relative dielectric constant (ε) and dielectric loss (tan δ) have been studied for BLHxFO nanoparticles at room temperature. The dielectric properties indicates a local maximum in sample with x = 0.25 while maximum magnetodielectric coefficient occurs in x = 0.35. Simultaneous enhancement in magnetic and dielectric properties can play an important role for the practical applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The paper discusses the magnetic state of zeta phase of iron nitride viz. ζ-Fe2N on the basis of spin polarized first principles electronic structure calculations together with a review of already published data. Results of our first principles study suggest that the ground state of ζ-Fe2N is ferromagnetic (FM) with a magnetic moment of 1.528μB on the Fe site. The FM ground state is lower than the anti-ferromagnetic (AFM) state by 8.44 meV and non-magnetic (NM) state by 191 meV per formula unit. These results are important in view of reports which claim that ζ-Fe2N undergoes an AFM transition below 10 K and others which do not observe any magnetic transition up to 4.2 K. We argue that the experimental results of AFM transition below 10 K are inconclusive and we propose the presence of competing FM and AFM superexchange interactions between Fe sites mediated by nitrogen atoms, which are consistent with Goodenough-Kanamori-Anderson rules. We find that the anti-ferromagnetically coupled Fe sites are outnumbered by ferromagnetically coupled Fe sites leading to a stable FM ground state. A Stoner analysis of the results also supports our claim of a FM ground state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the structural and magnetic properties of La0.75Ca0.25MnO3 nanoparticles synthesized by the sol-gel route. Rietvield refinement of X-ray powder diffraction confirms that our sample is single phase and crystallizes in orthorhombic system with Pnma space group. The facts that effective magnetic moment is large and the inverse susceptibility deviates from the Curie Weiss lawn indicate the presence of Griffiths-like cluster phase. The critical exponents have been estimated using different techniques such as modified Arrott plot, Kouvel-Fisher plot and critical isotherm technique. The critical exponents values of La0.75Ca0.25MnO3 are very close to those found out by the mean-field model, and this can be explained by the existence of a long-range interactions between spins in this system. These results were in good agreement with those obtained using the critical exponents of magnetic entropy change. The self-consistency and reliability of the critical exponent was verified by the Widom scaling law and the universal scaling hypothesis. Using the Harris criterion, we deduced that the disorder is relevant in our case. The maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) calculated from the M-H measurements is 3.47 J/kg K under an external field change of 5 T. The ΔSM-T curves collapsed onto a single master curve regardless of the composition and the applied field, confirming the magnetic ordering is of second order nature. The obtained result was compared to ones calculated based on the Arrott plot and a good concordance is observed. Moreover, the spontaneous magnetization obtained from the entropy change is in excellent agreement with that deduced by classically extrapolation the Arrott curves. This result confirms the validity of the estimation of the spontaneous magnetization using the magnetic entropy change.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents multi-material topology optimization for the co-design of permanent magnet segments and iron material. Specifically, a co-design methodology is proposed to find an optimal border of permanent magnet segments, a pattern of magnetization directions, and an iron shape. A material interpolation scheme is proposed for material property representation among air, permanent magnet, and iron materials. In this scheme, the permanent magnet strength and permeability are controlled by density design variables, and permanent magnet magnetization directions are controlled by angle design variables. In addition, a scheme to penalize intermediate magnetization direction is proposed to achieve segmented permanent magnet arrays with discrete magnetization directions. In this scheme, permanent magnet strength is controlled depending on magnetization direction, and consequently the final permanent magnet design converges into permanent magnet segments having target discrete directions. To validate the effectiveness of the proposed approach, three design examples are provided. The examples include the design of a dipole Halbach cylinder, magnetic system with arbitrarily-shaped cavity, and multi-objective problem resembling a magnetic refrigeration device.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic soft-hard composites of perovskite La-Sr manganite (LSMO) and M-type Sr-hexaferrite (SrM), LSMO(1 − x)–SrM(x) with x = 0, 0.05, 0.1, 0.3, 0.5, and 1.0 were prepared by solid-state reaction. Although the two phases coexist without forming secondary phases, the saturation magnetization (MS) value of the LSMO phase decreased with the doping of SrM (x ≥ 0.05). Clear double hysteresis behaviors were observed in the samples with x = 0.3 and 0.5, while single soft magnetic hysteresis was noted in the samples with x ≤ 0.1. In the M-T measurement, the composite with x = 0.5 exhibited a diffusive temperature dependence of magnetization unlike that of non-doped LSMO (x = 0). Weakening of ferromagnetism in the composites can be attributed to interatomic diffusion between the two phases occurring during calcination at 1200 °C.© 2017We propose a universal model for bias-stress (BS)-induced instability in the inkjet-printed carbon nanotube (CNT) networks used in field-effect transistors (FETs). By combining two experimental methods, i.e., a comparison between air and vacuum BS tests and interface trap extraction, BS instability is explained regardless of either the BS polarity or ambient condition, using a single platform constituted by four key factors: OH− adsorption/desorption followed by a change in carrier concentration, electron concentration in CNT channel corroborated with H2O/O2 molecules in ambient, charge trapping/detrapping, and interface trap generation. Under negative BS (NBS), the negative threshold voltage shift (ΔVT) is dominated by OH− desorption, which is followed by hole trapping in the interface and/or gate insulator. Under positive BS (PBS), the positive ΔVT is dominated by OH− adsorption, which is followed by electron trapping in the interface and/or gate insulator. This instability is compensated by interface trap extraction; PBS instability is slightly more complicated than NBS instability. Furthermore, our model is verified using device simulation, which gives insights on how much each mechanism contributes to BS instability. Our result is potentially useful for the design of highly stable CNT-based flexible circuits in the Internet of Things wearable healthcare era.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.High-frequency permeability spectra of magnetic films were measured over a wideband frequency range of 0.1–30 GHz using a shielded and short-circuited microstrip line jig. In this measurement, spurious resonances had to be suppressed up to the highest frequency. To suppress these resonances, characteristic impedance of the microstrip line should approach 50 Ω at the junction between connector and microstrip line. The main factors dominating these resonances were structures of the jig and the sample. The dimensions were optimized in various experiments, and results demonstrated that the frequency could be raised to at least 20 GHz. For the transverse electromagnetic mode to transmit stably along the microstrip line, the preferred sample was rectangular, with the shorter side parallel to the line and the longer side perpendicular to it, and characteristic impedance strongly depended on the signal line width of the jig. However, too small a jig and sample led to a lower S/N ratio.© 2017In this work, work-function variation (WFV) on 5 nm node gate-all-around (GAA) silicon 3D stacked nanowire FET (NWFET) and FinFET devices are studied for 6-T SRAM cells through 3D technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulation. The NWFET devices have strong immunity for the unprecedented short channel effects (SCEs) compared with the FinFET devices owing to increased gate controllability. However, due to the narrow gate area, the single NWFET is more vulnerable to WFV effects than FinFET devices. Our results show that the WFV effects on single NWFETs are larger than the FinFETs by 45–55%. In the case of standard SRAM bit cells (high density: 111 bit cell), the variation of read stability (read static noise margin) on single NWFETs are larger than the FinFETs by 65–75%. Therefore, to improve the performance and having immunity to WFV effects, it is important to analyze the degree of variability in 3D stacked device architectures without area penalty. Moreover, we investigated the WFV effects for an accurate guideline with regard to grain size (GS) and channel area of 3D stacked NWFET in 6-T SRAM bit cells.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a calculation model is proposed to measure magnetocaloric effect (MCE) and relative cooling power (RCP) in composites based on magnetic materials underscoring a giant MCE at room temperature. The two composite materials targeted are Gd-Gd5Si2Ge2 and MnAs-Mn1+δAs0.9Sb0.1 due to their high magnetic entropy change ΔSM over 270–300 K and 280–320 K. Our selected composites could give a larger RCP value among existing magnetocaloric materials for magnetic refrigeration in the temperature range of 280–300 K which is desirable for ideal Ericsson-cycle magnetic refrigeration. The excellent magnetocaloric properties of these two magnetic composites make them attractive for active magnetic refrigeration at room temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Co-doped BiFeO3 (5, 10, 20 and 30 mol%) nanoparticles were successfully synthesized via a simple solution method. The influence of the Co-doping on their nanostructures, magnetic and electrochemical properties was studied. An investigation of the magnetic properties revealed the enhancement of ferromagnetic properties with the Co doping content. Improvement of magnetization (0.21–9.24 emu/g) and coercivity (52.85–17970.57 Oe) of the nanoparticles could be attributed to the increasing of the Co content (which causes a decreasing of particle size), temperature dependence and the presence of impurity phases. Additionally, the electrochemical properties of the electrodes were studied by Cyclic Voltammetry (CV), Galvanostatic Charge-Discharge (GCD) and Electrochemical Impedance Spectroscopy (EIS). The Co doping contents caused a decreasing of the specific capacitances and the capacity retention, except for the 5 mol% of Co-doped BiFeO3, which the capacity retention is at the highest of 62% after 500 cycles at 10 A/g.© 2017Compensated ferrimagnets, due to their zero net magnetization and potential for large spin-polarization, have been attracting more and more attention in the field of spintronics. We demonstrate potential candidate materials among the inverse Heusler compounds Ti2VZ (Z = P, As, Sb, Bi) by first principles calculations. It is found that these compounds with 18 valence electrons per unit cell have zero net magnetic moment with compensated sublattice magnetization, as anticipated by a variant of Slater-Pauling rule of Mt = NV − 18, where Mt is the total spin magnetic moment per formula unit and NV is the number of valence electrons per formula unit, and show semiconducting behavior in both spin channels with a moderate exchange splitting, as with ordinary ferromagnetic semiconductors. Furthermore, the fully compensated ferrimagnetism and semiconductivity are rather robust over a wide range of lattice contraction and expansion. Due to the above distinct advantages, these compounds will be promising candidates for spintronic applications.© 2017Ab initio calculations based on density functional theory and non-equilibrium Green's function are performed to investigate the thermal spin transport properties of single-hydrogen-saturated zigzag graphene nanoribbon co-doped with non-metallic Nitrogen and Boron in parallel and anti-parallel spin configurations. The results show that the doped graphene nanoribbon is a full half-metal. The two-probe system based on the doped graphene nanoribbon exhibits various excellent spin transport properties, including the spin-filtering effect, the spin Seebeck effect, the single-spin negative differential thermal resistance effect and the sign-reversible giant magnetoresistance feature. Excellently, the spin-filtering efficiency can reach nearly 100% in the parallel configuration and the magnetoresistance ratio can be up to −1.5 × 1010% by modulating the electrode temperature and temperature gradient. Our findings indicate that the metal-free doped graphene nanoribbon would be a promising candidate for spin caloritronic applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Unique properties of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) have provided many breakthrough solutions for life science. The immense potential of MNP as labels in advanced immunoassays stems from the fact that they, unlike optical labels, can be easily detected inside 3D opaque porous biosensing structures or in colored mediums, manipulated by an external magnetic field, exhibit high stability and negligible background signal in biological samples, etc. In this research, the magnetic nanolabels and an original technique of their quantification by non-linear magnetization have permitted development of novel methods of multiplex biosensing. Several types of highly sensitive multi-channel readers that offer an extremely wide linear dynamic range are developed to count MNP in different recognition zones for quantitative concentration measurements of various analytes. Four approaches to multiplex biosensing based on MNP have been demonstrated in one-run tests based on several 3D porous structures; flat and micropillar microfluidic sensor chips; multi-line lateral flow strips and modular architecture of the strips, which is the first 3D multiplexing method that goes beyond the traditional planar techniques. Detection of cardio- and cancer markers, small molecules and oligonucleotides were used in the experiments. The analytical characteristics of the developed multiplex methods are on the level of the modern time-consuming laboratory techniques. The developed multiplex biosensing platforms are promising for medical and veterinary diagnostics, food inspection, environmental and security monitoring, etc.© 2017Low-frequency nonlinear magnetoelectric effects in a composite structure comprised of a piezoelectric langatate slab sandwiched between two Metglas amorphous alloy magnetostrictive layers under simultaneous harmonic and noise magnetic pumping have been investigated. It is shown that the frequency fp of harmonic pumping is linearly reproduced in the piezoelectric voltage spectrum accompanied by its higher harmonics. Similarly, narrow-band magnetic noise with a central frequency fN is present in the output piezoelectric voltage along with two noise peaks in the vicinity of a double 2fN and zero frequency. Simultaneous application of harmonic and noise magnetic fields produces a noticeably more complex output voltage spectrum containing additional noise satellite lines at frequencies fp±fN, 2fp±fN etc. as well as a noise “pedestal”. Amplitudes of voltage spectral components depend on the applied constant bias magnetic field, scaling as magnetostriction derivatives with respect to this field. The effects observed are well described by the theory of magnetic field mixing in magnetoelectric composites with nonlinear dependence of magnetostriction on applied fields.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have theoretically studied susceptibility of an InAs quantum dot in the presence of Rashba spin–orbit interaction (SOI), electron-electron (e−-e−) interaction, and magnetic field. We have used two potential models, shifted parabolic and inverse lateral shifted parabolic potentials. We have first solved the Schrodinger equation to obtain energy levels and then obtain the susceptibility using canonical ensemble. It is found that the susceptibility at low magnetic field is negative and then it becomes positive with increasing the magnetic field. This transition occurs at a particular magnetic field. The transition diamagnetism to paramagnetism occurs at lower magnetic field when the temperature increases. The susceptibility reduces with increasing temperature without considering the Rashba SOI. With considering e−-e− interaction, the peak position of susceptibility shifts toward lower magnetic fields. Also, the temperature has an effect on width and height of susceptibility.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A dilute two-dimensional (2D) system of interacting electrons has tendency to spontaneous spin polarization with increase of interparticle interaction. This instability, anticipated to occur with lowering carrier density and temperature, in fact has never been observed. Here, we report temperature dependence of the spin susceptibility of a 2D electron system in Si-MOS structures measured by two different techniques: (i) χT(T) by direct thermodynamic measurements, which are sensitive to all the electrons, and (ii) χ∗(T) from quantum oscillations in vector field, sensitive to the itinerant electrons only. In the former case, the susceptibility strongly diverges as 1/T2. In the latter case we found a weak χ∗(T) dependence, only a few percent over the range T=(0.1÷1)K, which seems to agree qualitatively with the predicted interaction corrections. We provide evidences for this difference to stem from the temperature- and magnetic field-dependent exchange with carriers between the localized and itinerant electrons coexisting in the two-phase state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We consider a cluster disordered model to study the interplay between short- and long-range interactions in geometrically frustrated spin systems under an external magnetic field (h). In our approach, the intercluster long-range disorder (J) is analytically treated to get an effective cluster model that is computed exactly. The clusters follow a checkerboard lattice with first-neighbor (J1) and second-neighbor (J2) interactions. We find a reentrant transition from the cluster spin-glass (CSG) state to a paramagnetic (PM) phase as the temperature decreases for a certain range of h. This inverse symmetry breaking (ISB) appears as a consequence of both quenched disorder with frustration and h, that introduce a CSG state with higher entropy than the polarized PM phase. The competitive scenario introduced by antiferromagnetic (AF) short-range interactions increases the CSG state entropy, leading to continuous ISB transitions and enhancing the ISB regions, mainly in the geometrically frustrated case (J1=J2). Remarkably, when strong AF intracluster couplings are present, field-induced CSG phases can be found. These CSG regions are strongly related to the magnetization plateaus observed in this cluster disordered system. In fact, it is found that each field-induced magnetization jump brings a CSG region. We notice that geometrical frustration, as well as cluster size, play an important role in the magnetization plateaus and, therefore, are also relevant in the field-induced glassy states. Our findings suggest that competing interactions support ISB and field-induced CSG phases in disordered cluster systems under an external magnetic field.© 2017A technique is proposed for demagnetizing correction of the measured magnetization curve and hysteresis loop, i.e., the M∗(Ha) curve, of a ferromagnetic cylinder into the true M(H) curve of the material, where Ha is the uniform applied field provided by a long solenoid and M∗ is the magnetization measured by a fluxmeter with the measuring coil surrounding the cylinder midplane. Different from ordinary demagnetizing correction by using a fixed demagnetizing factor, an (Ha,M∗)-dependent fluxmetric demagnetizing factor Nf(γ,χd) is used in this technique, where γ is the ratio of cylinder length to diameter, χd is the differential susceptibility on the corrected M(H) curve, and Nf(γ,χd) is approximated by accurately calculated Nf(γ,χ) of paramagnetic cylinders of the same γ and χ=χd. The validity of the technique is studied by comparing results for several samples of different lengths cut from the same cylinder. Such a demagnetizing correction is unambiguous but its success requires very high accuracy in the Nf determination and M∗(Ha) measurements.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report on the theoretical study of one-dimensional magnetophotonic crystals (MPC) comprising of periodic dielectric structure Si/SiO and of silica matrix doped with cobalt-ferrite (CoFe2O4) magnetic nanoparticles as the only magnetic defect layer. Such structure can be prepared by sol-gel dip coating method that controls the thickness of each layer with nanometer level, hence, can overcome the problem of integration of the magneto-optical (MO) devices. We have studied the influence of the volume fraction (concentration of magnetic nanoparticles VF%) on the optical (reflectance, transmittance and absorption) and MO (Kerr rotation) responses in reflection-type one-dimensional MPCs. During investigation of the influence of magnetic nanoparticle's concentration, we found that giant Kerr rotations (even ≈135° for VF = 39%) can be obtained accompanied by large reflectance and low amounts for transmittance and absorption. We report on the demonstration of large MO quality factor and figure of merit in cobalt-ferrite magnetic nanoparticles in the infrared regime. Given the large Kerr rotation, high reflectance accompanied by low absorption and nearly zero transmittance of the 1D MPC containing cobalt-ferrite magnetic nanoparticles, large MO Q factor and figure of merit are obtained.© 2017Complete miniaturized on-chip integrated solid-state capacitors have been fabricated based on conformal coating of vertically aligned carbon nanofibers (VACNFs), using a CMOS temperature compatible microfabrication processes. The 5 µm long VACNFs, operating as electrode, are grown on a silicon substrate and conformally coated by aluminum oxide dielectric using atomic layer deposition (ALD) technique. The areal (footprint) capacitance density value of 11–15 nF/mm2 is realized with high reproducibility. The CMOS temperature compatible microfabrication, ultra-low profile (less than 7 µm thickness) and high capacitance density would enables direct integration of micro energy storage devices on the active CMOS chip, multi-chip package and passives on silicon or glass interposer. A model is developed to calculate the surface area of VACNFs and the effective capacitance from the devices. It is thereby shown that 71% of surface area of the VACNFs has contributed to the measured capacitance, and by using the entire area the capacitance can potentially be increased.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe spatial position and energy level of the effective oxide trap in SiC DMOSFET were investigated using Trap Spectroscopy by Charge Injection and Sensing (TSCIS) method. It was found that the oxygen vacancy traps at 1.7 eV above from the valence band of SiO2 make threshold voltage (Vth) shift under high negative gate bias stress condition. To further understanding the extracted oxide trap, the repetitive negative stress and recovery test at VG = ±40 V were executed. The results confirm that Vth and subthreshold swing (SS) change were caused by the process induced pre-existed hole traps instead of the stress induced trap generation. This hole trapping also reduced the Stress Induced Leakage Current (SILC) after the negative bias stress.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effects of a magnetic field on the energy and on the spin of free electrons are computed in the theoretical framework of quantum field theory. In the case of a static moderate field and with relatively slow electrons, the derived formulae are particularly simple. A comparison with the approaches of classical physics and of quantum mechanics shows essential differences and important analogies. The relevance to the magnetic effects of the initial polarization components of the electron states and the possible existence of special values of these quantities are discussed in the final conclusions, which might be useful to explain recent experiments on quasi-free electrons in chiral systems in biology.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, Rashba coupling induced Aharonov-Casher effect in a graphene based nano ring is investigated theoretically. The graphene based nano ring is considered as a central device connected to semi-infinite graphene nano ribbons. In the presence of the Rashba spin-orbit interaction, two armchair shaped edge nano ribbons are considered as semi-infinite leads. The non-equilibrium Green's function approach is utilized to obtain the quantum transport characteristics of the system. The relaxation and dephasing mechanisms within the self-consistent Born approximation is scrutinized. The Lopez-Sancho method is also applied to obtain the self-energy of the leads. We unveil that the non-equilibrium current of the system possesses measurable Aharonov-Casher oscillations with respect to the Rashba coupling strength. In addition, we have observed the same oscillations in dilute impurity regimes in which amplitude of the oscillations is shown to be suppressed as a result of the relaxations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the effect of hydrogen insertion on the microstructure and magnetic properties of nanocrystalline Pr2Co7Hx (0 ≤ x ≤ 3.75) hydrides. The Pr2Co7Hx hydrides were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and physical properties measurement system (PPMS9) Quantum Design. Mean field theory was used to describe the temperature dependence of magnetization and deduce the exchange interactions and Curie temperature. We also apply the approach to saturation magnetization to our system. The results were interpreted in the framework of random magnetic anisotropy model. From such analysis, some fundamental parameters were extracted. We have determined the local magnetic anisotropy constant K1 which is found to increase from 5.2 × 107 erg/cm3 to a maximum of 5.7 × 107 erg/cm3 with increasing x from 0 to 2.5, respectively. This confirms the hypothesis of the electronic and magnetovolume effect of hydrogen insertion. In addition, it is shown that Herzer theory describes satisfactory the experimental data of change of coercive field as a function of grain size.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal of perpendicular exchange-biased [Pt/Co]5/Pt/FeMn multilayers was investigated by magneto-optical Kerr microscopy. The effect of varying the Pt interlayer thickness between the topmost Co layer and the FeMn layer was studied. Our measurements reveal that coercivity (HC) and exchange bias field (HEB) vary with Pt spacer thickness, and have a maximum for a Pt thickness of 0.4 nm. Magnetization reversal measurements show that, for the unbiased multilayer, the reversal is dominated by domain wall propagation starting from a few nucleation centers. For the exchange-biased multilayers, magnetization reversal occurs by nucleation and domain wall propagation with a variation in the nucleation density. For 0 and 0.2 nm Pt spacer, no difference is observed in the nucleation density of the ascending and descending branches unlike for 0.4 and 0.6 nm Pt spacer where the measurements reveal a larger density of nucleation centers in the descending branch.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The ground state properties along with thermodynamic and thermoelectric properties of quaternary CoFeCrAs alloy within the ordered LiMgPdSn-type structure have been investigated by employing first-principles calculations. The alloy offers half-metallic ferromagnet character with an indirect band gap of 1.12 eV in the minority spin state with total spin magnetic moment of 4µB and follows Slater-Pauling relation. Effects on various properties of the material has been studied by the variation of the pressure and temperature. CoFeCrAs tenders large value of the Grüneisen parameter and small value for the thermal expansion coefficient. The materials present high Seebeck coefficient and huge power factor with the room temperature value of ∼−40 μV/K and 18 (1014 μWcm−1 K−2 s−1) respectively, which make CoFeCrAs promising candidate for efficient thermoelectric material.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report magnetic and magnetoimpedance (MI) properties of cobalt-rich amorphous alloys to investigate the role of small quantities of 3d or 4d transition-metal elements in Co-rich alloys. The microstructure, thermal stability, AC soft magnetic properties and magnetoimpedance of the ribbons are investigated by substituting Nb in place of Ni and Mn. Present study shows an improvement in glass forming ability and reduction in electrical conductivity of the ribbon with Nb substitution. Higher Nb containing alloy shows minimum core loss compared to other compositions over a range of frequencies. Ribbon with higher core loss exhibited higher MI ratio (∼100% at 3 MHz), but decreased rapidly at higher frequencies due to its larger electrical conductivity. The ribbon with lower electrical conductivity showed a steady MI ratio and field sensitivity with frequency. These results indicate that MI and core losses at medium range of frequencies can be tuned by adding Nb that provides most favourable electrical conductivity and magnetic permeability values, which result in optimum skin depth and MI. The effect of electrical conductivity on MI is also validated through numerical simulations using standard electrodynamics models.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hyperthermia ablates malignant cells by the heat produced by power dissipation of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) under an alternating magnetic field. Most of the works in literature consider a uniform magnetic field for solving numerical models to estimate the temperature field during a hyperthermia treatment, however this assumption is generally not true in real circumstances. This paper considers the magnetic field produced by a solenoid and analyzes its effects on the treatment temperature. To that end, a set of partial differential equations is numerically solved for a specific tumor model using the finite element method and the obtained results are analyzed to draw general conclusions. The magnetic field inside the solenoid is obtained by using Maxwell's theory, and the treatment temperature of the tumor model is determined by using Rosensweig's theory and Pennes bio-heat transfer equation. Simulation results demonstrate that the temperature field obtained using a solenoid model is similar to that obtained considering a uniform magnetic field if tumor is centered with respect to solenoid and if the physical characteristics of solenoid are properly defined based on tumor volume. As the distance of tumor from the solenoid center is increased, the effects of non-uniformity of magnetic field become more evident and the adoption of the proposed model is necessary to obtain accurate results.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A slab waveguide structure consisting of five layers is studied for optical sensing applications. The five-layer waveguide structure has a guiding dielectric film, two left-handed material (LHM) layers and two dielectric layers as a substrate and a cladding. The dispersion relation and the sensitivity to any change in the index of the analyte layer are derived. The sensitivity is explored with different parameters of the structure. It is found that the sensitivity of the proposed structure can be significantly improved with the increase of the index of the guiding layer and the decrease of the permittivity of the LHM layers. Moreover, it can be also improved with the increase of the thickness of the LHM layers.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This study aims to combine dielectric and magnetic properties of different materials in an unique composite. For this, poly(o-methoxyaniline), POMA, was chemically synthesized in situ on magnetic metallic filaments (MF). The obtained composite was inserted into an epoxy resin matrix in the proportions of 40, 50 and 70%, in weight (wt%). The samples were characterized by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), X ray diffraction (XRD) and electromagnetic measurements. On the last case, the measurements considered the reflectivity and the complex parameters of electrical permittivity and magnetic permeability in the frequency range of 8.2–12.4 GHz (X-band). Specimens with different thicknesses were evaluated by reflectivity. XRD results show that the filaments are based on Fe-α steel and SEM analyses show the good incorporation of POMA/MF in the epoxy resin composite. The complex parameters show that the real component of permittivity shows the largest variation with the POMA/MF concentration increasing in epoxy resin and the loss tangent indicates that the magnetic losses are preponderant on dielectric ones. The reflectivity measurements show that the 5 mm-specimen with 50 wt% of POMA/MF presents the best result of attenuation (−21.5 dB, i.e. above 99% of attenuation). Already, the sample containing 70 wt% shows the worst performance (up to −9.0 dB). The increase of POMA/MF concentration in epoxy resin confers maximum attenuation values for less thick specimens. The results show that the combination of dielectric and magnetic materials in a composite contributes for the improvement of microwave absorbing performance, and extends the possibilities of RAM processing with different characteristics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The calculations of spin effects in 20 SinO2n+m nanoclusters with 10⩾m⩾5 and m⩾1 are presented. They include search for the equilibrium atomic structure, the calculations of electron spectra and the energy of different spin orderings. It was found that all SinO2n+m clusters have spin moments, which are located on radical O atoms at the cluster surface. Long radical-to-radical distance weakens their exchange interaction, so energy differences between ferro-, ferri-, and antiferromagnetic states are of 0.01 eV or lower, gaining 0.046 eV only in Si6O13. We analyze this magnetism in terms of electron spectra and individual radical groups. Its similarity to popular molecular magnets based on organic radicals is noticeable. The stability of these SinO2n+m clusters in O2 atmosphere, as well as their relation to silicon technology, is of particular interest for spintronics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electrically conductive polymers, created at the end of XX century, attract the attention of researchers due to variety of their mechanical and optical properties, as well as high conductivity. Studies conducted to date show the ability of a polymer to transition from low conductivity to a highly conducting state that is close to metallic and has a strong anisotropy. Due to the above properties, they are widely used as functional elements in devices of microelectronics. At the same time, the magnetic characteristics and behaviour features in magnetic field of polymers, in particular, poly diphenylene phthalide (PDP), have not been studied practically. The present work is devoted to the results of investigation of the magnetic properties of Fe/PDP/Fe thin-film systems.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe report the effect of the oxygen content of the LaAlO3 layer on the synaptic behavior in the Pt/LaAlO3/Nb-doped SrTiO3 memristor for neuromorphic applications. As the oxygen-content decreases, the current becomes larger and the spike time-dependent plasticity (STDP) becomes less sensitive to the time difference between pre- and post-synaptic spike voltage. In addition, the conduction mechanism, which was found to be a combination of thermionic and Poole-Frenkel emissions, and the effect of oxygen content are explained in association with the oxygen vacancy in the LaAlO3 layer. The trade-off between large current and efficient STDP can be controlled by the oxygen content. Furthermore, the results of extracting the synaptic strength-based model parameters indicate that the Pt/LaAlO3/Nb-doped SrTiO3 shows the efficient STDP characteristics in comparison to previously reported memristor materials.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we investigated how the structure and oxygen flow rate (OFR) during the sputter-deposition affects the photo-responses of amorphous indium-gallium-zinc-oxide (a-IGZO)-based photodetector devices. As the result of comparing three types of device structures with one another, which are a global Schottky diode, local Schottky diode, and thin-film transistor (TFT), the IGZO TFT with the gate pulse technique suppressing the persistent photoconductivity (PPC) is the most promising photodetector in terms of a high photo-sensitivity and uniform sensing characteristic. In order to analyze the IGZO TFT-based photodetectors more quantitatively, the time-evolution of sub-gap density-of-states (DOS) was directly observed under photo-illumination and consecutively during the PPC-compensating period with applying the gate pulse. It shows that the increased ionized oxygen vacancy (VO2+) defects under photo-illumination was fully recovered by the positive gate pulse and even overcompensated by additional electron trapping. Based on experimentally extracted sub-gap DOS, the origin on PPC was successfully decomposed into the hole trapping and the VO ionization. Although the VO ionization is enhanced in lower OFR (O-poor) device, the PPC becomes more severe in high OFR (O-rich) device because the hole trapping dominates the PPC in IGZO TFT under photo-illumination rather than the VO ionization and more abundant holes are trapped into gate insulator and/or interface in O-rich TFTs. Similarly, the electron trapping during the PPC-compensating period with applying the positive gate pulse becomes more prominent in O-rich TFTs. It is attributed to more hole/electron traps in the gate insulator and/or interface, which is associated with oxygen interstitials, or originates from the ion bombardment-related lower quality gate oxide in O-rich devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fractional order (1/2, 0) spots appear in the electron diffraction from NiO/Ag(0 0 1) films due to exchange scattering of low energy electrons by the antiferromagnetically ordered surface Ni moments. Utilizing these beams, imaging of the nanosized surface magnetic domains were carried out employing the high spatial resolution (∼10 nm) of the Low Energy Electron Microscopy (LEEM) in the dark-field (DF) mode. While selected through a contrast aperture, the four magnetic reflections produced by the p(2×2) antiferromagnetic sub-lattice lead to the visualization of the different magnetic twin domains. The intensity variations of different twin domains were measured as a function of electron beam energies via domain resolved LEEM I-V plots. The surface Néel temperatures (TN) of the films were measured using the temperature dependence of these half-order spot intensities. Detailed morphological studies of the size and shape of these nanodomains and their evolution as a function of the film thickness have been carried out with the help of pair-correlation function and fractal analysis. The size, shape and distribution of these magnetic domains are modified significantly by the strain relaxation mechanism beyond the critical film thickness. A method to estimate the relative domain sizes from a quantitative measure of the half-order spot intensities is manifested well below TN.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Chipless radiofrequency identification (chipless-RFID) systems based on near-field coupling between the tag and the reader and sequential bit reading, with tags implemented on plastic substrates, are presented in this paper. In the proposed system, the tag is a set of identical resonant elements (S-shaped split ring resonators – S-SRRs), inkjet-printed on a plastic substrate (PEN), forming a resonator chain. The presence or absence of resonant elements at predefined and equidistant positions in the chain determines the logic state ‘1’ and ‘0’, respectively, associated with each resonant element. The reader is a coplanar waveguide (CPW) transmission line fed by a harmonic signal tuned to the resonance frequency of the resonant elements of the chain. Tag reading is achieved by displacing the chain of resonant elements above the CPW transmission line, in close proximity to it, so that near-field coupling between the CPW transmission line and the resonant elements of the tag results. By this means, the injected carrier signal is amplitude modulated, provided the transmission coefficient of the line varies with the presence or absence of resonant elements in the chain, and the identification (ID) code is contained in the envelope function. The functionality of the proposed system, with 10-bit tags occupying an area of 1.35 cm2 (corresponding to an information density of 7.4 bit/cm2), is demonstrated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A series of magnetoactive elastomer (MAE) coatings consisting of a silicone matrix and carbonyl iron particles (3–5 μm in diameter) have been synthesized and their hydrophobic properties have been investigated in various magnetic fields of disk-shaped permanent NdFeB magnets. Concentration of magnetic filler in MAEs has been varied in the range of 63–76 mass%. Both isotropic samples and structured samples synthesized in the magnetic field of 80 mT have been obtained. It has been shown that application of a magnetic field induces structuring of the filler on the surface of MAE coatings, resulting in formation of mountain-like microstructures. Microstructure relief on coating surfaces leads to an increase of a water contact angle which could be varied from 110° ± 10° at zero field up to 163° ± 2° at 600 mT. The contact angle at the maximum field increases with iron filler content and with softening of the polymer matrix.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe low-voltage triggering silicon-controlled rectifier (LVTSCR) device is widely used in on-chip electrostatic discharge (ESD) protection owing to its low trigger voltage and strong current-tolerating capability per area. In this paper, an improved LVTSCR by adding a narrow NWell (NW2) under the source region of NMOS is discussed, which is realized in a 0.5-μm CMOS process. A 2-dimension (2D) device simulation platform and a transmission line pulse (TLP) testing system are used to predict and characterize the proposed ESD protection devices. According to the measurement results, compared with the preliminary LVTSCR, the improved LVTSCR elevates the second breakdown current (It2) from 2.39 A to 5.54 A and increases the holding voltage (Vh) from 3.04 V to 4.09 V without expanding device area or sacrificing any ESD performances. Furthermore, the influence of the size of the narrow NWell under the source region of NMOS on holding voltage is also discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the ESR studies of the localized magnetic moments in 3D topological insulators (TI) in order to elucidate their role in breaking of time reversal symmetry (TRS) which protects the nontrivial topology of these compounds. We studied two different types of the localized moments. The first ones are due to external doping by the magnetic ions, while the second ones are intrinsic, originating from the structural defects of TI. Using ESR spectroscopy together with the SQUID magnetometry and transport measurements we found that the impact of these two types of magnetic moments on topological insulators is different. For the case of magnetic Mn ions doped to the Bi2Te3 topological insulator our data reveal the specific critical behaviour confirming the ferromagnetic ordering of Mn spins even at modest doping. On the contrary if the comparable amount of local moments is induced due to intrinsic anti-site substitutional defects the analysis of experimental data evidences in favour of spin-glass state with magnetic polarization, which is completely averaged out. Therefore in the absence of external field the TRS is not violated.© 2017 Elsevier LtdA lab-on-a-chip (LOC) device for total phosphorus (TP) analysis was fabricated for water quality monitoring. Many commercially available TP analysis systems used to estimate water quality have good sensitivity and accuracy. However, these systems also have many disadvantages such as bulky size, complex pretreatment processes, and high cost, which limit their application. In particular, conventional TP analysis systems require an indispensable pretreatment step, in which the fluidic analyte is heated to 120 °C for 30 min to release the dissolved phosphate, because many phosphates are soluble in water at a standard temperature and pressure. In addition, this pretreatment process requires elevated pressures of up to 1.1 kg cm−2 in order to prevent the evaporation of the heated analyte. Because of these limiting conditions required by the pretreatment processes used in conventional systems, it is difficult to miniaturize TP analysis systems. In this study, we employed a photocatalytic reaction in the pretreatment process. The reaction was carried out by illuminating a photocatalytic titanium dioxide (TiO2) surface formed in a microfluidic channel with ultraviolet (UV) light. This pretreatment process does not require elevated temperatures and pressures. By applying this simplified, photocatalytic-reaction-based pretreatment process to a TP analysis system, greater degrees of freedom are conferred to the design and fabrication of LOC devices for TP monitoring. The fabricated LOC device presented in this paper was characterized by measuring the TP concentration of an unknown sample, and comparing the results with those measured by a conventional TP analysis system. The TP concentrations of the unknown sample measured by the proposed LOC device and the conventional TP analysis system were 0.018 mgP/25 mL and 0.019 mgP/25 mL, respectively. The experimental results revealed that the proposed LOC device had a performance comparable to the conventional bulky TP analysis system. Therefore, our device could be directly employed in water quality monitoring as an alternative to conventional TP analysis systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Two magnets with the same nominal composition of (MM0.3Nd0.7)-Fe-B (Marked as A) and [(La0.27Ce0.53Pr0.03Nd0.17)0.3Nd0.7]-Fe-B (Marked as B) were prepared using traditional powder metallurgical process, respectively. In order to point out the difference between two magnets, the magnetic properties, microstructure and magnetic domain of both magnets were investigated. Both magnets have the same elements, but different raw materials of misch-metal (MM) and La/Ce/Pr/Nd pure metal, which induces different magnetic properties. The magnet A with Br of 13.1 kGs, Hcj of 7.6 kOe, (BH)max of 37.8 MGOe and magnet B with Br of 13.4 kGs, Hcj of 5.8 kOe, (BH)max of 34.5 MGOe are obtained. Although both magnets have the similar Br, magnet A has higher coercivity than that of magnet B. According to refined results of characteristic X-ray diffraction peaks, there is a hard magnetic main phase with higher magnetic anisotropy field (HA) in magnet A and opposite case happens on magnet B. SEM images demonstrate that magnet A has more continuous RE-rich phase and smaller grain size compared to that of magnet B, which contributes to enhancing the coercivity. In addition, two main phases of [Nd0.82(La, Ce)0.18]-Fe-B and [Nd0.75(La, Ce)0.25]-Fe-B were detected by the EDX calculation, and the two main phases in both magnets were observed by magnetic domains again. Compared to magnet B, 2:14:1 main phases in magnet A contain more [Nd0.82(La, Ce)0.18]-Fe-B main phases and less [Nd0.75(La, Ce)0.25]-Fe-B main phases, which also leads to higher coercivity due to the different HA among Nd2Fe14B, La2Fe14B and Ce2Fe14B phases. Therefore, it is concluded that MM substitution could exhibit better magnetic properties than (La0.27Ce0.53Pr0.03Nd0.17)-metal substitution. Furthermore, applications of MM are beneficial to fabricate (MM, Nd)-Fe-B permanent magnets with lower cost.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electronic and elastic properties of recently discovered FeO2 were studied using ab initio band structure calculations within the generalized gradient approximation (GGA). This novel oxide can be one of the constituents of the Earth's lower mantle. We found that electronic structure of FeO2 practically does not change in the pressure range 76–290 GPa. The bulk modulus (B0) of FeO2 is 280 GPa and is of order of magnitude of B0 in perovskite (Mg, Fe) SiO3 and SiO2.© 2017Single-phase multiferroic Bi1−xLaxFeO3 (x = 0.00, 0.10, 0.20, 0.30, and 0.40) ceramics were studied by positron annihilation lifetime spectroscopy and the effect of the cation vacancies on the magnetism were investigated. Positron lifetime measurements and density-functional theory calculation of positron lifetimes identified the presence of Bi and Fe vacancies. It was observed that when x > 0.20 the Bi monovacancies disappeared gradually and some larger vacancy clusters begin to appear. Magnetic property measurements showed that the remnant magnetization increases greatly when x > 0.20. It is found that the enhanced magnetization is not only due to the suppressed spin cycloid structure, but the variation of cation defects also contributes.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, SONOS-type flash memory device with highly improved charge-trapping efficiency is suggested by using silicon nanocrystals (Si-NCs) embedded in silicon nitride (SiNX) charge trapping layer. The Si-NCs were in-situ grown by PECVD without additional post annealing process. The fabricated device shows high program/erase speed and retention property which is suitable for multi-level cell (MLC) application. Excellent performance and reliability for MLC are demonstrated with large memory window of ∼8.5 V and superior retention characteristics of 7% charge loss for 10 years. High resolution transmission electron microscopy image confirms the Si-NC formation and the size is around 1–2 nm which can be verified again in X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) where pure Si bonds increase. Besides, XPS analysis implies that more nitrogen atoms make stable bonds at the regular lattice point. Photoluminescence spectra results also illustrate that Si-NCs formation in SiNx is an effective method to form deep trap states.© 2017In this study, amorphous Fe0.7Nb0.1Zr0.1Ti0.1 alloy without metalloids was produced by mechanical alloying of pure mixture elements. Miedema's semi-empirical model was employed to predict the possibility of amorphous phase formation in proposed alloying system. The effect of Hexane as process control agent (PCA) on the structural, magnetic, morphological and thermal properties of the products was investigated. The results showed that the presence of PCA was necessary for the formation of amorphous phase as well as improved its soft magnetic properties. The PCA addition causes an increase of the saturation magnetization (about 43%) and decrease of the coercivity (about 50%). Moreover, the sample milled without PCA, showed a wide particle size distribution as well as relatively spherical geometry. While, in the presence of PCA the powders were aspherical and Polygon. In addition, the crystallization and Curie temperatures were found to be around 800 °C and 650 °C, respectively which are relatively high values for these kinds of alloys.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The spatial distribution of the magnetic flux density (B) was determined for the passive sources of magnetic field most used in magnetic stimulation of biological systems, toroidal dipole magnets and cylindrical dipole magnets, in order to find the spatial characteristics of the magnetic field within the volumes of interest for the treatment of biological systems. The perpendicular and parallel components of B regarding the polar surface of the magnets were measured, for which a FW Bell 5180 digital teslameter was used with longitudinal and transverse probes and a two-dimensional positioning system with millimeter scale. It was found that the magnets of this type, which are the most used, present a strong variation of the magnitude and direction of the magnetic flux density for spaces specified in millimeters, reason why the homogeneity of the magnetic field in the regions of interest was found to be relatively low, which makes them elements with a strong applicability for the stimulation of biological systems in which magnetic field gradients up to mT/mm are required in the case of cylindrical magnets, and up to tens of mT/mm in the case of toroidal magnets. Finally, it is concluded that a high percentage of experiments reported in the literature on magnetic treatment of biological systems may be presenting values of B in their doses with deviations of more than 100% of the real value, which raises an incongruence in the cause-effect proposed relation.© 2017The anisotropic hot deformed magnets consisting of Nd-rich and Ce-rich 2:14:1 main phases were prepared using dual alloy process. After heat treatment, crystallographic alignment was improved and compositional heterogeneity reduced. Coercivity and remanence descended with increasing Ce-Fe-B addition, and then were improved after diffusing heat treatment compared with magnets without heat treatment. Moreover, the magnetization behaviors of magnets were discussed and the coercivity mechanism was controlled by inhomogeneity of the domain wall pinning. The interaction domains were observed and the moment of Ce-rich grain was prior to reversal by comparison with Nd-rich grain in an applied field due to the lower magnetocrystalline anisotropy.© 2017 Elsevier LtdExperimental extraction of the electron trap parameters which are associated with charge trapping into gate insulators under the positive bias temperature stress (PBTS) is proposed and demonstrated for the first time in amorphous indium-gallium-zinc-oxide thin-film transistors. This was done by combining the PBTS/recovery time-evolution of the experimentally decomposed threshold voltage shift (ΔVT) and the technology computer-aided design (TCAD)-based charge trapping simulation. The extracted parameters were the trap density (NOT) = 2.6 × 1018 cm−3, the trap energy level (ΔET) = 0.6 eV, and the capture cross section (σ0) = 3 × 10−19 cm2. Furthermore, based on the established TCAD framework, the relationship between the electron trap parameters and the activation energy (Ea) is comprehensively investigated. It is found that Ea increases with an increase in σ0, whereas Ea is independent of NOT. In addition, as ΔET increases, Ea decreases in the electron trapping-dominant regime (low ΔET) and increases again in the Poole–Frenkel (PF) emission/hopping-dominant regime (high ΔET). Moreover, our results suggest that the cross-over ΔET point originates from the complicated temperature-dependent competition between the capture rate and the emission rate. The PBTS bias dependence of the relationship between Ea and ΔET suggests that the electric field dependence of the PF emission-based electron hopping is stronger than that of the thermionic field emission-based electron trapping.© 2017Excellent microwave absorption performance was obtained from NdFe magnetic powders. A suitable oxidation heat treatment temperature can optimize the impedance matching effectively and result in a good absorption performance. By varying the coating thickness, the reflection loss values of oxidized NdFe magnetic powders are less than −10 dB nearly in the whole range of 2–18 GHz. The maximum reflection loss value of the oxidized NdFe magnetic powders at 373 K reaches up to −55.9 dB at 3.6 GHz with a thickness of 3.0 mm. In addition, the microwave absorption peak frequency can also be tuned by the oxidation heat treatment temperature. The obtained results and systematic analysis suggest that NdFe magnetic powders would be attractive candidates for microwave absorbing materials and the oxidation heat treatment could be an effective way to optimize the impedance matching of some ferromagnetic alloy absorption materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles with diameters d, 7 nm ≤ d ≤ 12 nm, were synthesized by thermal decomposition of Fe(acac)3. Different experimental conditions, keeping constant concetration of Fe ions in solvent, showed that the heating rates is the most important parameter determining the final particle size. Use of two different solvents, 1-eicosene and 1-octadecene, yielded similar nanoparticle sizes (7.1 nm ≤ d ≤ 7.5 nm), but different magnetic anisotropies. All samples were superparamagnetic at room temperature. Spin disordering was inferred in samples coated with trioctylphosphine oxide (TOPO) co-ligand in addition to oleic acid and oleyamine. The heating ability of ∼12 nm-sized nanoparticles dispersed in hexane under alternating magnetic fields (3.98 kA/m ≤ H0 ≤ 23.87 kA/m; 229.3 kHz ≤ f ≤ 828 kHz) has been studied, finding a nearly quadratic dependence upon H0, as expected from the linear response theory.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Low temperature magnetostriction effects have been studied at Yb2Ti2O7 which is characterized by a geometric magnetic frustration. The experimental finding and the developed theory suggest that Yb2Ti2O7 is a quantum spin ice. Most of the magnetoelastic effects can be explained by an exchange striction model. The external magnetic field together with the temperature govern the transition between the collective paramagnetic behavior of the classical spin ice and the magnetically ordered state.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Lagrangian-based collective coordinate models for magnetic domain wall (DW) motion rely on an ansatz for the DW profile and a Lagrangian approach to describe the DW motion in terms of a set of time-dependent collective coordinates: the DW position, the DW magnetization angle, the DW width and the DW tilting angle. Another approach was recently used to derive similar equations of motion by averaging the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation without any ansatz, and identifying the relevant collective coordinates afterwards. In this paper, we use an updated version of the semi-analytical equations to compare the Lagrangian-based collective coordinate models with micromagnetic simulations for field- and STT-driven (spin-transfer torque-driven) DW motion in Pt/CoFe/MgO and Pt/Co/AlOx nanostrips. Through this comparison, we assess the accuracy of the different models, and provide insight into the deviations of the models from simulations. It is found that the lack of terms related to DW asymmetry in the Lagrangian-based collective coordinate models significantly contributes to the discrepancy between the predictions of the most accurate Lagrangian-based model and the micromagnetic simulations in the field-driven case. This is in contrast to the STT-driven case where the DW remains symmetric.© 2017 The AuthorsWe report on the experimental observation of the proximity induced superconductivity in an indium gallium arsenide (In0.75Ga0.25As) quantum well. The Josephson junction was fabricated by several photo-lithographic processes on an InGaAs heterojunction and Niobium (Nb) was used as superconducting electrodes. Owing to the Andreev reflections and Andreev bound states at the Nb-In0.75Ga0.25As quantum well-Nb interfaces, the subharmonic energy gap structures (SGS) are observed at the differential conductance (dI/dV) versus voltage (V) plots when the applied source-drain bias voltages satisfy the expression VSD = 2Δ/ne. The dI/dV as a function of applied magnetic field B shows a maximum at zero B which decreases by increasing B. When decreasing B to below ±0.4 T, a hysteresis and shift of the conductance maxima close to B = 0 T are observed. Our results help to pave the way to the development of integrated coherent quantum circuitry.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In present work, M-type strontium hexaferrite with chemical composition of Sr0.3La0.48Ca0.25n[Fe(2−0.4/n)O3]Co0.4 (n = 5.5, 5.6, 5.7, 5.8, 5.9, 6.0) magnetic powder were synthesized by using facile ceramic route methodology. The structural, morphological and magnetic properties of the products were investigated by using X-rays diffraction (XRD), Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM) and Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM) techniques, respectively. There is a single magnetoplumbite phase in the magnetic powders containing (5.5 ≤ n ≤5.8) and (n ≥ 5.9) magnetic some impurities begin to seem in the structure. The magnets have shaped hexagonal structures. Magnetic properties of the samples were metric by permanent magnetic measuring equipment Vibrating Sample Magnetometer, respectively. We report our investigation of n-aggregation iron content on crystalline size characterization and magnetic properties of the specimen. It is originate that the desirable quantity of n-aggregation iron content substitution may curiously increase saturation magnetization (Ms) and intrinsic coercivity (Hc). With the iron addition for the same sintering temperature at 1260 °C, (Ms) and (Hc) first increase and then decrease gradually.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ce and Dy substituted Cobalt ferrites with the chemical composition CoCexDyxFe2-2xO4 (x = 0, 0.01, 0.02, 0.03, 0.04, 0.05) were synthesized through the chemical route, citrate-gel auto-combustion method. The structural characterization was carried out with the help of XRD Rieveld analysis, SEM and EDAX analysis. Formation of spinel cubic structure of the ferrites was confirmed by XRD analysis. SEM and EDAX results show that the particles are homogeneous with slight agglomeration without any impurity pickup. The effect of RE ion doping (Ce and Dy) on the dielectric, magnetic and impedance studies was systematically investigated by LCR meter, Vibrating Sample Magnetometer and Impedance analyzer respectively at room temperature in the frequency range of 10 Hz–10 MHz. Various dielectric parameters viz., dielectric constant, dielectric loss and ac conductivity were measured. The dielectric constant of all the ferrite compositions shows normal dielectric dispersion of ferrites with frequency. Impedance analysis confirms that the conduction in present ferrites is majorly due to the grain boundary mechanism. Ferrite sample with x = 0.03 show high dielectric constant, low dielectric loss and hence can be utilized in high frequency electromagnetic devices. Magnetization measurements indicate that with increase in Ce and Dy content in cobalt ferrites, the magnetization values decreased and coercivity has increased.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper the results of specific magnetization (M), heat capacity (Cp) and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) measurements for Gd(Ni1−xFex)2 system over the Ni substitution by Fe range of x = 0 ÷ 0.16 are presented. Phase composition was controlled by X-ray diffraction analysis. Heat capacity was measured in the temperature range 77 ÷ 320 K. MCE has been studied within the temperature range 5 ÷ 400 K in magnetic fields up to 70 kOe by the entropy magnetic contribution change calculation (ΔSm) and by direct ΔTad measurements at the adiabatic conditions for external magnetic field change ΔH = ±17.5 kOe. It was found that the Fe concentration increase causes both the Cp maxima disappearing at Curie temperature point and emergence of magnetic contribution to Cp in a wide temperature range below this point. Moreover, in compounds with iron, a plateau-like temperature dependence of the MCE was observed for both magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) and direct ΔTad data which are independent on Fe concentration. The possible reasons of such behavior are discussed.© 2017In order to improve blocking tepmerature of the exchange bias effects in heterojunction composing of ferromagnetic (FM) materials and multiferroic BiFeO3 (BFO). NiFe2O4 (NFO) was selected as the FM material to form FM/BFO heterojunction for its high Curie temperature in this paper. NFO/BFO bilayer film was prepared on Pt/Ti/SiO2/Si substrate via a simple sol-gel spin-coating technique. Exchange bias field at room temperature has been observed as expected and HEB/HC was 4.5%. The M-T curves of the NFO/BFO heterostructure indicated that the magnetic anisotropy disappeared above 300 K. Furthermore, a field-dependent irreversible magnetization behavior and an exponential decay of coercive field and exchange bias field with temperature were found, which suggested a spin-glass-like state existed in the NFO/BFO heterostructure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present study involves investigaton of magnetocaloric effect of Pr0.67Ca0.33MnO3-La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 nanocomposite materials above room temperature. From application point of view in magnetic refrigeration our study highlights the enhancement of operating temperature region compared to the well known La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 refrigerant material above room temperature. Comparison has also been made with the magnetocaloric properties of La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 nanomaterials. The modification of the magnetocaloric entropy changes (broadening of the temperature dependent magnetic entropy change) is addressed due to the effect of the gradual melting of antiferromagnetic charge ordered state of the Pr0.67Ca0.33MnO3 nanoparticles in such nanocomposite materials.© 2017In this work, we report the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the Gd1−yPryNi2 compounds from both experimental and theoretical points of view. It is worth noting that this series shows a variety of magnetic arrangements depending on the Pr concentration, including paramagnetism, ferrimagnetism and ferromagnetism. Our experimental work consists of the systematic analysis of the magnetic properties of the compounds with y = 0.0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75 and 1.0, which includes temperature and magnetic field dependence of the magnetization, heat capacity and isothermal entropy change obtained by isothermal magnetization curves. Also, we developed a model Hamiltonian, which takes into account the exchange interactions among Gd-Gd, Gd-Pr and Pr-Pr ions, the Zeeman interaction for both ions and the crystalline electrical field interaction for the Pr ions. We systematically investigated the magnetic properties of the series and obtained a good agreement when compared with our experimental data.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Thermal and magnetic properties of pristine and Stone-Wales (SW) defected zigzag mixed spin-2,5/2AFeIIFeIII(C2O4)3 nanoribbons have been investigated using Monte Carlo simulations. The variation in thermal and magnetic properties has been examined in terms of the number and the positions of SW-defects relative to the edges and the widths of ribbons, as well as to the temperature. Many interesting phenomena have been obtained, such as first and second order phase transitions, N-type compensation behavior and compensation temperature originating mainly from the antiferromagnetic exchange interaction between magnetic ions FeIII and FeII. Furthermore, different hysteresis loop behaviors, such as a single and quintuple hysteresis loops which exhibit different number of steps and various shapes have been observed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.CuFe0.99Mn0.01O2 and CuFe0.99Co0.01O2 single crystal samples are grown by a floating zone technique and their magnetization and spontaneous electric polarization have been investigated. Similarly with pure CuFeO2, an obviously anisotropic magnetization and spontaneous electric polarization were observed in the both doped samples, and their phase transition critical fields and temperatures are directly doping ion dependent. Considering the different d-shell configuration and ionic size between Mn3+, Co3+ and Fe3+ ions, in which the Mn3+ ion with Jahn-Teller (J-T) effect has different distortion on the geometry frustration from both of Fe3+ and Co3+ ion. Since for Mn3+ ion, the orbital splitting results from the low-symmetry J-T distortion in a crystal-field environment leads to a distorted MnO6 octahedron, which different from undistorted FeO6 and CoO6 octahedrons. The strain between distorted and undistorted octahedrons produces different effects on the spin reorientation transition and spontaneous electric polarization. Although the pure CuFeO2 has a very strong and robust frustration, the presence of the strain due to the random distribution of distorted MnO6 octahedron and undistorted CoO6 (FeO6) octahedrons leads to its spin reorientation transitions and spontaneous electric polarization different from CuFeO2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have undertaken a systematic study of critical behavior in La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 nanoparticles, sintered at different temperatures (L6, L8, L10 and L12 sintered at 600 °C, 800 °C, 1000 °C, 1200 °C respectively), by magnetization measurements. The critical exponents are estimated by various techniques such as the Modified Arrott plot, Kouvel–Fisher plot and critical isotherm technique. Compared to standard models, the critical exponents are close to those expected by the Mean-field model (with β = 0.5 γ = 1, and δ = 3) for (L6, L8, and L10) samples and by the (3D) Heisenberg model (β = 0.365, γ = 1.336 and δ = 4.80) for L12 sample. We conclude that the reduction of grain size strongly influences the universality class.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe-doped BaTiO3 has been prepared by the solid state reaction method. Nanonization of sample has been achieved by using high energy ball milling. Tetragonal phase along with a small amount of hexagonal phase has been identified by room temperature X-ray diffraction (XRD) technique in all the samples. Mössbauer spectrum of the as-prepared sample shows multi-site substitution of Fe atoms. Magnetic interactions between Fe atoms placed at three different configurations have been evidenced by the presence of three sextets. A doublet pattern has also been observed for Fe atoms situated in isolate manner without any magnetic exchange. Suppression of sextet patterns in milled samples has been attributed to the presence of superparamagnetism.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The intrinsic brittleness in giant magnetostrictive material TbDyFe alloy has devastating influence on the machinability and properties of the alloy, thus affecting its applications. The purpose of this paper is to study the mechanical properties of the TbDyFe alloy by alloying with Nb element. The samples (Tb0.3Dy0.7)xFe2xNby (y = 0, 0.01, 0.04, 0.07, 0.1; 3x + y = 1) were melted in an arc melting furnace under high purity argon atmosphere. The microstructure, magnetostrictive properties and mechanical performance of the alloys were studied systematically. The results showed that NbFe2 phases were observed in the alloys with the addition of Nb. Moreover, both the NbFe2 phases and rare earth (RE)-rich phases were increased with the increasing of Nb element. The mechanical properties results revealed that the fracture toughness of the alloy with the addition of Nb enhanced 1.5–5 times of the Nb-free alloy. Both the NbFe2 phase and the RE-rich phase had the ability to prevent crack propagation, so that they can strengthen the REFe2 body. However, NbFe2 phase is a paramagnetic phase, which can reduce the magnetostrictive properties of the alloy by excessive precipitation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Multiphase flow is one of the most complicated problems, considering the multiplicity of the related parameters, especially the external factors influences. Thus, despite the recent developments more investigations are still required. The effect of a uniform magnetic field on the hydrodynamics behavior of a two-phase flow with different magnetic permeability is presented in this article. A single water vapor bubble which is rising inside a channel filled with ferrofluid has been simulated numerically. To capture the phases interface, the Volume of Fluid (VOF) model, and to solve the governing equations, the finite volume method has been employed. Contrary to the prior anticipations, while the consisting fluids of the flow are dielectric, uniform magnetic field causes a force acting normal to the interface toward to the inside of the bubble. With respect to the applied magnetic field direction, the bubble deformation due to the magnetic force increases the bubble rising velocity. Moreover, the higher values of applied magnetic field strength and magnetic permeability ratio resulted in the further increase of the bubble rising velocity. Also it is indicated that the flow mixing and the heat transfer rate is increased by a bubble injection and applying a magnetic field. The obtained results have been concluded that the presented phenomenon with applying a magnetic field can be used to control the related characteristics of the multiphase flows. Compared to the previous studies, implementing the applicable cases using the common and actual materials and a significant reduction of the CPU time are the most remarkable advantages of the current study.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, well-dispersed nanoparticles of NiFe2O4 with diameters less than 10 nm and good crystallinity and excellent magnetic properties were synthesized via a simple one-step capping agent-free coprecipitation route from metal chlorides. The ammonia was used as the precipitating agent and also the solution basicity controller. The effect of pH value during the coprecipitation process was investigated by details through microstructural, optical and magnetic characterizations of the synthesized particles using X-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopy, Fourier transform infrared and UV–vis spectroscopy, and vibrating sample magnetometer. The results showed that the particle size, departure from the inverse spinel structure, the band gap value and the magnetization of Ni ferrite samples increase with pH value from 9 to 11 indicating the more pronounced surface effects in the smaller nanoparticles.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a novel structural piezoresistive pressure sensor with a four-beams-bossed-membrane (FBBM) structure that consisted of four short beams and a central mass to measure micro-pressure. The proposed structure can alleviate the contradiction between sensitivity and linearity to realize the micro measurement with high accuracy. In this study, the design, fabrication and test of the sensor are involved. By utilizing the finite element analysis (FEA) to analyze the stress distribution of sensitive elements and subsequently deducing the relationships between structural dimensions and mechanical performance, the optimization process makes the sensor achieve a higher sensitivity and a lower pressure nonlinearity. Based on the deduced equations, a series of optimized FBBM structure dimensions are ultimately determined. The designed sensor is fabricated on a silicon wafer by using traditional MEMS bulk-micromachining and anodic bonding technology. Experimental results show that the sensor achieves the sensitivity of 4.65 mV/V/kPa and pressure nonlinearity of 0.25% FSS in the operating range of 0–5 kPa at room temperature, indicating that this novel structure sensor can be applied in measuring the absolute micro pressure lower than 5 kPa.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper proposes a new concept of read margin analysis of crossbar arrays using cell-variability-aware simulation. The size of the crossbar array should be considered to predict the read margin characteristic of the crossbar array because the read margin depends on the number of word lines and bit lines. However, an excessively high-CPU time is required to simulate large arrays using a commercial circuit simulator. A variability-aware MATLAB simulator that considers independent variability sources is developed to analyze the characteristics of the read margin according to the array size. The developed MATLAB simulator provides an effective method for reducing the simulation time while maintaining the accuracy of the read margin estimation in the crossbar array. The simulation is also highly efficient in analyzing the characteristic of the crossbar memory array considering the statistical variations in the cell characteristics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Metal magnetic memory (MMM) testing technique is a novel testing method which can early test stress concentration status of ferromagnetic components. Under the different maximum tensile stress, the relationship between the leakage magnetic field of at certain point of cold rolled steel specimen and the tensile stress was measured during the process of loading and unloading by repeated. It shows that when the maximum tensile stress is less than 610 MPa, the relationship between the magnetic induction intensity and the stress is linear; When the maximum tensile stress increase from 610 MPa to 653 MPa of yield point, the relationship between the magnetic induction intensity and the tensile becomes bending line. The location of the extreme point of the bending line will move rapidly from the position of smaller stress to the larger stress position, and the variation of magnetic induction intensity increases rapidly. When the maximum tensile stress is greater than the 653 MPa of yield point, the variation of the magnetic induction intensity remains large, and the position of the extreme point moves very little. In theoretical aspects, tensile stress is to be divided into ordered stress and disordered stress. In the stage of elastic stress, a microscopic model of the order stress magnetization is established, and the conclusions are in good agreement with the experimental data. In the plastic deformation stage, a microscopic model of disordered stress magnetization is established, and the conclusions are in good agreement with the experimental data, too. The research results can provide reference for the accurate quantitative detection and evaluation of metal magnetic memory testing technology.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we employed microwave irradiation (MWI) at low temperature in the fabrication of solution-processed AlZnSnO (AZTO) resistive random access memory (ReRAM) devices with a structure of Ti/AZTO/Pt and compared the memory characteristics with the conventional thermal annealing (CTA) process. Typical bipolar resistance switching (BRS) behavior was observed in AZTO ReRAM devices treated with as-deposited (as-dep), CTA and MWI. In the low resistance state, the Ohmic conduction mechanism describes the dominant conduction of these devices. On the other hand, the trap-controlled space charge limited conduction (SCLC) mechanism predominates in the high resistance state. The AZTO ReRAM devices processed with MWI showed larger memory windows, uniform distribution of resistance state and operating voltage, stable DC durability (>103 cycles) and stable retention characteristics (>104 s). In addition, the AZTO ReRAM devices treated with MWI exhibited multistage storage characteristics by modulating the amplitude of the reset bias, and eight distinct resistance levels were obtained with stable retention capability.© 2017 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we have demonstrated the possibility of using the thermal coupling to control the dynamics of operation of coupled VO2 oscillators. Based on the example of a ‘switch-microheater’ pair, we have explored the synchronization and dissynchronization modes of a single oscillator with respect to an external harmonic heat impact. The features of changes in the spectra are shown, in particular, the effect of the natural frequency attraction to the affecting signal frequency and the self-oscillation noise reduction effects at synchronization. The time constant of the temperature effect for the considered system configuration is in the range 7–140 μs, which allows operation in the oscillation frequency range of up to ∼70 kHz. A model estimate of the minimum temperature sensitivity of the switch is δTswitch ∼ 0.2 K, and the effective action radius RTC of the switch-to-switch thermal coupling is not less than 25 μm. Nevertheless, as the simulation shows, the frequency range can be significantly extended up to the values of 1–30 GHz if using nanometer-scale switches (heaters).© 2017Amorphous silicon-zinc-tin-oxide (a-SZTO) thin film transistors (TFTs) have been fabricated depending on the silicon ratio in channel layers. The a-SZTO TFT exhibited high electrical properties, such as high mobility of 23 cm2 V−1 s−1, subthreshold swing of 0.74 V/decade and ION/OFF of 2.8 × 108, despite of the addition of Si suppressor. The physical mechanism on the change of the sheet resistance and the contact resistance in a-SZTO TFT has been investigated and proposed closely related with the Si ratio. Both resistances were increased as increasing Si ratio, which clearly indicated that the role of Si is a carrier suppressor directly leading to the increase of channel and contact resistances. To explain the role of Si as a carrier suppressor, the conduction band offset mechanism has been also proposed depending on the change of carrier concentration in channel layer and at the interface between electrode and channel layer.© 2017 Elsevier LtdWe report a low knee voltage and high breakdown voltage 4H-SiC TSBS employing poly-Si/Ni dual Schottky contacts. A knee voltage was significantly improved from 0.75 to 0.48 V by utilizing an alternative low work-function material of poly-Si as an anode electrode. Also, reverse breakdown voltage was successfully improved from 901 to 1154 V due to a shrunk low-work-function Schottky region by a proposed self-align etching process between poly-Si and SiC. SiC TSBS with poly-Si/Ni dual Schottky scheme is a suitable structure for high-efficiency rectification and high-voltage blocking operation.© 2017 Elsevier LtdTo obtain high channel boosting potential and reduce a program disturbance in channel stacked NAND flash memory with layer selection by multilevel (LSM) operation, a new program scheme using boosted common source line (CSL) is proposed. The proposed scheme can be achieved by applying proper bias to each layer through its own CSL. Technology computer-aided design (TCAD) simulations are performed to verify the validity of the new method in LSM. Through TCAD simulation, it is revealed that the program disturbance characteristics is effectively improved by the proposed scheme.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis study proposes a new method for automatically synthesizing the equivalent circuit of the dielectric relaxation (DR) characteristic in dynamic random access memory (DRAM) without frequency dependent capacitance measurement. Charge loss due to DR can be observed by a voltage drop at the storage node and this phenomenon can be analyzed by an equivalent circuit. The Havariliak-Negami model is used to accurately determine the electrical characteristic parameters of an equivalent circuit. The DRAM sensing operation is performed in HSPICE simulations to verify this new method. The simulation demonstrates that the storage node voltage drop resulting from DR and the reduction in the sensing voltage margin, which has a critical impact on DRAM read operation, can be accurately estimated using this new method.© 2017 Elsevier LtdNumerous researches for making steep tunnel junction within tunnel field-effect transistor (TFET) have been conducted. One of the ways to make an abrupt junction is source/drain silicidation, which uses the phenomenon often called silicide-induced-dopant-segregation. It is revealed that the silicide process not only helps dopants to pile up adjacent to the metal-silicon alloy, also induces the dopant activation, thereby making it possible to avoid additional high temperature process. In this report, the availability of dopant activation induced by metal silicide process was thoroughly investigated by diode measurement and device simulation. Metal-silicon (MS) diodes having p+ and n+ silicon formed on the p- substrate exhibit the characteristics of ohmic and pn diodes respectively, for both the samples with and without high temperature annealing. The device simulation for TFETs with dopant-segregated source was also conducted, which verified enhanced DC performance.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThe MoO3 nanobelts have been grown onto the glass substrates using chemical spray pyrolysis (CSP) deposition technique at optimized substrate temperature of 400 °C. XRD study shows that the film is polycrystalline in nature and possesses an orthorhombic crystal structure. The FE-SEM micrographs show the formation of nanobelts-like morphology of MoO3. The presence of Pd and its oxidation states in Pd-sensitized MoO3 film is confirmed using EDAX and XPS study, respectively. The percentage gas response is defined as [formula presented]×100% where, Ra and Rg are the film resistances in presence of air and analyte gas, respectively. Before Pd sensitization, MoO3 nanobelts show NO2 gas response of 68% for 100 ppm concentration at operating temperature of 200 °C with response and recovery times of 15 s and 150 s, respectively. Selectivity coefficient study shows that the Pd-sensitized MoO3 nanobelts are more sensitive and selective towards NO2 gas among various gases such as NH3, H2S, CO, CO2 and SO2. The Pd-sensitized MoO3 nanobelts shows the enhanced response of 95.3% towards 100 ppm NO2 gas concentration with response and recovery times of 74 s and 297 s, respectively. The lower detection limit is found to be 5 ppm which is four times less than immediately dangerous to life or health (IDLH) value of 20 ppm. Finally, the proposed NO2 gas sensing mechanism based on chemisorption model is discussed.© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis paper deals with the comprehensive behavioral model of p-n junction diode containing reverse recovery effect, applicable to all standard SPICE simulators supporting Verilog-A language. The model has been successfully used in several production designs, which require its full complexity, robustness and set of tuning parameters comparable with standard compact SPICE diode model. The model is like standard compact model scalable with area and temperature and can be used as a stand-alone diode or as a part of more complex device macro-model, e.g. LDMOS, JFET, bipolar transistor. The paper briefly presents the state of the art followed by the chapter describing the model development and achieved solutions. During precise model verification some of them were found non-robust or poorly converging and replaced by more robust solutions, demonstrated in the paper. The measurement results of different technologies and different devices compared with a simulation using the new behavioral model are presented as the model validation. The comparison of model validation in time and frequency domains demonstrates that the implemented reverse recovery effect with correctly extracted parameters improves the model simulation results not only in switching from ON to OFF state, which is often published, but also its impedance/admittance frequency dependency in GHz range. Finally the model parameter extraction and the comparison with SPICE compact models containing reverse recovery effect is presented.© 2017The effect of specific surface area (SSA) of Fe2O3 was investigated while evaluating the raw material of Y3Fe5O12 (yttrium iron garnet (YIG)) preparation. For YIG ferrite, the specific surface area of Fe2O3, rather than average particle size (D50), was found to markedly affect the mixing homogeneity of powders in the mixing procedure and the magnetic properties. Increasing the specific surface area of Fe2O3 resulted in the increase of the remanence (Br) and squareness ratio (SQR); meanwhile, it also caused an obvious reduction in coercivity (HC) for the sintered specimens. An upgrade in the specific surface area of raw material Fe2O3 could further resulted in a decrease in slurry viscosity in the mixing procedure, which promotes slurry mixing homogeneity and further promotes reactivity in the calcination and sintering processes. Consequently, a larger Br and SQR and a smaller HC were obtained. In addition, good ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) line width (i.e., ΔH) properties were also realized as 36.7 Oe at 3.2 GHz using the selected Fe2O3. As found in this study, the strict control of raw material Fe2O3 is critical in tailoring suitable Br and HC for the YIG ferrite manufacturing process.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Co-doped Ni-Mn-(Sn, Al) Heusler alloys were calculated using ab initio zero-temperature calculations combined with Monte Carlo finite-temperature simulations. To find the stable magnetic ground state for austenite and martensite, the calculations for ferromagnetic and ferrimagnetic orderings were carried out. Once accurate lattice constants were calculated, magnetic moments, exchange coupling constants, bulk moduli, Debye temperatures for the alloys studied were determined. Using the thermodynamic approach jointly with Monte Carlo simulations, martensitic phase transition temperatures were obtained from intersection of the Free energy curves. Finally, the temperature dependences of magnetic and magnetocaloric properties for the studied systems were simulated by the effective Potts-Blume-Emmery-Griffiths Hamiltonian. The obtained results are in a good agreement with available experimental data.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the state-of-art density functional theory is employed to study the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of samarium nitride (SmN). We have performed calculation for both ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic states in rock-salt phase. The calculated results of optimized lattice parameter and magnetic moment agree well with the available experimental and theoretical values. From energy band diagram and electronic density of states, we observe a half-metallic behaviour in FM phase of rock salt SmN in while metallicity in AFM I and AFM III phases. We present and discuss our current understanding of the possible half-metallicity together with the magnetic ordering in SmN. The calculated phonon dispersion curves shows dynamical stability of the considered structures. The phonon density of states and Eliashberg functional have also been analysed to understand the superconductivity in SmN.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on magnetic and magnetothermal properties of undoped and doped gadolinium silicide (Gd5Si4) nanoparticles with the objective of simultaneously attaining high specific absorption rate (SAR) and low Curie temperature (TC) suitable for self-controlled hyperthermia applications for which TC ∼ 315–320 K. Pellets of doped gadolinium silicide Gd5(Si1−xGex)4 and (Gd1−xRx)5Si4 with R = Ho, Nd and Er and 0 ≤ x ≤ 0.35 were made by arc melting and reduced to nanoparticulate form by surfactant assisted ball milling. Structural and morphological studies were done using X-ray diffraction and scanning electron microscopy respectively. All samples show soft magnetic properties. At low fields there is a ferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition that reduces remanance and coercivity to zero making these materials very attractive for biomedical applications. Zero-field-cooled thermal demagnetization measurements showed that TC of these nanoparticles can be lowered to lie within the limits required for self-controlled hyperthermia by varying the dopant concentration. Specific absorption rates (SAR's) were obtained from magnetothermia measurements made in an ac magnetic field of amplitude 10 Oe and frequency 300 kHz. We have identified samples that have SAR values larger or comparable to those of magnetite and several ferrite nanoparticles, while having Curie temperatures that are low enough for self controlled hyperthermia applications.© 2017We report the dynamical behaviors of magnetic vortices in different Permalloy nanodisks induced by an out-of-plane spin-polarized current in an off-centered nanocontact geometry through micromagnetic simulation. Simulation results show that the dynamical behaviors of magnetic vortex are sensitive to nanocontact position and the dimension of nanodisks. The influences of nanocontact position on the vortex core pinning behavior, the critical switching current density and switching time are analyzed deeply. Non-circular symmetry of system total energy in such off-centered geometry leads to the magnetic vortex easy to be excited in all nanodisks. The thicker nanodisks are beneficial to the magnetic vortex pinning, and the vortex is easier to exhibit gyration in the thinner nanodisks. We put forward an effective method to control the magnetic vortex position, thus improving the possibility of using magnetic vortex as a candidate for magnetic memory and logical devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Temperature and Magnetic field dependent magnetization properties of electron doped polycrystalline sample Ca0.85Dy0.15MnO3 (CDMO) prepared by solid state reaction method have been studied. The sample undergoes ferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase transition at about 111k. From the study of magnetic properties in terms of Arrot plots it is observed that the phase transition is of 2nd order. The Griffith phase behavior of the sample is suppressed with the increase of the applied magnetic field strength H. We have estimated the magnetic entropy change from experimental magnetization and temperature data. For a magnetic field change of 8000 Oe, the maximum value of magnetic entropy change arrives at a value of 1.126 J-kg−1 k−1 in this magnetocaloric material.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nonlinear magnetoelectric effect in a planar ferromagnetic-piezoelectric composite structure, placed in the constant magnetic field H and harmonic alternating field h, manifests itself in voltage harmonics generation. The hysteresis in the field dependence of magnetostriction of the ferromagnetic layer leads to an ambiguous dependence of the harmonic amplitudes on H. The effect of the hysteresis suppression in the harmonic amplitudes dependences on the field H under increasing amplitude of the excitation field is described in the paper. In a planar structure with Ni and lead zirconate titanate layers, an increase in the field h from 1 Oe to 100 Oe led to a decrease of the coercive field from 21 Oe to 0.4 Oe in the field dependence of the first and third voltage harmonics amplitudes. The simulation showed that the effect is caused by a decrease in the relative influence of the constant field on the asymmetry of the ferromagnetic layer magnetostriction loop of the structure with increase of the excitation field. The hysteresis suppression effect will increase the measurement accuracy of the magnetoelectric sensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ground state magnetic phase diagrams of the square and simple cubic lattices are investigated for the narrow band Hubbard model within the slave-boson approach by Kotliar and Ruckenstein. The transitions between saturated (half-metallic) and non-saturated ferromagnetic phases as well as similar transition in antiferromagnetic (AFM) state are considered in the three-dimensional case. Two types of saturated antiferromagnetic state with different concentration dependences of sublattice magnetization are found in the two-dimensional case in the vicinity of half-filling: the state with a gap between AFM subbands and AFM state with large electron mass. The latter state is hidden by the phase separation in the finite-U case.© 2017In this work, the magnetocaloric properties of (La0.45Nd0.25)Sr0.3MnO3 (LNSMO)-based composites are studied. The structural, microstructural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of LNSMO and LNSMO/5CuO samples were investigated aiming to particularly clarify the secondary phase (CuO) role in driving the magnetocaloric behavior. The main phase LNSMO crystallizes in a rhombohedral R-3C (1 6 7) configuration. The XRD patterns of composite samples show both perovskite LNSMO and monoclinic Tenorite CuO structures. The microstructural analysis unveils that the CuO phase is mainly present in the grain boundaries and segregates region. On the other hand, it was found that the magnetocaloric effect could be significantly enhanced by adding a small amount of CuO (5% weight ratio). For a magnetic field changing from 0 to 1.5 T, the corresponding isothermal entropy change was found to be 2.55 J/kg K for the LNSMO/5CuO composite while it is only about 1.1 J/kg K for the mother material LNSMO. Our finding should inspire and open new ways for the enhancement of the magnetocaloric effect in manganites-based materials.© 2017 Elsevier LtdReactive sputtering followed by N2, NH3, O2, and NO post-deposition annealing (PDA) of SiO2 on 4H-SiC was investigated in this study. The results of ellipsometry, an etching test, and X-ray photoemission spectroscopy showed that N2 and NH3 PDA nitrified the SiO2. Devices using N2 and NH3 PDA exhibited a high gate leakage current and low breakdown field due to oxygen vacancies and incomplete oxynitride. SiO2/4H-SiC MOS capacitors were also fabricated and their electrical characteristics measured. The average breakdown fields of the devices using N2, NH3, O2, and NO PDA were 0.12, 0.17, 4.71 and 2.63 MV/cm, respectively. The shifts in the flat-band voltage after O2 and NO PDA were 0.95 and −2.56 V, respectively, compared with the theoretical value. The extracted effective oxide charge was −4.11 × 1011 cm−2 for O2 PDA and 1.11 × 1012 cm−2 for NO PDA. NO PDA for 2 h at 1200 °C shifted the capacitance–voltage curve in the negative direction. The oxygen containing PDA showed better electrical properties than non-oxygen PDA. The sputtering method described can be applied to 4H-SiC MOS fabrication.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Differential shot noise and Fano factor are investigated theoretically in a ferromagnet-Graphene-superconductor junctions, where ferromagnetism and superconductivity are induced by proximity effect, while the intermediate layer is Graphene. We have found that sub-gap region in shot noise and Fano factor is strongly affected by the ferromagnetic exchange energy. We have found that shot noise and Fano factor are suppressed when the exchange energy increases and the Andreev retro-reflection is the dominant process. When the dominant process is specular Andreev reflection, shot noise and Fano factor enhance by increasing the exchange energy. Also, for a wide intermediate Graphene layer, the shot noise oscillates vs applied bias voltage while there is no oscillation in the curves of Fano factor vs bias voltage. The calculation of Fano factor at zero bias shows that the Fano factor vs spin-polarization displays a clear distinction between Andreev retro-reflection and specular Andreev reflection. Our finding can be used not only to understand more about Andreev retro-reflection and specular Andreev reflection but also to discriminate between them through the differential shot noise and Fano factor.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We implement the coupled cluster method to very high orders of approximation to study the spin-[formula omitted] J1–J2 Heisenberg model on a cross-striped square lattice. Every nearest-neighbour pair of sites on the square lattice has an isotropic antiferromagnetic exchange bond of strength J1>0, while the basic square plaquettes in alternate columns have either both or neither next-nearest-neighbour (diagonal) pairs of sites connected by an equivalent frustrating bond of strength J2≡αJ1>0. By studying the magnetic order parameter (i.e., the average local on-site magnetization) in the range 0≤α≤1 of the frustration parameter we find that the quasiclassical antiferromagnetic Néel and (so-called) double Néel states form the stable ground-state phases in the respective regions α<α1ac=0.46(1) and α>α1bc=0.615(5). The double Néel state has Néel (⋯↑↓↑↓⋯) ordering along the (column) direction parallel to the stripes of squares with both or no J2 bonds, and spins alternating in a pairwise (⋯↑↑↓↓↑↑↓↓⋯) fashion along the perpendicular (row) direction, so that the parallel pairs occur on squares with both J2 bonds present. Further explicit calculations of both the triplet spin gap and the zero-field uniform transverse magnetic susceptibility provide compelling evidence that the ground-state phase over all or most of the intermediate regime α1ac<α<α1bc is a gapped state with no discernible long-range magnetic order.© 2017Micromagnetic simulations of the ground state magnetization patterns of rectangular gadolinium thin film elements were performed and the effects of aspect ratio, size, and thickness of the island on net long axis moment were investigated. Highly remanent states were found in 15 nm thick gadolinium islands with high aspect ratios, 8:1 or greater, as well as in smaller islands with aspect ratios down to 5:1. The thickness of the island was also critical for the ability of a gadolinium island to maintain a highly remanent ground state; islands with thickness greater than or equal to 30 nm showed increased multidomain formation. These results provide information and guidance on what dimensions are suitable for fabrication of single-domain gadolinium nanostructures – a feat not yet achieved in literature. The proposed dimensions most suitable for experimental realisation of a single domain gadolinium element are 500nm×50nm×15nm, lying within the range found in this investigation to be energetically favoured single domains.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A computational model is described and implemented in this work to analyze the performance of a ferrofluid based electromagnetic energy harvester. The energy harvester converts ambient vibratory energy into an electromotive force through a sloshing motion of a ferrofluid. The computational model solves the coupled Maxwell's equations and Navier-Stokes equations for the dynamic behavior of the magnetic field and fluid motion. The model is validated against experimental results for eight different configurations of the system. The validated model is then employed to study the underlying mechanisms that determine the electromotive force of the energy harvester. Furthermore, computational analysis is performed to test the effect of several modeling aspects, such as three-dimensional effect, surface tension, and type of the ferrofluid-magnetic field coupling on the accuracy of the model prediction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Strontium hexaferrite nanoparticles were synthesized by a microwave-assisted hydrothermal process. The variation of structure, morphology and magnetic properties of the as-produced particles and after annealing temperatures were carefully analysed. Pure M-SrFe12O19 powders were synthesized at T = 200 °C using a heating rate of 25 °C.min−1. The particles exhibited a magnetic coercivity of 95 kA.m−1 (µ0Hc = 0.12 T), explained by the shape of the particles that crystallized as very thin platelets with a micrometer size diameter and a very high aspect ratio in which a competition between shape and magnetocrystalline anisotropy takes place. The coercivity was strongly enhanced with Hc = 360 kA.m−1 (µ0 Hc = 0.445 T) by annealing at the optimum temperature of 1000 °C. In order to optimize the particle morphology and magnetic properties after annealing, the heating rate of the microwave synthesis was increased. At T = 200 °C using a heating rate of 40 °C.min−1 the particle exhibited a size in the range 20–100 nm. The powder crystallized as a mixture of hexaferrite and ferrihydrite. After annealing at 1000 °C, M-SrFe12O19 with a small amount of hematite (<15%) was obtained. The coercivity was strongly enhanced to reach the value Hc = 465 kA.m−1 (µ0Hc = 0.585 T).© 2017 Elsevier LtdThis work is focuses on terahertz performance of hybrid single walled carbon nanotube (CNT) based amplifier and proposed for measurement of soil parameters application. The proposed circuit topology provides hybrid structure which achieves wide impedance bandwidth of 0.33 THz within range of 1.07-THz to 1.42-THz with fractional amount of 28%. The single walled RF CNT network executes proposed ambition and proves its ability to resonant at 1.25-THz with analytical approach. Moreover, a RF based microstrip transmission line radiator used as compensator in the circuit topology which achieves more than 30 dB of gain. A proper methodology is chosen for achieves stability at circuit level in order to obtain desired optimal conditions. The fundamental approach optimizes matched impedance condition at (50+j0) Ω and noise variation with impact of series resistances for the proposed hybrid circuit topology and demonstrates the accuracy of performance parameters at the circuit level. The chip fabrication of the proposed circuit by using RF based commercial CMOS process of 45 nm which reveals promising results with simulation one. Additionally, power measurement analysis achieves highest output power of 26 dBm with power added efficiency of 78%. The succeed minimum noise figure from 0.6 dB to 0.4 dB is outstanding achievement for circuit topology at terahertz range. The chip area of hybrid circuit is 0.65 mm2 and power consumption of 9.6 mW.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Utilizing the package MSH/VBA, based on the microscopic spin Hamiltonian (MSH) approach, spectroscopic and magnetic properties of Fe2+ (3d6; S = 2) ions at (nearly) orthorhombic sites in Fe(NH4)2(SO4)2·6H2O (FASH) are modeled. The zero-field splitting (ZFS) parameters and the Zeeman electronic (Ze) factors are predicted for wide ranges of values of the microscopic parameters, i.e. the spin-orbit (λ), spin-spin (ρ) coupling constants, and the crystal-field (ligand-field) energy levels (Δi) within the 5D multiplet. This enables to consider the dependence of the ZFS parameters bkq (in the Stevens notation), or the conventional ones (e.g., D and E), and the Zeeman factors gi on λ, ρ, and Δi. By matching the theoretical SH parameters and the experimental ones measured by electron magnetic resonance (EMR), the values of λ, ρ, and Δi best describing Fe2+ ions in FASH are determined. The novel aspect is prediction of the fourth-rank ZFS parameters and the ρ(spin-spin)-related contributions, not considered in previous studies. The higher-order contributions to the second- and fourth-rank ZFSPs are found significant. The MSH predictions provide guidance for high-magnetic field and high-frequency EMR (HMF-EMR) measurements and enable assessment of suitability of FASH for application as high-pressure probes for HMF-EMR studies. The method employed here and the present results may be also useful for other structurally related Fe2+ (S = 2) systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetic behaviour of ball-milled nanoparticles of antiferromagnetic spin-1 Li2Ni(WO4)2 system by magnetic susceptibility and neutron diffraction measurements. Bulk sample shows indicators of two successive three dimensional (3D) antiferromagnetic (AF) ordering at TN1∼18K and TN2∼13K in χ(T). The magnetic susceptibility and neutron diffraction measurements indicate that no long-range magnetic order is detected when bulk sample is reduced to nano size particles, despite of the identical crystal structures. The super-super exchange interaction is proposed being disrupted as a result of cell volume expansion in nanoparticles. The Zero-Field-Cooled (ZFC) and Field-Cooled (FC) curve bifurcation and M(H) curve of nanoparticle reveal that the weak ferromagnetic behavior exists at low temperature because of spin disorder on the surface of nanoparticle.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The field of magnon spintronics offers a charge current free way of information transportation by using spin waves (SWs). Compared to forward volume spin waves for example, Damon-Eshbach (DE) SWs need a relatively weak external magnetic field which is suitable for small spintronic devices. In this work we study DE SWs in Co2MnSi, a half-metallic Heusler alloy with significant potential for magnonics. Thin films have been produced by pulsed laser deposition. Integrated coplanar waveguide (CPW) antennas with different distances between emitter and detection antenna have been prepared on a Co2MnSi film. We used a vector network analyzer to measure spin wave reflection and transmission. We observe spin wave propagation up to 100 μm, a new record for half-metallic Heusler thin films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have studied theoretically (including computer simulations) dynamical magnetic properties of aggregates of ferromagnetic amorphous nanogranules in the presence of direct exchange between the neighboring granules and random anisotropy fields. It was shown that in such structures there still exist delocalized magnetic excitations similar to magnons in the bulk materials, although at much lower frequencies. The excitations at high frequencies are localized within the corresponding granules. The details of spectrum of these excitations (including structural factors) are discussed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The ground-state magnetic response of fullerene molecules with up to 36 vertices is calculated, when spins classical or with magnitude s= [Formula presented] are located on their vertices and interact according to the nearest-neighbor antiferromagnetic Heisenberg model. The frustrated topology, which originates in the pentagons of the fullerenes and is enhanced by their close proximity, leads to a significant number of classical magnetization and susceptibility discontinuities, something not expected for a model lacking magnetic anisotropy. This establishes the classical discontinuities as a generic feature of fullerene molecules irrespective of their symmetry. The largest number of discontinuities have the molecule with 26 sites, four of the magnetization and two of the susceptibility, and an isomer with 34 sites, which has three each. In addition, for several of the fullerenes the classical zero-field lowest energy configuration has finite magnetization, which is unexpected for antiferromagnetic interactions between an even number of spins and with each spin having the same number of nearest-neighbors. The molecules come in different symmetries and topologies and there are only a few patterns of magnetic behavior that can be detected from such a small sample of relatively small fullerenes. Contrary to the classical case, in the full quantum limit s=[Formula presented].© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The exchange-bias properties of ferromagnetic, either Co or Ni, thin films deposited onto polycrystalline multiferroic CuO are investigated. After field cooling, the CuO/Co magnetization hysteresis loops show exchange bias at temperatures lower than 200 K, while the CuO/Ni system exhibits bias below about 5 K only. It is suggested that the exchange bias of CuO/Co is determined mainly by the magnetization reversal that takes place on the descending branch of the loop. Rather high values of both the interface coupling energy, 0.89 erg/cm2, and coercivity, 2.44 kOe, of the CuO/Co film are obtained at 5 K.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The transmission properties of a one-dimensional photonic crystal containing graphene mono-layers are studied using the transfer matrix method. It is shown that the structure can be used as a polarization-selective nonreciprocal device which discriminates between the two circularly polarized waves with different handedness impinging in the same direction. This structure may be utilized in designing optical isolators for the circularly polarized waves due to the gyrotropic behavior of the graphene mono-layers under the perpendicularly applied external magnetic field. Moreover, the effect of an external magnetic field and the chemical potential of the graphene mono-layers on the band gap of the structure are investigated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present a first-principles study of electronic structures and magnetic properties in Ni-doped BiFeO3 using the density functional theory + U methods. The BiNixFe1-xO3 (x = 0.125, 0.25, 0.5) multiferroic ceramics represent ferromagnetic properties due to the ferrimagnetic order in Ni-O-Fe, and the magnetic moment rises with increase in Ni doping concentration agreeing well with experimental results. Ni atoms prefer to occupy the diagonal positions in the quasi-plane Ni-O-Fe eight-membered ring. Charge transfer from Bi 6s state to Ni 3d state through O 2p orbital lead to the 2+ oxidation state of Ni, indicating high Néel temperatures of BiNixFe1-xO3, and the electronic state of the system can be described as Bi4+xBi3+1-xNi2+xFe3+1-xO3. The spin polarization of Bi 6s state and O 2p state near the Fermi level contributes to the total magnetic moment. A spin-polarized acceptor level of about 0.4 eV constituted by Bi 6s state and O 2p state is found, which is responsible for the increase in leakage current of Ni-doped BiFeO3.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Spin-spin correlation function response in the low electronic density regime and externally applied electric field is evaluated for 2D metallic crystals under Rashba-type coupling, fixed number of particles and twofold energy band structure. Intrinsic Zeeman-like effect on electron spin polarization, density of states, Fermi surface topology and transverse magnetic susceptibility are analyzed in the zero temperature limit. A possible magnetic state for Dirac electrons depending on the zero field band gap magnitude under this conditions is found.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nanostructured Co and permalloy films are fabricated on top of a polymethyl methacrylate (PMMA) colloidal crystals by magnetron sputtering. The influence of the geometry of the samples on the ferromagnetic resonance spectra is studied. A number of spin-wave resonances are found in the nanostructured system, while only a single resonance is observed in the spatially uniform flat film. The number of the observed resonance peaks increases with both the period of the colloidal crystal (120 ÷ 340 nm) and the film thickness (20 ÷ 90 nm). The micromagnetic simulations of the system show that the excited spin-wave modes are nonreciprocal because of nonzero toroidal momentum of the magnetization of the system.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Fe-Co-Ni-Si-B high entropy amorphous alloys composites (HEAACs), which containing high entropy solid solution phase in amorphous matrix, show good soft magnetic properties and bending ductility even in optimal annealed state, were successfully developed by melt spinning method. The crystallization phase of the HEAACs is solid solution phase with body centered cubic (BCC) structure instead of brittle intermetallic phase. In addition, the BCC phase can transformed into face centered cubic (FCC) phase with temperature rise. Accordingly, Fe-Co-Ni-Si-B high entropy alloys (HEAs) with FCC structure and a small amount of BCC phase was prepared by copper mold casting method. The HEAs exhibit high yield strength (about 1200 MPa) and good plastic strain (about 18%). Meanwhile, soft magnetic characteristics of the HEAs are largely reserved from HEAACs. This work provides a new strategy to overcome the annealing induced brittleness of amorphous alloys and design new advanced materials with excellent comprehensive properties.© 2017Using vanadium slag as raw material, Metal-doped Mn-Zn ferrites were synthesized by multi-step processes including chlorination of iron and manganese by NH4Cl, selective oxidation of Fe cation, and hydrothermal synthesis. The phase composition and magnetic properties of synthesized metal-doped Mn-Zn ferrite were characterized by X-ray powder diffraction, Raman spectroscopy, transmission electron microscopy (TEM), X-ray photon spectra (XPS) and physical property measurement. It was found that Mn/Zn mole ratio significantly affected the magnetic properties and ZnCl2 content significantly influenced the purity of the phase of ferrite. Synthesized metal-doped Mn-Zn ferrite, exhibiting a larger saturation magnetization (Ms = 60.01 emu/g) and lower coercivity (Hc = 8.9 Oe), was obtained when the hydrothermal temperature was controlled at 200 °C for 12 h with a Mn/Zn mole ratio of 4. The effect of ZnCl2 content, Mn/Zn mole ratio and temperature on magnetic properties of the synthesized metal-doped Mn-Zn ferrite were systemically investigated. This process provided a new insight to utilize resources in the aim of obtaining functional materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A method to increase the relative cooling power to be used in Ericsson like refrigeration cycles is presented. The technique is based in the modification of the magnetic properties by the application of hydrostatic pressure on magnetic samples. The main advantage is to reach larger values of the magnetic entropy change in a wider temperature region (the so-called “table like” behavior). The study was carried out in a manganite belonging to the family of La0.625−yNdyCa0.375MnO3, and some conclusions were compared with the expected behavior in other materials extracted from literature.© 2017The structural and magnetic properties of doped ferrite Zn0.3Cu0.7Fe1.5Ga0.5O4 have been studied by means of the neutron diffraction method at high pressures up to 4.7 GPa and in temperature range 300–425 K. By increasing the temperature and the pressure, a gradual suppression of the magnetic moments of iron ions in both A and B crystallographic sites was observed. This effect corresponds to a magnetic phase transition from the ferrimagnetic state to paramagnetic one. The lattice parameters, interatomic bond lengths and angles, magnetic moments of iron ions as functions of temperature and pressure were obtained. Upon compression, the magnetic ordering temperature of studied ferrite decreases with a large pressure coefficient dTc/dP = −19(1) K × GPa−1.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Smart materials like magnetic hybrid elastomers (MHEs) are based on an elastic composite with a complex hybrid filler of magnetically hard and soft particles. Due to their unique magnetic field depending characteristics, these elastomers offer great potential for designing sensor systems with a complex adaptive behaviour and operating sensitivity. The present paper deals with investigations of the material properties and motion behaviour displayed by synthesised MHE beams in the presence of a uniform magnetic field. The distribution and structure formation of the magnetic components inside the elastic matrix depending on the manufacturing conditions are examined. The specific magnetic features of the MHE material during the magnetising process are revealed. Experimental investigations of the in-plane free vibrational behaviour displayed by the MHE beams with the fixed-free end conditions are performed for various magnitudes of an imposed uniform magnetic field. For the samples pre-magnetised along the length axis, it is demonstrated that the deflection of the beam can be identified unambiguously by magnetic field distortion measurements. It is shown that the material properties of the vibrating MHE element can be specifically adjusted by means of an external magnetic field control. The dependence of the first eigenfrequency of free bending vibrations of the MHE beams on the strength of an imposed uniform magnetic field is obtained. The results are aimed to assess the potential of MHEs to design acceleration sensor systems with an adaptive magnetically controllable sensitivity range.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Today, searching for materials hosting quantum anomalous Hall effect (QAHE) at high temperature and with long conductivity plateau is an important issue for next generation spintronic applications at nanoscale. In this article, we discuss a quantized spin Hall response in heterostructures composed of a three-dimensional topological insulator (TI) film and a ferromagnetic normal insulator (FMNI). The magnetic proximity effect at the TI/FMNI interface provides exchange splitting of the topological states in the TI film. We predict analytically that the FMNI/TI/FMNI trilayer can be driven into the QAHE state either from the topologically trivial state or the quantum spin Hall state, depending on the TI film thickness and the interface potential. We calculate the corresponding phase diagram of the FMNI/TI/FMNI trilayer. Our results provide a useful guide to realize the QAHE regime in the TI/FMNI heterostructures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of pulsed laser deposited Co-Zn ferrite [Co1−xZnxFe2O4 (0.1 ≤ x ≤ 0.7)] nanocrystalline thin films have been investigated. The films were deposited on amorphous quartz substrate. The observed magnetic properties of the films depend on the deposition temperature (TS), the annealing temperature (TA) and the Zn content (x). A magnetization value higher than bulk was observed in a room temperature deposited Co rich (x = 0.1) Co-Zn ferrite thin films, when the films were ex-situ annealed at TA = 750 °C. On the other hand, in Zn rich (x = 0.7) Co-Zn ferrite, a magnetization value higher than bulk (x = 0.7) was obtained in a film deposited at TS = 750 °C. The unusual magnetization values are explained on the basis of grain growth and the cation distribution in thin films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and magnetotransport properties of (Bi1-xEux)2Se3 thin films have been studied experimentally as a function of Eu content. The films were synthesized by MBE. It is demonstrated that Eu distribution is not uniform, it enter quint-layers forming inside them plain (pancake-like) areas containing Eu atoms, which sizes and concentration increase with the growth of Eu content. Positive magnetoresistance related to the weak antilocalization was observed up to 15 K. The antilocalization was not followed by weak localization as theory predicts for nontrivial topological states. Surprisingly, the features of antilocalization were seen even at Eu content x=0.21. With the increase of Eu content the transition to ferromagnetic state occurs at x about 0.1 and with the Curie temperature ≈8 K, that rises up to 64 K for x=0.21. At temperatures above 1–2 K, the dephasing length is proportional to T-1/2 indicating the dominant contribution of inelastic e-e scattering into electron phase breaking. However, at low temperatures the dephasing length saturates, that could be due to the scattering on magnetic ions.© 2017The authors regret to make a mistake about the affiliations of the corresponding author. The correct one should be School of Physics and Technology, University of Jinan, Jinan 250022, PR China. The authors would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The use of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) in cancer therapy offer many advantages due to their unique size, physical and biocompatible properties. In this study we have developed a formulation, comprising of anti-cancer drug doxorubicin (Dox) conjugated to iron oxide nanoparticles via a pH sensitive imine linker. Different amounts of chitosan functionalized superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (Fe3O4-CHI) were synthesized in-situ by a simple hydrolysis method at room temperature. The synthesized nanoparticles were well characterized by TEM, Zeta Potential, TOC, XPS, TGA and VSM for their physicochemical properties. Dox was conjugated to the Fe3O4-CHI nanoparticles via a glutaraldehyde cross linker with the imine (–C[dbnd]N–) bond, which is sensitive to cleavage in the pH range of 4.4–6.4. The synthesized Fe3O4-Dox nanoparticles exhibited enhanced drug release in lower pH conditions which mimics the tumor microenvironment or intracellular organelles such as endosomes/lysosomes. The cell uptake and therapeutic efficacy of Fe3O4-Dox nanoparticles carried out in ovarian cancer cell (SK-OV-3) and breast cancer cell line (MCF7) showed improved therapeutic efficacy of Dox by nearly four-fold with Fe3O4-Dox nanoparticles.© 2017We report the magnetic and magnetoelastic properties of spinel oxide system Co1−xZnxFe2O4 (CZF series) where x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, and 0.5. All the composition were prepared by conventional solid state synthesis method and exhibited pure spinel phase formation. The lattice parameters showed gradual increase indicating uniform distribution Zn ions in cobalt ferrite lattice. The magnetic properties such as saturation magnetization and coercive field were drastically affected with Zn substitution showing enhanced saturation magnetization and a sharp decrease in the coercivity. The room temperature magnetostrictive properties showed a promising 30% enhancement in the slope of magnetostriction curve for x = 0.2 composition and a reasonable magnetostrictive strain of 110 ppm indicating its suitability as a promising magnetostrictive material.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, nanocrystalline samples of Ti1−xCrxO2 (x = 0, 0.02, 0.04, 0.06 and 0.08) were synthesized in anatase phase through simple and cost effective acid modified sol gel method. The influence of Cr doping on thermal, microstructural, electrical and magnetic properties was investigated in TiO2 host matrix. The surface morphology has revealed less agglomeration and considerable reduction in particle size in case of Cr doped TiO2 as compared to undoped TiO2 nanoparticles (NPs). Energy dispersive x-ray spectroscopy (EDS), Raman and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) established high purity, appropriate stoichiometry and oxidation states of the compositions. The dielectric properties of the nanoparticles were altered by the doping concentration, applied frequency as well as temperature variation. The variation in dielectric constant (ε′), dielectric loss (δ) and ac conductivity as a function of frequency and temperature at different doping concentration of Cr were interpreted in the light of Maxwell Wagner theory, space charge polarization mechanism and drift mobility of charge carriers. Both undoped and Cr doped TiO2 samples exhibit room temperature ferromagnetism (RTFM) that remarkably influenced by means of the Cr content. The significant enhancement in the magnetization was observed at 4% Cr doping. However, decrease in magnetization for higher doping signify antiferromagnetic interactions between Cr ions or superexchange mechanism. These results reveal that the oxygen vacancies play a crucial role to initiate the RTFM. Therefore, the present investigation suggests the potential applications of Cr doped TiO2 nanoparticles for spintronics application.© 2017This paper implements an open-loop controller for generating earth's magnetic field in vessel's co-ordinate frame. It also incorporates the rotational movements along the three axes, without physically moving the object. This has potential application in prediction of signature for ferromagnetic marine vessels in changing earth's magnetic field experienced by the vessel due to change in location. It also considers the effect of roll, pitch and heading changes. Uniform magnetic field simulator is designed to generate the required magnetic field in the vessel's coordinate frame. Simulation results are verified using experimental laboratory setup.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have studied thermoelectric conversion in all-ferromagnetic CoδFe100-δ/YIG bilayer junctions as a function of the chemical composition δ. We performed measurements of the transverse thermoelectric voltage upon application of a magnetic field. The voltage measured in the longitudinal spin Seebeck effect configuration shows a sign reversal at δ = 40%, which cannot be explained by the conventional electronic transport, such as the anomalous Nernst and Hall effects in the CoδFe100-δ layer. Our results suggest a possible role of the sd-type exchange interaction between Co40Fe60 and YIG at the interface as a possible origin for the observed behavior.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferrofluids can exhibit the anisotropic thermodynamic properties under magnetic fields. The dynamic optical properties of ferrofluids in the presence of magnetic fields are of particular interest due to their potential application as various optical devices. Although time-dependent light scattering by ferrofluids have been extensively studied, the effect of wavelength of incident light have been rarely considered. Here, for the first time, we investigated both the time- and wavelength-dependent light scattering in water based ferrofluids containing Fe3O4 nanoparticles under an external magnetic field. The field-induced response behavior of the prepared ferrofluid samples was determined and verified first by thermal conductivity measurement and numerical simulation. Double-beam UV–Vis spectrophotometer was employed to record the temporal evolution of transmitted intensity of incident light of various wavelengths passing through the ferrofluid sample and propagating parallel to the applied field. As expected, the light intensity decreases to a certain value right after the field is turned on due to the thermal fluctuation induced disorder inside the flexible particle chains. Then the light intensity further decreases with time until the appearance of a minimum at time τ0 followed by an inversed increase before finally reaches equilibrium at a particular time. More importantly, the characteristic inversion time τ0 was found to follow a power law increase with the wavelength of incident light (τ0 ∼ λα, where α = 2.07). A quantitative explanation for the wavelength dependence of characteristic time was proposed based on the finite-difference time-domain (FDTD) method. The simulation results are in good agreement with our experimental observations. The time-dependent light scattering in ferrofluids under different incident wavelengths was rationalized by considering both the coarsening process of the particle chains and the occurrence of resonance within the magnetic scatterers. Our finding should be of value for the development of various light-tunable optical devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The unusual physical characteristics of the multicomponent oxide systems renewed the interest as the potential cathode materials in high-energy cells. Since the earlier magnetic characteristics were not entirely conclusive, we report the results of dc magnetic measurements including higher harmonics of ac magnetic susceptibility of the M2FeV3O11 (M = Mg, Zn, Pb, Co, Ni) compounds. Ferrimagnetic long-range and antiferromagnetic short-range interactions for all compounds under study at low temperatures as well as superparamagnetic-like behavior with the blocking temperature of 29 K and the freezing parameter of 0.013 were observed. These effects are discussed within the framework of superexchange and double exchange magnetic interactions as well as the mixed valence band of iron ions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a model of interacting two-phase core/shell nanoparticles is presented. An analysis of the effect of exchange coupling, size and magnetic interaction between Fe/Fe3O4 nanoparticles on the coercive field Hc, the remanent saturation magnetisation Mrs and the saturation magnetisation Ms has been carried out. We show that the hysteresis characteristics grow together with the size of nanoparticles. Changing the exchange interaction constant leads to a nonmonotonic change of Hc and Mrs. Magnetic dipole-dipole interaction between core/shell nanoparticles results in a decrease of Hc and Mrs, due to the chaotisation of magnetic moments of the interacting nanoparticles.© 2017The studies surrounding the concept of microdroplets have seen a dramatic increase in recent years. Microdroplets have applications in different fields such as chemical synthesis, biology, separation processes and micro-pumps. This study numerically investigates the effect of different parameters such as Capillary number, Length of droplets, and Magnetic Bond number on the splitting process of ferrofluid microdroplets in symmetric T-junctions using an asymmetric magnetic field. The use of said field that is applied asymmetrically to the T-junction center helps us control the splitting of ferrofluid microdroplets. During the process of numerical simulation, a magnetic field with various strengths from a dipole located at a constant distance from the center of the T-junction was applied. The main advantage of this design is its control over the splitting ratio of daughter droplets and reaching various microdroplet sizes in a T-junction by adjusting the magnetic field strength. The results showed that by increasing the strength of the magnetic field, the possibility of asymmetric splitting of microdroplets increases in a way that for high values of field strength, high splitting ratios can be reached. Also, by using the obtained results at various Magnetic Bond numbers and performing curve fitting, a correlation is derived that can be used to accurately predict the borderline between splitting and non-splitting zones of microdroplets flow in micro T-junctions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Patterned magnetic thin films are both scientifically interesting and technologically useful. Ultrathin self-organized anodic aluminum oxide (AAO) template can be used to fabricate large area nanodot and antidot arrays. The magnetic properties of these nanostructures may be tuned by the morphology of the AAO template, which in turn can be controlled by synthetic parameters. In this work, ultrathin AAO templates were used as etching masks for the fabrication of both FePt nanodot and antidot arrays with high areal density. The perpendicular magnetic anisotropy of L10 FePt thin films are preserved in the nanostructures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic fluid flow and heat transfer by natural and thermomagnetic convection was studied numerically in a square enclosure. The aim was to investigate the transition from natural convection to thermomagnetic convection by exploring situations where buoyancy and the Kelvin body force would be opposing each other such that the magnetic effects would in some cases be the dominant factor throughout the domain and in other cases only in a part of the fluid. The numerical model coupled the solution of the magnetostatic field equation with the heat and fluid flow equations to simulate the fluid flow under a realistic magnetic field generated by a permanent magnet. The results suggest that the domain of influence over the flow field is largely aligned with the domain of dominance of the respective driving force. The result is that the transition from a single buoyancy-driven convection cell to a single thermomagnetically driven cell is via a two-cell structure and that the local effect on the flow field leads to a global effect on the heat transfer with a minimum of the Nusselt number in the transition region.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Hybrid magnets of Nd12Fe82B6(2:14:1-phase)/Nd9.4Fe59Co25.3Ti6.3(3:29-phase) and Nd12Fe82B6/Sm11.1Co65.8Fe8.9Cu10.7Zr3.5(2:17-phase) with different weight ratio have been prepared by spark plasma sintering pressing technique from ball-milled powders obtained from melt-spun ribbons. Influence of the ratio between the two phases on the magnetic properties and thermal stability of the hybrid magnets was studied. It has been found that the ratio has a remarkable influence, especially on the thermal stability of the bulk magnets. However, the magnetic properties of such type of hybrid magnets result not only from the type and ratio of components but also from the interaction between them. It was found that in NdFeB/3:29 hybrid magnets with 15% content of 3:29-phase, the temperature coefficients of remanence (α) and of coercivity (β) are improved from −0.095 to −0.082 (%/°C) and from −0.57 to −0.47 (%/°C), respectively, as compared to the Nd2Fe14B single-phase counterpart. While for the NdFeB/2:17 hybrid magnets the content of 2:17-phase is not significantly influencing the temperature coefficient of induction (α), the temperature coefficient of °C (β) increases up to −0.41 (%/°C) for 10% content of 2:17-phase. The increase in the reversible temperature coefficients of hybrid magnets indicate a remarkable improvement of their thermal stability.© 2017The detection of pyrrhotite (Fe7S8) by 57Fe NMR spectroscopy in zero applied field is reported. The 57Fe signal of pyrrhotite is detected in zero field using two different methods, with both yielding peak signal at 42.03 MHz. The technique and theory of 57Fe NMR spectroscopy of ferromagnetic iron compounds in zero applied field has recently been reviewed, and a zero field NMR ore detection and separation method has been recently described. The method presented here can be suitably adapted for detection and selection of pyrrhotite-containing ore fragments enriched in Fe7S8 in mining applications. The association of pyrrhotite with the Ni-rich mineral pentlandite (Fe,Ni)9S8 enables peak signal detection at 42.03 MHz as a proxy for nickel-rich material in ultramafic nickel sulphide deposits.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The high-density FeNi nanoparticle films with strip structures were prepared by electric field-assisted deposition technique. The electric field of 10–40 kV was applied on the sputtering platform during thin film deposition in order to obtain superior in-plane soft magnetic properties. The dependence of magnetic properties and microwave behavior on electric field was investigated. It is found that these high-density films have magnetically easy-modulated characteristics, especially for the strip-patterned ones. Application of electric field is very effective to obtain stronger in-plane magnetic anisotropy field and higher saturation magnetization simultaneously for our samples. In this case, large permeability and high ferromagnetic resonance frequency are easily achieved when the strip-patterned films are used in a wide gigahertz range. The experimental results indicate that electric field-assisted deposition technique is one of the important and promising manufacture methods to prepare thin film materials with enhanced gigahertz electromagnetic wave properties.© 2017First-order reversal curve (FORC) diagram has been previously adopted for the analyses of magnetization reversal process and/or quantitative evaluation of coercivity and interaction field dispersions in various magnetic samples. Although these kinds of information are valuable for permanent magnets, previously reported FORC diagrams of sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets exhibit very complicated patterns. In this paper, we have studied the FORC diagrams of hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets under various conditions. Contrary to the previous reports on sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets, the FORC diagram of the hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnet exhibits a very simple pattern consisting of a strong spot and a weak line. From this FORC diagram pattern, it is revealed that the coercivity dispersion of the hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets is surprisingly small. Moreover, this feature of the FORC diagram pattern is very robust and unaffected by changes in various conditions such as grain boundary diffusion process, temperature, and field direction, whereas these conditions significantly change the coercivity and the shape of magnetization curve. This fact indicates that the magnetization reversal process of the hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets is almost unchanged against these conditions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this article, Co1−xZnxFe2O4 (x = 0.0 and 0.5) disc-shaped pellets were formed by hot-press sintering of nanoparticles at temperature 925 °C for 10 min in vacuum atmosphere under 30 MPa mechanical pressure. X-ray diffraction study confirmed the formation of spinel cubic ferrite structure of hot-press sintered spinel ferrite Co1−xZnxFe2O4 (x = 0.0 and 0.5) samples. The scanning electron microscopy image indicated that the growth and densification of smaller ferrite nanoparticles were higher than larger ferrite nanoparticles. Magnetic properties of sintered samples were investigated by the superconducting quantum interface device (SQUID) magnetometer at room temperature. The hot press sintered Co1−xZnxFe2O4 (x = 0.0 and 0.5) pellet samples exhibited magnetic properties dependent on the grain size of spinel ferrite particles. The maximum saturation magnetization 82.47 emu/g was obtained for Co0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 hot press sintered sample of ball-milled ferrite particles. Further, the impact of grain size and density of sample on hardness, dielectric property and ac conductivity of hot-press sintered samples was investigated. In addition, the longitudinal wave velocity (Vl), transverse wave velocity (Vt), mean elastic wave velocity (Vm), bulk modulus (B), rigidity modulus (G), Young's modulus (E), Poisson ratio (σ) and Debye temperature (θD) were calculated. The elastic moduli of hot press sintered ferrite samples were corrected to zero porosity using Hosselman and Fulrath model.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A numerical simulation of three-dimensional (3-D) implant assisted-magnetic drug targeting (IA-MDT) using ferromagnetic spherical targets, including the effect from the vessel wall on the blood flow, is presented. The targets were implanted within arterioles and subjected to an externally uniform applied magnetic field in order to increase the effectiveness of targeting magnetic drug carrier particles (MDCPs). The capture area (As) of the MDCPs was determined by inspection of the particle trajectories simulated from the particle equations of motion. The blood flow velocities at any particle position around the target were obtained by applying bilinear interpolation to the numerical blood velocity data. The effects on As of the type of ferromagnetic materials in the targets and MDCPs, average blood flow rates, mass fraction of the ferromagnetic material in the MDCPs, average radii of MDCPs (Rp) and the externally applied magnetic field strength (μ0H0) were evaluated. Furthermore, the appropriate μ0H0 and Rp for the IA-MDT design is suggested. In the case of the SS409 target and magnetite MDCPs, dimensionless capture areas ranging from 4.1- to 12.4 and corresponding to particle capture efficiencies of 31–94% were obtained with Rp ranging from 100- to 500 nm, weight fraction of 80%, μ0H0 of 0.6 T and an average blood flow rate of 0.01 ms−1. In addition, the more general 3-D modelling of IA-MDT in this work is applicable to IA-MDT using spherical targets implanted within blood vessels for both laminar and potential blood flows including the wall effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The macroscopic magnetic moment of a superparamagnetic system has to overcome an energy barrier in order to switch its direction. This barrier is formed by magnetic anisotropies in the material and may be surmounted typically after 109-1012 attempts per second by thermal fluctuations. In a first step, the associated switching rate may be described by a Néel-Brown-Arrhenius law, in which the energy barrier is assumed as constant for a given temperature. Yet, magnetic anisotropies in general depend on temperature themselves which is known to modify the Néel-Brown-Arrhenius law. We illustrate quantitatively the implications of a temperature-dependent anisotropy on the switching rate and in particular for the interpretation of the prefactor as an attempt frequency. In particular, we show that realistic numbers for the attempt frequency are obtained when the temperature dependence of the anisotropy is taken into account.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.BaTi1.2Co1.2Fe9O19−δ hexagonal ferrite was prepared by solid state reaction method sintered at 1250 °C, and its structure was examined by XRD and SEM, its magnetic properties were measured by VSM and BH analyzer at different temperature between −60 °C and 120 °C. It was found that no power loss minimum can be observed in the power loss versus temperature data when the initial permeability reaches a peak at 60 °C. Magnetic losses analysis indicated that the hysteresis loss is very small at −60 °C. The real part of permeability μ′ is a field independent constant in H < 500 A/m at −60 °C, while μ′ shows linear field dependence in the measured field range at 60 °C. The sample shows constant μ′ with very low hysteresis loss in H < 500 A/m at −60 °C, which is consistent with the characteristic of the initial magnetization region, so conclusion is that initial magnetization region expands to high magnetic field with decreasing temperature in BaTi1.2Co1.2Fe9O19−δ hexagonal ferrite. This characteristic may serve as a new way to achieve low loss soft magnetic materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the evolution of physical properties due to partial substitution of Gd on the Y site in a mixed metal oxide YFe0.5Cr0.5O3. This compound exhibits negative magnetization at low applied fields. Our investigations on Y1-xGdxFe0.5Cr0.5O3 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4 and 0.6) compounds is carried out through magnetization and Raman spectroscopy studies. It is observed that even with 20% Gd substitution, the negative magnetization observed in YFe0.5Cr0.5O3 is suppressed. Due to magnetic rare earth ion Gd3+, additional exchange interaction of the form Gd-O-Fe/Cr dominates the magnetic interaction arising due to the transition metal ions. This results in positive magnetization in Gd-substituted compounds. Temperature dependent Raman spectroscopy along with magnetization studies revealed that the observed shifts of Raman mode is due to spin-phonon coupling. Hardening of Raman mode observed below 240 K in YFe0.5Cr0.5O3 weakens and softening of phonon modes was observed for Y0.4Gd0.6Fe0.5Cr0.5O3 compound. This implies that additional magnetic interactions due to Gd ions play a dominating role in dictating the behavior of the Gd-substituted compounds.© 2017The structural and magnetic properties of Zn, Co and Zr cations doped barium hexaferrite [Ba(Znx/2Cox/2)xZrxFe(12−2x)O19] nanoparticles synthesized by sol-gel method have been investigated. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) were employed to investigate the physico-chemical properties of the obtained ferrite samples. XRD studies reveal that the magnetoplumbite structure for all sample (up to x = 0.8) have been formed and the crystallite size of nanoparticles lies in the range of 34–46 nm. At higher dopant concentration, other impurities (α-Fe2O3 and BaFe2O4 etc.) have been observed. Magnetic studies indicate that site occupancy and nature of dopant ions greatly affect the behavior of magnetic properties. The results of VSM and LCR analysis show that magnetic and electrical parameters vary with an increase in dopant concentration. The results of BET surface area of samples indicate that these types of materials could be used for catalytic properties. Dielectric constant, dielectric loss tangent and A.C. conductivity weremeasured using impedance analyzer over wide frequency range 20 Hz–120 MHz. All the three parameters increase significantly with increase in doping. Increase in dielectric constant proposes these materials for fabrication of microwave devices, while increase in dielectric loss tangent proposes these for applications such as attenuator, absorber etc.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates electromagnetic properties of half-dense ceramics with compositions Ni0.5Zn0.3Co0.2FeyO4-δ where y = 1.98 (Iron deficient, noted ID) or y = 2.3 (Iron in excess, noted IE). IE and ID materials are obtained by chemical coprecipitation route. The obtained nano-sized powders are pressed and annealed at two temperatures (800 °C, 900 °C), so has to obtain half-massive ceramics. Ferrous and ferric ions coexist in the crystalline structures, but the former in a less extend for ID ferrite. The concomitant influences of Fe2+ and Fe3+ on the dielectric and magnetic losses (ε″/ε′ and µ″/µ′, respectively) are considered at frequency up to 6 GHz. The permeability dispersion changes from relaxation-like to resonance-like with the decrease in ferrous ions. In reason of the relaxing-like behavior of Fe2+, and because of a relatively high amount in Fe2+, IE sample shows lower total losses (magnetic and dielectric) than ID sample. These conclusions applied for TA = 900 °C. At frequencies above 700 MHz, the total loss values (IE and ID samples) are prohibitive for antenna downsizing whatever is the firing temperature value (800 °C and 900 °C). Whereas at frequencies below 700 MHz Ni0.5Zn0.3Co0.2Fe2.3O4+δ may leads to better antenna performances than Ni0.5Zn0.3Co0.2Fe1.98O4-δ.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The M-type hexagonal ferrites with chemical formula SrFe12−xSmxO19 (x = 0, 0.01, 0.02, 0.03) were synthesized via sol-gel method. We studied the effects of substitution of rare earth on the structural and magnetic temperament of M-type hexaferrites. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and X-ray diffraction (XRD) strategies are employed for the systematical examination of micrographs and structures of the samples. The magnetic particularities are studied by the use of vibrating sample magnetometery. The M-H loops are used to investigate the hard magnetic behavior of all the samples. The substantial value of coercivity (>1 kOe) for all the samples shows that the particular sample is permanent magnet and reveals the hard magnetic action. It is observed that values of saturation magnetization (Mr) and remanence (Ms) decline with increasing the rare earth ions substitution. This decrease may follow spin canting and the magnetic dilution, which results in dislocation of superexchange interactions. The improvement in Hc may be because of large anisotropy of magnetocrystalline, where ion anisotropy of Fe2+ ion on the 2a site probably overriding in all hexaferrites series. The synthesized composites were useful for applications in magnetic microwave absorbing materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ion doping in crystals can result in lattice modifications triggering interesting magnetic and optical properties of the material, understood as a compensation of the crystal deformation and microstrain. We investigated the spinel structure of Mn-Cr ferrite after doping with La3+ ions. The structure was first characterized by X-ray diffraction and high-resolution transmission electron microscopy. Raman scattering spectra were taken that could also be interpreted in terms of crystal field distortion due to La3+ ion doping. On assessing the magneto-impedance of the doped ferrite, it showed giant magneto-impedance behavior, with a strong drop of over 50%. The saturation magnetization was characterised by vibrating sample magnetometer and was found to be 20.25 emu/g with remnant magnetization of 1.47 emu/g.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Triethylene glycol (TREG)-coated nickel-zinc (Ni-Zn) ferrite nanoparticles were synthesized via the hydrothermal method and characterized for application to magnetic hyperthermia. Ni-Zn ferrite particles of Ni1−xZnxFe2O4 with three different zinc contents of x = 0.2, 0.4, and 0.6 were formulated to investigate the structural and magnetic properties according to the zinc content. Transmission electron microscopy images revealed that the particles were spherical in shape and that the average diameters of the particles were 10.67, 13.02, and 18.73 nm for zinc contents of 0.6, 0.4, and 0.2, respectively. Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy confirmed that the TREG was firmly coated on the surface of the particles. The saturation magnetization decreased with the increasing zinc content in the particles, which affected the heating ability of the particles in the alternating magnetic field. The heating ability of the Ni0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4 and Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 particles facilitated the aqueous solution of these particles to reach the target temperature of 42 °C for magnetic hyperthermia, while an aqueous solution of Ni0.2Zn0.8Fe2O4 particles with a high particle concentration did not reach the target temperature. The high specific absorption rates of the Ni0.8Zn0.2Fe2O4 and Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 particles indicate that these particles are applicable to magnetic hyperthermia.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The phosphoric acid addition effect on phosphate insulation coating microstructure was investigated in this study. The relationships between the phosphate insulation coating microstructure and temperature resistance, corrosion resistance and magnetic properties of iron-based soft magnetic composites (SMCs) were studied by using SEM, TEM/EDS and FTIR. It was observed that an iron phosphate/carbonyl iron core/shell structure is formed with carbonyl iron powder after phosphatizing treatment. The iron phosphate phase was identified as amorphous and its thickness increased from 30 nm to 60 nm as the phosphoric acid concentration was increased from 1 wt% to 2 wt%. When the phosphoric acid concentration was further increased to 5 wt%, the excess iron phosphate precipitates between the soft magnetic composite particles. The temperature and corrosion resistance and resistivity of the iron-based SMCs can be effectively improved using carbonyl iron powders after phosphatizing. The initial permeability of the iron-based SMCs decreased with increasing phosphoric acid concentration due to thicker insulation layer formation. However, the imaginary permeability below the domain wall displacement resonance frequency decreased with increasing phosphoric acid concentration. The DC-bias superposition characteristic can also be improved by increasing the phosphoric acid concentration. Iron-based SMCs with superior temperature and corrosion resistance, initial permeability, magnetic loss and DC-bias superposition characteristics can be obtained by controlling the phosphoric acid concentration during phosphatizing to adjust the iron phosphate precipitate thickness on the iron powder surface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ultrathin Co films of 3 nm thickness have been prepared on MgO (0 0 1) substrate in presence or absence of substrate pre-annealing. Uniaxial anisotropy is induced in the samples due to the deposition under oblique angle of incidence. Along with the oblique deposition induced anisotropy, another uniaxial anisotropy contribution has been observed due to pre-annealing. However, no cubic anisotropy has been observed here as compared to the thicker films. Angle dependent ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) measurement confirms the presence of two anisotropies in the pre-annealed sample with ∼18° misalignment with each other. The two anisotropy constants were calculated from both superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID) magnetometry and FMR spectroscopy. The magnetization reversal is governed by nucleation dominated aftereffect followed by domain wall motion for the pre-annealed sample. Branched domains are observed for the sample prepared without pre-annealing which indicates grain disorientation of Co. However, in the thicker (25 nm) Co films ripple domains were observed in contrary to ultrathin (3 nm) films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report experiments on the temperature dependence of anomalous Hall and anomalous Nernst effects in amorphous [CoSiB/Pt] multilayer films with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy down to low temperatures. The Hall resistance decreases slowly with decrease in temperature, remaining at about 88% of the room temperature value at 25 K. On the other hand, the Nernst coefficient decreases rapidly with decreasing temperature and becomes about 10% of the room temperature value even at 100 K. The coercive field determined from these measurements also shows a strong change with temperature, increasing by a factor of two at 25 K as compared with that at room temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The kinetic arrest (KA) of martensitic transformation (MT) observed in Ni45Co5Mn36.8In13.2 melt-spun ribbons has been studied. These alloy ribbons show an ordered columnar-like grain microstructure with the longer grain axis growing perpendicular to ribbon plane and transform martensitically from a single austenitic (AST) parent phase with the L21-type crystal structure to a monoclinic incommensurate 6 M modulated martensite (MST). Results show that the volume fraction of austenite frozen into the martensitic matrix is proportional to the applied magnetic field. A fully arrest of the structural transition is found for a magnetic field of 7 T. The metastable character of the non-equilibrium field-cooled glassy state was characterized by introducing thermal and magnetic field fluctuations or measuring the relaxation of magnetization. The relaxation of magnetization from a field-cooled kinetically arrested state at 5 and 7 T follows the Kohlrausch–Williams–Watts (KWW) stretched exponential function with a β exponent around 0.95 indicating the weak metastable nature of the system under the strong magnetic fields. The relationship between the occurrence of exchange bias and the frozen fraction of AST into the MST matrix was studied.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements were performed on a powdered CuFe2Ge2 sample that orders antiferromagnetically at ∼175 K. Whereas a paramagnetic doublet was observed above the Néel temperature, a superposition of paramagnetic doublet and magnetic sextet (in approximately 0.5:0.5 ratio) was observed in the magnetically ordered state, suggesting a magnetic structure similar to a double-Q spin density wave with half of the Fe paramagnetic and another half bearing static moment of ∼0.5-1μB. These results call for a re-evaluation of the recent neutron scattering data and band structure calculations, as well as for deeper examination of details of sample preparation techniques.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Rapidly quenched NdFeB ribbons with high coercivity were obtained by Nd70Cu30 diffusion process. Samples with a high coercivity of 22.02 kOe at room temperature were obtained after grain boundary diffusion with 20 wt% Nd70Cu30 alloys. The NdCu diffusion process promoted grain growth in the ribbons, and grain boundary phases were formed with Cu segregation among NdFeB grains. Coercivity above 10 kOe at 150 °C was achieved in the bonded magnets with NdCu content over 10 wt%. The flux loss of bonded magnets was reduced by ∼32% at 120 °C after diffusion treatment with only a small amount (2 wt%) of NdCu.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effect of ball milling process on remanence and coercivity of nanocrystalline SmCo5 magnets was systematically investigated. Nanocrystalline SmCo5 magnets were prepared by high energy ball milling and spark plasma sintering. And their vast difference of remanence and coercivity were analyzed thoroughly. The anisotropic SmCo5 magnets prepared by wet-milling with surfactant (oleylamine, OY) have high remanence, but the coercivity is much lower than the isotropic magnets prepared by dry-milling. Further analysis indicates the milling process induced changes on the size and shape of grains are the key factors influencing the coercivity. The amorphous powders prepared by dry-milling were crystallized during sintering and the magnets have small and homogeneous grains, while the anisotropic nanoflakes prepared by wet-milling could be well oriented but the magnets have lower coercivity due to the larger and inhomogeneous grains.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, finite element micromagnetic simulations were performed in order to study the magnetization reversal mechanisms in thin films with perpendicular magnetocrystalline anisotropy. Magnetization loops are taken both for perpendicular and planar external magnetic fields, at different anisotropy constants and film sizes. Magnetization vortices, stripe domains and magnetic bubbles are ab initio simulated and they are investigated on the basis of the film characteristics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effects of sulfur (S) doping on microstructure and magnetic properties of Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets were studied. With 0.2 wt% S doping, the melting point of the Nd-rich eutectic phases decreased from 1038 K to 1021 K. Clear and continuous grain boundary phases were also formed with smaller grain size. The average grain size was 7.83 μm, which was approximately 1.3 μm smaller than that of the undoped magnets. The coercivity enhancement was attributed to boundary microstructure modification and grain size optimization. The coercivity of the 0.2 wt% S-doped magnets increased from 15.54 kOe to 16.67 kOe, with slight changes of the remanence and the maximum magnetic energy production. The magnetic properties of the overdoped magnets deteriorated, due to the reduction in density and decrease of the volume fraction of the main phase. Globular S precipitates in the Nd-rich triple junctions were hexagonal Nd2O2S phase and tetragonal NdS2 phase. S addition allows reducing Dy usage in magnets with comparable magnetic properties.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we report the results on the fabrication of diluted magnetic semiconductors Zn1−xMnxO1−ySy thin films with manganese x = 0.05 and sulfur 0 ≤ y ≤ 0.15 compositions, respectively, by using ultrasonic spray pyrolysis method. The influence of the sulfur concentration on the band gap energy, structural and magnetic properties have been studied by using optical transmission, X-ray diffraction and superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID) measurements, respectively. The morphology and composition of samples were studied by using Scanning Electron Microscope (SEM) and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). With increasing of the sulfur concentration the band gap energy of composition decreases, while the magnetization increases proportional to the sulfur concentration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A first-principle study of structural, electronic and magnetic properties of the bulk on (1 1 1), (1 1 0), and (0 0 1) surfaces of zinc-blende manganese bismuth and the MnBi/HgTe (0 0 1) and (1 1 0) interfaces is undertaken. In case of the bulk, the compound exhibits half-metallicity with an energy gap of 1.27 eV in the minority-spin direction at the equilibrium lattice constant of 6.412 Ǻ. The results show that the half-metallicity of this bulk is well preserved on the surfaces considered here except for the Bi-terminated (0 0 1) and Mn-terminated (1 1 1) surfaces. Moreover, we find that the spin magnetic moments at the (1 1 1), (0 0 1) and (1 1 0) surfaces increase compared to those of the bulk MnBi, while they decrease on the (1 1 1), (0 0 1) and (1 1 0) subsurfaces. As we calculate the adhesion energy, it is found to be the most stable interface. We find out as will that the Bi-Te(0 0 1) configuration is the most stable between the two possible configurations of the MnBi/HgTe (0 0 1) interface. Regrettably, interfacial configurations show that the half-metallicity of bulk MnBi is ruined for all possible configurations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we investigate artifacts arising from electric charges present in magnetic force microscopy images. Therefore, we use two austenitic steel samples with different microstructural conditions. Furthermore, we examine the influence of the surface preparation, like etching, in magnetic force images. Using Kelvin probe force microscopy we can quantify the charges present on the surface. Our results show that electrical charges give rise to a signature in the magnetic force microscopy, which is indistinguishable from a magnetic signal. Our results on two differently aged steel samples demonstrate that the magnetic force microscopy images need to be interpreted with care and must be corrected due to the influence of electrical charges present. We discuss three approaches, how to identify these artifacts – parallel acquisition of magnetic force and electric force images on the same position, sample surface preparation to decrease the presence of charges and inversion of the magnetic polarization in two succeeding measurement.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the use of a non-destructive continuous magnetic Barkhausen noise technique to detect applied stress on steel surfaces. The stress profile generated in a sample of 1070 steel subjected to a three-point bending test is analyzed. The influence of different parameters such as pickup coil type, scanner speed, applied magnetic field and frequency band analyzed on the effectiveness of the technique is investigated. A moving smoothing window based on a second-order statistical moment is used to analyze the time signal. The findings show that the technique can be used to detect applied stress profiles.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Hydrogen insertion on the electronic and magnetic properties of the Cr doped ZnO has been investigated using the density functional theory DFT approach within the GGA and GGA+U methods. The electronic density of states (DOS) shows that the magnetic contribution appears to be n-type in H-ZnO. The calculated formation energy indicates that interstitial hydrogen atom prefers to bond with oxygen atom in the Cr–O bond center. Calculations show that the existence of interstitial hydrogen increases the local magnetic moment of Cr in Zn1−xCrxO. The hydrogen implantation increases the magnetic moment in the CrZnO. Calculations are done for different doping concentrations to discuss the contribution of different atoms to the magnetic moments.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the field of biomedicine the applications of magnetic beads have increased immensely in the last decade. Drug delivery, magnetic resonance imaging, bioseparation or hyperthermia are only a small excerpt of their usage. Starting from microscaled particles the research is focusing more and more on nanoscaled particles. We are investigating and validating a method for simulating magnetic beads in a microfluidic flow which will help to manipulate beads in a controlled and reproducible manner. We are using the soft-matter simulation package ESPResSo to simulate magnetic particle dynamics in a lattice Boltzmann flow and applied external magnetic fields. Laminar as well as turbulent flow conditions in microfluidic systems can be analyzed while particles tend to agglomerate due to magnetic interactions. The proposed simulation methods are validated with experiments from literature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Co71Mo9P14B6 bulk glassy rod with a maximum diameter of 4.5 mm is fabricated by combining fluxing treatment and J-quenching technique, and its magnetocaloric effect (MCE) has been investigated in the present work. The peak values of the magnetic entropy change and refrigerant capacity of the Co71Mo9P14B6 bulk metallic glass (BMG) are 0.96 J kg−1 K−1 and 70.5 J kg−1, respectively, under a maximum applied field of 5 T. Most importantly, this BMG exhibits a Curie temperature of 317 K, which is suitable for room-temperature magnetic refrigeration. Combining the large glass-forming ability and near room-temperature MCE, the present Co71Mo9P14B6 BMG provides a candidate used as near room-temperature magnetic refrigerant.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Current induced spin wave excitations in spin transfer torque nano-contacts are known as a promising way to generate exchange-dominated spin waves at the nano-scale. It has been shown that when these systems are magnetized in the film plane, broken spatial symmetry of the field around the nano-contact induced by the Oersted field opens the possibility for spin wave mode co-existence including a non-linear self-localized spin-wave bullet and a propagating mode. By means of micromagnetic simulations, here we show that in systems with strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in the free layer, two propagating spin wave modes with different frequency and spatial distribution can be excited simultaneously. Our results indicate that in-plane magnetized spin transfer nano-contacts in PMA materials do not host a solitonic self-localized spin-wave bullet, which is different from previous studies for systems with in plane magnetic anisotropy. This feature renders them interesting for nano-scale magnonic waveguides and crystals since magnon transport can be configured by tuning the applied current.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new magneto-viscoelastic model is presented for anisotropic magnetorheological elastomers (MREs), which combines the dynamic behaviour and magnetic permeability components. Five samples were synthesised with different particle contents. Dynamic properties were measured using a rheometer equipped with a magnetorheological cell. A four-parameter fractional derivative model was used to describe MRE viscoelasticity in the absence of a magnetic field. The magnetic permeability of each sample was measured with a vibrating sample magnetometer. From experimental measurements of longitudinal and transverse components of the magnetic permeability, the dependency with magnetic field was modelled. The new magneto-induced modulus model proposed in this work is based on the model developed by López-López et al. [19] for magnetorheological fluids, and was adapted for anisotropic MREs. The proposed model includes the longitudinal and transverse components of magnetic permeability, and it is valid for the linear viscoelastic region of anisotropic MREs. The errors between experimental values and the values predicted by the model do not exceed 10%. Hence, a new linear magneto-viscoelastic model for anisotropic MREs is developed, which predicts the effect of magnetic field on the dynamic shear modulus as a function of magnetic field intensity and frequency.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A quantum model of a single-domain magnetically soft ferromagnetic is proposed. The α-Fe crystal in a state of the saturation magnetization and a variable magnetic field is considered as a sample. The method of an effective Hamiltonian, including the operators of the Zeeman energy, the spin-orbit interaction and the interaction with the crystal field, is used in the model. An expansion of trial single-electron wave function in a series in small parameter of the spin-orbit interaction is suggested to account for the magnetic anisotropy. Within the framework of the Heisenberg representation, the nonlinear equations of motion for the magnetization and the orbital moment of single domain are obtained. Parameters of the modelling Hamiltonian are found from a comparison with experimental data on the magnetic anisotropy of iron. A phenomenological term of the magnetic friction is introduced into equation of the magnetization motion. Nonlinear equations are solved numerically by the Runge-Kutta method. A dependence of the single domain magnetization on magnetic field intensity has a characteristic form of a hysteresis loop which parameters are quantitatively coordinated with experimental data of researches of magnetic properties of nanoparticles of iron and iron oxide. The method is extended for modelling the magnetization dynamics of multi-domain ferromagnetic in the approximation of a strong crystal field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate magnetic correlations and local magnetic moments at finite temperatures in some Fe and Ni multilayers on and embedded in Cu(100). Our study is based on a mean-field theory of magnetic fluctuations for layered materials within the first-principles local spin-density functional theory. We find that although there is no significant local moments formation in the Ni layers, the Ni layers are not magnetically dead in the sense that they mediate magnetic interactions between Fe layers separated by Ni layers. The Curie temperature of FenNim/Cu(100) and NinFem/Cu(100) films is almost independent of the Ni layer thickness, however, in Fe1NinFe1/Cu(100) and Fe1CunFe1/Cu(100) films, the Curie temperature exhibits an interesting oscillatory behaviour as the spacer layer thickness is increased. We show that there is a connection between this behaviour and the spin-reorientation transition observed in some Ni films. In the Ni1FenNi1/Cu(100) and Cu1Fen/Cu(100) films we found that the nature and strength of the magnetic correlations depends upon the Fe layer thickness.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic single electron transistor with electrodes having different temperatures is investigated and the effects of changing electrodes temperature on TMR of system are studied. A modified orthodox theory is used to study the system and to calculate the electron tunneling transition rate. The results show that the temperature of electrodes can be an effective tool to control and tune the tunnel magnetoresistance of FM-SET. Also, the effects of parameters such as resistance ratio of junctions, magnetic polarization and spin relaxation time on the behaviour of the system are studied.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Two-leg spin-1/2 ladder systems consisting of a ferromagnetic leg and an antiferromagnetic leg are considered where the spins on the legs interact through antiferromagnetic rung couplings J1. These ladders can have two geometrical arrangements either zigzag or normal ladder and these systems are frustrated irrespective of their geometry. This frustration gives rise to incommensurate spin density wave, dimer and spin fluid phases in the ground state. The magnetization in the systems decreases linearly with J12, and the systems show an incommensurate phase for 0.0<J1<1.0. The spin-spin correlation functions in the incommensurate phase follow power law decay which is very similar to Heisenberg antiferromagnetic chain in external magnetic field. In large J1 limit, the normal ladder behaves like a collection of singlet dimers, whereas the zigzag ladder behaves as a one dimensional spin-1/2 antiferromagnetic chain.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Re-substitution doping by W has been investigated in the Double Perovskite (DP) Sr2CrRe1−xWxO6 for x ranging from 10 to 90% by using a Monte Carlo Simulation (MCS) in the framework of Ising model. Exchange couplings used in the simulation have been approximated in previous work for experimental Curie temperatures (TC). Doping effect on: partial and total magnetization, magnetic susceptibility, internal energy, specific heat, and Curie temperature has been studied. A sharp drop of partial magnetizations at 40% of W-concentration has been noticed at the magnetic transition. Apparition of a non-monotonic behavior of the total magnetization at 20% of W-concentration. Effect of doping on the stability of the compound has been emphasized. A quasilinear decrease of TC has been observed by increasing the concentration percentage of substitution doping by W.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The coupled magnetic and mechanical motion of a ferromagnetic nanoparticle in a viscous fluid is considered within the dynamical approach. The equation based on the total momentum conservation law is used for the description of the mechanical rotation, while the modified Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation is utilized for the description of the internal magnetic dynamics. The exact expressions for the particles trajectories and the power loss are obtained in the linear approximation. The comparison with the results of other widespread approaches, such as the model of fixed particle and the model of rigid dipole, is performed. It is established that in the small oscillations mode the damping precession of the nanoparticle magnetic moment is the main channel of energy dissipation, but the motion of the nanoparticle easy axis can significantly influence the value of the resulting power loss.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.SiO2 was successfully coated on the surface of flaky carbonyl iron particles using a chemical bath deposition method in the presence of 3-aminopropyl triethoxysilane (APTES). The morphologies, composition, valence states of elements, as well as antioxidation and electromagnetic properties of the samples were characterized by scanning electron microscope (SEM), energy dispersive spectrometer (EDS), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), thermogravimetric (TG) and microwave network analyzer. TG curve shows the obvious weight gain of carbonyl iron was deferred to 360 °C after SiO2-coated, which can be ascribed to the exits of SiO2 overlayer. Compared with the raw carbonyl iron, SiO2-coated sample shows good wave absorption performance due to its impedance matching. The electromagnetic properties of raw and SiO2-coated carbonyl iron particles were characterized in X band before and after heat treatment at 250 °C for 10 h. It was established that SiO2-coated carbonyl iron demonstrate good thermal stability, indicating SiO2-coating is useful in the usage of microwave absorbers operating at temperature up to 250 °C.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Mott-insulating iron oxychalcogenides exhibit complex magnetic behaviour and we report here a neutron diffraction investigation into the magnetic ordering in La2O2Fe2OS2. This quaternary oxysulfide adopts the anti-Sr2MnO2Mn2Sb2-type structure (described by space group I4/mmm) and orders antiferromagnetically below TN = 105 K. We consider both its long-range magnetic structure and its magnetic microstructure, and the onset of magnetic order. It adopts the multi-k vector “2k” magnetic structure (k = (1/2 0 1/2) and k = (0 1/2 1/2) and has similarities with related iron oxychalcogenides, illustrating the robust nature of the “2k” magnetic structure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.There is an urgent technical requirement of lowering the sintering temperature of Y3Fe5O12 (YIG) for its practical applications. In this paper, a modified solid state reaction method is reported by adding the surfactant of cetyltrimethylammonium bromide (CTAB). A high sintering temperature of 1200 °C is required for the formation of YIG phase without adding CTAB, which is effectively decreased to 1050 °C by adding CTAB. The morphology studies show that the sintering temperature plays the main role in the crystal growth and excludes the possible contribution of CTAB. The prepared YIG ceramic samples show soft ferromagnetic properties, with coercivity of only 21.2 Oe for the sample prepared with CTAB at 1050 °C, which decreases with increasing sintering temperature. The main role of adding CTAB is preventing the agglomeration of ball milled ultrafine source particles, which may facilitate the interdiffusion among them and promote the reaction at lower temperatures. Furthermore, the Gilbert damping constant is significantly reduced for YIG prepared by adding CTAB, which is one order smaller than that without CTAB.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have studied the effect of K substitution on the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric (MCE) properties of the perovskite manganites La0.78Cd0.22−xKxMnO3 (x = 0.00, 0.10, 0.15 and 0.20) which were prepared by standard solid-state reaction method. The phase purity of prepared samples were verified by analyzing the X-ray diffraction patterns and shows that all compositions crystallize in the rhombohedral structure with the R3‾c space group. The zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) magnetization measurements reveal that all the samples undergo a paramagnetic-ferromagnetic (PM-FM) phase transition and the transition temperature is found to increase from 202 K for x = 0.00 to 326 K for x = 0.20. Magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) was also studied which reaches a maximum values of 3.6, 4.86, 5.66 and 5.98 J/kgK at 5 T for x = 0.00, 0.10, 0.15 and 0.20 composition, respectively. However, the relative cooling power (RCP) decreases with increasing K content from 274 (x = 0.00) to 216 (x = 0.20) J/kg for 5 T due to the decrease of full width at half maximum of ΔSM curves with increasing K dopant. All the studied samples exhibit a second-order magnetic phase transition at TC. The field dependence of the magnetic entropy change curves show a power law dependence, ΔSMmax∞Hn, around the TC. The obtained n values are 0.89, 0.82, 0.86 and 0.75 for x = 0.00, 0.10, 0.15 and 0.20 respectively, confirms not only the invalidity of the mean field model. Thus, the calculated ‘n’ values corroborate the absence of long range magnetic order and suggest the existence of magnetic inhomogeneities in all the samples reported here.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Heteroepitaxial film growth is crucial for magnetic and electronic devices. In this work, we reported the effects of the large lattice mismatch and film thickness on the epitaxial growth and magnetic properties of FePt films on ZrxTi1−xN (0 0 1) intermediate layer. FePt films with different thickness were deposited on ZrTiN intermediate layers with various doping concentration of TiN in ZrN. The increase in doping concentration of TiN caused a decrease in the lattice parameters of ZrTiN intermediate layer. It was found that (0 0 1) epitaxy of FePt 10 nm films was only achieved on ZrTiN intermediate layer when the TiN composition was ≥25 vol%, while (0 0 1) texture of 5 nm films was achieved on ZrTiN intermediate layer with a minimum of 50 vol% TiN composition. The in-plane lattice constants of FePt and Zr0.70Ti0.30N (25 vol% TiN) were 3.870 Å and 4.476 Å, respectively, which resulted in a lattice mismatch as large as 15.7%. These large lattice mismatch heterostructures adopted 7/6 domain matching epitaxy. The magneto-crystalline anisotropy of FePt films was improved with the increase in lattice mismatch. Intrinsic magnetic properties were extrapolated for FePt (30 nm)/Zr0.70Ti0.30N (30 nm)/TaN (30 nm)/MgO, and the Ms(0 K) and K1(0 K) were 1042 emu/cc and 5.10 × 107 erg/cc, respectively, which is comparable to that of bulk L10 FePt.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A series of double-stranded DNA samples, containing cholesteric liquid crystal droplets, were investigated. Binding of DNA molecules with Gd3+, La3+, Cu2+, ions was carried out. The samples were characterized by X-ray, optical circular dichroism and EPR techniques. Magnetic SQUID magnetometer research showed significant deviations of Gd3+ paramagnetism from the Curie-Weiss law. A possibility of spin-glass-like interactions was analyzed. The dispersion of magnetic parameters was claimed as a main reason of magnetic anomalies observed in the liquid crystal DNA-metal systems. Such systems can be useful in biomedical applications as low-toxic magnetic labels.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have systematically synthesized polycrystalline samples of Nd0.9A0.1CrTiO5 (A = Pr, Nd, Gd, Dy, Er, Tm, and Yb), and have investigated their crystal structure, polarization and magnetic susceptibility. The polarization values of doped samples are suppressed comparing to pure NdCrTiO5 sample, which indicates that the polarization is highly dependence with the magnetic moments of doping ions. The TN of Cr–Cr in Nd0.9A0.1CrTiO5 are dominated by both the suppression effect caused by doped magnetic moment increment and the enhancement effect caused by c axis contracting. We conclude that the magnetic moments in the rare-earth Nd sites play an important role in the magnetoelectric effect in NdCrTiO5 family. The substitution effect discussion here can help us well understand the intrinsic mechanism and provide a possible guidance in exploring new magnetoelectric coupling systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work analyzes the differences between the magnetic Barkhausen noise corresponding to the initial magnetization curve and Barkhausen noise corresponding to one branch of the hysteresis loop in API-5L steel. The outcomes show that the Barkhausen noise signal corresponding to the initial magnetization curve and that corresponding to the hysteresis are significantly different. This difference is due to the presence of different processes of the domain wall dynamics in both phenomena. To study the processes present in magnetization dynamics for an applied field of H > 0, research into the angular dependence of a Barkhausen signal using applied field bands has revealed that a Barkhausen signal corresponding to the initial magnetization curve is more suitable than a Barkhausen signal corresponding to the hysteresis loop.© 2017 The AuthorsThe magnetoelectric effect is a key issue for material science and is particularly significant in the high frequency band, where it is indispensable in industrial applications. Here, we present for the first time, a study of the high frequency tunneling magneto-dielectric (TMD) effect in nanogranular FeCo-MgF films, consisting of nanometer-sized magnetic FeCo granules dispersed in an MgF insulator matrix. Dielectric relaxation and the TMD effect are confirmed at frequencies over 10 MHz. The frequency dependence of dielectric relaxation is described by the Debye-Fröhlich model, taking relaxation time dispersion into account, which reflects variations in the nature of the microstructure, such as granule size, and the inter-spacing between the granules that affect the dielectric response. The TMD effect reaches a maximum at a frequency that is equivalent to the inverse of the relaxation time. The frequency where the peak TMD effect is observed varies between 12 MHz and 220 MHz, depending on the concentration of magnetic metal in the nanogranular films. The inter-spacing of the films decreases with increasing magnetic metal concentration, in accordance with the relaxation time. These results indicate that dielectric relaxation is controlled by changing the nanostructure, using the deposition conditions. A prospective application of these nanogranular films is in tunable impedance devices for next-generation mobile communication systems, at frequencies over 1 GHz, where capacitance is controlled using the applied magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We propose a novel setup for a spin-torque oscillator reader in magnetic hard disk drive technology. Two adjacent bit tracks are to be read simultaneously, leading to high data transfer rate and increased resilience to noise as the lateral size of the oscillator device is allowed to remain larger than the bit width. We perform micromagnetic simulations of an example system and find that the magnetization response has a clear unimodal character, which enables for detection of two bit values at the same time. We analyze the frequency of the device under the influence of two different external fields and conduct a simulation of a successful dynamic readout. We estimate the signal linewidth and signal-to-noise ratios of the setup and show that it may be potentially beneficial for magnetic readout applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we have investigated magnetic behavior, magnetocaloric effect and critical exponent analysis of La0.7-xEuxSr0.3MnO3 (x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3) manganites synthesized through solid state reaction route. The crystallographic data obtained from refinement of X-ray diffraction patterns reveal that crystal structure changes from rhombohedral (for x = 0.0) to orthorhombic (for x ≥ 0.1). The average ionic radius of A-site is decreased from 1.384 Å (for x = 0.0) to 1.360 Å (for x = 0.3) with Eu3+ substitution which in turn decreases the Mn-O-Mn bond angles. Magnetization measurements are performed in the vicinity of TC to determine magnetocaloric effect (MCE) and critical field behavior. The maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSMmax) (for μ0ΔH = 6T) increases with the Eu3+ substitution from 3.88 J/kg K (for x = 0.0) to 5.03 J/kg K (for x = 0.3) at the transition temperature. The critical field behaviour of compounds was analysed using various methods such as modified Arrott plots, Kouvel-Fisher method and critical isotherm to determine critical temperature and critical exponents (β, γ and δ). The obtained critical exponents are in good accordance with scaling relation. The temperature dependence of the order parameter n, for different magnetic fields, is studied using the relation ΔSMαHn. The values of n are found to obey the Curie-Weiss law for temperatures above the transition temperature. The rescaled change in entropy data for all compounds collapses into the same universal curve, revealing a second order phase transition.© 2017The magnetoresistance (MR) of different sensor setups of bilayer arrays by micromagnetic simulations has been studied in order to detect 20 nm diameter Fe3O4 superparamagnetic nanoparticles. The MR signal of sensors with different sizes and/or different aspect ratios has been compared. We have proved that for a sensor with a given shape and size, the sensor sensitivity can be increased by raising the aspect ratio of its bilayers. The sensors can detect from hundreds down to a few tens of superparamagnetic nanoparticles randomly distributed on the sensor surface.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have worked for the impact of induced magnetic field on peristaltic motion of a non-Newtonian, incompressible, synovial fluid in an asymmetric channel. We have solved the problem for two models, Model-1 which behaves as shear thinning fluid and Model-2 which behaves as shear thickening fluid. The problem is solved by using modified Adomian Decomposition method. It has seen that two models behave quite opposite to each other for some parameters. The impact of various parameters on u, [formula ommited], Δp and induced magnetic field bx have been studied graphically. The significant findings of this study is that the size of the trapped bolus and the pressure gradient increases by increasing M for both models.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Sn1− xCuxFe2O4 nanoparticles (0 ≥ x ≤ 0.3) were successfully fabricated via a co-precipitation route at low temperature 80 °C for 1 h using low-cost secondary resources. Evidently, the results revealed that the Cu2+ ion content up to 0.1 was found to form tin ferrite and increasing of Cu2+ ion content up to 0.2 and 0.3 was seemed to obtain a secondary phase of copper ferrite nanorods. TEM images revealed that the produced tin ferrite powders were a high homogeneity cubic-like structure. Nevertheless, copper ferrite nanorods were confirmed. Meanwhile, magnetic properties of Sn1− xCuxFe2O4 nanoparticles relied on the copper ratio. Indeed, high magnetization (Ms = 56.5 emu/g) was fulfilled with copper content of 0.1 and it was decreased to (Ms = 40.2 emu/g) with increasing Cu2+ ion content to 0.3. Alternatively, the coercive force was found to decrease from 144.2 to 85.4 Oe with increasing the Cu ratio from 0.0 to 0.3.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magneto hydrodynamic blood flow in the presence of magnetic particles through a circular cylinder is investigated. To calculate the impact of externally applied uniform magnetic field, the blood is electrically charged. Initially the fluid and circular cylinder is at rest but at time t=0+, the cylinder starts to oscillate along its axis with velocity fsin(Ωt). To obtain the mathematical model of blood flow with fractional derivatives Caputo fractional operator is employed. The solutions for the velocities of blood and magnetic particles are procured semi analytically by using Laplace transformation method. The inverse Laplace transform has been calculated numerically by using MATHCAD computer software. The obtained results of velocities are presented in Laplace domain in terms of modified Bessel function I0(·). The obtained results satisfied all imposed initial and boundary conditions. The hybrid technique that is employed here less computational effort and time cost as compared to other techniques used in literature. As the limiting cases of our results the solutions of the flow model with ordinary derivatives has been procured. Finally, the impact of Reynolds number Re, fractional parameter α and Hartmann number Ha is analyzed and portrayed through graphs. It is worthy to pointing out that fractional derivatives brings remarkable differences as compared to ordinary derivatives. It also has been observed that velocity of blood and magnetic particles is weaker under the effect of transverse magnetic field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The IrMn/Py/Ru/Co (Py = Ni81Fe19) spin valves have been produced by sputtering deposition and analyzed by magnetization measurements and a theoretical modelling of their exchange interactions, based on the macro-spin model. The Ru thickness was grown between 6 and 22 Å, which is small enough to promote strong indirect coupling between Py and Co. Results of measurements showed a large and gradual change in the shape of hysteresis loops when the Ru thickness was varied. The theoretical analysis, using numerical calculations based on the gradient conjugate method, provides the exchange coupling constants (bilinear and biquadratic), the exchange anisotropy fields and the magnetic anisotropy fields (uniaxial and rotatable). The exchange bias fields of spin valves were compared to that of a IrMn/Py bilayer. We found that the difference between these fields oscillates with Ru thickness in the same manner as the bilinear coupling constants.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The in-plane magnetic field pulse driven domain wall motion on a perpendicularly magnetized nanowire is numerically investigated by performing micromagnetic simulations and magnetic domain wall dynamics are evaluated analytically with one-dimensional collective coordinate models including the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. With the action of the precession torque, the chirality and the magnetic field direction dependent displacements of the magnetic domain walls are clearly observed. In order to move Bloch type and Neel type domain walls, a longitudinal and a transverse in-plane magnetic field pulse are required, respectively. The domain wall type (Bloch or Neel) can easily be determined by the dynamic motion of the domain walls under the applied pulse fields. By applying a temporally asymmetric in-plane field pulse and successive notches in the perpendicularly magnetized nanowire strip line with a proper interval, the concept of racetrack memory based on the synchronous displacements of the chirality dependent multiple domain walls is verified to be feasible. Requirement of multiple domain walls with homogeneous chirality is achieved with the help of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work is devoted to the experimental study of the magnetic separation of medium sized nanoparticles (40–70 nm) which are separated from the suspending fluid when the suspension flows through a micropillar array magnetized by an external magnetic field. The nanoparticle accumulation around micropillars is visualized and described by the capture efficiency and retention capacity, which are analysed in function of different dimensionless parameters, such as Mason number, dipolar coupling parameter, nanoparticle volume fraction, orientation of the flow with respect to the magnetic field and array's geometry. The role of these parameters is interpreted in terms of the interplay between hydrodynamic and magnetic interactions, as well as taking into account possible field-induced phase separation. The results could be useful for the development of the microscale magnetic separators for biomedical applications.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.For room-temperature magnetic refrigerators, magnetocaloric materials are critical for their performance and reliability. Among various magnetocaloric materials, Fe-based metallic glasses, especially in the FeZrB system, have been intensively studied recently due to their promising properties such as low fabrication cost and broad magnetic entropy change peak. In order to further improve the magnetocaloric effect (MCE), the influence of minor additions of Co, Er, Sm and Mn on the MCE of FeZrB-based metallic glasses was systematically investigated in this work. The composition-dependent Curie temperatures (TC) were studied and the magnetic field-dependent MCE was investigated. In two compositions, Fe88Zr7B3Co2 and Fe86Zr8B4Sm2, it was found that their Curie temperatures were close to room temperature and the values of the refrigerant capacity and peak magnetic entropy change were larger than those reported for Fe-based metallic glass at room temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Two porous glassy carbon-based samples doped with Au and Co were investigated. The magnetization study as well as measurements of the nonlinear longitudinal response to a weak ac field (NLR) and electron magnetic resonance give evidences for a presence of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) embedded in paramagnetic/ferromagnetic matrix respectively, both samples being in magnetically phase-separated state at temperatures above 300 K. Matrix, forming by paramagnetic centers located in matrix outside the MNPs, reveals exchange interactions providing its ferromagnetic (FM) ordering below TC ≈ 210 K in Au-doped sample and well above 350 K in Co-doped one. For the former, NLR data suggest a percolation character of the matrix long-range FM order, which is mainly caused by a porous amorphous sample structure. Temperature dependence of the magnetization in the Au-doped sample evidences presence of antiferromagnetic (AF) interactions of MNPs with surrounding matrix centers. At magnetic ordering below TC these interactions promote origination of “domains” involving matrix fragment and surrounding MNPs with near opposite orientation of their moments that decreases the magnetostatic energy. On further cooling, the domains exhibit AF ordering below Tcr ∼ 140 K < TC, resulting in formation of a peculiar “ferrimagnet”. The porous amorphous structure leads to absence of translational and other symmetry features through the samples that allows canted ordering of magnetic moments in domains and in whole sample providing “canted ferrimagnetism”. At low temperatures Ttr ∼ 3 K, “order-oder” transition, evidencing the non-Heisenberg character of this magnetic material, occurs from ordering like “canted ferrimagnet” to FM alignment, which is stimulated by external magnetic field. The data for Co-doped sample imply the similar evolution of magnetic state but at higher temperatures above 350 K. This state exhibits more homogeneous arrangement of the FM nanoparticles and the FM matrix. Order-order transition occurs in it at higher Ttr ∼ 10–15 K as well and followed by formation of long-range FM ordering found earlier by neutron diffraction. Doping of carbon-based nanomaterials by magnetic metals provides advantages for their possible practical applications as Co-doped sample with higher TC (>350 K) and larger remanent magnetization evidences.© 2017Multilayered films consisting of layer stacks with different anisotropies are studied by vector magnetometry i.e. simultaneous measurement of the components Mx, My along and perpendicular to the applied field respectively. The quantity Mx2+My2 is used as measure of the homogeneity of the reversal. For the [Co(6 Å)/Pt(15 Å)]4/(Pt(s))/[Co(10 Å)/Pt(15 Å)]4 with s = 0–45 Å series consisting of a perpendicular anisotropy bottom four-bilayer-stack coupled to a planar anisotropy top four-bilayer-stack a peak of the My component is clearly observed at the Mx coercivity. This is a sign of homogeneous reversal but it can be shown that similar effects can arise by decoupling of two layers with different (in-plane/perpendicular) anisotropies which is the case for s > 15 Å. In order to study the latter effect, a [Co(6 Å)/Pt(15 Å)]4/W(15 Å)/Co(24 Å) sample is used as a reference as it consists of a perpendicular anisotropy bottom four-bilayer-stack coupled to a vanishing anisotropy top Co layer through a W layer (which creates a magnetically inactive interface permitting only dipolar coupling). In contrast for [Co(5 Å)/Pt(10 Å)]6/Pt(s)/[Ni(15 Å)/Pt(5 Å)]6 series consisting of two different coercivity stacks which both have perpendicular anisotropy the decoupling does not manifest by appearance of peaks in the My component.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The ultrafast switching mechanism of an in-plane magnetized elliptical magnetic disk by applying dynamic out-of-plane magnetic field pulses is investigated by performing micromagnetic simulations. For the in-plane magnetized nanostructures, the out-of-plane magnetic field is able to rotate the direction of magnetization when the precession torque overcomes the shape anisotropy of the system. This type magnetization reversal is one of non-equilibrium dynamic within a certain transition time util the precession torque is equivalent to the damping torque. By controlling the rise time or fall times of dynamic out-of-plane field pulses, the transition time can be also successively tuned and then an ultrafast switching of an elliptical magnetic nano-disk is clearly achieved by controlling the precessional torque. As another reversal approach, sinusoidal magnetic fields in gigahertz range are applied to the system. Consequently, the thresholds of switching fields are drastically decreased. We also reveal that the ferromagnetic resonance frequencies at the center and the edge of the elliptical disk are most important for microwave sinusoidal out-of-plane magnetic field induced magnetization reversal.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study the dynamical properties of a magnetic film with spatially modulated perpendicular anisotropy by numerical simulations. Both topologically charged states (magnetic skyrmions) and uncharged uniform and nonuniform states are considered. The dependences of the ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectra on the geometry and material parameters of the system are analyzed. It is found that the spectra contain resonances of the localized and delocalized modes of the magnetization oscillations. In the case of nonuniform states the localized modes have the form of rotating magnetization distributions. The direction of the rotation depends on the local density of the toroidal moment of the state. The magnetic states with different FMR spectra can be easily switched by a temporary applying of a uniform external magnetic field that can be used in the tunable microwave devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the paper a study of a model magnetoelastic solid system is presented. The system of interest is a mean-field magnet with nearest-neighbour ferromagnetic interactions and the underlying s.c. crystalline lattice with the long-range Morse interatomic potential and the anharmonic Debye model for the lattice vibrations. The influence of the external magnetic field on the thermodynamics is investigated, with special emphasis put on the consequences of the magnetoelastic coupling, introduced by the power-law distance dependence of the magnetic exchange integral. Within the fully self-consistent, Gibbs energy-based formalism such thermodynamic quantities as the entropy, the specific heat as well as the lattice and magnetic response functions are calculated and discussed. To complete the picture, the magnetocaloric effect is characterized by analysis of the isothermal entropy change and the adiabatic temperature change in the presence of the external pressure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmion is a promising candidate for the future information technology due to its small size, topological protection and the ultralow current density needed to displace it. The applications, however, are currently limited by its narrow phase diagram and the skyrmion Hall effect which prevents the skyrmion motion at high speed. In this work, we study the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction induced magnetic skyrmion that exchange coupled with magnetic nano-disks utilizing the micromagnetic simulation. We find that the stability and the skyrmion Hall effect of the created skyrmion can be tuned effectively with the coupling strength, thus opens the space to optimize the performance of the skyrmion based devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.High coercivity of hot-deformed Nd2Fe14B magnets was obtained by grain boundary diffusion. Comparable squareness and similar magnetic properties for samples diffusing from side and pole surfaces show little discrepancies if quantities of the infiltrated PrNd-Cu low eutectic alloys is enough to obtain sufficient diffusion. However, the microstructures and higher characteristic peak ratios show preferable orientation of grains near surfaces of the sample diffused from side surfaces than that from pole surfaces. Amorphous Nd-rich phases and crystal Fe-rich phases were both observed in the diffused magnets. The enhancement of coercivity is considered to be resulted from grain boundary optimization and magnetic isolation which is caused by the thickened nonmagnetic intergranular phases.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the high temperature superconducting (HTS) maglev system, the magnetic rail as an essential infrastructure is needed all along the route to carry passengers and goods to the destinations. Thus, large amount of rare earth magnetic materials are required in the magnetic rail construction. In order to decrease the dependence of magnetic rails on rare earth elements, the ferrite magnet is employed to replace part of the NdFeB magnets containing rare earth elements. Consequently, a new type rail with double-layer Halbach structure is presented, which is consisted of NdFeB and ferrite magnets. In this paper, we designed and fabricated the proposed rail, and further measured its magnetic flux density distribution and electromagnetic force interacting with HTS bulks. Experimental results indicate that, this new type rail, in double-layer Halbach structure, can achieve an equivalent distribution of magnetic flux density and levitation performance as the pure NdFeB Halbach rail, while a 10% reduction in NdFeB magnet consumption can be realized at the same time. In addition this work explores another magnetic material selection for HTS maglev applications. The dependence on rare earth element and the cost of magnetic rails can be further reduced, as the coercive force of ferrite magnets improved.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We examined the effects of Nd-Al alloy addition on the microstructures and magnetic properties of Nd4Fe77.5B18.5 nanocomposite magnets. The Nd4Fe77.5B18.5 nanocomposite magnet without Nd-Al alloy addition showed a coercivity of 0.18 MA/m, whereas that with the addition of 40% Nd-Al alloy exhibited a high coercivity of 1.44 MA/m. Microstructural studies revealed that the improvement of the coercivity of the nanocomposite magnets was due to an increase in the amount of the hard magnetic Nd2Fe14B phase. It was found that the Nd-Al alloy reacted with the soft magnetic Fe3B phase in the nanocomposite magnets during annealing and formed the Nd2Fe14B phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A trigonal Te-rich Cr5Te8 single crystal was grown by the Te-flux method. The usual and rotating magnetocaloric effects have been investigated by measuring isothermal magnetization curves on both a single crystal and polycrystalline powder. The Curie temperature and the magnetic moment of trigonal Te-rich Cr5Te8 were determined to be 250 K and 2.03 μB/Cr, respectively. The difference from the usual magnetocaloric effect, the rotating magnetocaloric effect has saturation tendency when the applied field is above the anisotropy field. The temperature, where the rotating entropy change has its maximum, decreases with increasing the magnetic field. The temperature dependence of the magnetocrystalline anisotropy is the determining factor for the rotating magnetocaloric effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Pseudo-one-dimensional Chevrel compound TlFe3Te3 undergoes a first-order phase transition from paramagnetic to ferromagnetic at TC = 220 K. Here we report a systematic study of magnetization, heat capacity and resistivity on polycrystalline TlFe3Te3 near TC. The enhancements of TC in an external magnetic field and a hydrostatic pressure follow the Clausius-Clapeyron relations. The large enhancement of the TC under the pressure indicates that the unit cell shrinks from para- to ferro-magnetic phase.© 2017Polycrystalline Sm0.9-xNdxPr0.1Fe1.93 (x = 0, 0.12, 0.2, 0.24, 0.32 and 0.36) intermetallic compounds were found to stabilize in MgCu2-type cubic Laves phase structure. The easy direction of magnetization (EMD) was seen to be along 〈1 1 1〉 direction, accompanied by a rhombohedral distortion in all the compounds, at room temperature. The spin reorientation temperatures were observed at 59 K (TSR1) and 190 K (TSR2) from the temperature dependent magnetization studies. The spin reorientation temperature (TSR2) was due to the change of EMD from 〈0 1 1〉 to 〈1 1 1〉. The order–disorder transition (Curie temperature: TC) was found to decrease with increasing Nd content. The anisotropy compensated Sm0.9Pr0.1Fe1.93 compound was found to exhibit the largest induced magnetostriction (λ‖-λ⊥) value of -1822×10-6, from the present studies, at an applied field of 10 kOe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically investigate the spin-dependent transport properties in a silicene junction, with extrinsic Rashba spin–orbit interaction (RSOI), in the presence of strain. Due to the RSOI coupling, spin-inversion can be achieved. The spin resolved conductance and spin- inversion effect can be efficiently tuned by RSOI and strain strength. In addition, for particular values of RSOI strength, electrons with perfect spin-inversion transmit through the junction. It is found that for the armchair direction strain, unlike the zigzag direction the spin polarization can be observed and it increases with increasing the RSOI strength. The magnitude and sign of spin polarization can be manipulated by strain. The spin polarization reaches a maximum value at 2% strain.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.When a conventional Halbach type Hollow Cylindrical Permanent Magnet Array (HCPMA) is used to generate magnetic induction over the magnitude of coercivity μ0Hc, some detrimental parasitic magnetic phenomena, such as the demagnetization, magnetization reversal, and vortexes of magnetization, can appear in the interior of the magnets. We present a self-consistent quantitative analysis of the magnetization and magnetic induction distributions inside the magnetic array by considering the anisotropic and nonlinear magnetization functions of the materials consisting of the array. These numeric simulations reveal novel magnetization structures resulted from the self-field of array. We demonstrate that both the field uniformity and magnetic flux in the pole gap can be modulated by partially substituting the magnets of high energy products with the soft irons and the superhard magnets. We also show how the optimized substitution parameters can be obtained for a HCPMA achieving the best field uniformity or the maximum magnetic flux.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The features of the spin and charge transport of electrons and holes in a metal and a semiconductor were studied using the Boltzmann transport equations. It was shown that the electrons and holes carry the spin in opposite directions in an electrical current. As result, the spin polarization of an electrical current in a metal is substantially smaller than spin polarization of electron gas. It was shown that the spin properties of the electron gas are responsible for the existence of the concept of “electrons” and “holes” in a metal and a semiconductor.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Electronic and magnetic properties of DNA structures doped by simple and transition d- and f-metal ions (Gd, La, Cu, Zn, Au) are reviewed. Both one- and two dimensional systems are considered. A particular attention is paid to gadolinium and copper doped DNA systems, their unusual magnetism being treated. The problem of classical and quantum transport (including transfer of genetic information during replication and transcription) and electron localization in biological systems is discussed.© 2017The magnetostructural transformation and magnetocaloric effect of directionally solidified polycrystalline Ni55Mn18+xGa27−x (x = 0, 1, 2) alloys were studied. It is shown the directionally solidified alloys form coarse columnar-shaped grains with strong 〈0 0 1〉A (the subscript A refers to austenite) preferred orientation along the solidification direction. Through Mn substitution for Ga, a coupled magnetostructural transformation was realized in Ni55Mn19Ga26 and Ni55Mn20Ga25 alloys. Large adiabatic temperature variation (ΔTad) of 1.47 K and 1.57 K under the low field change of 1.5 T were achieved in these two alloys, respectively. Such ΔTad values are obviously higher than that obtained from a single martensitic transformation and magnetic transition. The present results demonstrate that proper composition tuning to achieve magnetostructural transformation as well as increasing the grain size and preferential orientation degree through directional solidification could be an economical processing route to optimize magnetocaloric properties in polycrystalline Ni-Mn-Ga based alloys.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.M-type permanent magnetic ferrites Sr0.95−xY0.05LaxFe11.75Co0.25O19 (x = 0.00, 0.10, 0.20, 0.30, 0.40) have been prepared by ceramic process and investigated systematically. The phase compositions were examined by X-ray diffraction, the results showed that the single phase was obtained when x ≤ 0.30. The morphology of the magnets was investigated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), the micro-morphology of the particles exhibited the uniform plane hexagonal structure with different lanthanum content. Magnetic properties of the sample were measured by a physical property measurement system-vibrating sample magnetometer (PPMS-VSM). The saturation magnetization (Ms) decreases constantly with the increasing of La content (x). However, the coercivity (Hc) increases as the increasing of doping content.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Mössbauer spectra of magnetic nanoparticles are usually influenced by fluctuations of the direction of the magnetic hyperfine field. In samples of non-interacting particles, the superparamagnetic relaxation usually results in spectra consisting of a sum of a sextet and a doublet with a temperature dependent area ratio. This is in accordance with the exponential dependence of the superparamagnetic relaxation time on particle size and temperature in combination with the particle size distribution. An alternative interpretation of these features is a first order magnetic transition from a magnetically ordered state to a paramagnetic state. We point out that this interpretation seems not to be correct, because the doublet component has been found to transform to a magnetically split component when relatively small magnetic fields are applied, and therefore it cannot be due to a paramagnetic state. In other cases, spectra of magnetic nanoparticles consist of sextets with asymmetrically broadened lines without the presence of doublets. It has been suggested that such spectra can be explained by a multilevel model, according to which relaxation takes place between a large number of states. We point out that spectra with asymmetrically broadened lines at least in some cases rather should be explained by the influence of magnetic inter-particle interactions on the magnetic fluctuations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Monte Carlo simulation is used to study the magnetic properties of mixed spin (3/2, 1) disordered binary alloys on simple cubic, hexagonal and amorphous magnetic ultra-thin films with 18 × 18 × 2 atoms. To this end, at the first approximation, the exchange coupling interaction between the spins is considered as a constant value and at the second one, the Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yosida (RKKY) model is used. Effects of concentration, structure, exchange interaction, single ion-anisotropy and the film size on the magnetic properties of disordered ferromagnetic and ferrimagnetic binary alloys are investigated. Our results indicate that the spontaneous magnetization and critical temperatures of rare earth-3d transition binary alloys are affected by these parameters. It is also found that in the ferrimagnetic state, the compensation temperature (Tcom) and the magnetic rearrangement temperature (TR) appear for some concentrations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, interfacial magnetic exchange coupling at FM/AFM interface has been studied by varying the thickness of AFM layer (LaMnO3) in (La2NiMnO6/LaMnO3)15 multilayer thin film based system. In multilayer thin films, the thickness of LMO was varied from 30 to 50 Å while the thickness of LNMO was kept constant at 100 Å. Thin films of LNMO, LMO and LNMO/LMO multilayers have been deposited by pulsed laser deposition technique on (0 0 1) LaAlO3 substrate. The thin films have been studied for their structural and magnetic properties. XRD analysis reveals the c-axis epitaxial growth of LNMO, LMO and their multilayer thin films. Exchange bias (EB) effect has been observed in the field cooled hysteresis loops of multilayer thin films and the interaction between FM and AFM spins at the interface is responsible for the observed effect. EB measurements reveal that the thickness variation influences the interfacial interaction between two layers. The EB increases with increasing AFM film thickness in multilayer thin film samples and maximum EB (∼740 Oe) is observed for sample with 50 Å thickness of AFM layer. Temperature dependence of EB and training effect measurements have also been performed to confirm the EB in the sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of minor Al addition on structural, crystallization, soft magnetic behaviour and magnetic field induced anisotropy through DC Joule annealing in (Fe53.95Co29.05)83Si1.3B11.7-xNb3Cu1Alx, (X = 0, 1) alloys has been studied. The Al added as-quenched melt spun ribbons show good glass forming ability, better thermo-physical properties like a high Tx1 of 438 °C, Tcam of 435 °C and Tcnc of 906 °C, compared to Tx1 of 389 °C, Tcam of 409 °C and Tcnc of 900 °C for the alloy without Al addition. The longitudinal magnetic field annealed Al added alloy exhibits low Hc of 12.92 A/m and maximum Ms. of 1.78 T. The better soft magnetic properties of Al added alloy are achieved through a high nucleation density of BCC-FeCo(Al) nanocrystallites having low K1 and λ values. The as-quenched alloys possess high magneto-strain exceeding 30 ppm and approach near zero value on nanocrystallization. The longitudinal magnetic field assisted DC Joule annealing, having current density (J) in the range of J = 20–25 A/mm2 promotes good magnetic softening due to precipitation of 5–35 nm nanocrystallites as explained by extended-random anisotropy model. The Al added alloy shows better magnetic field induced anisotropy (Ku) on nanocrystallization and shows visible change in the shape of hysteresis loop.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Anisotropic Magneto resistance (AMR) effect offers significant potential for the fabrication of low field magnetic sensors as it lends well to the Earth's field sensing range. To operate the sensor in linear and low field regions, theoretical simulation with optimized barber pole biasing configuration was carried out and implemented to our device fabrication. Permalloy based AMR film was characterized with a magnetoresistive coefficient of 2% and then barber pole biased AMR sensor was developed to obtain a linear transfer curve with sensitivity 0.35(mV/V)/G. Further, the design was extended towards the development of two axes magnetometer and the study was concluded with the indoor calibration of magnetometer utilizing a Helmholtz coil magnetic simulator.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Quasi-one-dimensional superconducting channels host sound-like plasma modes propagating along the sample which are associated with fluctuations of the phase of the superconducting order parameter. Interaction between these electromagnetic excitations and charge carriers affects the electron density of states (DOS). I-V characteristics of tunnel S1-I-S2 junctions, where superconducting S2 electrode is a thin nanowire in the regime of quantum fluctuations have been studied. The observed broadening of the I-V dependencies at the gap edge is interpreted as the renormalization of DOS. The results are in reasonable agreement with the model, taking into consideration plasma modes in quasi-one-dimensional superconductors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Flexible and free standing magnetoelectric polymer nanocomposite electrospun membranes, which exhibit both ferroelectric and magnetic orderings simultaneously, are fabricated. CoFe2O4 nanoparticles of different weight percentages are embedded as fillers in poly (vinylidene fluoride) (PVDF) matrix. The percentage of electroactive β phase is analysed using XRD and FTIR studies. Investigations on the effect of filler on the structural, functional, morphological properties are discussed. CoFe2O4 content in PVDF plays a main role in controlling the α and β phase conformations and makes significant effect on the ferroelectric and ferromagnetic properties of PVDF/CoFe2O4 membranes. The domain switching behaviour of these ferroelectric membranes is confirmed through DC-EFM studies. In addition to the coexistence of ferroelectric and ferromagnetic orderings, the cross coupling between them have been proved.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Theoretical model of the singlet long-range Josephson transport is proposed. Taking into account the mismatch of the electron effective masses of majority and minority spin subbands the Eilenberger-like equations are obtained with renormalized effective exchange interaction. The critical Josephson current is calculated through ferromagnet nanowire. It is shown that the effective exchange field can be completely compensated and thereby the long-range spatial supercurrent arises. Within the proposed theoretical model, the long-range proximity effect observed in the Co single-crystalline nanowire (Wang et al., 2010) can be qualitatively understood.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports a detailed investigation of magnetic microstructure and magnetic properties in Gd19Fe81 thin films after rapid thermal processing at different temperature viz. 300, 400 and 500 °C for 20 min. While the as-prepared films show stripe domain with high magnetic contrast, the processed samples display a weak magnetic contrast shadowed with topographic feature. The perpendicular magnetic anisotropy observed in the as-prepared sample no longer exists after rapid thermal processing. Magnetization measurements and MFM respectively confirm the increase in saturation magnetization and decrease in perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. Micromagnetic simulations have been performed to understand the domain modification and associated magnetic properties as a function of saturation magnetization, anisotropy value and in-plane tilt of the easy axis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The control of magnetic skyrmion creation and pinning through strain is studied by micromagnetic simulations. A single stable skyrmion can be created by a vertical strain pulse on Pd/Fe/Ir hybrid structure on Pb(Zr1−xTix)O3 nanowire with −1.8 V pulse voltage from 1.2 ns to 2.0 ns. Then the skyrmion is pinned by the vertical strain independent of the polarity during its propagation in the wire driven by the current. The proposed device integrates strain-controlled skyrmion creation and pinning in a single nanowire structure, which would open a new route for skyrmion-based memory and logic devices with ultra-low power consumption.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a comparative study of electrochemical performance of reduced graphene oxide–ferrites (RGO-MFe2O4, M = Fe, Co, Ni, and Zn) nanohybrids synthesized by hydrothermal method was done. The structural morphology and investigation of other physical properties of nanohybrids confirm the cubic spinel phase of the MFe2O4, reduction of graphene oxide and the distribution of ferrite nanoparticles (NPs) on RGO nanosheets. The role of RGO on the electrochemical behavior of nanohybrids was understood by quantifying the charge storage capacitance and charging-discharging behavior in a 0.1 M Na2SO4 electrolyte. The specific capacitance values of pristine Fe3O4, CoFe2O4, NiFe2O4, and ZnFe2O4 are 128, 117, 15.2 and 9.1 F g−1 respectively whereas specific capacitance of RGO-Fe3O4, RGO-CoFe2O4, RGO-NiFe2O4 and RGO-ZnFe2O4 are 233, 200, 25 and 66.8 F g−1 respectively. Our investigation suggests that apart from specific surface area of nanohybrids other factors such as structural morphology determine interaction between nanohybrids and electrolyte ions which play critical role in elevating the performance of electrodes.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we investigate the domain structure and tunable spin orientation in L11-CoPt(10 nm)/NiFe(tNiFe) with insertion of 2-nm thick Ta-spacer and by varying NiFe-layer thickness, tNiFe = 1.0, 2.5, 5.5, 7.0, 8.5 and 10 nm. The L11-CoPt layer exhibits a strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and NiFe holds in-plane magnetic anisotropy and both were separated by the non-magnetic Ta-spacer. Upon increasing tNiFe, the magnetic hysteresis loops become more and more tilted along with moderate decrease in both Hc⊥, and SQR⊥ values; while the estimated tilt angle magnetization (θM) values tend to increase from 0 to 60°. Interestingly, with the insertion of Ta-spacer, significant enhancement in θM (=45°) is achieved with tNiFe of ∼3 nm in the CoPt/NiFe layers – indicating that increase in tNiFe induces tilting of CoPt spins even in the presence of Ta-spacer. Magnetic force microscopy studies on the the L11-CoPt/Ta/NiFe films revealed maze-like domain patterns and their magnetic phase contrasts tend to decrease with dominant topographic features upon increasing tNiFe. The results obtained with the micro-magnetic simulation on the tilt in anisotropy axis are found to be consistent with the experimental values of θM.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the melt-spun HoCo2 compound have been investigated. The sample orders ferrimagnetically at ∼94 K (TC). This is about 14 K larger than that of the TC reported for the arc-melted HoCo2 sample. This is found to be a second order transition whereas the arc-melted analogue is known to undergo a first order transition. Melt-spinning synthesis leads to micrograin formation in the sample. The maximum isothermal magnetic entropy change, ΔSmmax, near TC of the melt-spun HoCo2 is about −4.6 J kg−1 K−1 and −9.5 J kg−1 K−1 for 20 kOe and 50 kOe field changes, respectively. The corresponding refrigeration capacity and relative cooling power values are 115 J/kg and 148 J/kg for 20 kOe field change and 308 J/kg and 398 J/kg for 50 kOe field change. The relative cooling power is nearly equal to that of the arc-melted sample because the change of order of transition leads to broadening of ΔSm vs T curve. The increase in TC could be due to the enhanced ferromagnetic interactions present in the transition metal sublattice of the melt-spun HoCo2.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the nanocrystalline La0.7Te0.3Mn0.7Co0.3O3 perovskite manganite were investigated. X-ray diffraction pattern indicated that the nanocrystalline sample crystallized in orthorhombic crystal structure with Pbnm space group. The average particle size was calculated using scanning electron microscope and it was found to be ∼150 nm. Temperature dependence magnetization measurements revealed ferromagnetic–paramagnetic phase transition and the Curie temperature (TC) was found to be ∼201 K. Field dependence magnetization showed the hysteresis at low temperature with a coercive field of ∼0.34 T and linear dependence at high temperature corresponds to paramagnetic region. Based on the magnetic field dependence magnetization data, the maximum entropy change and relative cooling power (RCP) were estimated and the values were 1.002 J kg−1 K−1 and 90 J kg−1 for a field change of 5 T respectively. Temperature dependent resistivity ρ(T) data exhibited semiconducting-like behavior at high temperature and the electrical transport was well explained by Mott's variable-range hopping (VRH) conduction mechanism in the temperature range of 250 K–300 K. Using the VRH fit, the calculated hoping distance (Rh) at 300 K was 54.4 Å and density of states N(EF) at room temperature was 7.04 × 1018 eV−1 cm−3. These values were comparable to other semiconducting oxides.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline Fe3O4 thin films were grown on Si(100) substrate by reactive DC sputtering at different oxygen partial pressures PO2 for controlling the growth associated density of antiphase boundaries (APBs). The micro-Raman analyses were performed to study the structural and electronic properties in these films. The growth linked changes in the APBs density are probed by electron–phonon coupling strength (λ) and isothermal magnetization measurements. The estimated values of λ are found to vary from 0.39 to 0.56 with the increase in PO2 from 2.2 × 10−5 to 3.0 × 10−5 Torr, respectively. The saturation magnetization (saturation field) values are found to increase (decrease) from 394 (5.9) to 439 (3.0) emu/cm3 (kOe) with the increase in PO2. The sharp Verwey transition (∼120 K), low saturation field, high saturation magnetization and low value of λ (comparable to the bulk value ∼0.51) clearly affirm the negligible amount of APBs in the high oxygen partial pressure deposited thin films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report here magnetic properties of non-stoichiometric Ca4Mn3O10-δ. We have measured magnetization, electrical resistance, magnetoresistance, specific heat and thermo remanent magnetization (TRM) relaxation measurements. We find that at temperatures above 75 K the electrical transport can be explained in terms of activated hopping of magnetic polarons. These polarons are formed due to oxygen vacancy inducing Mn3+ sites. Below 50 K the polarons begins to strongly localize causing loss of moment and the electrical transport is governed by variable range hopping (VRH) conduction. The system shows glassy spin relaxation below 50 K, which presumably evolves into cluster spin glass at 12 K due to short range ordering of the canted moments. All these aspect could be well correlated with characteristics signature from magnetocaloric effect indicating magnetocaloric is a sensitive tool to study magnetic phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have systematically investigated the electrical, magnetic and magnetotransport properties of Nd1-xCaxMnO3 (where x = 0.0 to 0.8) manganites. The substitution of Ca at Nd-site changes the Mn3+/Mn4+ ratio, which in turn influences the electrical and magnetic transport behavior. The temperature dependence of AC susceptibility (ACS) measurements confirmed the inhomogeneity in the magnetic phases for all the compounds. Mostly Nd1-xCaxMnO3 behaves as an insulator under zero and higher magnetic fields. Exemption to that, the intermediate compositions, where x = 0.33–0.5, exhibit a magnetic field induced metal-insulator transition. A significant value of magnetoresistance, 100%, along with a hysteretic nature is obtained for the compositions x = 0.3 to x = 0.5, which attribute to the metamagnetic transitions in the materials. The results have also been explained from the ACS measurements, which are corroborated by the earlier reports.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Co2CrAl/GaAs slabs have been constructed to study the electronic structure and magnetic properties by Structeditor program implemented in WIEN2k Code. GGA and LDA parameterizations have been used for exchange correlation functions. The density of states, structure and magnetic parameters have been studied and analyzed. Co2CrAl/GaAs (1 1 1) surface shows 80% spin polarization within LDA parameterizations. Variation in spin polarization with varying projections is observed due to different surface terminations and bond length. Effect of capping layers of Au and Cu on the magnetic moment and spin polarization of Co2CrAl/GaAs for different surface projections has been studied. The DOS indicates that the spin polarization has enhanced for all surface projections within the GGA approximation for both capping layers. The magnetic moment also varies from the bulk value of 3µB in Co2CrAl/GaAs surfaces.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Herein, we report a comprehensive and comparative study on the structural, microstructural, magnetic and room temperature hyperfine properties of nanosized Ni0.4Zn0.6Fe2O4 having particle sizes 48 (S1), 21 (S2) and 15 (S3) nm synthesized by high energy ball milling method. All the samples are characterized by powder X-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopic, field emission scanning electron microscopic and Mössbauer spectroscopic techniques. S1, S2 and S3 are single phase nanosized cubic spinel ferrites of Fd-3m symmetry with lattice parameter 8.39, 8.41 and 8.44 Å respectively, and the samples consist of particles having assorted size and nearly spherical shape. The constituent particles of S1 exhibit multi domain magnetic structure. It shows collective magnetic behavior and clear hysteresis loop at 300 K with coercive field of 140 Oe. On the other hand, S2 and S3 are composed of particles with single domain magnetic configuration and these samples show purely superparamagnetic behavior above their blocking temperature (TB). All the samples display magnetic ordering at low temperature. The values of TB of S2 and S3 are 250 and 185 K, respectively. The values of saturation magnetization (MSAT) of S1, S2 and S3 at 300 K are 47, 42, 30 emu/g, at 150 K are 58, 50, 43 emu/g and at 10 K are 86, 72, 56 emu/g, respectively. The values of coercivity of S1, S2 and S3 at 150 K are 280, 400, 350 Oe and at 10 K are 1600, 2800 and 2000 Oe, respectively. It has been shown that for mechanically activated nanosized Ni0.4Zn0.6Fe2O4 the values of MSAT decrease with the reduction of particle size due to surface spin canting effect, the coercivity is determined by the magnetic domain structure of the particles in the samples, cation distribution can be reliably estimated through infield Mössbauer spectroscopic study and field dependent dc magnetization measurement in conjugation and the particles in S2 are comprised of ferrimagnetically aligned core surrounded by surface region having highly noncollinear spin structure. The sample S2 exhibits memory effect in its dc magnetization recorded as a function of temperature, which may be utilized in fabrication of magnetic storage devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents magnetic force microscopy (MFM) studies on the effect of crystallographic orientation and external magnetic field on magnetic microstructure in a bulk polycrystalline iron specimen. The magneto crystalline anisotropic effect on the domain structure is characterized with the support of electron backscatter diffraction study. The distinct variations in magnetic domain structure are observed based on the crystallographic orientation of the grain surface normal with respect to the cube axis i.e. the easy axis of magnetization. Further, the local magnetization behavior is studied in-situ by MFM in presence of external magnetic field in the range of −2000 to 2000 Oe. Various micro-magnetization phenomena such as reversible and irreversible domain wall movements, expansion and contraction of domains, Barkhausen jump, bowing of a pinned domain wall and nucleation of a spike domain are visualized. The respective changes in the magnetic microstructure are compared with the bulk magnetization obtained using vibrating sample magnetometer. Bowing of a domain wall, pinned at two points, upon application of magnetic field is used to estimate the domain wall energy density. The MFM studies in presence of external field applied in two perpendicular directions are used to reveal the influence of the crystalline anisotropy on the local micro-magnetization.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic interaction between BiFeO3 and SrRuO3 layers in a heterostructure grown on (0 0 1) oriented SrTiO3 substrate is investigated. A two-step magnetization reversal was observed in M−H hysteresis loop measurement of the heterostructure at 10 K. The first step in the hysteresis loop is associated with the switching of the free SrRuO3 moments whereas the second step arises from the switching of the pinned moments. The total amount of the pinned SrRuO3 moment was observed to decrease with increasing thickness of the BiFeO3 layer. The presence of exchange bias effect in the heterostructure was confirmed by the field cooled M−H measurements where only the second step of hysteresis loop was observed to shift along the field axis. The coercivity of the second step of hysteresis loop decreases with increasing temperature and merges with that of the first step above 100 K which infers the desertion of the pinned magnetic moments. Temperature dependent capacitance measurement shows a kink at the ferromagnetic transition temperature of SrRuO3 and a pronounced dip was observed in the second derivative of capacitance with respect to temperature, indicating a strong magneto-electric coupling between the two layers.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Resonant modes of a single Néel type skyrmion in confined nanodisks with varying aspect ratios (AR) are investigated using micromagnetic simulations. The AR of the skyrmion has a non-linear dependence on that of the nanodisk. The power spectra of skyrmions in nanodisks with AR ranging from 1.0 to 2.0 are calculated. With the increase of disk AR, multiple new modes emerge in the power spectrum, which originate from the broken rotational symmetry of both the nanodisk and the skyrmion. All of the spin wave modes are resolved by spatial maps of the real time magnetization fluctuations. New mixed modes such as rotation modes and oscillation modes with different azimuthal and radial components are identified in the elliptical nanodisk with AR = 1.8. The new emergent modes may provide new approaches to skyrmion-based oscillators and spin wave sources in confined structures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of nanocrystalline Pr-deficient Pr1−xSrxMnO3−δ Perovskite manganites. Rietveld refinement of the X-ray powder diffraction patterns confirms that all the studied compounds have crystallized into an orthorhombic structure with Pbnm space group. Transmission electron microscopy analysis reveals nanocrystalline compounds with crystallite size less than 50 nm. The selected area electron diffraction patterns reveal the highly crystalline nature of the compounds and energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopic analysis shows that the obtained compositions are nearly identical with the nominal one. The oxygen stoichiometry is estimated by iodometric titration method and stoichiometric compositions are confirmed by X-ray Fluorescence Spectrometry analysis. A large bifurcation is observed in the ZFC/FC curves and Arrott plots not show a linear relation but have a convex curvature nature. The temperature dependence of inverse magnetic susceptibility at higher temperature confirms the existence of ferromagnetic clusters. The experimental results reveal that the reduction of crystallite size to nano metric scale in Pr-deficient manganites adversely influences structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties as compared to its bulk counterparts reported earlier.© 2017Evolution of magnetic properties of thin FeCoB films sandwiched between two Mo layers has been studied as a function of thermal annealing at different temperatures. The as-deposited film exhibits a uniaxial magnetic anisotropy. With thermal annealing up to 300 °C, anisotropy gradually decreases while coercivity exhibits a significant increase. Uniaxial anisotropy reappears after annealing at 400 °C. In order to understand the origin of magnetic anisotropy in the film, in-plane and out-plane X-ray diffraction measurements have been done using Hard X-ray beamline BL-11 of INDUS-2. It is found that with thermal annealing the film exhibits significant changes in grain texture as well as internal stresses. Variation in grain texture in the film is expected to be the main cause for observed magnetic anisotropy.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigate current-induced skyrmion dynamics in the presence of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction and spin-orbit spin-transfer torque corresponding to various types of spin-orbit coupling. We determine the symmetries of Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction and spin-orbit spin-transfer torque based on linear spin-orbit coupling model. We find that like interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (Rashba spin-orbit coupling) and bulk Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (Weyl spin-orbit coupling), Dresselhaus spin-orbit coupling also has a possibility for stabilizing skyrmion and current-induced skyrmion dynamics.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Bi3+ substituted polycrystalline samples of Barium U-type hexaferrite, (Ba1-3xBi2x)4Co2Fe36O60 (0.05 ≤ x ≤ 0.15, in steps of 0.05), were prepared through solid state reaction route. The effect of Bi3+ substitution on the structural properties of Barium hexaferrrite samples was investigated through X-ray diffraction (XRD) studies. Le Bail refinement of XRD patterns confirmed the formation of desired U-type hexaferrite phase in all the prepared samples. The room temperature magnetic hysteresis (M-H) loops shows that the saturation magnetization (Ms) initially increases to 63.5 emu/g for x = 0.10 sample and then reduces to 55.3 emu/g for x = 0.15 sample. Nicholson-Ross-Weir (NRW) algorithm has been employed to calculate the complex permittivity (ε∗=ε′-iε″) and permeability (μ∗=μ′-iμ″) spectra in 2–18 GHz frequency range. The reflection loss (RL) was calculated from the complex permittivity (ε∗) and permeability (μ∗) spectra using transmission line theory. The minimum reflection loss (RLmin) of −35.5 dB (MW absorption of 99.97%) was obtained for (Ba0.55Bi0.30)4Co2Fe36O60 sample at 10.6 GHz MW frequency. Moreover, the broad frequency bandwidth of 8.4 GHz (over X- and Ku-band), for the reflection loss of −10 dB (90% MW absorption) or less, was attained in (Ba0.55Bi0.30)4Co2Fe36O60 sample.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The effect of conventional and spark plasma sintering processes on the structural and magnetic properties of Ba0.5Sr0.5Fe12−2xCox(MgZn)x/2O19 (x = 0.2, 0.4 and 0.6) was investigated in this study. XRD patterns of both conventionally sintered (CS) and spark plasma sintered (SPS) samples with x = 0.2 and 0.4 showed the crystallization of Ba0.5Sr0.5Fe12O19-phase with space group of P63/mmc. However, in the case of SPS sample with x = 0.4, a secondary peak of α-Fe2O3 was observed. SEM analysis on the SPS samples revealed dense morphology with low porosity; while the CS samples showed the presence of aggregated particles with spherical shapes. Maximum values of saturation magnetization, MS (58 emu/g) and coercivity, HC (3.5 kOe) were obtained for the CS samples with x = 0.4; while their SPS counterparts revealed increased MS (65 emu/g) and HC (3.9 kOe) values. The observed magnetization reversal behaviour for both sintering conditions were not smooth in the case of x = 0.2, which indicated the existence of two-phase behavior. The temperature dependent magnetization studies for x = 0.2 and 0.4 were performed in order to analyze the variation in Curie temperature against Co-Mg-Zn substitution and the obtained results are discussed on the basis of crystallization of hexaferrite-phase.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Nano-crystalline Zn-, Co-, and Ni-substituted Mn-Mg ferrites were prepared by hydrothermal process and annealed at 1100 °C. Annealing conditions are critical on the crystalline phase. TEM and XRD data reveal particle sizes between 8 nm and 15 nm for the as-prepared fine powders, which increase to about 73 nm after sintering at 1100 °C. Mӧssbauer spectra show well resolved magnetic splitting in bulk samples. The as-prepared fine powders show weak hyperfine splitting and broad central doublets associated with fine particles. Magnetization data reveal a high coercive field at about 300 K of about 945 Oe in the Co-based nanosized oxide, which reduces to about 360 Oe after thermal annealing at 1100 °C. The magnetization curves of Zn- and Ni-based samples show much lower coercive fields indicative of superparamagnetic nanoparticles. The crystallite size and chemical composition have significant effects on the properties of Mn0.1Mg0.2(Zn,Co,Ni)0.7Fe2O4 investigated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study the evolution of the magnetic field-induced switching between the stable domain configurations of permalloy nanoring structures, when magnetic nano-wires are attached to them. Magnetoresistance measurements were performed on such devices for two configurations of the attached nano-wires: (i) when they are at diametrically opposite ends of the nanoring, and (ii) when the nanowires are at an obtuse angle with respect to each other. During the measurements, the direction of application of the in-plane magnetic field is varied to understand the switching properties of the devices. Micromagnetic simulations were carried out in order to understand the domain configuration and reversal mechanism. We show that due to the nature of domain walls created by the presence of the nano-wires in the obtuse configuration, a vortex state can be stabilized in the nano-ring. We extended our studies to various nanoring devices with different widths while keeping a constant thickness.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A single crystal of rare earth intermetallic compound Dy5Si2Ge2 (Orthorhombic, Space group Pnma) has been prepared by Czochralski method. Magnetization of Dy5Si2Ge2 single crystal has been measured with magnetic field applied (i) along b axis and (ii) parallel to ac plane. Although a same Neél temperature (TN) of ∼55 K is obtained when 50 Oe field is applied along b axis and in ac plane, the magnitude of magnetization is substantially different. This TN value is close to the antiferromagnetic ordering temperature of polycrystalline Dy5Si2Ge2 as well. The magnetization vs field data at 1.8 K shows an ultra-sharp metamagnetic transition when field is applied along both the directions, in a critical field of about 28 kOe. It is observed that b axis is easy direction of magnetization. Magnetocaloric effect of this Dy5Si2Ge2 crystal has been estimated using magnetization vs field data obtained at various temperatures. A maximum magnetic entropy change (ΔSm max) of ∼−15.6 J/kg/K has been observed at 22 K with field along b axis and ΔSm max is ∼−11.2 J/kg/K at 54 K when field is parallel to ac plane, for a field change of 50 kOe. Occurrence of metamagnetic transition at temperatures below TN gives rise to a second peak at ∼22 K in the temperature dependent isothermal magnetic entropy change that leads to the observed large magnetocaloric effect.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of tetragonal polycrystalline intermetallic compound Tb0.5Ho0.5Mn2Si2 have been investigated using temperature dependent dc magnetic susceptibility and neutron powder diffraction studies. Results of high temperature susceptibility data shows anomaly at TN = 510 K while low temperature susceptibility data indicate two successive anomalies at T1 = 11 K and T2 = 25 K. Metamagnetic transition is observed in magnetization versus field curves. Our neutron diffraction results indicate three different magnetic regions with different magnetic structures. Neutron diffraction data shows that below T2, the intensities of some of the nuclear peaks get enhanced indicating ferromagnetic ordering, while additional magnetic reflections are observed below T1, indicating antiferromagnetic order. Ordering of rare earth sublattice at low temperature rearranges the ordering of Mn sublattice and results in reorientation of Mn spins at T1. At 2 K Tb/Ho moments are aligned along c-axis while Mn moments are aligned perpendicular to c-axis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report on the possible observation of Griffith phase in a wide range of temperature (>272–378 K) in the 2.5 min plasma sintered La0.67Ca0.33MnO3 (LCMO) as deduced from careful electron spin resonance studies. This is 106 K higher than the paramagnetic to ferromagnetic transition (Curie transition ∼272 K) temperature. The indication of Griffith phase in such a wide range is not reported earlier by any group. We purposefully prepared LCMO samples by plasma sintering technique so as to create a disordered structure by rapid quenching which we believe, is the prime reason for the observation of Griffith Phase above the Curie transition temperature. The inverse susceptibility curve represents the existence of ferromagnetic cluster in paramagnetic region. The large resonance peak width (40–60 mT) within the temperature range 330–378 K confirms the sample magnetically inhomogeneity which is also established from our electron probe microstructure analysis (EPMA). EPMA establishes the presence of higher percentage of Mn3+ cluster in comparison to Mn4+. This is the reason for which Griffith state is enhanced largely to a higher range of temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Cobalt and Nickel ferrite based graphene nanocomposites with increased electrochemical performances were successfully prepared by solvothermal process. To know the structure and morphology of the as-synthesized nanocomposite, the material was investigated by X-ray diffraction and electron microscopy techniques. Further, the material was tested for hydrogen production through electrochemical route. HER activity of nanocomposites was tested for hydrogen evolution at an applied potential of −1.2 to 0.8 V in acidic electrolyte. It shows good exchange current density of 47.9 mAcm−2 and 41.2 mAcm−2 at over potential of 248.3 mV and 259 mV and a Tafel slope of 116.6 mVdec−1 and 121.4 mVdec−1 for CFG and NFG nanocomposite respectively. The experimental results revealed that cobalt and nickel ferrites based graphene nanocomposites is a good electrocatalyst towards hydrogen production.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Transport and calorimetric properties of Mn1−xCrxSi (x = 0.025) down to 2 K and magnetic fields up to 13 T are reported. Electrical resistivity in zero field as well as in magnetic fields, below a magnetic transition temperature, Tc = 23.6 K could be described using a T2 term with large coefficient, invoking the role of spin fluctuations. Sommerfeld coefficient ‘γ’ of specific heat is an enhanced one as compared to the pure MnSi. Negative magnetoresistance (35% at 13 T) with maximum at Tc and a decrease in coefficient of T2 term in resistivity suggests the suppression of spin fluctuations in high magnetic fields. This is further supported by negative magneto-specific heat in the vicinity of Tc coupled with a decrement in the Sommerfeld coefficient ‘γ’ of specific heat under a field of 10 T. Kadowaki-Woods ratio places the system close to other systems showing strong spin fluctuations.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Hybrid hetero-structure of ferromagnetic and ferroelectric materials provides a platform to make a multifunctional device with improved functionality. Epitaxial thin film of La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 was grown on ferroelectric BaTiO3 (0 0 1) substrate by pulse laser deposition. Here we report that the magnetic properties of ferromagnetic La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 were highly influenced by the strain induced by the successive low temperature structural phase transition of ferroelectric BaTiO3.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the preparation of single phase samples of Gd1−xYxCrO3 (x = 0–0.30) compounds using the sol-gel method. Analysis of X-ray diffraction patterns shows a systematic decrease in lattice parameters a, c and volume of the unit cell with increase in Y concentration. Raman spectra recorded at room temperature shows a systematic shift of various modes towards higher wave number suggesting the presence of lattice distortion. The temperature variation of magnetization measurements show the presence of magnetization reversal and the magnetic compensation temperature is found to decrease upon Y doping. The origin of magnetization reversal is explained by considering competition between the paramagnetic moment of Gd3+ ions under the influence of negative internal field and the weak ferromagnetic component of Cr3+ ions due to canted antiferromagnetic ordering.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We explore the generation of propagating dipolar spin waves by homogeneous magnetic field excitation in the proximity of the boundaries of magnetic microstructures. Domain wall motion, precessional dynamics, and propagating spin waves are directly imaged by time-resolved wide-field magneto-optical Kerr effect microscopy. The aspects of spin wave generation are clarified by micromagnetic calculations matching the experimental results. The region of dipolar spin wave formation is confined to the local resonant excitation due to non-uniform internal demagnetization fields at the edges of the patterned sample. Magnetic domain walls act as a border for the propagation of plane and low damped spin waves, thus restraining the spin waves within the individual magnetic domains. The findings are of significance for the general understanding of structural and configurational magnetic boundaries for the creation, the propagation, and elimination of spin waves.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report here the interplay of ferromagnetism (FM) and charge density wave (CDW) in manganese oxide systems through the study of tunneling conductance spectra. The model Hamiltonian consists of strong Heisenberg coupling in core t2g band electrons within mean-field approximation giving rise to ferromagnetism. Ferromagnetism is induced in the itinerant eg electrons due to Kubo-Ohata type double exchange (DE) interaction among the t2g and eg electrons. The charge ordering (CO) present in the eg band giving rise to CDW interaction is considered as the extra-mechanism to explain the colossal magnetoresistance (CMR) property of manganites. The magnetic and CDW order parameters are calculated using Zubarev's Green's function technique and solved self-consistently and numerically. The eg electron density of states (DOS) calculated from the imaginary part of the Green's function explains the experimentally observed tunneling conductance spectra. The DOS graph exhibits a parabolic gap near the Fermi energy as observed in tunneling conductance spectra experiments.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic, electronic, elastic and mechanical properties of full-Heusler compounds Co2YAl (Y = Fe, Ti), in L21 type structure are determined using the density functional theory based full potential linearized augmented plane waves (FP-LAPW) method. We have used four approaches to evaluate the structural stability for the two compounds, Co2FeAl and Co2TiAl, the Local Spin Density approximation (LSDA), the LSDA + USIC, the Spin-Perdew-Burke-Ernzerhof generalized gradient approximation GGA and PBE-GGA + USIC. The results show that the equilibrium lattice constants using the general gradient approximation method are in good agreement with experimental values. The electronic and magnetic properties of 3d transition metal based full Heusler compounds Co2YAl (Y = Fe, Ti) within the framework of Perdew-Burke-Ernzerhof generalized gradient approximation GGA, GGA + USIC besides new modified Becke and Johnson GGA (mBJ-GGA) have been calculated by exchange-correlation potentials. The calculated density of states (DOS) and band structure for Co2YAl show the existence of energy band gap in their minority-spin channel and half-metallic character, while their total magnetic moment following the Slater–Pauling rule Mt = Zt − 24. The mechanical properties of bulk modulus, shear modulus, Young's modulus E, anisotropic ratio, Poisson's ratio ν and B/G ratio are also investigated to explore the ductile and brittle nature of these compounds. To collect more information on the mechanical stability, we have calculated Lame's coefficients, Cauchy pressure, Kleinman parameter, sound velocities and Debye temperature θD Our calculated values are in agreement with experimental and theoretical data.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Mn rich Ni-Mn-Sn and Ni-Mn-Co-Sn alloy films were deposited on Si (1 0 0) substrate by dc magnetron sputtering from Ni50Mn37Sn13 alloy target at 1.8 Pa Ar pressure with 70 W dc power. Co was introduced by placing Co chips on the Ni-Mn-Sn target. As-deposited films were vacuum annealed at 823 K for 1 h. X-ray diffraction patterns of the films revealed modulated 14 M structure of the martensite phase at room temperature. Magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) across the Curie temperature of the ferromagnetic films was estimated from initial isothermal magnetization curves using Maxwell's equation. ΔSm and refrigeration capacity (RC) of Ni-Mn-Sn and Ni-Mn-Co-Sn films increased with increasing film thickness. Upon Co substitution in Mn/Sn site(s), ΔSm and RC increased more remarkably. The change is more prominent in the case of 360 nm films, wherein a 3.8-fold increase in ΔSM and 8.9-fold increase in RC was observed. Introduction of Co increased the magnetic moment and broadened the magnetic transition. These factors increased ΔSm and RC in Co substituted Ni-Mn-Sn alloy. Since TC shifted to higher temperatures with Co substitution, operating temperature of these magnetic refrigerants also shifted to higher temperature. This study indicates the possibility of developing high temperature cooling devices and waste energy harvesters using these films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we present an interesting magnetic property of ilmenite NiTiO3 material prepared by sol-gel mediated slow evaporation induced self-assembly (EISA) method using Pluronic F127. Two oxide samples were prepared using Ni:Ti 1:1 and 1:2 M ratios under similar reaction conditions. It is observed from powder XRD analysis that sample NTO11 (Ni:Ti = 1:1) is a predominating NiTiO3 phase with small percentage of NiO and TiO2, whereas NTO12 (Ni:Ti = 1:2) is a mixture of anatase TiO2 and NiO structures. Both materials reveal, presence of exchange bias (in hysteretic M-H loop) decreasing with increase in temperature. Both samples show an anomalous increase of magnetic coercivity with increase in temperature. The anomalous coercivity increase in NTO11 is much more pronounced than in NTO12 (by a factor of 6). We explain this large anomaly in NTO11, by invoking layer structure and weak interlayer exchange coupling between Ni moments in NiTiO3, which allows a transition near the surface of nanoparticles from antiferromagnetically coupled ferromagnetic planes of Ni moments to uncoupled set of ferromagnetic layers on the surface (each layer can be thought of as single ferromagnetic plane), blocked along different directions. The increased coercivity at higher temperature is due to excess coercivity of the nanosized ferromagnetic layers.© 2017Electronic structure, magnetic and optical properties of Co2TiZ (Z = B, Al, Ga, In) Heusler alloys have been computed by density functional theory implemented in WIEN2k within generalized gradient approximation for exchange correlation functions. Lattices constants, bulk modulii, energy gaps, spin polarization and density of states have been calculated. Negative value of formation energy of these alloys evidences their stability. Spin polarization of Co2TiZ (Z = Al, B, Ga, In) are 100%, 99%, 97% and 80% respectively and Co2TiAl shows true half metallic ferromagnetism. Co2TiZ, for Z = B, Al, Ga, shows stable half metallically over a wide range of pressure making them suitable for fabricating thin films for spintronics applications. Optical parameters such as complex dielectric function, refractive index, reflectivity, absorption, extinction coefficient, optical conductivity have also been calculated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Structural and electrical transport properties of Nickel (Ni) doped FeSi at low temperatures in the presence of zero and high magnetic fields are investigated systematically and reported. FeSi is a material known for its high thermoelectric power. Metal-Insulator Transition in FeSi is always an exotic one with different ground states depending upon the substituent. Changes in Magneto Resistance (MR) at low temperatures are explained by invoking an interplay between Weak Localization (WL) and enhanced Electron-Electron Interaction (EEI) that evolved upon varying the nickel concentrations. Competing interactions between WL and EEI along with Kondo hybridization scenario may classify this system into an exotic one among doped semiconductors. Temperature dependent zero field resistivity is analyzed in the light of various scattering mechanism in different doping regimes at low temperatures. Different crossover regimes are explained by invoking carriers and magnetic moments induced by the Ni impurity in an otherwise non-magnetic Kondo Insulator (KI).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The thermodynamic instability of the off-stoichiometric Ni49.8Mn45.1Sn5.1 martensitic Heusler causes it to decompose into ferromagnetic Ni50Mn25Sn25 precipitates and an antiferromagnetic NiMn matrix. If the decomposition takes place under an applied magnetic field, the shell of the precipitates acquires a preferred spin orientation that is strongly pinned by the anisotropy of the matrix. The pinning leads to a large vertical shift in the field dependence of the magnetization even at temperatures as high as 500 K. The positive remanence remains permanent even when the magnetic field is cycled or when the sample is directionally manipulated with respect to the external field, providing a non-volatile magnetic-field-proof memory as a further functionality to those existing in martensitic Heuslers.© 2017La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (LSMO)-ZnO composites with varying concentration of the ZnO have been synthesized by the sol-gel method. The effect of ZnO addition on the structural, magnetic and transport properties of the LSMO have been studied in detail. XRD data confirms the coexistence of both phases in the composites. The calculated average particle size of the composite samples was found to be in the range of 16–25 nm. The magnetization measurement shows a decrease in magnetization and shift in the transition temperature towards a lower temperature with an increase in ZnO content. The electrical resistivity studies show that the resistivity increases and the metal-insulator transition temperature decreases with increase in the amount of ZnO in LSMO. The effect of ZnO on the transport behavior is explained using different conduction mechanism in different temperature regions. The magnetoresistance measurement shows the enhancement of the low field magnetoresistance and magnetic field sensitivity in the LSMO-ZnO composite samples compared to pure LSMO. The LSMO-ZnO composite sample shows 32.8% MR for an applied magnetic field of 1 T at 10 K.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Micromagnetic simulations are used to investigate the effects of different absorbing boundary layers (ABLs) on spin waves (SWs) reflected from the edges of a magnetic nano-structure. We define the conditions that a suitable ABL must fulfill and compare the performance of abrupt, linear, polynomial and tan hyperbolic damping profiles in the ABL. We first consider normal incidence in a permalloy stripe and propose a transmission line model to quantify reflections and calculate the loss introduced into the stripe due to the ABL. We find that a parabolic damping profile absorbs the SW energy efficiently and has a low reflection coefficient, thus performing much better than the commonly used abrupt damping profile. We then investigated SWs that are obliquely incident at 26.6°,45° and 63.4° on the edge of a yttrium-iron-garnet film. The parabolic damping profile again performs efficiently by showing a high SW energy transfer to the ABL and a low reflected SW amplitude.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Bismuth substituted lutetium iron garnet (BLIG) films exhibit larger Faraday rotation, and have a higher Curie temperature than yttrium iron garnet. We have observed magnetic stripe domains and measured domain widths of 1.4 μm using Fourier domain polarization microscopy, Faraday rotation experiments yield a coercive field of 5 Oe. These characterizations form the basis of micromagnetic simulations that allow us to estimate and compare spin wave excitations in BLIG films. We observed that these films support thermal magnons with a precessional frequency of 7 GHz with a line width of 400 MHz. Further, we studied the dependence of precessional frequency on the externally applied magnetic field. Brillouin light scattering experiments and precession frequencies predicted by simulations show similar trend with increasing field.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we studied the local structure and the magnetization of Co4N thin films deposited by a reactive dc magnetron sputtering process. The interstitial incorporation of N atoms in a fcc Co lattice is expected to expand the structure. This expansion yields interesting magnetic properties e.g. a larger magnetic moment (than Co) and a very high value of spin polarization ratio in Co4N. By optimizing the growth conditions, we prepared Co4N film having lattice parameter close to its theoretically predicted value. The N concentration was measured using secondary ion mass spectroscopy. Detailed magnetization measurements using bulk magnetization method and polarized neutron reflectivity confirm that the magnetic moment of Co in Co4N is higher than that of Co.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report a novel approach for tuning the magnetic properties of stripe domain structured amorphous Co40Fe40B20 (CoFeB) films by using stack structured [CoFeB (100 nm)/Ta (z = 0–1.5 nm)]n = 0–4/CoFeB (100 nm) films with spacer layer thickness dependent interlayer coupling. All the as-deposited films deposited directly on thermally oxidized Si substrate at ambient temperature exhibit amorphous structure. Single-layer CoFeB (x = 100–300 nm) films display transcritical loops with high coercivity (HC > 4 kA/m) and large applied field required for magnetization saturation (HS > 40 kA/m) due to the formation of magnetic stripe domains induced by the stress quenched in during the preparation of the films at a high deposition rate to form amorphous structure. With increasing n, the number of CoFeB layers in stack structure increases providing an enhanced interlayer coupling and a better flux closure, which leads to a substantial drop in HC (∼1.8 kA/m) and changes the loop shape away from transcritical into soft magnetic type with reduced HS (∼10 kA/m) and increased remanence ratio (>75%). However, the improvement in magnetic properties strongly depends on the values of n and z. Temperature dependent M-H loops reveal a competition between interlayer coupling and interfacial strain, which provides unusual variation of HC(T), i.e., minimum in HC(T) vs T curve, depending on z and n. The observed results are explained on the basis of stress dependent stripe domains in single layer films and number of CoFeB layers and spacer layer thickness dependent interlayer coupling in stack structured films. It is revealed that the fabrication of stack of thick CoFeB films having stripe domains and separated by optimum z is an alternative approach to improve the magnetic properties of thick CoFeB films.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Spin polarized electric current, injected into permalloy (Py) through a nano contact, exerts a torque on the magnetization. The spin waves (SWs) thus excited propagate radially outward. We propose an antidot magnonic crystal (MC) with a three-hole defect (L3) around the nano contact, designed so that the frequency of the excited SWs, lies in the band gap of the MC. L3 thus acts as a resonant SW cavity. The energy in this magnonic crystal cavity can be tapped by an adjacent MC waveguide (MCW). An analysis of the simulated micromagnetic power spectrum, at the output port of the MCW reveals stable SW oscillations. The quality factor of the device, calculated using the decay method, was estimated as Q > 105 for an injected spin current density of 7×1012 A/m2.© 2017We report on the structural and magnetic properties of YCo thin films and IrMn/YCo bilayers. X-ray diffraction infer that all the films are amorphous in nature. Magnetization versus magnetic field measurements reveal room temperature soft ferromagnetism in all the YCo films. Thin films which were grown at 100 W sputter power with growth rates of 0.677, 0.694 and 0.711 Å/sec show better morphology and composition than 50 W (0.333, 0.444 and 0.277 Å/sec) grown films. Perpendicular exchange bias in as deposited bilayers is evident for IrMn/YCo bilayers. Exchange bias (EB) decreases in case of in plane measurements and enhances for out of plane measurements after perpendicular field annealing. EB is more in case of out of plane direction due to large perpendicular anisotropy in comparison with in plane direction. Above the critical thickness, EB variation is explained on the basis of random field model in the Heisenberg regime, which has been proposed by Malozemoff. Indeed there exists an inverse relationship between EB and IrMn layer thickness. Evidenced vertical shift apart from the horizontal shift for magnetization loops is attributed to frozen magnetic moments in one of the layers at the interface. Present results would prove to be helpful in spintronic device applications.© 2017In this work, an efficient superparamagnetic iron oxide-reduced graphene oxide (Fe3O4-RGO) nanohybrid has been synthesized following one-step co-precipitation method. The phase identification, microstructure and magnetic behavior of nanohybrid were characterized by X-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopy (TEM), raman spectroscopy and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), respectively. TEM micrograph confirms the presence of well-segregated Fe3O4 nanoparticles in RGO layers. The layered RGO minimizes the agglomeration in Fe3O4 nanoparticles with slight reduction in magnetic behavior. Doxorubicin (DOX) has been used as a model drug to investigate the loading efficiency of nanohybrid and chemo-thermo therapeutic effect on human cervical cancer (HeLa cells). The DOX loaded nanohybrid (DOX-Fe3O4-RGO) shows maximum inhibition of human cervical cancer cell lines during magnetic field assisted hyperthermia treatment. The synergistic effect of nanohybrid demonstrated the potential for cancer cell proliferation prevention up to 90% when treated at the concentration of 2 mg mL−1 for one million cells and exposed to AC field of 335 Oe at a fixed frequency of 265 kHz for 35 min.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Despite numerous attempts of electron doping in different manganites (RMnO3, R = rare earth), successful reports are scarce in the literature till date. In this paper, we have synthesized a series of phase-pure electron doped multiferroic compound Sc1−xZrxMnO3 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.1, and 0.2) and evaluated the effect of doping on structural properties, oxidation states of cations, DC magnetization, heat capacity, resistivity, dielectric behaviour and ferroelectricity in the material. The presence of Zr4+ and mixed valence state of Mn comprising of Mn2+ and Mn3+ ions are confirmed using X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. All these samples exhibit antiferromagnetic ordering; as Zr4+ content increases, antiferromagnetic ordering gradually diminishes while shifting to low temperatures. Additionally, ferromagnetic-like interaction develops in doped systems which gives rise to hysteresis in isothermal magnetization loops with greatly enhanced magnetization in comparison to pure antiferromagnetic nature of x = 0 i.e. ScMnO3. Interestingly, even with zero magnetic moment of Sc3+ Schottky-like anomaly is observed at 5 K in heat capacity data of samples with x = 0.1 and 0.2, a result that we attribute to the highly resistive nature of doped samples. Moreover, while measuring ferroelectric hysteresis loops, we observe a significant reduction of leakage current in doped sample (x = 0.2) compared to pure ScMnO3. Additionally, the compound x = 0.2 shows improved dielectric and ferroelectric behaviour. It is proposed that doping of Zr4+ compensates for the cation deficiency and consequently eliminates the inherent oxygen vacancies by charge compensation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.NdxSr1−xMnO3 (0.2 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) systems are widely studied in magnetism, popular for high colossal magnetoresistance and are ferromagnetic oxides with TC ranging from 200 K to 300 K. Recently, many of such compounds are re-visited for exploring the correlation of spin, charge and lattice degrees of freedom. Although, manganite thin films are the ideal candidates for studying the electron-correlation effects, the puzzle of obtaining a high quality epitaxial thin films of NdxSr1−xMnO3 are still unsolved contrary to its sister compound LaxSr1−xMnO3. Hence, in this study, we demonstrate the growth of best quality of Nd0.6Sr0.4MnO3 (NSMO) epitaxial thin films. This is evident from the TC and a sharp insulator-to-metal transition (IMT) coinciding at as high as ∼255 K against the bulk TC (∼270 K). It is the highest reported TC in Nd0.6Sr0.4MnO3 thin films to date. Moreover, as-deposited films with in situ oxygen annealing are not enough to relax the lattice of NSMO films due to the significant Jahn-Teller distortion in the film. With ex situ annealing processes alongside the various deposition and in situ annealing conditions, we have extensively studied the growth of epitaxial NSMO thin films on LaAlO3 (0 0 1) and SrTiO3 (0 0 1) to investigate the evolution of lattice and its one-to-one correspondence with the magnetism and the electrical properties of thin films. Accordingly, the enhanced magnetization, reduced resistivity and the higher TC and IMT of the NSMO films obtained from our extensive growth analysis looks promising for the future applications across the TC and IMT.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetoresistance studies on Dy1−xYx (x ≤ 0.05) alloys across the first order helimagnetic to ferromagnetic phase transition. These alloys exhibit multiple magnetic phases on varying the temperature and magnetic field. The magnetoresistance studies in the hysteresis region shows irreversibility in forward and reverse field cycles. The resistivity values at zero field for these alloys after zero field cooling to the measurement temperatures, are different in both forward and reverse field cycles. The path dependence of magnetoresistance suggests the presence of helimagnetic phase as the supercooled metastable state which transforms to the stable ferromagnetic state on increasing the field. At high magnetic fields negative magnetoresistance following a linear dependence with field is observed which is attributed to the magnon scattering.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Single phase polycrystalline LuFe1−xNixO3 (x = 0 − 0.3) (LFNO) nanoparticles are synthesized using the sol-gel method. X-ray diffraction measurements revealed that the crystal structure of Ni-doped samples is isomorphic to hexagonal LuFeO3 (LFO). The phase pure hexagonal P63cm symmetry exists for 0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3, and the secondary phases appear for x ≥ 0.4. Raman spectra show a shift in the mode frequency corresponding to the changes in Lu-O and Fe-O bond lengths with Ni doping. An enhancement in the magnetization is observed for LFNO throughout the temperature range (400–5 K) compared to LFO. The antiferromagnetic state of LFO becomes ferrimagnetic at low temperatures, and a net magnetization is observed at room temperature with Ni doping. As Ni concentration increases, a systematic increment in the ferroelectric polarization is observed. This enhancement in polarization is believed to be due to the distortion in FeO5 cage, while the improvement in magnetic properties is due to the induced magnetic interactions, caused by the Fe-Ni interactions on the triangular lattice with Ni doping in LuFeO3.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.With the recent proposition of skyrmion utilization in racetrack memories at room temperature, skyrmionics has become a very attractive field. However, for the stability of skyrmions, it is essential to incorporate the Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction (DMI) and the out-of-plane magnetic field into the system. In this work, we explore a system without these interactions. First, we propose a controlled way for the creation of magnetic skyrmions and skyrmioniums imprinted on a ferromagnetic nanotrack via a nanopatterned nanodisk with the magnetic vortex state. Then we investigate the detachment of the imprinted spin textures from the underneath of the nanodisk, as well as its transport by the spin-transfer torque imposed by spin-polarized current pulses applied in the nanotrack. A prominent feature of the moving imprinted spin texture is that its topological number Q is oscillating around the averaged value of Q=0 as if it is a resonant state between the skyrmions with Q=±1 and the bubble with Q=0. We may call it a resonant magnetic soliton (RMS). A RMS moves along a straight line since it is free from the skyrmion Hall effect. In our studied device, the same electrodes are employed to realize the imprinted spin texture detachment and its transport. In addition, we have investigated the interaction between the RMS and a magnetic tunnel junction sensor, where the passing of the RMS in the nanotrack can be well detected. Our results would be useful for the development of novel spintronic devices based on moveable spin textures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The present work reports the preparation of polycrystalline SmFeO3 (SFO) and its characterization using bulk magnetization, 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy and ferroelectric polarization measurements. Temperature dependent bulk magnetization study shows crossover between zero-field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) curves at 4 K and slope variation of ZFC curve in 200–300 K region due to the spin switching transition which is found to be tunable with the applied magnetic field as observed in recent literature on single crystal SFO sample. From the temperature dependent Mössbauer measurements, transition from antiferromagnetic to paramagnetic state at about 708 K and signatures of temperature induced spin reorientation of Fe3+ are observed in quadrupole shift (QS) and A23 hyperfine parameters in the temperature range 450–500 K. The least square fitting to the temperature variation of Hint gives the critical exponent (β) ≈ 0.327 ± 0.001 suggesting the 3D Heisenberg magnet like behavior. The presence of ferroelectric ordering is shown from ferroelectric and PUND (Positive Up Negative Down) data measured at low temperatures (200 K).© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we investigate the characteristics of antenna for propagating-spin-wave-spectroscopy (PSWS) experiment in ferromagnetic thin films. Firstly, we simulate the amplitude and phase distribution of the high-frequency magnetic field around antenna by high frequency structure simulator (HFSS). And then k distribution of the antenna is obtained by fast Fourier transformation (FFT). Furthermore, three kinds of antenna designs, i.e. micro-strip line, coplanar waveguide (CPW), loop, are studied and compared. How the dimension parameter of antenna influence the corresponding high-frequency magnetic field amplitude and k distribution are investigated in details.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We present a time-resolved study of the evolution of the spin-wave intensity and phase in a local parametric spin-wave amplifier at pumping powers close to the threshold of parametric generation. We show that the phase of the amplified spin waves is determined by the phase of the incoming signal-carrying spin waves and that it can be preserved on long time scales as long as the energy input by the input spin waves is provided. In contrast, the phase-information is lost in such a local spin-wave amplifier as soon as the input spin-wave is switched off. These findings are an important benchmark for the use of parametric amplifiers in logic circuits relying on the spin-wave phase as information carrier.© 2017 The AuthorsUsing first-principles calculations, based on disordered local moment theory, combined with the self-interaction corrected local spin density approximation, we study magnetic interactions in GdX intermetallics for X = Cu, Zn, Ga, Cd, and Mg. Our predicted magnetic orders and ordering temperatures both at zero and other pressures agree well with experiments including the large increase in the Curie temperature of GdCd under pressure that is shown by our own experimental measurements. From our results it emerges that the Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yosida interaction on its own can not explain the observed behaviour under pressure, and that the magnetic ordering mechanism is strongly influenced by the occupations of both Gd and anion d-bands.© 2017Magnonics offers a new way for information transport that uses spin waves (SWs) and is free of charge currents. Unlike Damon-Eshbach SWs, the magneto-static forward volume SWs offer the reciprocity configuration suitable for SW logic devices with low power consumption. Here, we study forward volume SW propagation in yttrium iron garnet (YIG) thin films with an ultra-low damping constant α=8×10-5. We design different integrated microwave antenna with different k-vector excitation distributions on YIG thin films. Using a vector network analyzer, we measured SW transmission with the films magnetized in perpendicular orientation. Based on the experimental results, we extract the group velocity as well as the dispersion relation of SWs and directly compare the power efficiency of SW propagation in YIG using coplanar waveguide and micro stripline for SW excitation and detection.© 2017The longitudinal resistivity and anomalous Hall resistivity of 50 nm Co2FeSi films deposited on Si (1 0 0) substrate at different temperatures have been investigated as functions of disorder. The film deposited at 450 °C has minimum disorder and the lowest temperature (Tmin ∼ 11 K) at which resistivity goes through a minimum as a function of temperature. The film with the highest disorder has the largest Tmin, residual resistivity and absolute value of resistivity at any given temperature. The resistivity data have been analyzed taking into account the contributions from electron-electron scattering, electron-phonon scattering and disorder-induced enhanced electron-electron interaction, which dominates at low temperatures. The effect of Tmin is observed in Hall resistivity for all the samples. Anomalous Hall conductivity (AHC) is extremely sensitive to the degree of disorder present in the films and has the value 180 S/cm at 300 K for the most ordered TS450 film, which tallies well with the theoretically calculated value for the Co2FeSi alloy with L21 structure. The influence of disorder on the longitudinal resistivity and anomalous Hall effect has been discussed in detail.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.‘Zero-field’ linear ac magnetic susceptibility, χ1(T), of the Cr75−xFe25+x (x = 0, 5) thin films with thickness, t, ranging from 980 to 10 nm has been measured at temperatures close to Tc, the temperature at which the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic phase transition occurs. An elaborate analysis of χ1(T⩾Tc) for the films with t⩾40nm yields the temperature dependence of the effective critical exponent for susceptibility, γeff(T), that is characteristic of the three-dimensional (3D) isotropic Heisenberg-to-3D isotropic dipolar crossover. In the asymptotic critical region (ACR), these thin-film samples behave as a 3D isotropic dipolar (ID) ferromagnet. As the film thickness reduces from t≃ 980 nm to 40 nm, ACR narrows down while the temperature, Tdip, at which a dip in γeff(T) occurs and the temperature, TIH∗, that marks the onset of the 3D isotropic Heisenberg (IH) behavior, shift to lower temperatures. For a given t, the width of ACR as well as the characteristic temperatures Tdip and TIH∗ increase with decreasing (increasing) Fe (Cr) concentration. Consistent with these observations, the ratios involving nonlinear ac magnetic susceptibilities obey the generalized magnetic equation of state with 3D ID critical exponents and the value of Tc same as that determined from χ1(T). A quantitative comparison between theory and experiment highlights certain limitations of the existing theories. The films with t≲ 20 nm do not exhibit 3D IH-to-3D ID crossover. Instead, the critical behavior of Cr70Fe30 thin films with t = 21 nm and t = 11 nm is that of a 3D IH and 3D Ising ferromagnet, respectively. By contrast, a 3D Ising (spin glass) critical behavior is observed in the Cr75Fe25 thin film with t = 19 nm (t = 12 nm). Curie temperature, Tc, decreases with film thickness in accordance with the finite-size scaling.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the spin wave filtering and guiding properties of periodic array of single (Permalloy and Fe) and bi-layer (Py/Fe) nanowires (NWs) by means of Brillouin light scattering measurements and micromagnetic simulations. For all the nanowire arrays, the thickness of the layers is 10 nm while all NWs have the same width of 340 nm and edge-to-edge separation of 100 nm. Spin wave dispersion has been measured in the Damon-Eshbach configuration for wave vector either parallel or perpendicular to the nanowire length. This study reveals the filtering property of the spin waves when the wave vector is perpendicular to the NW length, with frequency ranges where the spin wave propagation is permitted separated by frequency band gaps, and the guiding property of NW when the wave vector is oriented parallel to the NW, with spin wave modes propagating in parallel channels in the central and edge regions of the NW. The measured dispersions were well reproduced by micromagnetic simulations, which also deliver the spatial profiles for the modes at zero wave vector. To reproduce the dispersion of the modes localized close to the NW edges, uniaxial anisotropy has been introduced. In the case of Permalloy/iron NWs, the obtained results have been compared with those for a 20 nm thick effective NW having average magnetic properties of the two materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We investigated two-dimensional magnonic structures which are the counterparts of photonic quasicrystals forming Penrose tiling. We considered the slab composed of Ni (or Py) disks embedded in Fe (or Co) matrix. The disks are arranged in quasiperiodic Penrose-like structure. The infinite quasicrystal was approximated by its rectangular section with periodic boundary conditions applied. This approach allowed us to use the plane wave method to find the frequency spectrum of eigenmodes for spin waves and their spatial profiles. The calculated integrated density of states shows more distinctive magnonic gaps for the structure composed of materials of high magnetic contrast (Ni and Fe) and relatively high filling fraction. This proves the impact of quasiperiodic long-range order on the spectrum of spin waves. We also investigated the localization of spin wave eingenmodes resulting from the quasiperiodicity of the structure.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the effect of film thickness and rapid thermal annealing on the spin reorientations in Tb-Fe films grown on flexible polyimide substrates. Magnetization studies indicated that the spins reorient from in-plane to out-of-plane direction with increase in film thicknesses. This was confirmed by magnetic force microscopy studies which showed weak featureless contrast for films deposited with lower thickness and a strong out-of-plane contrast for films grown with higher thicknesses. On subsequent rapid thermal annealing all the Tb-Fe films exhibited in-plane magnetic anisotropy. The results were explained based on competition between uniaxial and shape anisotropies, nature of residual stresses as well as nucleation of crystalline Fe phase in an amorphous Tb-Fe matrix on rapid thermal annealing.